<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6273</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAE2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / The FT Goes Shopping (7): Brutal game behind the painted
smile / A look at the cosmetics industry
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
COSMETICS has always been a brutal business. It was, after all, Elizabeth
Arden, one of the grandes dames of the beauty industry, who called it 'the
most vicious . . . in the world'.
But the cosmetics industry of the early 1990s is more brutal than ever
before. The dominant theme in its development during the 1980s was the wave
of mergers and acquisitions that swept across the US and Europe. This has
left the market in the hands of a small number of powerful players -
Unilever, with Elizabeth Arden and Calvin Klein Cosmetics; L'Oreal, which
owns Helena Rubenstein and Lancome; and Procter &amp; Gamble, with Max Factor
and Cover Girl.
These multinationals have already raised the stakes in the industry by
putting pressure on the smaller companies which cannot afford to sign up
celebrities or super-models for extravagant advertising campaigns, as
Lancome have done with Isabella Rossellini, and Revlon by paying Dollars 6m
(Pounds 3.9m) to Claudia Schiffer for a four year contract and Dollars 3m to
Cindy Crawford for three years.
The level of competition is now intensifying thanks to the Japanese
cosmetics companies - Shiseido, Kao and Shu Uemera - that are accelerating
their expansion into the West. Shu Uemera is opening its glossy boutiques
all over Europe and Shiseido this summer launched a Dollars 2m Haute
Parfumerie in the 17th century arcades of the Palais Royal in Paris.
Meanwhile, the entire cosmetics industry is threatened by the depressed
state of some markets, notably the UK, and by the spectre of legislative
intervention in areas such as product testing.
Where does all this leave the consumer and how will the changes in the
cosmetics industry affect the kind of products which will come on to the
market in the 1990s? The short answer is that, while the new global
cosmetics groups are struggling for sales in an increasingly competitive
market, their customers ought to be able to look forward to a stream of new
and increasingly sophisticated products.
The leitmotif of cosmetics in the 1990s will be innovation. This is partly
because the customer base will be increasingly fragmented, with more older
consumers and greater emphasis on the ethnic market. It also reflects the
more sophisticated research and development activities of the multinational
manufacturers. L'Oreal, Unilever and Procter &amp; Gamble operate across dozens
of different product sectors so can apply the technological advances
achieved in one area, to others.
The effects are already apparent. Definicils, the 'High Definition' mascara
launched last year by Lancome really does make eyelashes look longer and
sleeker thanks to the years of research that L'Oreal has invested in its
haircare companies. Other new products, such as Chanel's foundation, which
moistens at the touch of the fingers, are the legacy of complex research
programmes.
All you have to do is to glance at the names of the latest cosmetic launches
to see where the market is going. Helena Rubenstein's Skin Life TPA Eye
Contour Cream (anti-wrinkle cream) and Clinique's Turnaround Cream with
salicylic-filled liposomes (tonic cream) sound like complex chemical
formulae rather than skin creams.
The cosmetics companies are also harnessing their research resources to
areas of the market they had neglected. Coloured and black women have a far
wider range of skin tones than their Caucasian counterparts, 37 as opposed
to seven. This means that manufacturers need to devise more shades, making
product development more costly and complex.
As a result darker-skinned women have had to mix their own shades from
conventional cosmetics, or buy products from specialist companies.
Mainstream US makers are using their improved technology to move into this
market. Maybelline last year introduced a Shades of You line while Clinique
introduced Colour Deeps and Almay brought out Darker Tones.
The emphasis on technological innovation is accompanied by the parallel
trend towards more natural cosmetics such as those of Clarins and Body Shop.
One of the fastest growing cosmetics ranges in the US is Origins Natural
Resources, the botanically-based products from Estee Lauder.
This trend is likely to be accelerated by legislative pressure such as the
recent recommendation by the European Parliament to ban animal testing of
cosmetics. All the big cosmetics companies have long been preparing for such
an initiative by developing alternative forms of testing by computer
analysis and cell structures.
Almost all the recent innovations in make-up have been achieved without
recourse to animal testing. However, the ban could affect research into skin
products such as anti-ageing creams and sun screens, raising the cost of
innovation and making the beauty business even more complex and competitive
in the 1990s.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6274</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAE1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / The FT Goes Shopping (6): Luxury - a dated concept in the
90s - Meretricious displays of wealth are completely passe now, says Stephen
Bayley in his philosophical view of what the rich buy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEPHEN BAYLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LUXURY, at least as defined many of the goods people accumulate, is vulgar
and venal. Luxury, in my observation, is not necessarily about pleasure, but
more likely about excess.
Other than a meretricious and crass display of wealth, there is no good
reason, for example, why taps should be gold. In a sense, luxury is the
opposite of design. Industrial civilisation has the potential to provide the
best goods and services to the entire population at a modest cost and,
miserable as we may be in this fin-de-siecle, it is a fact that for many
western citizens this paradise has been achieved.
That is what all the early Modernist Bauhaus theory was concerned with. Now
stigmatised by those who would often wilfully aim to misunderstand them,
Modernist architects and designers were not trying to impose an austere
machine aesthetic on the glum and downtrodden people of Europe. Rather, the
metal furniture and concrete houses were just making the best of materials
available, making the most of contemporary possibilities. The classics of
modern design made a popular form of luxury commonplace in that for the
first time in history efficient, safe and beautiful furniture and appliances
became universal. That the word 'luxury' now connotes something more vulgar
and expensive than a Breuer chair or a Citroen 2cv is both a repudiation of
the Modernist adventure and a reaction to it.
The rot set into the meaning of 'luxury' in Britain when some time in the
1950s a hotshot marketeer working for Ford, the motor company, decided that
a premium priced model of the Ford Anglia might be ennobled with the name
'de luxe'. In the poetics of car specifications, de luxe meant the addition
of external chrome strips, elaborated mouldings around the rear light
clusters and two-tone upholstery. It was hard for words to recover from such
debasement.
In America, where the achievement of status has long been measured in terms
of accumulated possessions, the idea of luxury has acquired a fetishistic
quality. It can be defined by a powerful and evocative list of artefacts. In
her autobiography, Ali McGraw, the actress, describes her astonishment on
arrival in Hollywood. The house was mock Georgian on a huge plot, with an
artificially fed 300-year-old sycamore. There were scented candles (a sure
definition of luxury at work) and in the linen cabinets hundreds of bars of
Guerlain soap. She cannot have been under anything other than a very clear
impression that this was a luxury dwelling.
Although Flaubert, in his sardonic Dictionnaire des Idees Recus posed as the
homme serieux and defined luxury as 'the ruin of nations,' the French are
more confidant with their tastes and sense than the English or the
Americans.
There is something marvellous about French culture which allows intellectual
rigour to go hand-in-hand with intense sensual delight. The best French
cooking or wine is a challenge to the intellect as much as to the palate;
and while the German Modernists of the 1920s were doggedly making severe and
honourable metal furniture out of discarded industrial components, Le
Corbusier's 'Grand Confort' armchair kept the Modernist faith, but was also
a supremely elegant, comfortable and luxurious artefact.
The tradition continues: Andree Putman is perhaps the leading European
interior designer. She is rigidly modernist, but sensible of her clients'
and their customers' needs. She says: 'To God and to artists all materials
are the same.' This is a sophisticated belief that unites the purist ethics
of modern design with the sensitivity of a mondaine sensualist. No gold taps
here.
But, if in general luxury and modern design are at variance, then in the
past decade they have been at war. London and Paris have long established
tradesman-craftsmen houses specialising in luxury goods, whether Lobb shoes,
Purdey shotguns, Swaine Adeney &amp; Brigg saddlery, Cartier watches, Christofle
silver or Baccarat glass.
So influential are these makers of exclusive premium-priced personal-ware
that entire personalities are defined by them, In France, a certain type of
woman is known by the deadly accurate acronym 'FHCP': Foulard Hermes,
Collier de Perles. In this way, luxury goods define their customers in a
process which anthropologists would recognise.
In France the luxury goods business is taken seriously. With typical French
panache for bureaucracy, 71 luxury goods makers (including Louis Vuitton,
Hermes, Cartier, Dior and Chanel) have formed the the portentously titled
Comite Colbert, as if to suggest malettiers, vignerons and joailliers are
providing the continuity of French artistic culture. Despite the recession,
the Comite Colbert reports rising sales.
One explanation of this may be psychological. A Paris psychiatrist called
Michel Lejoyeux says he has identified a form of obsessive-compulsive
disorder which seeks gratification from buying things, as if the act of
purchasing (irrespective of eventual use) establishes power and authority
over a harrowing world.
But the real explanation of the continued demand for luxury goods is social
and aesthetic rather than psychological. The 20th century has made the major
western economies rich in that most own, or have access to, a range of
machines - from the car through the video to the cellphone to the occasional
use of a Boeing 747. Marinetti's dream of motorways and aircraft is part of
our daily routine. As soon as those things - which by their familiarity and
accessibility are a triumph of our civilisation - become everyday, the
insecure or the greedy will seek specialist treatment. This is where the
taste for gold taps comes from.
It is why Donald Trump sends out morocco-bound invitations to his latest
pleasure palace. It explains the astonishing demand for the S-class
Mercedes-Benz, a car of boastfulness and arrogance three times more
expensive than other cars in its class.
The greedy and insecure take refuge in this limited definition of luxury.
They can find another version of it in the immature, brackish splendour of,
say, London's new Lanesborough Hotel. But in truth is there not something
inadequate about definitions of luxury which entail exclusiveness, expense
and rarity? Are not luxury goods consumers living in a costly fantasy world?
Of course, but maybe that is the source of the pleasure.
In times of excess, real pleasure is defined by experience rather than
merchandise. Only the most curmudgeonly would deny that lunch in Paris's
Crillon Hotel is a life-enhancing experience.
But then I look around and feel glad I do not have gold taps. In a crowded
world the great challenge is to make life more simple and less complicated.
Real luxury is the ability to choose how to spend your time and arrange your
space.
'Luxury' goods may be of supreme quality and may confer a certain cachet in
the village long-hut of the international rich, but the concept is dated and
limited.
Sixty years ago, in The Price of Things, Elinor Glyn had a character say:
'If one consciously and deliberately desires happiness . . . one must have
sufficient strength of will to banish all thought.' Writing today, she would
banish luxury.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6275</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAE0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / The FT Goes Shopping (5): Cost-conscious gems - Vivienne
Becker considers baubles that won't break the bank
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VIVIENNE BECKER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
APART FROM the spectacular arrival of Christian Lacroix, the great fashion
phenomenon of the 1980s was surely the rise in status of costume jewellery.
Reflecting the glamour and power of the post-feminist years, it entirely
changed the way women presented themselves and broke through enormous social
and fashion barriers.
From a lowly position as declasse poor relation to diamonds and pearls,
costume jewellery suddenly became the single most important fashion
accessory of the decade, worn in the highest echelons of society, at all
times of day, from the boardroom to the ballroom.
The 1960s paved the way with its beads and baubles and plastic
anti-jewellery. The lead came both from street fashion, from pop-star rebels
wearing antique 'junk' jewellery and from the great couture houses,
encouraged by the growth of the designer-accessories market. Dallas and
Dynasty power dressing and the Princess of Wales spurred things on and,
since the mid-1980s, the costume jewellery industry has been booming
worldwide. Today the market is saturated with costume jewels from costly
couture to cheaper-than-cheap copies of copies.
The success of the 1980s has been toned down by recession. But, it appears
that the costume jewellery market has been less badly affected than the
fashion trade. People prefer to spend money on lasting accessories rather
than on seasonal new clothes.
Jewellery is now an important money-spinning and marketing aspect of
couture. A piece of designer jewellery, a pair of Chanel earrings, for
example, has been the ideal and affordable way for women to wallow in the
designer identity parade. Just how much of the original designer's genius
they actually end up with is debatable and varies from house to house.
Costume jewellery is the jewellery women buy for themselves. But, as with
fine jewellery, there are signs that women no longer wish to be dictated to
by names and are slowly beginning to look further afield at the huge feast
of faux treasures on offer. There are also signs that the barriers between
real and costume jewellery are breaking down as more and more silver, gold
plated and semi-precious jewellery creeps onto the counters.
In 1989 Swarovski, the world's leading producer of cut crystal stones (all
those gems in costume jewels all over the world) launched its Daniel
Swarovski range of exclusive, couture accessories aimed at the very top of
the market and selling at the sort of prices that some real jewellery used
to command - anything from Dollars 700 (Pounds 463.50) to Dollars 5,000.
Masterminded in Paris by Rosemarie Le Callais, the accessories, including a
high profile range of costume jewellery, are designed by Herve Leger.
They quickly gathered high-profile fans. Ivana Trump and Catherine Deneuve
are devoted customers.
Christian Lacroix produces genuinely exciting and original couture
jewellery. It is a true reflection of his spirit and style and seems to have
more integrity than some because Lacroix himself is passionate about jewels
and has done a great deal to bring fashion and ornament closer together,
creating bejewelled and embroidered dresses and couture jewels that look
like fabrics.
Haute Couture jewels are normally ordered by couture customers as part of
the total look, and are rarely sold separately. His distinctive ready to
wear range, priced from about Pounds 30 to Pounds 600 also bears the Lacroix
stamp: lots of rich gilt metal, ritualistic emblems like crosses, crescents
and pyramids, huge ethnic chokers and of course vibrant colours in the form
of glass beads. At the London boutique opened some three months ago, the
jewellery has a steady following among Lacroix fans, particularly from
fashion students hankering after a little piece of his wild magic.
Karl Lagerfeld, the King of Whimsy, was largely responsible for introducing
wit and fantasy into couture jewellery in the l980s, first at Chloe then at
Chanel, where courageous jewellery, totally in the spirit of Coco Chanel,
plays a vital part. His haute couture jewels are inspired.
The Yves Saint Laurent couture range is under the direction of Loulou de la
Falaise, whose jewels fill a boutique on the rue Saint Honore in Paris. The
diffusion range, part of the YSL collection, including pens, lighters,
leather goods, is designed and distributed by Cartier as licensee, although
everything is approved by Saint Laurent himself and Pierre Berge. Designs
play up Saint Laurent's signature motifs like the heart and strong colours
like his vibrant deep blue. Since Cartier took over eight years ago, more
than 1m pieces have been sold worldwide. The Dior collection, made under
licence in Germany, is a mass-market product today. Fior, the London
retailer of fine quality 'real look jewellery' stopped stocking Dior
jewellery a few years ago because it was too widely available.
Several of today's shining stars of costume jewellery began anonymously
making couture jewellery for big names. Some of the most successful are
Herve van der Straeten, whose work is sold at Liberty and who made for
Mugler and Lacroix, Dinny Hall who produced ranges for Rifat Ozbek, and
Migeon et Migeon resin specialists who also made ornaments for Lacroix and
YSL.
Cobra and Bellamy, with a successful shop in Liberty and another in Sloane
Street, do a roaring trade in Chanel lookalike pearls. Cobra and Bellamy's
big rows of baroque pearls sell for around Pounds 100 to Pounds 200 and a
ravishing three-row collar for about Pounds 250.
Butler and Wilson, Britain's best, and world leaders in up-market costume
jewellery, have always offered a couture look at reasonable prices, but they
sell to jewellery addicts rather than to fashion followers.
Although business is undoubtedly tougher, Butler and Wilson is selling
classics and outrageous designs. and Simon Wilson says he is always amazed
at how well the 'mad' and expensive pieces sell - usually the designs he
creates as a strong image for the shops. Huge chokers at around Pounds 200,
although hardly a recessionary look, are just walking out.
Perhaps it is the escapism, the freedom and fantasy of costume jewellery
that we need to pierce the gloom and lift our spirits and confidence this
Christmas.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6276</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAEZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / The FT Goes Shopping (4): The finest of jewels to bewitch
and bedazzle - Customers are becoming more discerning
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VIVIENNE BECKER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE IS nothing to beat the sumptuous jewel: the ultimate icon of wealth,
status and femininity, which at its best combines natural beauty with the
artistry of man.
Jewellery has existed since time immemorial. In turbulent times it became a
convenient source of portable wealth. 18th century aristocrats fled Paris
with their jewel encrusted snuff boxes, and during the Russian Revolution
pocketfuls of Faberge trinkets were smuggled across Europe.
However, the intrinsic value of the precious metals and gems that makes
jewels so special also means it is hard to admire them for their beauty
alone - somewhere along the way the investment element inevitably creeps in.
Unlike a Versace dress of the same price, a jewel can still be turned into
ready cash even if the days of expecting a large profit are over. But in
these depressed times jewellery investment is a dangerous game - too many
diamond-laden fingers were burned when the jewellery and gemstone market
fell in 1982 after a long period of rising prices. The lesson has not been
forgotten and the attitude towards jewellery has changed. Buyers are more
realistic about the investment possibilities and have come to take a greater
interest in the intrinsic appeal of the pieces.
While the 1970s were an investment-crazy time, the 1980s saw the development
of a world-wide obsession with brands. The art of the jeweller became
subservient to clever marketing and image. Happily, the early 1990s sees a
different mood. It is no longer possible to sell jewellery on name alone.
Customers are becoming more discerning and are looking for good value rather
than investment, and value in terms of lasting style, workmanship and
materials.
One reason for the change in attitude was the 1980s boom in costume
jewellery, during which women became used to buying decorative, glamorous
and exciting jewels that flattered and changed their image in an instant.
The intrinsic worth of the materials did not really matter. Now they look at
real jewels with a different eye, demanding more than just a label,
searching for lasting modern classics or for fantasy jewels in precious
materials.
The fine jewellery trade is still dominated by the great international
jewel-houses - Cartier, Boucheron, Tiffany, Chaumet, Bulgari etc. Then come
the smaller companies that are privately owned and run by artistic
designers, the most exclusive being JAR of Paris and Verdura in New York,
followed by shops such as Marina B in Geneva and Elizabeth Gage in London,
all dedicated to individuality and quality.
Ward Landrigan, of Verdura in New York, finds that there is a 'much, much
stronger consciousness of style today. Generic jewels - jewellery without a
strong design element - are the orphans in the market today.' Joel
Rosenthal, of JAR, also thinks that: 'A new eye is being developed, little
by little. Many of our customers are becoming much more discerning.'
The very top end of the business, dealing in ravishing jewels in the Dollars
500,000 to Dollars 1m (Pounds 331,000 to Pounds 600,000) range, is
relatively little affected, so specialised is its appeal. Each of the
jewellery houses keeps its own corner of classic 'high jewellery,' usually
the more conventional, formal sets of precious gems and diamonds.
London-based Laurence Graff, which is opening a new shop in Bond Street next
spring, has cornered the market in magnificent stones, selling fine and rare
gems to the world's most important buyers, who are, he points out, still
buying. He finds that internationally there are fewer people in the market
for the world's most precious stones but the top clients - kings, sultans,
sheikhs, princes and potentates and the like  - are still there.
Once, the great jewel houses were also privately owned by talented, artistic
and dedicated individuals and their families, who ran their businesses in a
highly personal way. Now many of these jewel houses are part of
multi-national big businesses, run to a great extent from the board room.
Tiffany, which expanded its very successful London shop a year ago, is a
public company, after a management buyout from Avon in 1984. Bulgari is
still 93 per cent family-owned, while Boucheron is privately owned.
The mighty Cartier group ranks number one worldwide in the luxury goods
market in terms of figures and market share. In 1991 the group's turnover
was well over SFr1,800m (Pounds 829m). Although those golden, creative years
of Cartier died with the family, customers today buy a slice of the Cartier
magic and history along with the name.
M. Bamberger, managing director of Cartier UK, said: 'To say that we are not
hit by the recession would be ridiculous. But we have such a wide range of
products from accessories, watches, high jewellery to perfume, that we are
coping well. Figures are up on last year.'
During the boom years of the 1980s many houses started promoting more
accessible 'boutique' ranges to reach a wider market. The first of these was
the successful concept 'Les Must de Cartier' launched in 1973 to break down
intimidating barriers associated with fine jewellery and to attract a new,
younger clientele. These boutique jewels, along with watches, became
sought-after status symbols.
The Gulf War hit the top end of the jewellery market hard. The Middle
Eastern customers who formed the backbone of many jewellery businesses
stopped buying completely while other jet-setting customers, especially
Americans, stopped travelling and therefore shopping. The US market is now
showing some signs of picking up. In Japan and the Far East, however,
economies are suffering. Middle Eastern buyers have now cautiously resumed
buying. The UK, even in the good times, has never had an uninhibited home
market, Britons being temperamentally disinclined to spend money on such
conspicuous luxury.
For Italian women, mid-way in culture and mentality between Europe and the
Middle East, jewels are an essential part of their femininity and so
inventive designers, such as Damiani, have flourished by catering to their
needs with extravagant, fearless designs.
Bulgari epitomises the classic side of Italian style and has grown in
stature since the 1970s. Nicola and Paolo Bulgari believe that making
jewellery is a creative business, its real raison d'etre, and that
constantly reworking old themes is not the way ahead. They introduced the
rich Renaissance 'cabochon' look, an unconventional mix of uncut stones
mixed with gold and steel which established a debonair, modern style that
has an avid international following.
Chaumet was one of the grand old Paris jewellers with a fine shop in the
Place Vendome but after a scandal that landed the Chaumet brothers in prison
it was bought by Investcorp in 1987. The new owners worked hard to establish
a 'look', principally through a range called Anneau. At the same time they
went back to basics, promoting the most classic piece of jewellery, the
diamond ring, which continues to be their most important product.
Chaumet has made a point of actively launching new products and constantly
renewing itself: next month, Chaumet London is launching a range of exciting
semi-precious jewels designed by interior decorator David Hicks. It is an
enterprising venture offering quite different fare from the sort normally to
be found in the grand jewellers.
Of the old established houses, Boucheron alone is owned and run by its
original family: Alain Boucheron is the fourth generation of this jewellery
dynasty. Daniel Reveyron, director of Boucheron in London, believes it is
important to take a long term view of the jewellery business, which,
although buffeted by recession, is very much a survivor: 'Jewellery answers
one of the most ancient and basic instincts. The need for it will always be
there.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6277</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAEYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / The FT Goes Shopping (3):  For fashion or fling, a scarf's
just the thing / A look at the evolution of a top accessory
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By AVRIL GROOM
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EVERY SCARF shop will tell you the story of the woman who meets a friend
wearing a particularly luscious silk square and asks: 'Is it real?'
'Real' generally means one of the classic equestrian or Baroque styles from
Hermes which have become the much-copied pinnacle of aspiration. Yet, this
is misleading. There are thousands of exquisite designs and fabrics from
other illustrious labels, and Hermes itself does a huge range of less
classic motifs.
So, wearing a scarf can be an act of public status-display or private
comfort. You can choose one with a designer label in a prominent position or
you can throw on the plainest slip of cashmere and silk that feels wonderful
or lifts a plain outfit. The true aficionado knows a stylish scarf
instantly. If you have to ask if it is real, then you are not up to wearing
it.
Hermes' pre-eminence came about almost by accident - it was first with a
brilliant idea. Having diversified from equestrian to motor age accessories,
it launched scarves in 1937. The first big success, Entente Cordiale, was
kept under wraps during the German occupation of France. After the
liberation, the windows of the Paris store were filled with the new design,
which was snapped up.
The scarves' quality - designs take 2 1/2 years from concept to shop and can
involve up to 36 colours, each of which needs its own print-screen -
attracted a top-line clientele, emphasised later by the patronage of such
celebrities as Grace Kelly.
When fashion went back to glamour and formality in the 1980s, Hermes went
into overdrive, boosted by the newly label-conscious Far East market.
Despite a big range of other products, scarves, made in France and costing
Pounds 129 each, now constitute the main part of its business.
Each company connected loosely with fashion feels it needs a signature scarf
as part of its corporate image. Through the 1980s, this was a great
marketing ploy which played on the customer's need for confidence through
labels. Some designs were less than subtle, though. Burberry used its rather
dominant house check on its first silk scarf in 1980. Now, in a more
sophisticated marketplace, there are 15 more gentle varieties of that check,
plus 30 other designs where the check-as-logo might be just the ribbon on a
bunch of flowers. Made in Italy, they cost from Pounds 85 to Pounds 105.
There are aspirational scarves at all levels of the market. For top fashion
houses, a scarf can be the point of entry that lures you on to more
expensive things. Chanel's Bernadette Rendalls says: 'Lipsticks are the
basic introduction to the world of Chanel but a scarf or a pair of earrings
often comes next, before the handbags or clothes.'
Designs vary from the classic, incorporating the famous double C logo, to
the specials that Karl Lagerfeld designs for each clothes collection. Next
spring's, in fashionably 1940s' style, feature his witty sketches of house
symbols - camellias, quilted bags and so on - on faded pastel backgrounds.
They cost from Pounds 115.
Celine is more classic: its main growth areas are the large wraps, stoles
and throws which high designer fashion now takes for granted. Its range is
from Pounds 90 to Pounds 200.
Even in the mass market, there is an element of exclusiveness. Tie Rack uses
much thinner silk and designs with only 10 colours (although often
overprinted to make more) and, by turning to high-tech methods in Japan, can
sell at a maximum of Pounds 25. Art school graduates design limited edition
ranges which change every month and disappear quickly to regular customers.
The designs may be heavily influenced by the likes of Versace and English
Eccentrics, but if you want a scarf for every outfit this is the reasonable
way to do it.
There is, however, another approach to scarves which is growing as the
market becomes less label-obsessed. Here, choice depends totally on design,
either its beauty or the exquisite quality of fabric or because it
complements an outfit from the same house.
Gucci, for instance, says its scarves are 'bought as the finishing touch
with an outfit. Sales are increasing as our clothes in general become more
high profile.' Made in Italy, the scarves are Pounds 120. At Yves St
Laurent, a plain silk scarf often adds an unexpected but totally appropriate
colour note to an outfit, and there is also a tradition of a different
animal-print scarf each season.
Loewe's beautiful scarves on Spanish themes - often historical - also are
collectors' pieces, the latest being inspired by Velasquez and the Madrid
botanic gardens. And Louis Vuitton's scarves, commissioned from well-known
contemporary designers such as Gae Aulenti and Philippe Starck, could almost
be used as wall hangings and go from Pounds 130 to Pounds 180.
Jewellery houses have discovered that their designs translate very well into
classic scarves of the pearl-swag and chain variety. Cartier's newest
designs, based on the Duchess of Windsor's famous flamingo brooch and on
Egyptian-inspired jewels, cost Pounds 110.
Lalique has taken the same route this year as part of its expanding product
range, with designs at Pounds 150 based on famous Art Nouveau pieces from
Rene Lalique's archives.
Classic scarves come mostly from Europe but British designers are in the
vanguard of a new direction. Georgina von Etzdorf started as a screen
printer, but scarves now make up 73 per cent of her turnover, which
increased by 15 per cent last year.
She is known best for Art Deco-inspired prints on silk or velvet but is now
trying matt linen, sheeny panne velvet and metallic organza, all in the
pale, muted shades of fashion's new light and fluid mood. Prices go from
Pounds 69.
English Eccentrics' forte is the rich baroque motif with which it has
experimented since 1987 in all colourways, from the most vivid to strict
monochrome. It is now working also with more delicate colours and fabrics
and with the newly fashionable long, rather than square, scarf (from Pounds
81).
Young designer Jackie Campbell, whose fragile watered chiffons, priced from
Pounds 52.50 are acquiring a cult following, sums up the new approach.
'I am not competing with the Hermes silk twill status symbol,' she says.
'Chiffon is much softer and subtler, an enhancement of clothes rather than a
designer afterthought.'
As women increasingly forsake the prop of the label, the great scarf houses
may have to take note.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6278</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAEXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / The FT Goes Shopping (2): Hey, big spenders - please come
back / The mounting problems of the luxury goods industry, which is facing
both recession and a backlash against the conspicuous consumption of the
1980s
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SOME people, it seems, just cannot stop spending money. The other day, a
wealthy Arab commandeered no fewer than 64 rooms at the Hotel Bristol in
Paris and set off on a shopping spree with his female friends. The bill came
to Dollars 500,000 - and that was just for Giorgio Armani.
Unfortunately for Armani and his fellow fashion designers, the shopaholic
Arab is the exception rather than the rule. The luxury goods industry is in
the doldrums.
The smart shopping streets of New York, London and Milan are scarred by
boarded-up windows. Some businesses have gone bust. Others are struggling
for survival.
The recession is the biggest problem, of course. Not only has it left
consumers with less money to spend - it has contributed to the backlash
against the conspicuous consumption of the 1980s by creating a new climate
in which splashing out on status symbols is not quite the thing to do.
But the effect of the recession has been aggravated by the internal changes
within the industry. A new breed of groups dealing in luxury goods invested
in fashion during the 1980s - Dunhill with Chloe and Karl Lagerfeld; Orcofi,
which owns Lanvin; and Bernard Arnault's interests, which include Christian
Dior, Givenchy and Christian Lacroix.
These companies have raised the cost of competing in the luxury sector,
thereby intensifying the pressure on smaller players. The problems were
apparent even before the recession and now seem set to worsen in the chilly
climate of the early 1990s.
When the new investors first appeared, their influence was almost purely
positive. They brought new capital into the industry together with the
management skills that (they hoped) would modernise the old-established
fashion houses.
These groups all adopted similar strategies, generally following the
precedent set by Alain Wertheimer, the reclusive Swiss businessman who took
over Chanel late in the 1970s. They rationalised their newly-acquired
companies by weeding out the less prestigious licencees and retail outlets.
They also brought in new, younger designers to revitalise the creative side
of the businesses.
They harnessed the publicity generated by these designers to launch new
perfumes and licenced lines. Then, they invested heavily to maintain the
high profiles of their fashion houses. There were lavish fragrance launch
parties, soaring advertising budgets and extravagant catwalk collections.
It is no coincidence that the rise of the super-models, with their fees of
up to Dollars 10,000 a show, came at the same time as the expansion of the
luxury goods groups.
All this spending made fashion seem more exciting. The new investors even
managed to allay initial fears that transforming fashion into a serious
business could compromise its creativity. This was mainly because one of the
main themes of fashion in the 1980s was the use of the collections as
publicity vehicles to generate press coverage for the scents, sunglasses and
licenced lines that really made money.
It was, thus, in the financial interest of the new investors to allow their
designers to be as wild and wacky as they wished. The signature Y-fronts
sported by the super-models at last month's Chanel show might not ammount to
much in sales terms - Chanel will be selling them this spring at Pounds 100
a pair - but they produced hundreds of thousands of pounds in free
publicity.
Moreover, the stylistic trends of the 1980s - reflecting the opulence of the
decade and the post-modernist emphasis on reinterpreting historical imagery
 -were compatible with the aims of the new investors. They wanted their
designers to create luxurious images for the fashion houses - preferably
laced with an air of European 'authenticity' to appeal to the fast-growing
Japanese market.
As a result, the new investors benefited from a happy confluence between
their own commercial needs and the creative direction of fashion design. But
all that has changed.
The new themes in fashion, the hippy nouvelle styles in the latest Paris and
Milan collections, and the 'grunge' look that surfaced in New York, are not
suited nearly as well to the needs of the luxury goods groups as the glossy
fashions of the 1980s.
Many established houses have reverted to their old roles of creating
glamorous looks for the middle-aged customers who make up the bulk of their
market. This is the strategy that Lanvin has chosen by replacing the
flamboyant Claude Montana, with the more muted Dominique Morlotti.
The hitch is that this approach is neither creatively in tune with the
times, nor is it exciting enough to produce photo opportunities for the
paparazzi.
In addition, the growth of the luxury goods groups is now posing serious
problems for the rest of the industry. The gap between the large and small
designers, who cannot afford to spend Dollars 200,000 on a catwalk show or
Dollars 50m to launch a new perfume, is wider than ever. It is now much more
costly and complex for small companies to build up their businesses,
particularly during a recession.
The new investors also are suffering. They put money into luxury goods when
the market was buoyant, and are now attempting to recoup their investments
in a very different environment.
Yves Saint-Laurent reported a sharp fall in profits recently. Lanvin had to
cut back on the renovation of its Paris shops because of problems in Japan.
Arnault has not yet recovered a penny of the Pounds 20m he spent on Lacroix,
or of the Pounds 17.5m he sank into C'est La Vie], its ill-fated fragrance.
The industry is trapped in a vicious cycle, with the big groups squeezing
out their smaller competitors without achieving any real improvement in
their own interests. This scenario shows no sign of stopping.
The recession might be making it more difficult for the luxury goods groups
to develop their existing interests, but it is also creating new
opportunities for expansion by destabilising other companies.
A stake in Yves Saint-Laurent is said to be up for sale, as is a chunk of
shares in Gucci. So far, there is no sign of a deal on either front -
although the prospect of a few more shopaholic Arabs might hurry them along.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6279</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAEWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / The FT Goes Shopping (1): Couture - the sizzle not the
sausage / Young blood is being selected for top fashion houses
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRENDA POLAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CUSTOMERS for Parisian couture clothes are variously estimated to number
somewhere between 2,000 and 3,000 women. The biggest spenders come from the
US and the Gulf states.
The Americans, very thin and very rich, fill the front row at the
twice-yearly press showings. Women from the Gulf wait for the show to reach
the Dubai Intercontinental where the proprieties of modesty can be properly
observed.
Whether those women buy two or 20 outfits a season it is obvious that, even
at prices which range from Pounds 5,000 to Pounds 10,000 for a daytime suit
to as much as Pounds 50,600 for a beaded, embroidered evening gown, the
economics do not work.
What this small number of women pays for its clothes cannot begin to even
chip away at the design house's investment in its couture collection: the
rich materials, the perfectionist in-house labour, the sub-contracted
specialist labour of embroiderers, button-makers, milliners,
jewellery-makers, shoe-makers and furriers, the maintenance of premises, the
salaries of sales staff, promotional staff, the fees of models,
hairdressers, make-up artists, fitters, design assistants, parties for the
press, the designer's palazzo.
Couture, the business of making extraordinarily beautiful clothes to the
exact measurements of the customer, is the sizzle, not the sausage.
Its glamour sells a meaty mixture of ready-to-wear clothing (often
encompassing many price points down to jeans and T-shirts), scarves, tights,
costume jewellery, handbags, sunglasses, cosmetics and scent.
Scent is the really chewy part of the recipe. Chanel, for instance, is
estimated to have annual revenues seriously in excess of Dollars 500m.
Probably no one but the Wertheimer family, the company's reticent owners,
knows the true figure. The company blithely pays an annual fine to the
French government as a penalty for its steadfast refusal to come clean. It
is clear, however, that a very small percentage comes from frocks or even
quilted handbags and ropes of gobstopper-sized pearls. The earner is the
perfume: Chanel No 5, No 19, Crystalle and Coco.
When Yves Saint Laurent, who, together with Karl Lagerfeld at Chanel,
probably sells more couture clothes than anyone else, went public in 1989,
priced at Dollars 500m (Pounds 322.5m) its prospectus revealed that, in
1988, 86 per cent of its sales (FFr 2.6bn) and 73 per cent of its operating
profits (FFr 439m) came from its perfumes.
Arguably it is on figures such as these that various entrepreneurs have
based their moves, over the last few years, into couture. For, looked at in
isolation, the business of the custom-built frock is a shocking anachronism,
impractical in economic terms and atavistic in moral ones.
Indeed, its almost total demise was an acknowledged fact in the 1960s.
Elderly houses may have marched staidly on servicing a core of equally
elderly customers, but fashion, glamour, excitement, the future, all lay
elsewhere, in the ready-to-wear youth and mass markets.
The late-1980s revival of couture, when the high-gloss occupants of the
fashion-show front row, women such as Ivana Trump, Lynn Wyatt, Paloma
Picasso, Joan Collins, Marisa Berenson and Carole Bouquet, became household
names, was not, however, exclusively a marketing ploy. It was equally a
media-generated phenomenon.
The resuscitation of the moribund is always a good story. In 1983, Alain
Wertheimer, grandson of Coco Chanel's original backer, appointed Karl
Lagerfeld to the post of chief designer at the house.
Chanel couture became the only story in Paris. Fashion commentators began to
write of couture as the experimental laboratory of fashion, a crucible of
creativity where, freed of economic restraints, the designer could follow
his muse. A new and now-monied clientele began to buy couture, welcoming a
chance to flaunt its wealth and get its picture taken.
The rest of the couture houses, galvanised by all the attention, took a
fresh pencil to their sketchpads and hired new, hot, ready to-wear
designers: Gianfranco Ferre at Dior, Claude Montana at Lanvin. And, as the
hype mushroomed from season to season and the column inches stretched, other
designers begged to join - Valentino from Rome, Versace from Milan.
Bernard Arnault, financial games-player, corporate predator and, as of this
year, undisputed monarch of the luxury brands conglomerate, Louis Vuitton
Moet Hennessy (LVMH), even started a new house. In 1987 he wooed Patou's
chief designer, Christian Lacroix, and gave him his head and his own label.
Doubtless, Arnault had pondered Chanel's and YSL's fragrance income.
Probably, he had taken into account the fact that launching a
non-couture-associated scent with adequate promotion and a suitable
advertising campaign costs around Pounds 30m.
Lacroix was a controversial success. Yet, when Bernard Arnault, with
eye-watering alacrity, launched Lacroix's first perfume, C'est la Vie, it
failed.
Arguably, Arnault, a man generally in a terrible hurry, had not given the
name enough time to establish an identity away from the pages of Vogue, down
at the sturdy base of the market where mass sales are made, where working
girls cruise Printemps, Harrods or Maceys in their lunch hour, courting
temptation, and everyone gets their full duty-free allowance once a year.
Since C'est la Vie's failure, Arnault has grumbled publicly about the rising
costs and falling sales of Lacroix's couture and de luxe ready to wear
business.
Similarly anxiety plagues the 30-year-old house of Yves Saint Laurent where
Saint Laurent's partner and business brain, Pierre Berge, has told Le Figaro
that 15 per cent of the company is up for sale. Arnault, labelled by Serge
'a bird of prey,' is, allegedly, extremely interested.
He probably should not be. Last year Yves Saint Laurent decided to buy back
its perfume interest from the licensee, Charles of the Ritz. Carlo de
Benedetti, the Italian industrialist, backed the move, to the tune of
Dollars 630m. When he ran into cashflow troubles soon afterwards, Berge was
forced to buy the 15 per cent share the investment had bought. It is these
shares he is seeking to sell. New finance is necessary, he told Figaro,
because of sharply declining sales.
YSL's published pre-tax profits for the first half of 1990 were Pounds
309,000, a sharp fall from the previous six month period's Pounds 4.9m. He
blamed the recession.
Other factors are also arousing anxiety. The Single European Market,
effective in two years, may undermine the duty-free market within Europe.
Challenges to exclusiveness and price control by retailers such as Superdrug
may ultimately devalue the glamour factor of couture perfumes. Protectionism
by the new administration in the US may render French imports prohibitively
expensive compared with almost equally glamorous domestic products.
A sharp fall in fragrance sales need not kill off couture. Arguably, the
smaller the cake, the harder you have to try. But there is a new mood abroad
in the world, one which rejects excess and conspicuous consumption. Arab
women may see no reason to stop spending but they do not go out much. Once
the high-profile US customers have heeded the call to the flag and learned
to shop American, the front row may lose its glamour.
Alert to this danger, the Chambre Syndicale de la Couture, which regulates
the couture industry, is revising its strict rules to permit more, newer,
younger, design houses to qualify as couturiers.
Its aim is partly to increase the sizzle factor, partly to ensure that when
the sausage pops, there is something sustaining left in the pan. A future
for the couture business and its great names will do.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6280</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAEVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Hard man warms to his latest battle: Jocelyn Stevens tells
Antony Thorncroft how he quelled print unions and art professors and what he
plans for the archaeologists
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTONY THORNCROFT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JOCELYN Stevens is a happy man. Just over six months after arriving as
chairman of English Heritage he is reaping the anticipated whirlwind. He
sits surrounded by his blistering press coverage. 'Terminator 3 arrives at
English Heritage' he comments. The academics on his advisory boards are
shrill in their opposition. 'I was told 'watch out for the archaeologists:
they will bury you',' he jokes.
There is one piece of good news. Stevens asked for 180 voluntary
redundancies from among English Heritage's 1,600 workforce; he has had 600
applicants.
This is all meat and drink to Stevens. As the man who saw off the hot metal
print unions at Express Newspapers in the 1970s ('my worst moment was
closing down the Glasgow plant with 2,200 jobs') Stevens reckons he can cope
with anything 'this Quango' (he spits out the word) of conservationists
throws at him.
He was given the job by David Mellor. 'Somebody had it in for us. He read me
out a very clear brief. No more money for two years and sort out the place.'
Then Stevens said something surprising. 'I was under no illusions that
English Heritage was popular. Everyone has an English Heritage horror
story.' Stevens has his own. In his previous job as Rector of the Royal
College of Art he wanted to modernise a listed building, now the Stevens
Wing. Delays by the conservationists at English Heritage added Pounds 2m to
the cost.
You realise that while most people regard English Heritage as a group of
cosy traditionalists, rather like morris dancers, Jocelyn Stevens, and his
friends, live in listed houses and object to the way that it can intervene
if they want to change the knocker on their front doors
Retribution was swift. Since April, Stevens has gone through English
Heritage like a dose of salts. As a one time journalist he wrote the policy
document on its future himself. It suggests finding new owners for most of
the properties it administers; contracting out the specialist labour force
and cutting HQ staff - and running down English Heritage's authority in
London.
'I have no apologies to make. I'd do it again the same way. You've got to
use your first 100 days.' Now he is coping with the vociferous reaction of
the advisory committees that he ignored. The second stage in his plan is to
be emollient. Negotiations have started. Now that it is in place the
strategy will be discussed. Already he can dangle benefits. 'In January I
will be able to announce that another Pounds 6m will go directly in grants
to priority cases'.
Somehow you cannot help warming to Stevens. You can also agree with much of
his thinking. If the National Trust owns the downland at Avebury why should
it not look after the stones, too; local authorities and local interest
groups make better guardians of remote dolmens or crumbling medieval castles
than English Heritage in London. Stevens wants to concentrate on his stars,
on Stonehenge, on Dover castle, and (his particular favourite) Richard III's
castle at Middleham, as well as churches and conservation areas in cities.
It is hard to believe that he will not get his way.
Typically he is enthusiastic. 'This job is thrilling'. In theory he need
give three days a week to English Heritage. He is there all the time and
spends his evenings getting to know local conservation officers. This
constant activity is the only life he knows. At Express Newspapers he often
worked from 9.30 in the morning to 11.30 at night seven days a week. 'The
unions came to respect me because I was always there, always trying to get
the papers out. When I left they gave me a dinner; the management did not.'
At Express Newspapers he turned round the ailing Evening Standard and helped
to keep the Express afloat.
He never worked harder. It cost him his marriage and the closeness of his
children. It was also ultimately in vain. There was a row with Lord
Matthews, the new proprietor, over who should be chairman, and Stevens lost.
'I know what it is like to be sacked; to be told to clear your desk', he
sighs, although his pay-off financed a lavish party at Gstaad. Skiing is his
suitably energetic leisure alternative to work.
After his dismissal Stevens did what he is good at - making money. He has
that disregard for money that can only be enjoyed by the very rich. His
mother died at his birth but his connections, the Hulton press barons, were
wealthy enough to put Pounds 750,000 into the orphan's bank account. He
enjoyed the ease of Eton and Cambridge (he is undoubtedly bright) but little
parental attention. His subsequent career as a hard-nosed businessman who
get results by trampling on the weak is too glibly explained by a need to
prove himself, to get attention.
Stevens might have made a career in television, but one of his rumbustious
interviews as a reporter on Panorama caused such a public outcry that he was
not asked back. Instead he merged his social life with money-making and
founded Queen magazine, the style journal of the 1960s. 'I got bored with my
readers and sold it for Pounds 500,000 to the man sitting at the next table
at Claridges'. After his dismissal from the Express group he made another
fortune out of Centaur Publishing. He sold that for Pounds 2m.
Then came the call to public service, the call that changed Stevens, and the
nation's life. 'I was asked by George Howard, who I'd never met, to become
rector of the Royal College. It was out of control.' He now thinks that
Margaret Thatcher might have been behind the call. He knew nothing about
art; had no academic experience. So he talked to the students - 'some had
never seen their professors in two years' - and committed himself to turning
the Royal College from an ivory tower into a stepping stone towards a good
job in art and design.
He quickly decided four departments should be closed down. 'One was
environmental media where the students were working with no discipline,
painters fiddling with televisions and so on. I called a meeting of the
senate and locked the doors. I told them that they would not be released
until the reforms had been agreed unanimously. We got out at four in the
morning, a time which, with my experience of the unions, I was quite used
to.
By the time he left the Royal College, (and he is proud of the fact), only
three of the 20 professors he inherited were still in place. The carnage was
terrible; the suffering immense; but he got the college Pounds 20m in
building grants from the government, raised its reputation, and slanted it
towards the needs of industry.
He has brought little from the college to English Heritage, just one large
plaster cast of a dog which he bought from a student, and which stands by
his desk. It is like Stevens in that it has a rather dopey, love me,
expression; but unlike him in that it neither barks nor bites. He plays down
his famous rages - 'I can't remember whether I was born in a filing cabinet
and threw my father out the window or the other way round' - but it is easy
to see how the intense energy of the man, whose body is always mobile as he
shifts papers, stretches, chases words and arguments, could erupt into
shouting matches.
He is at English Heritage until 1997, when he will be 65. 'I was the rogue
choice. Michael Heseltine gave me five minutes to make up my mind. I like
these five year assignments. I wish I'd come across them earlier in my
career.' He hopes for more. 'Perhaps I could run London. I'd like that. I'll
never retire.' His private life is now happy (he lives with Vivien Duffield,
one of the richest women in the country) and they share houses in Hampshire
and Scotland. He seems unable to show any enthusiasm for hobbies, outside
the next obstacle to be overcome.
Like many hard men Stevens seems to need to be liked. He chooses unlikely
groups to identify with - in newspapers it was the unions (although he broke
their power); at the Royal College it was the students; at English Heritage
it is the guardian of Middleham Castle, a woman who keeps a lonely vigil
over the ruins. His interest in her solitary life suggests that, after all
his battles, Stevens is at last confident enough of his identity to strike
out on his own.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6281</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAEUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Chicken Kiev comes home to roost: Dominic Lawson asks why
politicians are so reluctant to recognise what is going on in the world
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DOMINIC LAWSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A YEAR ago, the Ukraine seceded from the former Soviet Union. No one was
very surprised. Yet, barely three months before that President Bush had
travelled to the Ukrainian capital, Kiev, and announced publicly: 'God Bless
the Soviet Union.' He went on to deny the viability of independence for the
states of the USSR, calling it 'suicidal nationalism.' This is now known to
students of modern history as the 'Chicken Kiev' speech.
Perhaps Bush was being chicken, but it seems harsh to lumber him with sole
responsibility. He was, after all, only echoing the established view of the
State Department and, for that matter, that of Britain's Foreign Office.
Yet, almost every journalist who had spent time in the Ukraine and in other
parts of the Soviet Union had realised (and had written) that the empire was
on the verge of disintegration. And still the leader of the western world
called on God's support for the USSR; a doomed and artificial construction
of godless Bolshevism.
Psychiatrists would call this condition 'denial' - the tendency to refuse to
admit, even to yourself, something which deep down you know is happening. It
is all too common in the governing classes. In 1984 and 1985, I covered
conferences of the Organisation of Petroleum Exporting Countries for the FT.
It was obvious even to the inexperienced observer, which I was, that OPEC
had ceased to exist as an effective cartel. The oil market had become
deregulated and over-supplied, with the price set by traders speculating
daily on a vast scale. Yet, the British government continued to authorise
the British National Oil Corporation to buy North Sea crude at the defunct
Opec price. The result was that the British taxpayer lost about Pounds 100m.
This, admittedly, was a far smaller sum than the Treasury and the Bank of
England lost last summer in an attempt to prop up sterling against the
D-mark - something which, once again, almost every trader and outside
commentator knew was hopeless.
Now, we are going through the same nonsense over the Maastricht treaty. Last
week, the government made available to every home in the land a
well-produced little booklet called Britain in Europe, designed to persuade
us that it is right to sign our names to the treaty. This is, of course, a
misleading bit of flummery which omits to quote from those parts of the
accord which speak of 'a common foreign and security policy' for the EC. Nor
does it quote the bit about 'the eventual framing of a common defence
policy' (anyone for national service?)
But none of that matters any more. All this sophistry, and postage is a
waste of effort. Everybody knows that the Maastricht treaty is dead. Not
just technically dead because it has been rejected by one of the member
states, Denmark. But dead in spirit because the tide of opinion in western
Europe has turned against Brussels federalism in much the same way that
public opinion in the Ukraine turned against Muscovite federalism.
It is not just the people of France, the country most wedded to the European
ideal, who are divided deeply on the treaty. The German people do not want
monetary union, least of all at the price the European Commission's
president, Jacques Delors, wants them to pay through the euphemistically
named cohesion fund. And what the German people do not want, the EC does not
do.
Maastricht is, as comedian John Cleese would say, an ex-treaty. Dead.
Deceased. It is no more. And yet, the politicians cannot admit the obvious.
They are still in denial over Maastricht.
It is perhaps worth guessing the reasons for this damaging and recurring
condition among politicians. I blame the civil servants, who are supposed to
be the experts. Like all experts, they have studied their subjects for many
years. Over those years, they have built up a wonderful network of contacts
who tell them what is going on.
In the former Soviet Union, of course, the contacts would have been members
of the Communist party. In Brussels, the contacts will be long-time
apparatchiks of the Commission. What do such people stand for? The status
quo, long after the ante has been upped. The received wisdom, long after it
has ceased to become wise.
What do bureaucrats hate? Change, which renders their knowledge
anachronistic, their contact books useless. What they love above all is
order. Now they have invented something called the New World Order.
Eventually they even told George Bush. Too late, as usual.
Dominic Lawson is editor of The Spectator.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6282</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAETFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Hawks &amp; Handsaws: The great tapioca war
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL THOMPSON-NOEL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WARNING: when it pivots, when it moves from intro to finale, from preamble
to message, this column is going to mention tapioca pudding. I wish it could
be avoided. I wish I had never seen or heard of tapioca pudding, or imagined
that it existed. When we get to it, I will type extremely quickly so as to
rush us towards the end; but at least you have been warned.
This week, I finished reading The Rise and Fall of the Third Chimpanzee by
Jared Diamond, who is ranked among the world's top zoologists. As the FT
said when Rise and Fall was first published, it is an important book -
certainly among the best science books I have read.
It is about our animal heritage. We are chimpanzees. More than 98 per cent
of our genes are shared with the two other species of chimpanzee. We are
greatly influenced by our animal origins, but we are also - uniquely and
destructively - human.
The first indications that our ancestors were unusual among animals were the
crude stone tools that began appearing in Africa about 2.5m years ago.
Nothing much happened for another 1.5m years, though by 1m years ago we had
spread to warm parts of Europe and Asia. Evidence for the Great Leap Forward
in human behaviour suddenly appeared in Europe about 40,000 years ago.
Whatever caused the leap, it involved only a tiny fraction of our beings,
because we still differ from the pygmy and common chimpanzee in only 1.6 per
cent of our genes.
Now scroll forward to the modern day. We are proud of some of our hallmarks
as a species: our language, art, technology and agriculture. A few weeks
ago, we even launched a systematic search of the Milky Way for signs of
other intelligences. But we are cursed by several self-destructive traits,
two of them so serious that they may produce our fall: xenophobic mass
killing and our accelerating assault on our environment. If the estimate
that half the world's 30m species will become extinct in the next century is
correct, says Diamond, then species are now disappearing at the rate of
about 17 an hour.
Diamond says he would not have written his book if he considered the chances
of our own extinction remote; equally, he would not have written it if he
thought our predicament hopeless. He says there are many grounds for
pessimism. But he himself is cautiously optimistic. 'We do not need novel,
still-to-be-invented technologies to solve our problems,' he says. 'We just
need more governments to do many more of the same obvious things that some
governments are already doing in some cases. Nor is it true that the average
citizen is powerless.'
The average citizen. Me. You. It is my belief that while governments and
other bodies must display unprecedented political will and spend enormous
sums on top-down projects to rehabilitate our species and our planet, there
is still scope for small people - you, me - to do our bit, bottom-up.
But where to start? I believe that each one of us should concentrate hard so
as to bring to mind some small-scale horror, some bit of nastiness - and
then strive to exterminate it, to squash and quash it. And then move on, to
something slightly larger, nastier and more horrid, and exterminate that.
And then move on . . .
I have decided where I will start: with the tapioca pudding served in the FT
restaurant. This is not the time nor the place to give my opinion on the FT
restaurant. But their tapioca pudding is an affront to human decency, a
negation of man's cultural flourishes and accomplishments. It makes me
queave and faint just to see it sitting there. I would not dream of offering
it to a common chimpanzee, or even to a pygmy one.
My theory is this: if I can exterminate the FT's tapioca pudding, there is a
reasonable chance that I and my colleagues will be nicer to our significant
others once we reach home; this niceness will spread, like ripples on a
lake; people will be happier; they will start to spend money, which will
kick-start the economy; they will even vote more sensibly - goodbye Laurel
and Hardy; bigger and better tasks will be attempted almost everywhere;
substance abuse will cease; spring will not be silent; wars will not be
fought; the planet will be saved, and man will make contact with
extra-terrestrials.
Call me cock-eyed, but I believe it can be done.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6283</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAESFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Sport: Where I put my elephant's trunk - The delights of
designing a lawn with a hold in it / Golf
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN HOPKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BERNARD Darwin did for golf what William Hazlitt did for boxing. He was the
game's first essayist and he remains its best. In The Links of Eiderdown he
writes winningly about having to spend a day confined to bed.
Darwin outlines some of the expected joys of such a day before coming to a
passage in which he describes how, while lying in bed, he begins to see a
series of golf holes formed by the undulations of his eiderdown, what he
refers to as his 'links of counterpane.'
Moreover, he writes: 'by undulating himself in bed the patient can in a
moment change the contour of the course.' He conveys his pleasure at such a
discovery and of how he imagines that one such hole resembled a hole at
Formby, another the sixth at Prince's and so on.
In this I hold an edge over Darwin, for so long the unbylined golf
correspondent of The Times. To create the feel of designing a golf course I
have no need to retire to bed, as he did, and place a tray with four legs
(what he calls a bed-table) on my eiderdown to resemble trees standing in
the middle of a fairway. I have done some course design already. A humble
green it may be to you. To me, however, it was the whole cigar and to do it
required a trip to Cork in south-west Ireland.
The site in question is the Fota island golf course that Peter McEvoy is
designing, with help from Christy O'Connor Junior, for London &amp; Edinburgh
Trust. It is built on 300 of the 800 acres on the island.
McEvoy was my guide and the man to shoulder all the blame for allowing me
near the green in question. I like him. The former Amateur champion has a
sense of adventure, an ear for gossip, a nose for a good story. As we
tramped over the course he said he had just returned from St Andrews where
he had competed in the autumn medal of his club, the Royal &amp; Ancient.
'I met a man there who had played five off the first tee of the Old course.
He hit one drive out of bounds right, one out of bounds left. As the first
hole has the widest fairway in golf, that is quite an impressive record,
isn't it?' mused McEvoy, a grin peeping out from underneath his ginger
moustache.
Soon we reached a crest. From our feet the land sloped gently down and in
the distance, limning the course, was the sinuous estuary that led out to
the Irish Sea.
'My only regret is that we couldn't get more holes playing downhill' said
McEvoy. 'With the water in the background it would have looked terrific.
However, I walked the course from tee to green and then from green to tee.
You have to do that. Designing a golf course is an art not a science. You
have to get out there and see what it looks like and feels like under your
feet. And having done so I could not think of a way to change my original
routing.'
We turned and headed to a far corner of the property.
'This is where I need some help' said McEvoy.
He pointed at the object of his concern - the green of a par four hole, one
of 400 yards or so.
'I have in mind the 15th on the King's course at Gleneagles. I have no
objection to a green that slopes away. It is the only one that does on the
course. But I am not sure it is right. What do you think?'
I am a minimalist, in music, art and now in course design, happy to follow
the words of Alister Mackenzie, who designed Cypress Point and much of
Augusta National, which are two pretty impressive courses to be able to put
on a curriculum vitae. Mackenzie said: 'excellence of design is more felt
than fully realised.'
Unlike A W Tillinghast, the American course designer, who was known for the
shape, or lack of it, of his bunkers, I had to concentrate only on the
putting surface - and only the back half at that. Still, the moment I saw
the green I knew what to do.
This green is big, 6,000 sq ft, and slopes down from front to back by as
much as one metre by one estimate. That is too much, I thought at first.
I imagined myself, a 14 handicapper, hitting a four or five iron second shot
that pitched on the front of the putting surface and raced to the back
because I did not have the skill to put backspin on the ball, at least not
with those sort of clubs. On behalf of mid to high handicap golfers I said I
thought that it was a unfair. What should be done about it, McEvoy asked?
There are those who suggest a green is nothing more than a closely mown area
with a flagstick stuck in the middle. They would probably say they know why
the Mona Lisa is smiling and that Henry Moore's sculptures are merely pieces
of marble hacked about a bit.
To us creative types, on the other hand, a green is a thing of subtlety, a
surface of slopes and gradients, of barely visible challenges and
screamingly obvious defences.
'A good golf course is like a good piece of music,' said Mackenzie. 'It is
not necessarily a course that appeals the first time one plays it.'
The surface soil on my green was smooth but not flattened to its final
preparation and this heightened the impression of a green that was tilted
too severely.
'It needs a mound on one side that would break the speed of the ball' I
suggested. 'Or what about a tier up to the back half?'
McEvoy looked thoughtful. 'What we could have is a nose,' he said finally.
'A nose on a green is a ridge that runs in from the side. It is rather like
the trunk of an elephant underneath a blanket.'
'That would work,' I said, walking to one side of the green and pointing to
where I wanted the nose. 'If you put it here then it would give you another
pin placement behind it and help to stop balls racing through the green.'
McEvoy pondered and then called in Mick, a green shaper of international
repute.
'We think this green needs a nose just there,' he said. Mick looked with his
expert eye.
'OK,' he said. 'I will make a few passes (with his bulldozer) there after
lunch. It will be finished by tea-time.'
As we walked to the next tee, I turned and looked at the green. In my eyes
it had become a thing of beauty. McEvoy caught a glimpse of me admiring my
work. 'There you are,' he said. 'Now you are a golf course designer. We will
name it after you.'
McEvoy made another visit to Fota Island last week and that evening we spoke
on the telephone. He sounded happy.
'Your green is looking really good,' he reported. 'We are very pleased with
it. You know what we have decided to call it? Hopkins's Folly.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6284</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAERFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Sport: Autumn in summer's realms - Terry McLean makes a
November tour of England's county cricket grounds / Cricket
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY MCLEAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
I HAVE always thought November is a dismal month; dark early, cold all day,
harbinger of a long, bleak winter without any cricket.
The county cricket staff who work all year round chat cheerfully about the
players and summertime staff, with just a whiff of moral superiority. Not
for the all-year-round brigade the soft options of migration or hibernation
when the cold weather bites.
'Oh, we're a hive of industry,' boasted Phillip August, Gloucestershire's
secretary, when I asked him what the county ground at Bristol was like in
November.
'We work a bloody sight harder in winter than summer,' laughed the Rev
Michael Vockins, secretary of Worcestershire.
The Headingley style was more dour. It was raining in Yorkshire. 'We're at
it 52 weeks a year.'
Most players and staff take their holidays in late September and early
October, when the season is safely over. Then from mid-October until April
the non-playing staff come into their own.
'It's different sort of work,' mused Vockins, with the air of one who enjoys
thinking about his job. 'The summer is six months of peaks and troughs, home
games and away games. The winter is six months of steady work towards the
target of the new season. That's why it's hard.'
For groundsmen it is always hard, whatever the season, whatever the weather.
It is intrinsic in their job to be battling against nature. Whereas office
staff work comfortably, inside, groundsmen start their 'rescue work' on the
grass as soon as the season is over and keep it up all year round. When I
rang Bristol on a bitter November afternoon, their groundsmen were out,
working on the square. August described with relish their spiking, trimming,
treating, feeding, filling and repairing.
Surrey's press secretary (now known as a public relations executive), Kate
Hempstall, gave a more openly sadistic appreciation. 'When it's really,
really cold or frozen, we let them in,' she chuckled. 'They can sew up
nets.'
Surrey are not a typical county because the Oval is a Test as well as county
ground. It has four full-time groundstaff, led by Harry Brind, a man of few
words, cold knuckles and long experience. But even in small counties the
head groundsman often has an assistant, who is usually part-time, often a
player looking for winter work.
'This is a grim time for players in search of jobs,' said August, losing his
good cheer for a moment. It soon returned. 'We've been trying to get
unemployed cricketers to help with jobs here - painting, mending seats,
fixing fences - that sort of thing.'
Surrey's November newsletter includes a list of 20 first and second XI
players, with a description of what they are doing this winter. Only two are
working their own way through until next spring. Alec Stewart (England),
Graham Thorpe (England 'A') and Waqar Younis (Pakistan) are going on tour,
to India and Sri Lanka, Australia and the West Indies respectively. Eight
others are going overseas, for playing and coaching purposes. Seven are
working at cricket schools and leisure centres in the wilds and heartlands
of Surrey, from East Moseley to Guildford. Thanks to the tireless efforts of
the National Cricket Association and of counties and local sponsors wanting
home-grown players, an increasing number of players spend their winter
months like these seven, as 'cricket development officers'.
'With the help of a local sponsor, we had an assistant coach last year, for
the first time,' Vockins told me from Worcester, 'spreading the word in
schools. It was such a success that we're doing it again this year. This
year he's a cricket development officer.'
Next year a positive cricket person? The only thing as widespread as the
jargon polluting cricket's language is the re-building of pavilions. Almost
everyone seems to be re-building their pavilions. But it is not called
re-building; re-builds and repairs are out of favour. It is called
re-shaping, re-fashioning, up-grading or, best of all, 'activating the
pavilion restoration scheme' (Surrey).
All this pavilion work is partly for the comfort of members and players and
partly because modern cricket grounds get a good share of their income from
renting out their pavilions in autumn and winter, for use as conference
centres and exhibition halls, for wedding receptions, sports club lunches
and dinners and a variety of other entertainments. Most county grounds can
provide parking and catering for large numbers. All that is then required is
a re-fashioned pavilion. That is why the marketing men make good in the cold
and dark. The more depressing the weather, the more attractive the pavilions
and 'sporting social facilities' they can dangle in front of their
customers. Or is it clients?
There are bookings for next season's hospitality boxes, there are health and
fitness centres (gyms) and even stretches of open ground on offer. Bristol
has a bigger crowd for the huge firework display staged there on Guy Fawkes
weekend than for any of its cricket matches.
The marketing of counties' off-season attributes is such an intense business
that it was quite a relief to return to the determinedly everyday atmosphere
of Headingley. Whatever the big financial operations going on, the man who
answered the phone only wanted to talk about life in the office where he
worked. That is: the preparation of brochures, year books, newsletters,
membership forms, diaries and Christmas raffle tickets and, the biggest
boost of the non-cricket season so far, the launch of the Sunday League's
1993 technicolour kit in all its nylon glory, with all its mail-order,
chat-show mystique. 'Quite a thing, that.'
It was quite a thing at most grounds, where the office staff are the silent
perennials whose labours keep first-class cricket going. The public launch
of the new outfits made a change from everyday routine. Nowadays that
routine includes the regular tightening up of security. Trouble often
amounts to no more than 'splashing a bit of paint around the seats', as at
Bristol.
At neighbouring Worcester, Vockins spoke almost nostalgically of the bad old
days. 'Twenty years ago we used to say that all Worcestershire burglars
began their careers here.' But crime is not what it used to be. 'Things are
quieter now.'
At bigger grounds the problem is bigger and the response tougher. At the
Oval, where break-ins are frequent and the new Ken Barrington sports centre
was broken into and looted a few weeks ago, the whole security system is
being strengthened. Surrey, like all the counties I contacted, has a
fellowship of loyal office staff who mourn their counties' misfortunes, with
an eye to an improving future. At the Oval they are already selling tickets
for next season's Test Match against the Australians. In the office at
Glamorgan they are adept at hoping for the best, or at least for better,
next season. Even in Yorkshire, apparently, 'you never know.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6285</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAEQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Motoring: Europe bows to Japanese - Stuart Marshall predicts
a first in the Car of the Year voting
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STUART MARSHALL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FOR THE first time, it looks odds-on that Europe's Car of the Year will be
Japanese. The jury is out and the verdict will be delivered next week. But I
am confident of my forecast unless more than usual of the 59 motoring
journalists involved vote nationalistically or perversely - and some always
do just that.
One look at the list of eligible vehicles is enough to prove my point. There
are 15 entrants, but only 12 completely different cars if you accept that
the Mazda 626 and MX6, Mitsubishi Colt and Lancer, and Mitsubishi Space
Runner and Space Wagon are variations on themes rather than separate
entities. Only three of the 12 - the Alfa 155, Fiat Cinquecento and Renault
Safrane - are completely European products.
The two likeliest winners, the Nissan Micra and Toyota Carina E, have
Japanese names but were created mainly for European buyers. They are being
made in Britain. Micras come from the plant at Washington, County Durham,
which for five years has been supplying Europe with Bluebirds and, more
recently, Primeras.
The Carina E (the E stands for Excellence in Europe) will be rolling off the
assembly tracks at Burnaston, Derbyshire, by January but its engines are
being produced already at Shotton, north Wales; some are being exported to
Japan. So if, as I predict, the Micra and Carina E become winner and
runner-up, the victory will be Anglo-Japanese rather than purely Japanese.
First, though, a look at the runners as they parade in the paddock.
The Alfa 155, a four-door saloon with front-wheel drive and a Twin Spark
four-cylinder or V6 engine, is a pleasant car with sporting overtones but
not in the running for the award.
More of the jury's votes (members have 25 each) will go to the Fiat
Cinquecento, due in Britain early next year. Compared with Japanese
micro-cars, it is simple and low-tech. But it is small, cheap and
economical. Jurors with an eye on the environment will favour it.
The medium-large Renault Safrane is the Renault 25 replacement; it arrives
in Britain in January. Its comfort will appeal to many a business user but
it is hardly a Car of the Year.
The Micra should win because it brings business car standards of refinement
to the runabout-cum-small family car segment. It can be had with power
steering, ABS brakes, air-conditioning, and an advanced form of automatic
transmission.
The Carina E should be close behind, not least because it raises quality
standards in the 1.6 to two-litre family-cum-fleet class to new heights.
(Toyota's Camry and Lexus did the same for the middle and top management
segments).
The latest Corolla also brings similar executive-class refinement to the
mainly retail buyers of small / medium cars.
The 2.1-litre, 185-horsepower Honda Prelude high performance coupe is being
touted as Europe's safest car. It has driver and passenger airbags and
four-wheel steering and might appeal to buyers who lust after, but cannot
afford, a Mercedes-Benz SL.
Honda's CRX two-seater has a neat hardtop which stows under the boot lid. It
is a civilised and entertaining sports car for the 1990s.
The sleekly-styled Mazda 626, MX6 coupe and Xedos models may pick up votes
because they feature some of the smallest V6 engines in production.
The Mitsubishi Colt and Lancer are two more examples of the crop of high
quality small and small/medium Japanese cars. The Mitsubishi Space Runner
and Space Wagon are multi-purpose vehicles costing no more than typical
family hatchbacks. All are good, but not Car of the Year material.
Were I making a book on the result, I would offer these odds: 4-5 Nissan
Micra; evens Toyota Carina E; 3-1 Honda Prelude and CRX, Toyota Corolla; 5-1
Fiat Cinquecento and Renault Safrane; 7-1 Mazda 626; 10-1 Mazda MX6 and
Xedos; 12-1 Mitsubishi Space Runner and Space Wagon; 20-1 Mitsubshi Colt and
Lancer; 50-1 Alfa 155.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6286</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAEPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Gardening: Weeds in pots at Pounds 2 a time (each) - When
does a plant become a weed? When Robin Lane Fox decides to poison, burn or
uproot it
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBIN LANE FOX
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WISHFUL gardeners have already declared the season at an end; non-gardeners
are thankful that they never let it start; in my garden, it never seems to
stop. My strategy for the winter is simple: start early, and remain bent
double until the rain stops play. Recently, I have swung back in favour of
winter planting, because plants can be bought in winter from the open
ground, not the misleading shelter of a polythene tunnel. Besides planting,
there is so much to invent or alter that unless I start now, it will never
stop.
As in life, so in the garden, the worst problems are of one's own making.
Four years ago, I set out with virgin soil on which nothing was growing
except some harmless lawn turf. I made new borders; the mood was
adventurous; optimism still ran high. Surely there were under-rated winners
in all those catalogues which Weekend FT readers would love to try in the
1990s? Winners indeed there were, particularly among smaller plants like
campanulas (I recommend Tymonsii) and the lesser-known varieties of roses
bred in the 1950s (Mme Louis Laperriere is still in flower, a strong, deep
red).
Naturally there were also losers, not least the soft penstemons which died
en masse in the first sharp frost after I had praised them to the skies.
There were also plants which I had not expected: space invaders, whose
habits were utterly unmanageable. As a result, I am in an embarrassing
position: I have bought my own invasive weeds.
Why do nurserymen not give us more warning? Their descriptions are seductive
and I have fallen for them, from Verbena Gravetye Gem with a haze of violet
flowers in late summer to Achillea Perrys White which is said to be so much
better than the well-known form called The Pearl. Both of them run so badly
that they have had to be poisoned. So, in places, has a Geranium called
Thurstonianum, a rose bay willow herb with fragile white flowers, a
variegated groundholder which lost its variegation and an awful little
celandine with a well-deserved name of Brazen Hussy.
Why did I allow these invaders on to the place? Some of them were presents.
In the first year, they flourished. In the second year they ran wild and
have been a menace ever since. Before you buy an unknown performer, be
certain that it is not a weed. If in doubt, ask. Remember that a high price
is no guarantee of quality.
In many lists you will find a Korean Campanula called Takesimana. Nurserymen
praise the beauty of its spotted flowers, nobody explains that it runs wild
like Ladies Mantle, perhaps because many of them sell Ladies Mantle too, at
Pounds 1.80 a plant. Admittedly, Campanula Rapunculoides is even worse. All
the books of my childhood tried to deter readers from trying it, and so I
bought one, just to be sure. It cost about Pounds 2 and after six weeks had
developed white roots like fangs and had to be burnt before it started
jungle warfare.
I suspect that many nurserymen do not know what some of their plants will do
when mature. We all went wild for the white-flowered Lavatera Barnsley
before anyone explained that it had space-invasive qualities: surely the
first suppliers knew? I have developed my own suspicions: never trust
unknown soapwort, and above all avoid any highly-praised form of dock.
Catalogues call them rumex which may conceal their habit.
Three years ago, I bought an attractive dock in the pot because it had
silver leaves like shields. At the time, even The Plant Finder hesitated
about its existence: might Rumex Scutatus be the Weekend FT find of the
year.
Once again, it is a weed in disguise: if you see it, curse it because it
seeds and worst of all, puts out roots which are so fragile that you are
never rid of them entirely. The young leaf looks enchanting but like some
fatal beauty, the plant takes over your life. Stems sprawl everywhere;
rust-coloured flowers throw seeds in all directions and one innocent
pot-plant becomes a sprawling blanket, nearly a yard wide. I buried mine in
long grass but it is equal to the fight. It might make an alternative
ground-cover wherever you are bothered with buttercups.
These weeds, and others, cost good money, forcing us to wonder when a weed
becomes a weed, not a garden plant. I used to rally to the old liberal
definition, that a weed was a plant in the wrong place. It now seems to me
to be a wet, soggy definition.
Weeds are invaders with take-over tendencies which have to be fought to be
controlled. Whoever defined an enemy as a soldier in the wrong place?
Toughening my tactics, I am beginning this season of re-arrangement in a
pugnacious way. I am starting by poisoning plants which I bought less than
five years ago.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6287</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAEOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Gardening: The comprehensive guide to Jekyll and her genius
 -Arthur Hellyer praises a new book on the designer who made history
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ARTHUR HELLYER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ONE hundred years ago, Gertrude Jekyll was just emerging on the garden scene
as an impressive new voice on design and, in particular, on the use of
plants in gardens. Today, her influence seems as great as ever. Her books
are available again and new works on her life and her place in garden
history are being produced.
The latest of these, The Gardens of Gertrude Jekyll (Frances Lincoln, Pounds
20), is by Richard Bisgrove, a lecturer at Reading University, near London,
and an expert in garden design. It is the most comprehensive study I have
seen of the garden-making ideas of this astonishingly prolific lady.
Something like 2,000 of her plans are stored in the library of the
University of California at Berkeley, near San Francisco - all, I think,
drawn in black and white. Bisgrove examined the lot and made a selection. He
then re-drew them in colour, partly for clarity but also to imbue himself
with the logic and feeling for form and colour that combine to make the
essential Jekyll style.
There are not, I think, any Jekyll gardens that have survived the years
unaltered by their owners, but a number have been restored and there are
also Jekyll's own photographs to show what some of them looked like.
Because she was associated closely with William Robinson, a gardening writer
and editor for whom she worked extensively, it has been assumed that the two
of them had similar ideas about garden-making, but this is not really so.
Her vision was wider than his and she never ruled out formality or the use
of temporary bedding-out plants to maintain colour in the garden.
Some of her best planting schemes are for the gardens which the architect
Sir Edwin Lutyens was accustomed to design for the many fine houses he
planned, most especially during the early years of the century. Most of
these gardens were essentially formal in design.
In this book, for the sake of clarity, the gardens have been divided into
fairly arbitrary groups, which have been given chapter headings. There is
one on garden-making as a whole; this looks especially at Jekyll's painterly
vision, for she was also an accomplished artist. Weak eyesight was one
reason she gave this up.
A second chapter, which includes several gardens in America, is used to
reveal the great diversity of her styles. There is no such thing as a single
simple Jekyll garden but always a feeling for the special needs of the site
in question.
A third chapter includes the recently restored garden of the Manor House,
Upton Grey, Hampshire, and four other gardens to highlight Jekyll's use of
plant associations. I saw the Manor House this past summer and found it
deeply interesting for its division into two sections that are entirely
different in manner.
On one side of the house, there is a garden of flowing lines and a
Robinsonian type of natural garden-making. On the other is a much more
regular design, with high terrace retaining walls planted freely and with
careful colour contrasts. There is also a long pergola as a central feature.
This garden is open to the public occasionally for charity and so can be
used as a living guide to two of Miss Jekyll's methods of garden-making, for
here she was on her own without guidance from Lutyens or anyone else.
There is a chapter on formal gardens which includes Hestercombe, a very fine
Lutyens garden. It has been restored faithfully by the Somersetshire fire
brigade, which uses the place as its headquarters. The massive
stone-pillared pergola here is very typical of the Lutyens-Jekyll
partnership. The garden is full of delightful detail including an entirely
formal parterre of beds in the centre, planted with bergenias and other
Jekyll favourite perennials.
Other chapters deal with Shrubs, Wild Gardens, Steps and Walls, Sun and
Shade and with Jekyll's favourite plants. In all of these, Bisgrove proves
himself a perceptive guide.
This is a book that can be read cover to cover - but one to which people
will refer time and again over the years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6288</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAENFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Property: Georgian's enduring appeal / A look at the
continuing demand for houses with that classical touch
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GERALD CADOGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHY DO the British love Georgian? Was the 18th century special, as the
estate agents and Prince Charles demand we believe (despite many houses of
that age having been jerry-built?) Or is it a desire that shows more about
20th century yearnings than the buildings themselves?
These questions are pertinent. Fine Georgian houses are on the market. And
the crisis of national identity, that has been worsening steadily since the
first world war and is now acute, bestows a powerful appeal on the rational,
confident certainty of 18th century architecture.
Georgian was not always popular. The Victorians had little time for it. With
their pinnacled, neo-Gothic buildings, they strained to reflect their
prowess in technology and trade while also leading the conscience towards
God. The ubiquitous nooks and recesses symbolise, in buildings that looked
like medieval churches, a culture that dispensed the same justice in Bombay
as in the Strand.
In the universal loss of faith of the 20th century, this Victorian power
play of crockets, pinnacles and polychrome brickwork looked dangerous.
Sensible Georgian came back to fashion, and the Georgian Group was founded
in 1937 to ensure that it was looked after.
With Georgian, large and well-lit rooms leave no space for private scheming
and fantasies. Life is in public. You know where you are, and how you relate
to everybody else. The Georgian drawing room is a microcosm of an ordered
world. No wonder the British like them.
In the 17th century, Inigo Jones propounded the ideas of a 16th century
Italian, Andrea Palladio, who wrote of the need for great men to have grand
country houses in which to rest and recover from the city's roar - and built
them. Palladio's so-called villas in the Veneto are metropolitan splendour
and classical style transposed to the country and married to a barn, as they
all live off the land.
But the English civil war, and the arrival of Dutch styles with William and
Mary, stopped the clock on British Palladianism until disorder ceased in the
18th century. Then the British invested with gusto in grand buildings in the
country, transforming swathes of landscape, moving villages for lakes,
decking the houses with pictures and furniture bought on the grand tour,
importing Italian plasterers, and commissioning a galaxy of brilliant
architects to create the nation's stately homes.
Georgian today has an aura of pre-Industrial Revolution nostalgia, when all
knew their place. That combines with the clean lines of rooms designed to
make the English (who have shyness problems the Irish, Scots and Welsh do
not) lose their inhibitions and start to behave as public people. (The roots
of Georgian are, after all, in the Mediterranean). And it carries memories
of classical education.
So, people want Georgian. It is the paradigm of the civilised, ordered life,
uncluttered by the demands of religious superstition (in which they do not
believe now and hardly did in the 18th century). Live in a Georgian house
and you are breathing a better lifestyle.
Even in the recession, Georgian sells, beating its guide prices. The
splendid Old Rectory at Amersham, Buckinghamshire, has just gone for more
than Pounds lm and the Grade I-listed Ven, near Sherborne, Dorset, for over
Pounds 1.1m (both through Knight Frank &amp; Rutley). At the easier guide price
of Pounds 475,000, Lane Fox (0285-653101) offers Brook House in Painswick,
between Cirencester and Cheltenham, a 17th century house lurking behind a
Georgian front - as many apparently Georgian houses turn out to be. (You hit
your head on the beams in the back part).
Buy Georgian in Hampshire and you are close to where Jane Austen lived.
James Harris (0962-841-842) has several attractive houses near Winchester
and Petersfield, well placed for getting to London by the M3.
A few miles from Lady Thatcher's Lincolnshire birthplace of Grantham, the
Pounds 210,000 guide price for the substantial George IV old rectory at
Great Ponton is far cheaper than it would be in the south-east. Carter Jonas
(0733-68100) is the agent and hunting is with the Belvoir.
A century older is the old rectory at Otterden, Kent, where the porch and
gables still show Dutch influence. With four acres of serious gardens, it is
being offered by Strutt &amp; Parker (0227-451-123) at Pounds 475,000.
Brockhampton House in Herefordshire, built in 1765 and listed Grade II, is
an unusual opportunity. The red brick house and gardens, including a secret
grotto, have a lease running to 2083. (The freeholder is the National Trust,
which owns the estate).
Thomas Farnolls Pritchard, best known for designing the Iron Bridge at
Coalbrookdale, near Telford, Shropshire, was the architect. He put in rich
ceilings and fireplaces and the designs include an emblem with a sheet of
music including the then newly-written national anthem. The whole house has
been restored in a way that matches its patriotic and comfortable heritage.
The asking price is Pounds 550,000 from Andrew Grant (0905-24477), or try
the agent's two other substantial brick houses: Kyrewood House at Tenbury
Wells and Morton Hall near Redditch.
Going north produces two important houses. One is the 1720-1840 Rusland Hall
in Cumbria, which has permission for conversion to a country house hotel -
an unlikely event at present, probably, but there are 11 bedrooms and eight
bathrooms - and is offered by Cluttons (0228-74792) at more than Pounds
850,000.
Scotstoun near Peebles, Scotland, is a most handsome late-18th century house
with a classic, pedimented facade. The painted centrepiece of crossed wheat
sheafs on the library ceiling depicts 'harvest.' This epitome of food,
learning and wealth, with 125 acres of parks and woods, is on offer at over
Pounds 650,000 from Knight Frank &amp; Rutley (031-225-7105).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6289</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAEMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Property: Try Cyprus for the good life - But don't pass dud
cheques
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GERALD CADOGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
APHRODITE'S island, where the goddess of love rose from the waves, is an
easy, welcoming place to live. Everybody in Cyprus knows some English - and
has relatives in north London.
Food is good and cheap. The grazer's delight is the multi-course meze. This
friendly affair for two or more people starts with pickled caper plants,
wild greens and other tidbits and continues through fish and stews to a
large grill.
Cypriot vegetables and fruit are heavenly. As they grow so fast, they are
both big and tender. (In Paphos, do not miss the market).
The World Service's signature tune of Lullibolero floats around Cyprus.
Reception is excellent, as the transmitter for the Middle East is between
Larnaca and Limassol. And there is the forces' BFBS station.
The Cyprus Weekly, a lively Daily Mail-style newspaper, complements the
country's news with full accounts of expatriate events. The daily paper is
the Cyprus Mail, and TV has English and Turkish bulletins as well as Greek.
Barclays bank has branches in Cyprus and the Cypriot banks have branches in
England, so it is easy to send in money. Cheques are accepted with an ease
long disappeared in Britain. (But if you pass a dud, the police will find
you quickly).
Driving has much the same rules as in Britain, including a breath test. The
new toll-free motorways make it easy to get around, and there is an
excellent system of inter-city communal taxis. The taxi, a large Mercedes,
goes round the town to collect passengers and drives them at breathless
speed down the motorway, dropping them off at the other end.
Much business is done in English and much of daily life is familiar.
Electricity works with square-ended three-point plugs on the same voltage as
the UK.
The water is safe - and this year has been plentiful - and there is good
bottled water. Usually, you cook using bottled gas. The village shops get
daily deliveries of bread and milk.
Cyprus brews two beers, Carlsberg lager and Keo, which tastes like English
beer. There are good wines and plenty of brandy. Mix it with lemon squash or
fresh lemon juice (better) and soda water and a dash of bitters to make a
brandy sour. Filfar is an orange liqueur similar to Curacao. All liquor is
very cheap.
Flights to and from Cyprus usually are packed. Make sure to reconfirm and
turn up early. Charter flights have more restrictions than in Greece or
Spain, with the result that Cyprus welcomes a more solid type of British
tourist than those delivered with their flying beer cans to other countries.
The young may be questioned hard at immigration if they look as if they do
not have enough money.
If you have difficulty getting seats, go to a Cypriot travel agent. He knows
the ropes, as most of his clients will be Cypriot-Britons returning for
holidays to their former home.
If you fly on Cyprus Airways, you will know you are on the right aircraft
when you hear the stewardesses speaking Greek with a north London accent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6290</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAELFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Travel: Mobbed by many monks - Snapshot / Tibet
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARAH ANDERSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHEN I flew into Lhasa's airport the Chinese at the passport check barked at
me to take off my sun-glasses. Knowing that you have done nothing wrong is
no solace when confronted by Chinese officialdom. With a shaking hand I
removed my glasses and was subjected to some harsh stares before being
allowed to pass.
Since the Chinese invaded Tibet in 1959 they have tried to wipe out Tibetan
culture. They call Tibet the 'Treasure House,' and have denuded its forests
and strip-mined its land. It is hard to know who the Chinese think they are
fooling with their attempts to whitewash their horrific deeds. There is now
a massive programme of reconstruction in Lhasa: temples are being rebuilt
and young Tibetans are being encouraged to become monks.
But this is only for the tourists. The Chinese need foreign currency and
they have realised that foreigners will only go to Tibet if monasteries and
monks are on the itinerary.
Arriving by aircraft prepares you for Tibet's bleak but beautiful landscape
of arid brown mountains and burning azure lakes, but not for the razor-thin
air.
I gasped my way on to the bus, but was soon transfixed by everything we
passed. Yaks are the only mammals, apart from man, which can live at high
altitudes for extended periods, and as we drove the 90 kilometres into
Lhasa, I saw yak dung used for houses, yak skin for boats, and yaks sporting
red ribbons working in the barley fields.
Chinese government policy ensures that there are now more Chinese in Lhasa
than there are Tibetans, which perhaps explains why the military presence,
although obvious, was low key; unfortunately, it takes little for the army
to start shooting innocent civilians.
Why should the peace-loving Buddhist Tibetans be subjected to continual
Chinese bombardment? This was the question which nagged me during my short
stay.
This was nowhere more perplexing than in the grubby face of a child, who,
bundled up on its mother's back, had come on a pilgrimage from the far
reaches of Tibet and was being taken round the Drepung Monastery to worship
and light butter lamps at each of the many different shrines. What kind of
future could this child expect?
Packs of wild dogs guard the entrance to Drepung. It is said that the dogs
are reincarnations of monks, something which our Tibetan guide dismissed as
myth, but certainly each monastery has many fewer monks than in the past.
Drepung now has 400 monks against the original 10,000.
The lined faces of the elderly monks have experienced so much hardship, yet
they remain proud and eager to show off their monastery. I was mobbed by
about 30 of the younger monks. Inside pilgrims leave white scarves and money
and prostrate themselves before the shrines.
Of the 1,000 rooms in the Potala, I was allowed to visit only six. The
Potala was used as the winter palace by the Dalai Lamas, and - contrary to
what I had been told - there were many photographs of the present Dalai Lama
both here and throughout Lhasa.
The Jokhang Temple, in the heart of town, was almost destroyed in the
Cultural Revolution. It is being thoroughly restored, but if the Chinese
think they are restoring it only as a museum to attract foreigners, they are
mistaken. I was moved by the religious feelings of the pilgrims, who often
spend months travelling to Lhasa and who fill the courtyard with their
prostrate bodies. Prayer is a quietly powerful act of resistance; how it
must madden the Chinese to have it around them all the time.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6291</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAEKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Travel: Lost in the mists of freedom in Budapest -
Raffishness is out, commerce is all-apparent
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICK HASLAM
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE most vivid image I have of my first visit to Budapest was of being
awoken suddenly in the small hours. Obscure silent figures, swathed in heavy
winter clothing, removed the floor boards under my bed at 4am and gathered
sheaves of closely typewritten pages before disappearing into the night. My
host, a university professor, apologised profusely the morning after, but
explained that he was running a secret printing press, or samizdat, and that
he was afraid of a police raid.
In spring, three years after the fall of the communists, I returned to meet
old friends and to see how the atmosphere had changed.
Linden seeds floated softly down the wide boulevards by the Danube and the
city looked its best under a bright spring sky. The scent of lilac blossom
filled the air as the taxi climbed into the steep hills of Buda which
overlook Pest and the rich Hungarian plains beyond. At the same book-lined
spacious flat, my friends were waiting. They looked well, and after hugs and
kisses we toasted each other in palinka, a fiery Transylvanian spirit.
No longer a teacher at the university, my friend told me that after the
communists' fall he had started running his samizdat as a legal business.
But free market forces are not quite what he thought. Dependent on
state-owned book shops, which were still to be privatised, his company was
being strangled by cash flow problems.
'We opened stalls on the streets, and sales of our books went well, but then
the police dug out some ancient communist bye-law and the stalls were
closed. So we are now really stuck'. Banks were unaccustomed to bailing out
ailing companies and the future looked bleak. He had also borrowed money to
buy his flat from the council, but would soon be unable to meet the
repayments.
When I gently explained that it was a familiar story for a westerner, he
laughed ruefully. 'It's true, but at least you had a boom before the crash -
many of us are going bankrupt before we've even made a profit.'
In the centre of Budapest, the change of political climate was clearly
apparent. The dark forbidding squares I remembered from the winter of 1987
were now liberally decked in advertising hoardings and anything that moved
seemed to convey some commercial message, from trams proclaiming the joys of
Marlboro cigarettes to the incongruous sight of a gipsy carrying a sandwich
board picturing voluptuous nudes for a nearby nightclub.
Before, drab state-owned department stores and brown painted corner shops
offered little other than bizarre arrangements of goods piled dustily on
each other. Now, elegantly dressed shoppers crowded the wide pedestrian
precincts, where windows displayed western clothing.
Nyugati station, where I had made many anxious dawn departures for Romania
laden with Hungarian books banned under Ceausescu's stifling regime, is a
graceful building of yellow brick and glass designed by Eiffel in the l870s.
It came as a shock to see the elegant filigree of Victorian iron work
adorned with the yellow and red of McDonalds.
As the week progressed, I made contact with friends, and found a similar
story. In the old days we would meet in the Caravanserai, a raffish basement
dive in Budapest's 8th district where many of the city's gipsies live.
Fights were common, but the police seldom went there and the gipsy band was
excellent. When I suggested to a friend that we meet there, he laughed and
said: 'You're really out of touch. It's a topless bar now'.
It seemed that the leisurely pace I remembered under the communists had
evaporated. The night-long sessions of cards and discussion were no more -
luxuries to be discarded under the pressure of coping with the new system.
Most people are now busy struggling to make ends meet, or immersed in the
engaging new sport of making a fast buck.
I had last met one friend, a striking Transylvanian girl, when we rattled
through Romania in a battered Trabant delivering the highly illegal
Hungarian books. If we had been caught, I would have been expelled, but she
faced the possibility of a long prison sentence with admirable equanimity.
Now the Trabant has been replaced by a Golf and she is a partner in a highly
successful chain of small boutiques. 'My dear', she said, puffing on her
king-size cigarette, 'we really have to move with the times'.
Not everything has changed. Hot springs still boil out of the Buda cliffs
overlooking the Danube where for centuries numerous invaders from east and
west washed off the mud of their journeys in piping hot mineral-rich waters.
My favourite, the Rudas baths, was gratifyingly gloomy and untouched since
my last visit. Inside the domed stone building, built by the Turks 400 years
ago, pot-bellied Hungarians wallowed contentedly while shafts of sunlight
filtered through the steam from star-shaped blue glass lights.
The same masseur still made the usual conversation about English football
teams, but when I asked him how life had changed under the new system, he
became stern. He was paid, he said, only about Pounds 80 a month. Inflation
was running at about 30 per cent. How could he keep a family under such
conditions? As if he held me personally responsible, the massage was more
than usually rough, and as I gingerly eased myself from the table I felt
like a spineless capitalist lackey.
On the eve of my departure, I finally asked one friend whether there was
nothing he missed from the communist years. To my surprise, he looked
slightly shame-faced. 'You know', he said, 'it's rather like my military
service. I hated every minute, yet looking back it was one of the biggest
laughs of my life. You knew where you were, where you could kick and how
hard. Now . . . well, I think we're all a bit lost'.
Nick Haslam flew to Budapest c/o British Airways. For reservations tel:
081-897-4000. Apex return fares from London Heathrow start at Pounds 268.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6292</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAEJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Travel: Pirate tales from Ireland - Snapshot / Sherkin
Island
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY TOOLE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AS WE stepped onto the pier and turned to watch the boat chug away on its
10-minute journey back to Baltimore, I felt marooned. The feeling became
more acute when I noticed that most of the dozen or so passengers who had
accompanied us on the ferry had vanished.
The Baltimore we had left is the one on the south-west coast of County Cork,
not its illustrious namesake in Maryland, which it resembles not at all.
Ireland's Baltimore is a picturesque little port at the end of a cul-de-sac
from Skibereen. It was never designed with the car in mind, much less the
tourist coach, and makes no concessions to either.
Access and parking are restricted only by the volume of traffic present, so
that on a busy day it may take as long as 30 minutes to enter or leave the
village. The shops, bars, restaurants and houses, painted in brilliant
colours, have been squeezed against the harbour by the surrounding hills,
and have bulged up the slopes and out onto the coastal cliffs.
There is one notable American connection, however, though it may well be
apocryphal. President George Bush claims that his ancestors came from here,
and while this is treated with some scepticism in political circles, the
surname Bushe has been common in the area for several generations.
We had parked the car, with some difficulty, and taken the first ferry of
the day to Sherkin Island. Other ferries would be making the short crossing
roughly every two hours until 9pm. The infrequency of trips, together with
the fact than the ferries cannot carry more than about 15 passengers,
restrict the number of visitors to the island. We were looking forward to a
quiet, relaxing day.
Sherkin Island is about three miles long by a mile wide and lies only just
off the mainland, but it feels like the last outpost. It rises above the
Atlantic in a series of cliffs which act as a bulwark between Baltimore
harbour and the southerly gales.
Constant battering by the sea has hollowed caves out of the rock, and
sculpted deep coves, so that in places the island narrows to no more than a
few hundred yards. Horseshoe Harbour, Kinish Harbour, West Bay - the names
sound as though plucked from a boys' adventure story.
Indeed, piracy was once a major industry here, providing the wealth of the
powerful O'Driscoll clan, which ruled more than 1,000 square miles of west
Cork during Elizabethan times. Dunna Long castle, on the northern peninsula
of Sherkin, was one of nine built around Baltimore and the nearby islands by
the O'Driscolls.
In 1537 the castle was destroyed during an invasion of the island by men
from Waterford, in response to the seizure of one of their ships that had
sought shelter in Baltimore harbour. Also sacked was the Franciscan abbey,
the ruins of which stand on a slight rise above the pier.
We strolled along the narrow road in the direction of the sandy beaches of
West Harbour, passing slopes of dense shrubbery, heather and bracken, and
along the shore of Kinish Harbour, fringed with bladder wrack. Two girls,
also passengers on the ferry, walked ahead of us. A woman stood on a ladder,
painting a house. There was no other sign of human activity.
After 30 minutes, we reached the beaches. Small, sandy and rimmed by low
cliffs, they were deserted, and lapped by clear green water. Only the
peninsulas of Kerry and Cork, and the tiny islets known as Carbery's
Hundred, lie farther west into the Gulf stream. The largest of these, Cape
Clear, hung above the sea, its head hidden in the morning haze.
Throughout the afternoon, small groups joined us on the beach, each arrival
signifying another ferry trip from Baltimore. At no time, however, were
there more than a few dozen.
There was no rowdiness or vulgarity here, only the soft sounds of
well-behaved people enjoying a desert island beach, the beauty of which
would rival anything in the Mediterranean. It is unlikely that Sherkin will
ever be any different.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6293</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAEIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Travel: Earth watchers start here - David Pilling considers
holidays that help to improve the environment / Practical Traveller
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID PILLING
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FOR SOME, the concept of an eco-tourist
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
someone whose globe-trottings have a positive environmental impact - is a
contradiction in terms.
Tourism, they argue, is by its nature destructive, leaving in its wake a
trail of aircraft fuel, polluted beaches, devastated fishing villages and
western habits of doubtful morality. The only true eco-traveller stays at
home.
Not so, others say. At its best, tourism promotes understanding, spreads
wealth and can contribute to the environment. For those wishing to give
eco-travel a go, here are a few ideas:
Earthwatch (tel: 0865-311-600) is a non-profit-making organisation that
matches scientists and archaeologists with volunteers keen to work on
research and conservation projects. The Earthwatch magazine, which comes six
times a year to members paying a Pounds 22 subscription, is bursting with
140 projects in 40 countries.
Members can count orang-utans in Indonesia, delve into volcanology in
Russia, observe insect behaviour in Peru or honey possum habits in
Australia, translate sea lion language in California, or dig for stone tools
in Ireland's County Kerry. One project, for example, seeks to discover
whether Carpathian wolves in south-east Poland kill the weakest or strongest
members of red deer herds. Volunteers, paying Pounds 795 for two weeks,
monitor deer and wolf populations and record the scars and antler
measurements of wolf-killed deer. Earthwatch trips, not including flights,
range from Pounds 400 to Pounds 1,500.
Discover the World (tel: 06977-48356) organises wildlife and wilderness
holidays in conjunction with the World Wide Fund for Nature and the Whale
and Dolphin Conservation Society. A significant portion of the booking fee
is donated to the conservation group concerned. Groups are kept small 'to
reduce the environmental impact' and holidays are designed to benefit local
economies.
A highlight is the chance to track pandas in a Chinese reserve at Wolong,
the first time UK citizens have been allowed to do so. There are also trips
to watch lemurs in Madagascar, polar bears in Spitsbergen and minke whales
off the coast of Scotland. Holidays start at Pounds 295 (weekend breaks)
soaring to more than Pounds 3,000 for whale watching in Japan.
Cox and Kings (tel: 071-931-9106) also organises one-off wildlife tours in
conjunction with charities and puts out a brochure called Environmental
Journeys. Holidays are planned with the help of naturalists and Cox and
Kings buys an acre of rain forest in Belize for each booking made.
David Bellamy is guest lecturer on one tour to the Solomon Islands, due to
depart in May 1993 (cost: Pounds 3,450). Defending the concept of
eco-travel, Bellamy says: 'Tourism is not going to go away, so it's got to
be brought into line. Tourism of the right sort shows people what a
wonderful place the world is, but how delicate and fragile it can be. It's a
way of winning friends for the environmental movement.'
Those who are in deadly earnest about eco-travel may consider signing up for
Nols, a US-based, non-profit-making group which teaches outdoor skills,
'low-impact wilderness living' and respect for the environment.
Nols' expeditions - to the Rocky Mountains, Pacific north-west America,
Alaska, Mexico, Chile and Kenya - encourage participants to become
self-sufficient in the wilderness. The idea is to leave no trace of your
presence behind; toilet paper is banned while picnic and camp sites are
scuffed over. This is not just an adventure holiday, the brochure stresses.
'Nols is a school where pencils and notebooks are as necessary as backpacks,
ropes and tents. Our classroom is the wilderness.'
Those thinking of signing up need to be pretty fit, or be prepared to become
so. Nols caters for people from 14 to 75, though many of its customers are
of student age. However, the brochure contains a special section for those
over 25, mainly trips of two and three weeks. Expeditions start at
reasonable prices and rise to Pounds 4,000 for three months in Patagonia.
Contact: Nols, 288 Main Street, Lander, Wyoming 82520-0579, tel (from UK):
0101-307-332-6973.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6294</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAEHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Travel: Port of Spain
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SEBASTIAN HOPE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ON my first night in Port of Spain, a week before Trinidad's carnival,
Wilfred took me to 'Calypso Spektakula' in the Queen's Park Savannah stadium
where the north stand was in fine voice and the competitive tradition of
calypso was stirring a little heat.
Talk centred around who would win this year's King and Queen of Calypso
titles, and what would become the Road March - the year's most-played
calypso.
Wilfred fancied Black Stalin for the title, with a sarky number called Love
My Country, and debated fiercely with his neighbour. I had met Wilfred on
the aircraft from New York, back in the smoking section with a bottle of
Cockspur.
By day, Port-of-Spain was one long musical assault course. It is hard to say
exactly when carnival starts. Some claim it never stops, but the Panorama
competition brings excitement to a head. The steel bands practise year round
for it, and in the run-up crowds come to listen at the pan-yards each night
where the bands put the finishing touches to their pieces.
Wilfred had once played 'cellopan for his local band, Casablanca, so our
tour ended up at their yard. The Casablanca Steel Orchestra was one of the
bands to emerge from the pan-yard wars of the late 1940s into respectability
in the 1950s.
Yet they had never won a Panorama title, and Wilfred took that personally.
There was no doubt whom I would be supporting. Besides, I had been given the
tribal colours: a Casablanca T-shirt.
In the north stand the chairs, which had been wired together, were suddenly
being stacked to one side. Mine was taken out from under me, and I was lost
in a mass of dancers.
We set off. Minutes later I was covered in mud. Casablanca was jumped by a
band of Moko Jumbies and Mud Massers armed with buckets of slop the
consistency of pancake mix.
A large lady, her face mottled with light brown mud, the colour of her scant
clothes no longer visible, singled me out. She battered my face and rubbed
herself against me. Who was I to stop her? I bore the marks with pride, and
she disappeared back into the night.
As we neared the circuit, the streets became stiff with people dancing,
drinking, covered in mud and not much else. Steel bands, drummers, floats
loaded with loud speakers jockeyed for position.
Something - the music, the rum - set me going. The abandon of the beat
seeped into my bones with the darkness. I could not see how anyone could
stand still.
The dawn light fixed images in my mind - an old man beating a hub cap, a man
writhing on the street while he was painted blue, couples grinding, legs
intertwined. I fell in with a Soca band, and then, from nowhere, there was a
girl behind me jamming up, and another in front jamming back, which seemed
the natural thing to do.
As the sun climbed, the next shift started to arrive, formal bands
thematically costumed, spotless and fresh. They had come to warm up for
their competition next day, Mardi Gras, when the Road March would also be
decided. I caught sight of myself in a shop window looking none too
wholesome. A shower and a tactical nap and everything would still be
happening when I returned.
Next year's Trinidad carnival is slated for February 22-23. About a dozen UK
tour operators feature Trinidad in their brochures. Details: Trinidad and
Tobago Tourist Office, 8a Hammersmith Broadway, London W6 7AL. Tel:
081-741-4466, fax: 081-741-1013.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6295</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAEGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Travel: Storms and solitude - Snapshot / Auvergne
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JILL JAMES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE WAR memorial was festooned with fairy lights, a halo of them placed
around the stone cock at the top. The fir trees surrounding the memorial
were plastered with tissue decorations. St Mamet-la-Salvetat, in the far
south-west corner of Cantal, in the heartland of rural France, was en fete.
In the bar opposite the memorial Madame was not happy. Someone had just been
sick in the toilets. In a big blue apron, she strode to the scene of the
crime. At least two of the customers looked culpable. In the street outside
there was much hand-shaking as neighbours greeted each other on their Sunday
promenade, some of them calling at the boulangerie to pick up a treat.
On this particular afternoon there were no fire engines in the village's
centre de secours (emergency services building) - just tractors and floats
decorated for the fete. On the outskirts of the village the sound of guns
was alerting everyone to the start of the ball-trap. Quite why these
shooting contests are held after a typically vinous lunch is a mystery.
As we drove out of the village, towards the lake at St Etienne-Cantales, the
plastic bunting hung across the road started to clack in the wind and spots
of rain began to fall. A spectacular thunderstorm with fork lightning and
monsoon-like rain was about to mar the day's activities - though fortunately
a French village fete usually lasts about four days.
As the storm rumbled in the distance, we made our way to the lake. Deserted
and surrounded by trees, it was stunningly beautiful. Normally, if you seek
Sunday afternoon tranquility, the lake is not a place to visit because
hundreds of holidaymakers crowd its little beaches and the area buzzes with
water sports enthusiasts. But on this day it was silent and grey.
The Auvergne has the capacity to absorb large numbers of tourists in its
huge empty spaces and you can generally find complete peace. It is ideal
countryside for those who enjoy fishing, picnicking by quiet streams and
exploring the wooded and hilly countryside on foot.
Heathers and broom tumble over rocky outcrops. In summer harebells, rosebay
willowherb, foxgloves and ferns proliferate in a landscape of water meadows
and stone-roofed houses. Best of all is the smell of hay and wild garlic -
and the absence of sunflowers.
If you want a bit of market day bustle, or are a serious food shopper, then
you can visit a country market almost every day. Aurillac, the provincial
capital, has markets on Wednesdays and Saturdays. Maurs, described as the
Nice of the Cantal - goodness knows why, since it is clearly a small country
town - has one on Thursdays.
A good way to sample any rural area is to base yourself in a small village -
and walk. It may even help you sympathise with the EC agricultural policy.
St Mamet is not much of a place, but it has two butchers, two general
stores, two bakers, a post office and a chemist and a doctor.
Keen walkers will appreciate the local cuisine - fat sausages called Jesus,
substantial pork dishes, stuffed cabbage, quail and freshly-caught river
fish. Almost every charcutier will have large jars of tripe on the counter.
If you cannot face tripe, choose Auvergne cheeses and country breads instead
 -perfect picnic food.
Jill James travelled with VFB Holidays of Normandy House, High Street,
Cheltenham, Glos. Tel: 0242-526338, fax: 0242-570340.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6296</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAEFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Travel: St Augustine's claim to fame
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TIM BURT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TOMORROW, the US marks the assassination of John F Kennedy. For one day, the
media spotlight will focus again on the mourners filing through Arlington
cemetery, events at the Kennedy family compound in Hyannis and the scattered
remembrance services in towns and cities around the country.
This year, following the Democrats' wresting of the presidency, Americans
are being encouraged to look back fondly at the early 1960s as some
enchanted age shattered by a volley of gunfire in Dallas.
Nowhere is that event more revered than at the Tragedy in US History Museum
in St Augustine, Florida, where today the curators are putting a final
polish to JFK's car and some assorted furniture belonging to his alleged
assassin, Lee Harvey Oswald.
They will also be cleaning the car Oswald drove on the day Kennedy was shot
and the ambulance that took Oswald to hospital after he was shot by Jack
Ruby.
In another display, the whistle, speed recorder and the dead engineer's
watch from the 'Wreck of Old '97' - one of America's great train disasters -
has pride of place. Proud of their ghoulish collection, the curators claim
it 'depicts history that the people of today understand.'
The authorities in St Augustine, however, are not so proud of the museum and
give the impression of being happy for some disaster to befall it. Yet, for
20 years, the curators have defied local opposition.
Although the tragedy museum concentrates on 20th century horror, it is also
anxious to back the campaign to establish St Augustine as America's oldest
inhabited settlement. The museum has built an old Spanish jail with real
human skeletons. The skeletons are said to date back to 1718 when St
Augustine was in Spanish hands and already celebrating its bicentennial,
more than 250 years before the rest of the country.
Not content with America's official history, the city - 50 miles north of
Daytona Beach - eschews the arrival of Christopher Columbus and rumours of
Viking visits to lay claim to the title of North America's first historic
site. It was here, according to city officials, that 'Ponce de Leon came
ashore to landmark for all time the first moment of our nation's history -
the discovery of North America.'
The claim is backed by some aggressive marketing to promote the nation's
oldest house, oldest wooden schoolhouse and oldest store museum. The Spanish
quarter has been converted into Florida's official living history museum
where 1990s residents dress and live like 1550s settlers.
Life in St Augustine is about as far from New York City as it is possible to
get in mainland US. High-rise buildings are banned, crime is paltry and
there are no yellow cabs - it is easier to get around by horse-drawn
carriage or tram.
The city's association with Spanish prospectors such as Ponce de Leon and
pirates like Sir Francis Drake has made it obsessed with the past. Almost
every street has a museum and many have several.
Such attractions are threatening to drown the old town, clustered on the
edge of Matanzas Bay, in a wave of synthetic nostalgia. But behind the
razzmatazz there is a genuine European village of narrow streets, discreet
timber board houses and high-walled gardens.
The potential for tourism was first recognised by Henry Morrison Flagler, J
D Rockefeller's business partner, who honeymooned in St Augustine and
decided to put it on the map by connecting the resort to his East Coast
Railroad in 1883.
Flagler is credited with saving the old town. His interest in the district
ensured that the oldest homes survived, and many of them have taken on a new
lease of life as up-market inns. Guests can stroll to the Castillo de San
Marcos or take a cruise into Matanzas bay.
The bay separates the old town from Anastasia Island, a flat sand outcrop of
condos and motels. The island is famous for a unique livestock collection,
the St Augustine Alligator Farm.
Although it is promoted as one of the state's finest attractions, the home
for retired alligators attracts fewer visitors than Anastasia's main asset -
the beach.
The dunes and long stretches of empty sand have been designated a state park
where the peace is disturbed only by whooping surfers.
Further information: St Augustine Chamber of Commerce, 1 Riberia Street, St
Augustine, FL32084. Tel: (904)-829-5681.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6297</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAEEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Arts: VAT to hit London - Art is put in the same pigeon hole
as second hand cars for tax purposes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTONY THORNCROFT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AFTER 20 years of deliberation and delay a decision could be taken next week
in Brussels which will deliver a hefty blow to London's precarious position
as the twin centre, with New York, of the international art market.
Rather ignominiously, the talk will mainly revolve around the movement
within the single European market of second hand cars, for, as far as the
bureaucrats are concerned, works of art are just second hand goods:
paintings by Rubens and furniture by Boulle will be treated alongside
Mercedes and hi-fi equipment.
At the moment works of art can flow in and out of London free of tax. It is
this unrestricted movement which makes London the great entrepot. Under the
proposals the UK will have to levy VAT at around 5 per cent on goods coming
for sale from outside the EC.
This is no marginal matter. In 1991 art valued at around Pounds 700m, or
just about 50 per cent of all imports, came into the UK from the US, Japan,
Switzerland, etc. Potential vendors like the fact that there is no hassle in
London, especially in the auction houses. When Sotheby's and Christie's hold
their sales of important Impressionist pictures in 10 days time around 90
per cent of the lots will come from abroad, many from outside the EC, and
will depart thither. If the regulations come into force, sellers in Japan or
Switzerland might take the safe and easy option and dispose of their art
through New York or Geneva.
This will not be a crippling blow to Sotheby's and Christie's, which are
well organised in both those cities, but the down grading of London would be
much regretted, especially by the British owned Christie's. The dealers,
too, although arch rivals of the auction houses, know that on this issue
they sink or swim together. All the stops are being pulled out to influence
Monday's decision.
But there is a resignation that, after a doughty rearguard action, some time
in 1993 the new tax will be implemented. The antiques trade is already
congratulating itself on keeping the tax down to 5 per cent and on securing
zero rating for exports. Dealers also believe that they have gained an
amendment that if they sell a work of art outside the EC within a short
time, say six months, of importing it, they will escape the paper work
involved in reclaiming the tax. This could cover half their turnover.
In theory an extra 5 per cent on a trade dealing in margins of up to 50 per
cent does not sound too burdensome. But it is the psychological damage to
London that is most feared. Sellers, especially those with multi-million
pound collections, will opt for the simple, more profitable, life, and
consign goods to New York. The auction houses cringe at the thought that in
their London catalogues they will have to draw attention to the lots that
will be liable for VAT.
The 5 per cent matters to London because it comes on top of worrying trends.
New York, with its mass of big domestic buyers, has taken a growing
percentage of the global business in recent years and at last Paris shows
signs of throwing off restrictive practices and becoming a major centre
again.
It also follows quickly on last week's EC decision on the movement of goods
and the restitution of smuggled items. This seems bound to make life more
complicated. Auction houses and dealers will have to apply for many more
export licences: on prints and drawings for example licences were previously
required on goods valued at over Pounds 35,000. This has been reduced to
around Pounds 10,500.
There will also have to be more research into the background of goods for
sale. Bureaucrats in Italy, for example, could have a happy time querying
the origins of Attic vases in an auction house or dealer catalogue, causing
endless delays. And with no licences required on movements inside the EC
British treasures could slip quickly to countries like Belgium, which has an
easy going attitude towards the export of works of art.
The Government could use its veto on any decisions taken on Monday; but this
is regarded as unlikely. The meeting could decide that the entire EC art
trade benefits from London being a free market; but this is perhaps over
optimistic. Some delay is possible, but in the end the tax is likely to
arrive - with the hidden danger of future increases in its burden. It will
not have an immediate impact, but it will mark the end of the British
antique trades impressive ability to operate with minimal restriction.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6298</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAEDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Arts: A narrow view of art - Gloom sets in as William Packer
views the Turner Prize candidates
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM PACKER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OH DEAR: round comes the Turner Prize again, and now we may all look forward
to Christmas, to cheer ourselves up. On Tuesday next, the English art world
assembles en fete at the Tate Gallery, to eat, drink and gossip, and to
witness the award of what should be contemporary art's most coveted prize.
The eighth Turner Prize will be awarded to 'a British artist under 50 for an
outstanding exhibition or other presentation of their (sic) work in the 12
months preceding 30 June 1992' runs the general citation, and what could be
fairer than that?
But wait a minute. As always, a representative if exiguous example of each
candidate's work has been on show at the Tate throughout the month, which is
where and when the gloom sets in. This is hardly the artists' fault.
Whatever the nature or quality of their work - and I shall come to that -
they were all put up by someone else, entered onto the short-list by the
jury, put on show by invitation and publicised further by the sponsor. And
in the longer term it is the artists themselves, good and bad alike, who
suffer for being so closely identified with the received attitudes and
prejudices of an evidently narrow-minded and exclusive curatorial club.
We live now in what the jargon has it are pluralistic times - which is only
to say that the old narrow and successive 'isms' of avant garde
pre-occupation have given way to a more open and catholic interest. If so,
it can only mean that the fellow sitting in the field, painting the
landscape, may be no less radical and true to himself and his times than the
severest conceptualist or the wildest neo-surrealist. What the Turner Prize
has been saying to us these eight years past is that, even so, the only
truly radical, relevant, essentially serious work can still only be of this
narrower sort - minimal, or conceptual, or conforming at least to the
international critical consensus.
Artists from two London dealers, d'Offay and Lisson, have dominated the
prize hitherto. Latterly, with the imposition of an age limit, half the
short-listed candidates have been recent graduates of a single art school,
Goldsmith's College. In eight years only two winners have been figurative
artists in any sense - Malcolm Morley and Gilbert &amp; George - and only one
other short-listed as I remember - Stephen McKenna. So much for any generous
trawl through the currency of British art.
And who are entered in this year's Turner Stakes (Pounds 20,000 added)?
Grenville Davey (31) is a minimalist sculptor cited for the 'cool beauty'
that underlies 'his fascination with the form of the circle, and a refined
sensibility in the handling of materials.' He is showing a pair of tall
patinated steel cylinders, one somewhat dented, and a lower, kidney-shaped
bench topped with an inch or so of asphalt.
David Tremlett (47) has painted one wall of the gallery dark brown, with a
red border and an asymmetric, light-violet parallelogram in the middle. His
drawings 'appear abstract but often refer to architectural features, or
ground plans . . . His work marries a powerful feeling for pure form with an
equal response to earthy reality.' He is also showing a series of drawings
of three-letter words.
Damien Hirst (27) shows two wall cabinets loaded with fish, each specimen
set in its individual tank of formaldehyde. He also shows one of his larger
glass-and-steel cabinets, this significantly occupied by a pile of discarded
clothes, ash tray, plastic cup etcetera. 'His elaborate titles offer the
spectator the opportunity to construct a network of meanings, but his works
often confront us . . . with the stark facts of existence.'
Alison Wilding (44) is another minimalist, whose sculpture has moved away
from the oddly fetishistic and idiosyncratic as it has grown larger and more
self-conscious. Here are two tall curved metal sheets enclosing a red
perspex tube with a ball on top. She also shows a flat metal cover or
shelter as though drawn away to reveal an internal structure of slotted
perspex. She 'works slowly, moving towards the realisation in sculptural
form of deep-seated experience: 'I like to make something I don't know
about', she says.'
It is too easy to mock, but it is a sad business. I have admired Alison
Wilding's work in the past and hope she wins. Davey, too, evinces a certain
formal integrity. But I fear the favourite must be Hirst, he of the shark
and dead flies and irresistible momentum, with Tremlett to give him a run
for his money.
The Turner Prize Tate is at the Tate Gallery until November 29, sponsored by
Channel 4.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6299</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAECFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Arts: Nordic design rooted in British idealism
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SUSAN MOORE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FEW British household have escaped the influence of Scandinavian design. Why
has it been so consistently popular? One reason is that Nordic design has
its roots in British idealism.
The reform of Swedish design at the beginning of this century was directly
inspired by the romantic socialism of Ruskin and William Morris
(incidentally, a devotee of all things Icelandic) and the example of the
British Arts and Crafts movement. Then the avant-garde Scandinavian
industrial designers of the 1920s and 1930s succeeded in making Modernism
palatable to the British. They tempered the uncompromising functionalism of
Gropius and Le Corbusier with an emphasis on natural materials and a
humanity that placed the needs of the user above aesthetics.
Ironically, their machine-made, mass-produced and therefore relatively
inexpensive artefacts came closer than Morris and his less mechanised
craftsmen to realising the dream of introducing good design to the modest
home.
The extent of this achievement can be seen in a series of seven small
exhibitions which are part of the Tender is the North arts festival in
London. The most thoughtful, at the Design Museum, is called 'Allies in the
same Battle': Scandinavian Design in Britain 1930-1970 (until February 28).
It shows how Victorian fussiness and Edwardian opulence was replaced by a
clean, elegant line, restraint and lightness. Armchairs by the great Finnish
designer Alvar Aalto exploit the flexibility and strength of plywood but
their flowing line and form are agreeably organic. The Swede Bruno
Mathsson's bent laminated wood 'Eva' chair seems almost sculpted to human
shape.
It is hardly surprising that we are still slumping in contemporary versions
of the Dane Kaare Klint's 1933 folding beech and canvas safari or director's
chair, or that various chairs, lightfittings and glassware featured here
have recently been reissued.
During the 1930s contemporary Scandinavian furnishings and applied arts were
available in Britain at such up-market emporia as Heal's. (Alvar Aalto, for
instance, found his largest export market in Britain.) By the 1950s,
Scandinavian Modernism had filtered down to the High Street, largely thanks
to a series of promotional international exhibitions. British industry
responded with its own contemporary designs, produced by 'G' Plan furniture,
Dartington glass and Midwinter pottery (a designer for the last was Terence
Conran).
Those nostalgic for '1950s Contemporary' will relish Marianne Westman's
'Picknick' tableware of 1956, with its cheerful, stylizied vegetables and
herbs, the linear patterns of Heal's textiles and the Ercol two-seater
'Windsor' beech sofa with its faux medieval upholstery. A decade on, the
Swedish furniture industry's development of colourful, inexpensive and
well-made furniture for a younger market, which could be bought flat-packed
to be assembled at home, provided the idea for Habitat.
During the 1960s the traditional relationship between the craft tradition
and Scandinavian industry weakened. Revealingly, Caroline Schlytar's elegant
calligraphic 'h' chair is one of relatively few wooden pieces in New
Directions in Scandinavian Design, also at the Design Museum. Instead, a
heightening of the social conscience of Scandinavian design has resulted in
an emphasis on, for example, CityCom's environmentally friendly and high-tec
PCV - a personal commuter vehicle to you and me.
Just as industry became less interested in the craft ethic, the
artist-craftsmen has become increasingly independent of industry.
Scandinavia, particularly Sweden, boasts a long and distinguished tradition
of studio glass, departments of which have been standard features of
manufacturers such as Orrefors since the early years of the century. Imagine
the shock to the industry when artists began setting up their own studios in
the late 1960s in the wake of Asa Brandt, a graduate of the Royal College of
Art in London responsible for introducing the new spirit of contemporary
glass to Sweden.
Ulla Forsell is one maker who followed Brandt's lead, and her exuberant,
fantastical and humorous confections make for a striking antidote to the
Barbican's drab interiors (until December 13). Here are glasses for serious
drinkers - oversize goblets of brilliant colour, their decoration like paint
squeezed out of a tube, and small, translucent houses that glow like stained
glass windows on a sunny day.
Other displays at the Barbican focus on contemporary jewellery, ceramics and
textiles (much of which, like Forsell's glass, is for sale). Here the
feeling for nature - which has long characterised Scandinavian craft and
design - has become even more pronounced, and related to the brooding
Northern landscape and coastline. Danish jeweller and gemmologist Agnete
Dineson, for example, exploits the natural beauty of pebbles in necklaces.
Jane Reumert hand-builds exquisite, wafer-thin porcelain vessels that take
their inspiration from shells and bird's eggs. Beate Anderson's vessels
share strong, primitive shapes and simple incised geometric decoration.
Natural earth colours are built up using a sequence of dry glazes.
A comparable rough, chalky surface characterises the ceramic ships crafted
by Gunhild Aaberg. These objects bring to mind the harsh, bleak life and
landscape portrayed in Babette's Feast. In similar vein, 'Abandonned Stage',
the large and impressive textile installation by the Finn Kirsti Rantanen,
would make an ideal set for The Flying Dutchman - despite its vibrant blues
and hot reds. She creates monumental hoops, spirals, waves, coils and
boulders of barely restrained, twisted and richly textured yarn, resonant of
the harbour's mounds of rope and rock and heaving shore.
The Scandinavian Design Festival is sponsored by Saab Great Britain and the
'Exclusively Finland' campaign. The Barbican displays are sponsored by
President Office Furniture, Intercraft Designs, Lamco Paper Sales and Varma
Services
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6300</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Books: Ultimate flight of fancy - FT Children's book of the
month
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL GLOVER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JM BARRIE'S PETER PAN presented by Eleanor Graham and Edward Ardizzone
Hodder &amp; Stoughton Pounds 12.99, 172 pages
THE way in which a book or a play (or a character from a book or a play) can
procreate or transmutate, begetting other books or other characters, is,
thanks to the ingenuity of authors, publishers and illustrators, some
talented and others merely unscrupulous, a weird and wonderful process - and
it is made all the more weird and wonderful, of course, if the subject of
the book or the character in the play happens to possess magical properties
of its own.
Take Peter Pan, for example, that strange hybrid, part boy, part fairy, who
could fly like a bird, but was not a bird; and could swim like a fish - but
was not, of course, a water creature of any kind.
Sir James Barrie's Peter Pan was first published by Hodder and Stoughton in
1911, but the text of what can arguably be described as the most famous and
abidingly popular play for children of all time was by no means the first
attempt that Barrie, the son of a poor hand loom weaver from Kirriemuir, had
made to capture his flights of childish fancy between hard covers. In 1906
he had written a story entitled Peter Pan in Kensington Gardens. This
edition became famous as much for its illustrations by Arthur Rackham as for
the text itself. Rackham, one of the most fashionable illustrators of the
Edwardian age (his Rip Van Winkle of 1905 had made him so) embellished the
story with his own curious blend of Nordic fantasy, all twisting tendrils
and misshapen humanoid trees.
Barrie's story had developed from tales he had made up for the five sons of
close friends, Arthur and Sylvia Llewelyn Davies. When the parents died,
Barrie gave these children a home. The play itself, first performed in 1904,
had been a great success from the start; but no one in Edwardian England
would have conceived that, 90 years on, it would have eclipsed in popularity
even The Admirable Crichton, his runaway success of 1902.
But the story of the story of the play does not end there. Other editions of
Peter Pan, books that might now be described just as well as examples of
'merchandising' or even 'novelisations' and the like, proliferated with the
passage of time and the increasing fame of Peter Pan himself.
Mabel Lucie Atwell, in producing her 'nursery version' of 1921 of the story,
added her own inimitable touch of saccharine and Good Housekeeping gave her
its seal of approval: 'The editing has been done with a keen sensitivity,'
wrote the reviewer. 'Nothing is spoiled or altered . . . real
little-children illustrations, safe, warm and comforting, even when they are
full of pirates.'
And 40 years later, in 1962, came a prose version for readers of
approximately six and above that is republished this month, a collaboration
between the artist Edward Ardizzone (best known in the world of children's
literature for his Little Tim books) who somehow managed to domesticate the
story without robbing it of any of its ethereal charm, and Eleanor Graham.
Interestingly, it was one of the wards of the Llewelyn Davies', Peter
Davies, the London publisher, who first commissioned book illustrations from
the young Edward Ardizzone in 1928, thereby encouraging a career that was
ultimately to establish him as one of the greatest and most distinctive
illustrators of his era, popular in both England and America.
And who was Eleanor Graham? She was the first editor of Puffin Books, the
imprint that in the 1940s pioneered the sale of children's books in
paperback format, and at prices that even children and their hard-pressed
parents could afford. She also published one of the first excellent
anthologies of paper back poetry for children, A Puffin Quartet of Poets
(1958), which introduced the work of such poets as James Reeves and Ian
Serraillier to new audiences.
There have been other versions of Peter Pan too, with other illustrators,
and he has managed, somehow, to withstand - and even to rise above - them
all, the recent film of Hook included. And, for once, the story of the book
of the play scarcely needs to be repeated here because it is as comfortingly
familiar as the hat that hangs in the hall.
All versions of the story form a part of the Peter Pan bequest by which
royalties of the books go straight to the Great Ormond Street Hospital for
Sick Children, to which Barrie had bequeathed the copyright. Although the
legal term of copyright expired at the end of 1987, the hospital continues
to benefit from sales of all Hodder and Stoughton editions.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6301</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Books: A great civic builder - The work of the Victorian
architect Alfred Waterhouse
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES JOLL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ALFRED WATERHOUSE 1830-1905: Biography of a Practice by Colin Cunningham and
PrudenceWaterhouse Oxford Pounds 80.00 + illustrations
ACCORDING to a recent poll, Alfred Waterhouse enjoys a greater reputation
than any of his fellow goths and the emergence of the Natural History
Museum, one of his finest works, from decades of grime has reinforced his
popularity with the public.
Yet there exists no biography. 'A major gap in the history of Victorian
architecture' as Mark Girouard has rightly lamented, though the booklet
accompanying an exhibition of Waterhouse's drawings at the RIBA Heinz
Gallery a decade ago whetted the appetite.
Dr. Colin Cunningham, one of the authors of that booklet, and Prudence
Waterhouse, an architect great grand-daughter of the architect, have now
remedied that deficiency in a scholarly work sub-titled 'Biography of a
Practice'. The fruit of many years of research, it provides a list, in
chronological order, of 647 works attributed to Waterhouse, appendices of
the competitions he judged, the paintings he exhibited at the Royal Academy
(he was elected RA in 1877) and of draughtsmen and assistants in his office.
The approach to Waterhouse's life and works is eminently sensible and
broadly chronological with a chapter for each of his major commissions and
groups of buildings, such as his work at Oxford and Cambridge in the 1860s
and 1870s. There are also brief essays on themes running throughout
Waterhouse's career, such as the business of building and his relationship
with the architectural profession (he was President of the RIBA).
Waterhouse was born in Liverpool in 1830 into a Quaker family, a fact to
which one critic attributes his preservation from 'the faults of decorative
and gothic excess'. After training with a minor classicist in Manchester he
travelled on the continent, seeing everything through Ruskin's eyes. France
and northern Gothic were to follow. He set up on his own in Manchester at
the age of 24, scraping by on minor commissions from friends and relations
until his victory in the competition for the Assizes Court there shot him
into the first rank in his profession at a tender age.
He moved to London and never looked back, acquiring a broader practice than
any of his peers. He built country houses, churches, university colleges and
a whole host of great civic buildings. His three most famous commissions
followed hotfoot, one on the other, and pay testimony to the efficiency with
which his office was organised. Curiously, and in strict contrast to Scott
or GE Street, no talented architects emerged from his office to pursue their
own careers.
Of his three greatest buildings Eaton Hall, Cheshire, built for the Marquis
of Westminster, has been pulled down after years of service as an infantry
officers' training school and the Natural History Museum suffers from the
most insensitive extension conceivable and threats of philistine
'improvements'; but Manchester's Town Hall soldiers on more or less as
Waterhouse eventually designed it. In each case Waterhouse solved complex
planning problems and produced buildings that were functional and, despite
their gothic or Romanesque dress, intensely Victorian.
Waterhouse was the most artistically gifted of his contemporaries - his
watercolour of the main door of the Museum - 'a high cathedral portal
recessed like a cave into the cliff of the front' - is quite ravishing and
the terracotta details of birds, animals and fishes throughout the building
are a constant delight. But he was also thoroughly practical as well. His
espousal of terracotta for the outside of many city centre buildings,
thereby creating a strong corporate livery for the 27 rather disparate
buildings he designed for the Pru, preserved them from 19th century soot and
pollution. They still look pristine if also a little unyielding in their
harshness.
All this, and more, is conveyed succinctly by Dr. Cunningham's book without
generating the excitement and sense of discovery the first man on the
biographical scene ought to. Partly this is because Waterhouse was indeed a
supremely professional architect but perhaps lacking the hint of genius that
Pugin, Burges or Butterfield embodied. Partly this may reflect a certain
tentativeness about the authors' own convictions about Waterhouse's oeuvre
and position in the architectural pantheon.
The treatment of his country houses is brief to the point of being
perfunctory and the survey of his furniture designs, particularly those for
Blackmoor is frankly inadequate. However, the main blame must be laid at the
publishers' door. A book at this price deserves better than 200 black and
white illustrations, many of them amateur snaps, crammed onto less than 50
pages. They are supplemented by a sparse four pages of colour when
Waterhouse's buildings, his perspectives and his drawings cry out to be
shown in their considerable multi-coloured glory.
He deserves better.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6302</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Books: Fire power
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARK ARCHER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FIRE AND CIVILISATION by Johan Goudsblom Allen Lane Pounds 20.00, 247 pages
IN the ancient philosophies of China, India and Greece, fire was regarded as
a living spirit, one of the primal elements, of which the world was
composed. In certain of these civilisations the ancient philosophy of fire
still survives - in the Hindu funeral pyre, for example, as compared with
our hygienically out-of-sight cremations.
Western culture, Johan Goudsblom argues in this engrossing new book, long
ago lost its reverence for fire. When Hesiod, in the eight-century BC,
advised couples not to 'lie down besides the fire when you have just made
love, and show your naked parts,' he was respecting the gods of the hearth,
not issuing a health warning. By Shakespeare's day, though, the poet John
Donne could write that: 'The Element of fire quite put out.' He blamed
science, forerunner of modern day thermodynamics, for stifling the flame.
Whether our forefathers learnt the secret of fire by subterfuge, as
Prometheus' legend has it, or good luck, all the worldwide fire myths
suggest that by obtaining fire and being able to cook, people became truly
'human.' Freud's theory was that the acquisition of fire demanded the
renunciation of certain spontaneous urges, chief of which was the supposedly
irresistible urge felt by primal man when he came in contact with fire 'to
put it out with a stream of urine.'
Goudsblom is less dotty, but he does argue that fire was a crucial part of
the civilising process. Whenever it was first used to turn the tables on
animal predators (opinions vary, but Goudsblom, like Bruce Chatwin in The
Songlines, settles for a cave in Sterkfontein, South Africa, four million
years ago), fire soon had to be institutionalised if people were to live
together. The origin of our word 'curfew' ('couvre feu' in French) was the
ordinance requiring all citizens to cover open fires at night. The Romans
had it both ways, instituting the Vestal Virgins as a watered-down cult of
the eternal fire of Mount Olympus, as well as organising the first fire
brigade.
Goudsblom's book, which ransacks the history and literature of fire from the
ancient world to the present day, is full of arcane facts. When you are next
browning the sausages on the barbecue, spare a thought for the fire gods
Hestia and Hephaestus looking on.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6303</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAD7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Books: Travels with the literati
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JDF JONES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LONELINESS AND TIME by Mark Cocker Secker &amp; Warburg Pounds 17.99, 294 pages
MARK COCKER has come up with what sounds like a good subject after his
workmanlike tyro biography of Richard Meinertzhagen. Loneliness and Time
sets out to be a study of - a meditation on the function of - British
'travel writing' in this century. He has spun a book around, principally,
St. John Philby, Wilfred Thesiger, Robert Byron, Laurens van der Post,
Patrick Leigh-Fermor, Lawrence Durrell and (a throw-back for reasons of
comparison), the near-forgotten Central Asian explorer Eric Bailey.
After that list, who can be surprised that he has bitten off more than he
can chew? He is interesting enough about most of them, which does not mean
that he always convinces. On Gavin Maxwell, for instance, he gets into a
terrible tangle; the otter man's inclusion is surely a mistake. He is good
on Jack Philby, in the steps of Elizabeth Monroe's biography - but was this
most famous of fathers flogging Fords to the Saudis really a figure 'of
almost Faustian proportions . . . in revolt against the limitations of life
itself'? On Thesiger, Cocker, unsurprisingly, is discreet. On Tibet, with
his description of the 'Pundits', the Asian spies who ventured beyond the
Himalayas, he seems to be working on a sketch of a separate book. He is best
on his Phil-Helknes-Byron (Robert), Durrell and Paddy Leigh-Fermor.
But by this time we are irritated by the arbitrariness of his cast of
characters: where, apart from throwaway references, are Freya Stark, Norman
Lewis, VS Naipaul (not a Brit?), Waugh, Greene, Raban, DH Lawrence, Colin
Thubron, etc, most of what would merit quite as much attention as the bunch
we get?
The most interesting pages are on van der Post, that increasingly mysterious
personality of our age. Cocker begins to probe at the deeper levels of the
'carefully-guarded life' when he tackles that surprising and long-term
best-seller, Venture to the Interior, with the central significance of the
drowning of the young forestry officer, but he is soon out of his depth when
he tries to explain van der Post's deliberate and mannered 'blend of
autobiography and invention', the matching of his 'mysticism' with what
Cocker can only describe as 'the plain facts'.
This is inevitably a curate's egg of a book: it will engage and infuriate in
successive chapters. Was the source of the Nile a search for a Grail? Is it
so significant that most of these travellers had no father figure in their
lives? Did the Victorian traveller really need to escape from British
inhibition into 'the metaphysical blank sheet'?
Mr. Cocker works his material to death and gets into a great state about the
'nature' of travel writing. Surely it cannot be such a terrible puzzle. We
all know that the 'travel writer' is not the same beast as the wretched
compiler of tourist guidebooks, and we also know that the genre contains a
menagerie of skills and interests. In these very pages my colleagues Michael
Thompson-Noel and Nicholas Woodsworth, to take the immediate example, are
manifestly different in their style, their tone of voice and, no doubt,
their philosophies, yet they are both 'travel writers' and no more need be
said, we accept them as inmates of the zoo.
Paul Fussell in a recent book, put the matter simply and Cocker has the
grace to quote him: 'Travel books are a sub-species of memoir in which the
autobiographical narrative arises from the speaker's encounter with distant
or unfamiliar data . . .'
Simple as that.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6304</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAD6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Books: Polish king who lost his castle and his country -
Elected royalty had its problems
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By J. H. PLUMB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE LAST KING OF POLAND by Adam Zamoyski Jonathan Cape Pounds 25, 550 pages
THIS is a remarkable book, not only for the story it tells; even more
impressive is the skill with which it is told. The complexities of Polish
history are immense, as entangling as the Amazon delta and could so easily
be too daunting for the average reader. Poland was not just Poland. As well
as the Kingdom it contained a Commonwealth - indeed the territory loosely
called Poland stretched from the Black Sea to the Baltic embracing, among a
conglomeration of many semi-sovereign princes, the Ukraine and a far vaster
Lithuania than the one we know.
The constitutions of this vast empire were bewildering, but none more so
than Poland's, which elected - or at least tried to elect - its own king in
an age-old parliamentary institution called the Seym. This was dominated by
the great aristocratic families, probably the richest aristocracy of any
European country in the 18th century. The Poniatowskis, Radziwills, Potockis
and Czartoryskis were all immensely powerful, usually suspicious of each
other and often scheming amongst the great powers - Russia, Prussia, Austria
and France - who bribed and seduced many with promises to keep the pot of
anarchy gently boiling. I cannot think of a task more difficult for an
author than to thread his way through this morass of diplomacy and politics.
Fortunately Zamoyski is amazingly skilful. He knows instinctively just how
much detail is necessary to present a comprehensible picture of the world in
which his hero, Stanislaw, lived and stroved to realise his ideals of
kinship. His chapters are short and illuminating. Against this beautifully
controlled background he tells the story of Stanislaw; his biographical
narrative brings a firm structure to his book and gives it impetus, so that
550 pages pass swiftly.
Stanislaw was a complex character. As a young man with his vast family
connections and drop of royal blood, he was regarded as electable. His
parents educated him as if destined for the throne - a Grand Tour took him
to Paris and London, which he adored. He developed a strong belief in the
liberality of Britain and its land-owning democracy.
In Paris he had been converted to the ideas of the Enlightenment. Entering
the diplomatic service, he fell in love and into bed with Catherine, the
future Czarina. Both took incredible risks. It had to end, and with luck
Stanislaw got back alive to Warsaw. Catherine, who murdered her husband, did
all she could to get Stanislaw elected king. That accomplished a new, if
dangerous, world opened for him.
Fortunately Poland was enjoying a prosperity it had never known before and
Stanislaw set about making Warsaw a city of beauty and sophistication -
rebuilding old palaces, bringing in the Italians, French, Germans and even
English architects, sculptors and painters who decorated his exquisite
palaces with the heavy symbolism of Freemasonry and of the Enlightenment. He
created a perfect setting for the greatest art of the 18th century:
conversation. He played with ideas with skill, welcomed the revolution in
America, even drew up, after the French revolution got into its stride, a
splendidly liberal constitution for Poland itself; but, alas, he was out of
touch with the cruel reality of his position.
Within nine years of his election, Russia, Austria and Prussia, fearing that
each might pounce upon so delectable an opportunity, clubbed together and
did a deal to slice portions off the Polish conglomeration. Their judgment
in seizing enough to worry, but not to stir France and Britain into action,
was excellent. Of course, Stanislaw was totally impotent to defend his
kingdom. He had built beautiful palaces, restored much of the crown lands
and income but he had failed, indeed scarcely tried, to provide the
essential institutions of a modern state: no national army, no strong
bureaucratic class. Anarchy still prevailed; later in life he endured a
second partition and died in the marble palace at St Petersburg. A few years
later Poland was wiped off the map.
A tragic tale beautifully told. Zamoyski's prose does not dazzle, nothing is
strained, it is cool and pellucid. He is a great writer and his biography is
very readable and instructive. The only blot on this book are the
illustrations, dreadfully small, often meaningless and smudged pictures; in
fact awful. But they do not matter. Please, Mr Zamoyski, turn your eye on
Catherine the Great: the greatest female monarch in Europe's history and so
ripe for your talents.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6305</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAD5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Christmas Food and Drink: Cognac at Pounds 280 a snort
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GILES MACDONOGH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT IS not a question of etiquette, it is simply unwise to ask how old the
cognac is: you are unlikely to get a straight answer. The simple answer is
as old as it was when it went into 'glass.' That means when it was bottled,
or when it was transferred from the cask to the demi-johns which reside in
the innermost sanctum of the cognac house known as 'Paradis'.
According to this simplification of the age issue we have only 10, 20, 30,
50 and 100 year old cognacs corresponding to the length of time they spent
in Limousin oak casks.
On the other hand there are vintages in the Charente region - good years and
bad for the sharp little white wines which are distilled to make the famous
brandy.
A small amount of cognac is sold with a vintage date. This is the 'early
landed cognac' which used to be a speciality of the British wine trade. In
Cognac most spirits are blended to create the house styles of the big names.
The resulting brandies are sold with the vaguest indications of age: VS
'very special' or three-star must be three years old; VSOP 'very special old
pale' four years old; Napoleon, five; and so on. In reality the famous firms
market far older brandies within these brackets so that the youngest brandy
in a VS will be four years old; the most junior in a VSOP, six; while an XO
might contain large amounts of brandy more than 25 years old.
The small firm of AE Dor is in the old Protestant enclave of Jarnac, a few
miles upstream from Cognac, on the Charente river. Dor is one of a very few
houses which specialises in releasing small batches of very old cognacs:
'Hors d'age' Reserves, which spent anything from 30 to 50 years in cask; and
the 'Tres vieilles grandes champagnes' which are ancient vintage spirits
released in minute quantities.
Last month I tasted a range of these cognacs at the Four Seasons restaurant
In London's Inn on the Park with the sommelier, Erik Bequemont and the
importer: David Baker of Classic Cognacs. At the cheaper end of the list
there was an honourable VSOP or 'Rare Fine Champagne' (Pounds 28.45 inc.
VAT) with an aristocratIc bouquet of apricots and incense and a rather more
concentrated Napoleon (Pounds 48.20 inc. VAT) The former is basically eight
years old, the Napoleon 15. Both receive small additions of caramel to give
them colour.
None of the other brandies contains additives. The XO is the most popular
with the restaurant trade, and Dor has dressed it up in a rather vulgar
bottle to make it appeal to the Duty Free shopper. The cognac here is 25
years old and exudes an attractive baked apple bouquet (Pounds 80.35 inc
VAT).
Only now begins the range of 'Hors d'Age' Reserves. The 30-year-old No 6
(Pounds 119.95 inc VAT) is a mite fiery with a slightly catty aroma. Baker
tells me that it is extremely popular in Germany. The 40-year-old No 7 was
much more exciting (Pounds 159.95 inc VAT) with its bouquet, length of
finish and complexity.
In a hotel or restaurant the No 7 would cost you between Pounds 12 and
Pounds 14 a shot, the 45-year-old No 8 (Pounds 233.00 inc. VAT) nearer
Pounds 18. The delicacy of this spirit belies its high (47 per cent) alcohol
content. Bequemont enjoyed the aromas of oranges and apricots, I found the
elusive bouquet of irises.
Both the Nos 9 and 10 are really vintage cognacs No. 9 (Pounds 699 inc. VAT)
was harvested in 1914 and run off 50 years later. Cognacs which spend more
than 50 years in cask are often said to go flat. This brandy, however, is
full of life. The No 10 (Pounds 1,202 inc. VAT) has more of the character
known as 'rancio' in Cognac: a nutty aroma combined with the smell of wild
mushrooms, not unlike old solera sherry. This cognac was harvested in 1922
and run off into glass in 1965.
Our final treat was one of the very old reserves: Louis Philippe, harvested
in 1840. Baker believes this was decanted into demi-johns in 1910. In more
than 70 years in cask its strength had gone down to 34 per cent by volume.
Not surprisingly, the spirit was a deep russet with a complex bouquet of
coffee, iris and orange combined with almonds and vanilla - rather like some
wonderfully special nougat. A bottle of this suitably packaged in crystal
will set you back Pounds 3,743 inc. VAT, or about Pounds 280 a snort.
Information: Classic Cognacs. PO Box 1171 Melksham, Wiltshire SNI2 8RX. Tel:
0225-791007. Fax 0225 791321.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6306</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAD4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Christmas Food and Drink: A personal food service in
Aladdin's cave
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIPPA DAVENPORT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MACKINTOSH of Marlborough, Wilts, does not sell Christmas hampers. It is not
that Nigel Mackintosh is against the giving of food and drink as presents.
Far from it. But he believes in the personalised rather than the
pre-packaged approach.
'Why don't you,' he suggests, 'look round our shop, choose what you know the
recipient will like, then nip next door (next door, very conveniently, is a
kitchenware shop), buy a basket and we can pack it for you.'
Alternatively you could buy a board or platter and load it with some of
Mackintosh's fine cheeses. 'Or,' adds Georgina, the catering half of the
husband and wife partnership, 'you might like to buy a lasagne, pie or pate
dish to give as a gift and I will cook something in it for you'. Thus many a
Christmas, house-warming, or birthday present is solved.
Mackintosh is a remarkably small shop, just 300 sq ft, with the same space
again in a basement kitchen area. The owners reckon the smallness of the
place is a virtue in disguise, enforcing a disciplined selection of stock.
There is no room here for run-of-the-mill products. It does not attempt to
compete with supermarkets or to stock lines carried by other shops in the
area, but concentrate instead on selling quality foods from small producers,
much of it artisan or hand-made, and its own foods cooked on the premises.
It is not a cheap place to shop but it is a miniature Aladdin's cave for the
greedy.
Nigel served his apprenticeship with Asda, spent four subsequent years with
Justin de Blank and two with Duff &amp; Trotter.
His wife is cordon bleu trained and cooked for directors' lunch parties in
London before they married, moved to this west country market town and set
up shop six years ago.
Cheese is a major item in the shop. Up to 50 sorts may be on sale, probably
half of them British. Nigel loves the seasonality of cheeses and is
presently excited by the return of vacherin Mont d'Or after three years
unavailability, and the arrival of a torte with basil and pine nuts, 'the
latest taste sensation in the shop'.
Cheese tastings and discussions are encouraged. Labels are intelligently
detailed, often specifying the cheesemaker's name.
Here you will find not any old Caerphilly, Cheshire, Lancashire and Double
Gloucester but those by the Ducketts, the Appelbys, Mrs Kirkham of Goosnargh
and Diana Smart respectively, names as important to lovers of good cheese as
the names of chefs to serious eaters at restaurants.
Olives and olive oils are treated to the same devotion as cheese. The
charcuterie section is small but well chosen. Alderton ham cooked on the
bone (brine-cured Wiltshire style, finished with marmalade) and carved to
order is a best seller.
Other provisions come from some of the best names in the food business,
British and foreign: classy French soups in glass jars, Baxter's potted
shrimps, Cipriani pasta, Millers Damsel biscuits, Ackerman and Valrohna
chocolate, Cellier cider from Brittany, Whittard's teas, chestnut honey from
Coltibuono, English honey by Vivian, Dorothy Carter jams, panettone by Le
Tre Marie, turron Alicante and - fingers crossed - Elvas plums in time for
Christmas.
These are the sort of elitist names one would hope and expect to find in the
best delicatessens countrywide. Pleasingly, Mackintosh also offers some up
and coming'discoveries', thus allowing customers to be ahead of the game.
Chutneys and pickles by Hotshop - Tuscan Lemon and Kashmiri Apricot -
loganberry vinegar by Womersley Hall, raised pies by Tilbec, House of
Edinburgh shortbread, Orkney oatcakes and thick flaky water biscuits, all
these may become well-established names in foodie circles before long.
The shop acts as a showcase and marketplace for the produce of local farm
kitchens and cottage industries. A culinary snapshot of the region, so to
speak. They offer the shopper a rare chance to enjoy a taste of the best of
the region.
From Eastbrook Farm, near Swindon, Glos, come free-range eggs, organic bacon
and sausages; from Wroughton glorious Guernsey cream and slabs of rich
yellow farm butter. There is runny and set honey and honey in the comb from
an apiary in Oare; local wild mushroom in oil, pickled walnuts, apple and
elderberry fruit cheese and other preserves by Louisa Maskell of Chisbury;
organic apple juice from Pewsey; breads from Rushall made with organic stone
ground flour; and sponges and fruit cakes baked by two women wisely
commissioned when the local Women's Institute market closed.
Then there is the cooking done on the premises, which tends more towards
comforting country house classics than haute cuisine. It is essentially good
honest home cooking without the chore of having to do it yourself.
There is always a selection of fresh pates available, and a variety of
sandiches, mini quiches, flapjacks and brown sugar meringues for the
lunchtime trade. The freezer usually boasts a range of soups, main courses
and puddings.
Pies of the shepherd's variety, vegetarian, steak and kidney, and chicken or
game and ham are all popular. These are normally made in foil containers
though the kitchen willingly makes them - and other recipes to order - in
customer's dishes. A fish pie topped with pastry fish swimming across the
lid was carried up from the kitchen to the shop for collection during our
interview.
Georgina particularly enjoys catering for shooting lunches, when the menu
might include Lancashire hotpot, or Irish or Oxtail stew with dumplings and
all the trimmings, followed by apple pie or treacle tart, luncheon cakes and
a splendid cheeseboard.
But more than anything else the shop kitchen is kept busy cooking roulades
(mostly sweet, some savoury) and tiddlewink size Parmesan shortbreads for
nibbling with pre-prandial drinks. Marlborough's appetite for them seems
never ending.
Mackintosh of Marlborough is at 42a High Street, Marlborough, Wiltshire.
Tel: 0672-514069.
SAVOURY PUFF PINWHEELS (makes 20-24) Another popular Mackintosh party piece:
1 x 8 oz packet puff pastry; 1 x 50 g tin of anchovies, drained of oil and
sliced in half lengthways; 1 large onion, finely chopped, cooked until soft
in the anchovy oil, drained and cooled; 4 tablespoons tapenade paste; 2
teaspoons tomato puree; 4 oz grated Cheddar cheese.
Cut the pastry in half and roll out each piece to a 6 x 8 inch oblong.
Spread each piece with tapenade, scatter with onion, dot with tomato puree
and lay the anchovies on top. Sprinkle evenly with the cheese and add a
grinding of pepper.
Roll up each piece of pastry as tightly as possible, rolling from one short
end to the other. Wrap in foil and freeze if preparing ahead. Or cut into
1/4 inch slices straight away.
To cook, lay the pinwheels on non-stick baking trays, spacing them a little
apart, and bake at 400'F (200'C) gas mark 6 for 10-15 minutes until golden
and crisp.
Cool on a rack and eat while still warm or within 24 hours or the pastry
will spoil.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6307</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAD3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Christmas Food and Drink: St Julien roadshow - Jancis
Robinson tests her palate and her stamina on 100 clarets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JANCIS ROBINSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HOW many times have you heard it said that there is a world glut of fine
wine? Forth Worth's Marvin C Overton III MD, and his ilk, have a solution.
The problem is, you see, that we are all just too slow on the draw; our
corkscrews spend too long in the holster. If only we would loosen up, get
popping and match Overton's opening rate of nearly 20 bottles an hour, the
planet's fine wine backlog could be cleared within months.
I could not believe the program he faxed me of a tasting I co-hosted at the
Four Seasons restaurant in New York last May. We were to begin at 9.30 am,
apparently with 'Lillet over ice with a slice of orange', a glass of
vermouth being just what you feel like after breakfast, especially with a
total of 87 clarets in prospect.
Between 10 am and an early lunch we were to taste 24 vintages of Ch Gloria
plus 19 of Ch St Pierre. After lunch corks were pulled on no fewer than 40
vintages of Ch Ducru-Beaucaillou, three of them from the last century.
In the months before the event I had protested vigorously, twice, at this
unseemly massacre. Do we really have to taste every vintage of the 1970s and
1980s, I bleated from my fax machine. Overton insisted: 'The poor vintages
are now not likely to show that well and are simply there for completeness
to accentuate the true beauty of the better years. Don't be concerned. I've
done this on any number of occasions and have it down pat.'
And he did. By 12.15 pm we had raced through 43 red bordeaux - most of us
having given the Lillet a miss, however much it may assist the fortunes of
the Borie family of Ducru-Beaucaillou. At lunch a mere four wines were on
offer with the consomme and wild mushroom risotto. The visiting Bordeaux
chateau owners were somewhat mystified by this flesh-free midday snack, one
of them dismissing the risotto as 'porridge'.)
This gaggle of proprietors had one more thing in common: their properties
are all in the same Bordeaux parish of which Dr Overton iis a devotee. As he
put to the assembled wine collectors and writers: 'We're not here to
critique the wines, we're here to celebrate God's glorious place, St
Julien'.
Overton is unmistakeably Texan, not just for his bowlegged drawl but for his
height, his apple cheeks, his resolute beam and his extraordinary taste in
suits. I have to say that I found his jacket, sculpted by a famous Italian
tailor from finest pinstripe to Dr Overton's own design incorporating a
pointed cowboy yoke, almost as riveting as the Ducru 1867.
But perhaps what most distinguishes him as a Lone Star statesman is the
sheer scale of his ambition. All those bottles emptied, followed by a
15-wine dinner that night illuminated, naturally, by his 20-minute home
movie about St Julien - 'and don't none of you laugh at ma French accent' -
and this was just the start of his five-city, 10-chateau tour of the US
putting God's glorious place on the American wine collectors' map.
He is quite right to bring to their often blinkered view the fact that there
is life beyond the first growths (St Julien has no first growth but is
stuffed with exceptionally good seconds and others), but who else could have
imagined that they would be happy to board a 9 am plane to Chicago the next
day with 102 wines still sloshing around the bloodstream?
Overton, a neurological surgeon, clearly has heartening faith in the human
body's ability to withstand the ravages of alcohol. 'I find I have to let it
all wash down mah throat. But it's just a liddle pour, it doesn't affect
me,' he confided, just before trying to wind up the event 13 vintages too
early.
I spent the afternoon, doggedly trying to spit and write notes, flanked by
the non-spitting Overton and the non-note-taking Jean-Eugene Borie whose
grin became increasingly bemused.
'I never had such a tasting. Marvin is always so active,' beamed the
proprietor of Ch Ducru-Beaucaillou. 'At the chateau we have four bottles or
so of the very old vintages, but none of this marvellous 1924. I'm going to
try and buy some.' As we tasted his surprisingly delightful 1969 he looked
at it dolefully. 'I never taste the 1969. I thought it wasn't very
interesting to keep it.'
The wines had come from a variety of sources - Overton's own cellar and
those of fellow American collectors in particular - although importers
helped with newer vintages and the Ducru 1929 had been air freighted in from
a London trader only that morning.
Overton, who loves organising these tasting marathons, is not only long on
wine, but long on wine homilies, as in, 'Ah always say that for the first 10
years of its life you have to work at a wine. For the second 10 years you
marvel at it, and for the third 10 years you just let it float over you like
yer ol' flannel jammies.'
All over New York that week I kept bumping into wine folk asking 'Why is he
doing it?' I suppose it might have been to hear someone like Jean-Eugene
Borie stand up after dinner at the Four Seasons and say: 'Marvin, you are
very, very fantastic.' But I think it was probably just ol' Marv doing his
bit to deplete stocks, fast.
Best buy: St Pierre 1986 at Pounds 120 a dozen, plus VAT, from Bibendum,
071-722-5577.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6308</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAD2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Christmas Food and Drink: Top-class venues on the cheap -
How to take advantage of expensive hotels
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS LANDER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AT CHRISTMAS large hotels can call on certain built-in advantages to cater
for parties - space, extra staff to make you, the customer, feel special and
financial resources, evident for example in impressive flower displays,
beyond the reach of individual restaurateurs.
In keeping with the straitened circumstances of the 1990s, Weekend FT sent
Nicholas Lander around the less expensive dining rooms of some of London's
top hotels.
Le Meridien, The Terrace Restaurant, Piccadilly, W1V OB8 (Tel:
071-734-8000).
This hotel faces some of the most imposing architecture on Piccadilly,
including St James' Church. Such views, however, are not on offer in the Oak
Room, the hotel's main dining room - dark wood panelling and chandeliers -
but they are freely available in the Terrace on the second floor. The
Terrace is all windows and ceiling with hanging plants and can offer welcome
sunshine.
Its menu has drawn on the cooking of Jacques Maniere for its inspiration. He
pioneered the philosophy that French cooking could excel without lashings of
butter or cream.
Dishes which are vegetarian are marked with an asterisk. A double asterisk
denotes lightly cooked, calorie-controlled dishes. In the former category, a
lasagne with spinach pasta, or a Mediterranean sandwich with fetta cheese,
are included. In the latter, white tuna on a bed of couscous, and chicken
with a spicy Thai sauce. The wine list smacks of a big hotel but the service
is attentive and friendly.
There are three pre-Christmas party menus, Pounds 20.50, Pounds 25 and
Pounds 28.50.
The Savoy, The Upstairs Bar, WC2. Tel: 071-836 4343.
If your company outing is for no more than four this is the place to go. The
Upstairs Bar looks down on the hotel's main entrance which can provide
better visual entertainment than television. After the theatre one night we
watched as a horde of photographers pursued first Princess Margaret and
then, in even greater numbers, the actress Joan Collins.
The Upstairs Bar's specialities are seafood and shellfish - oysters, lobster
and king prawns - and caviar should you choose. But the highlight of my last
meal, only spoiled by vegetables straight out of first-year catering
college, were the soups on offer. Served from tureens, they are sufficient
for at least two healthy portions and my barley, potato and clam soup showed
just how big hotel kitchens, with their continuous production of all the
necessary stocks, can offer dishes no longer to be found in most smaller
restaurants.
The bar's other major attraction is a well stocked Cruvinet which dispenses
large glasses of 10 well-chosen wines. We drank two glasses of different
1989 Chablis from Durup. Price of lunch and dinner from Pounds 25.
The Lanesborough, The Conservatory, 1 Lanesborough Place, SW1. Tel:
071-259-5599.
If you want to explore what was St George's Hospital, and is now the newest
London luxury hotel, the Conservatory Restaurant is the place to do it.
To get there you will have to walk through the lobby of the hotel past a
dull and misplaced dining room. The conservatory is light, airy and full of
greenery. My major reservation about the design is that if your table is
close to the piano and the waterfall, conversation can be a little
difficult.
The conservatory also seems to excite Paul Gaylor, the Lanesborough's chef,
more than the restaurant and the menu would certainly appeal to those who
want to leave meat, and in particular turkey, well alone.
There is a strong emphasis on fish - Thai mussels with minted peanut sauce,
sea bream with basil and tuna with balsamic vinegar - and a noticeable
influence from the East in dishes such as a first course of Cantonese
steamed quail and a main course of Chinese-style duckling with cumin
noodles. Gaylor has also gone out of his way to excite the taste buds of of
vegetarians with specialities from which an oriental black mushroom risotto
with coriander was excellent.
Service is formal and efficient and the wine list enterprising with some
very good selections from France, Lebanon, Israel, the US and New Zealand.
Pre-Christmas lunch, December 1-24, Pounds 21.50, Dinner Pounds 27.50.
Hotel Inter-Continental, Hyde Park Corner, W1. Tel: 071-409-3131, Coffee
House.
The first American style coffee shop when it opened in the early 1970s. It
still has an American bias with a range of big sandwiches, burgers and pasta
and an extensive buffet. Lunch Pounds 19, dinner Pounds 22.50 .
Claridges, The Causerie, Brook Street, W1. Tel: 071-629-8860.
One of this stylish hotel's best kept secrets is the smorgasbord at
lunchtime. Priced to include the first drink, from Pounds 16 with a Dubonnet
to Pounds 18.50 with a Manhattan.
The Park Lane Hotel, Brasserie on the Park, London W1. Tel: 071-499-6321.
A bright, airy room that takes full advantage of its position directly
opposite Green Park. Here, and in the hotel's more expensive Bracewell's
restaurant, it aims to promote the best of British produce. Pre-Christmas
lunch Pounds 19.75, dinner Pounds 23.75.
Hyatt Carlton Tower, The Rib Room, Cadogan Place, SW1. Tel: 071-235-5411.
This used to be the place to eat Scottish beef and although carnivores are
not neglected (roast rib of Aberdeen Angus Pounds 14.50), the menu now
includes a large shellfish and fish section. Pre-Christmas lunch Pounds 21,
dinner Pounds 29.
Grosvenor House, The Pavilion, Park Lane, W1. Tel: 071-499-6363.
Newly refurbished in a light, airy and, for a large hotel, most
unpretentious style. The food has an Italian emphasis and the wine list is
an international one with unusual, keenly-priced bottles from Long Island,
US, and Australia. Pre-Christmas lunch and dinner Pounds 19.50.
Inn on the Park, The Lanes, W1. Tel: 071-499-0888.
A windowless room that could be in any international hotel but this
restaurant's distinguishing features are very prompt service, an array of
different menus from Pounds 17 - buffets, specials and an a la carte - and
eight different house wines by the glass.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6309</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Computing: The facts about databases - How to pick from a
bewildering range of software
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID CARTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SELECTING a database programme can be confusing. The two other common
software packages - word processing and spreadsheet - are well charted
territory, but databases are tricky. There are 'flat file' and 'relational'
databases, menu-driven and programmable databases, specialised databases for
text retrieval and for personal information management.
In its original meaning, a database is simply a mass of data. You might talk
of a database of names and addresses, or a database of membership records.
Different types of database demand different types of database package. At
the simplest level, a list of client names and addresses can be handled by a
single file (or 'flat file') database. At the other extreme the package
might need to be 'relational', that is, able to accommodate several related
files which pass information between (update) one another. For example, a
sales order database will generate a sales invoice which in turn updates the
sales ledger file, the nominal ledger file, and the stock file.
To write complex business packages such as sales order processing,
developers use 'database development packages' such as dBase IV, Foxpro,
Clipper, DataEase, Paradox and R:Base 3.1. These are called 'programmable'
databases because they use programme-like instructions. Complex applications
demand the flexibility of a programmable database. These top of the range
packages cost Pounds 500 plus and their power and sophistication really make
them suitable only for professionals.
For non-technical users who want to perform simpler tasks database packages
are available which are entirely 'menu-driven'. Without having to learn any
programming language you can design your own database, enter data, edit it
and print out reports. Menu-driven databases are the nearest you or I will
get to writing our own computer programs.
Most of the top-range packages use menus for simple tasks. Some come in
cut-down versions for the amateur where the underlying programming language
has been removed so that they are entirely menu-driven. Examples are Paradox
Special Edition (Pounds 80 from retailers like Dixons or Wildings) or
Personal R:Base (about Pounds 80 by mail order in PC magazines) In terms of
price / performance these are probably the best value database packages on
the market. However, they were originally designed for the professional and
employ a formal, classical approach. This takes some getting used to and
Personal R:Base, for example, is simply too powerful and complex to be given
to the novice. But database users who think they have outgrown their first
package and want something more sophisticated will love it.
This leaves packages designed ab initio for the amateur rather than cut-down
versions of professional packages. Examples are Q &amp; A, Reflex, Masterfile,
Cardbox Plus, Professional File, Rapidfile. Which do you choose? There is
one fundamental question - is your database primarily made up of text or
numbers? Each requires different functions.
In the case of a text application such as address lists or membership
records you need to be able to query the file in order to extract, say,
prospective customers who live in Wales and have expressed an interest in
antique furniture. The important thing is to be able to search through 5,000
records, retrieve the half-dozen that meet your criteria, then print them
out in a list. Maintaining contact name and addresses is the most common
application for a database. Every package on the market can do this, and do
not forget the databases within integrated packages such as Microsoft Works,
Smartware, Eight-in-One Gold, PFS First Choice. They are more than adequate
and have the added advantage that they are designed to work with the
integrated word processor to produce mailshots.
These are textual databases. The other type is a numeric database, for
example, a database of sales invoices. In this case you are not interested
in retrieving individual sales invoices but in data analysis and reporting
analysing which products have been sold to which customers by which
salesmen, producing summary reports and identifying trends. Here you must be
careful.
All databases can handle text applications; few can handle numeric. For data
analysis the key requirement is 'cross-tab reporting' which enables you to
summarise data in different ways rather than simply listing individual
records within the database. A database package without cross-tab reporting
is useless for analysis of numeric data.
Few packages excel in data analysis and reporting, but one that does is
Borland's Reflex which is a easy to use and can be recommended even to
beginners.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6310</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Minding Your Own Business: Rocked by the recession - A
couple fighting through bad times with a heavy load of debt
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CLIVE FEWINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE YEAR 1992 has been a bad one for many small businesses. But for David
and Noreen Kiss who run The Rocking Horse Workshop from a Victorian
farmhouse near the small town of Wem in rural Shropshire it has been little
short of disastrous.
As Christmas approaches there will be ample presents for the couple's three
young sons. But just as those will be bought with borrowed money, so the
Kisses are increasingly wondering whether they are running their business on
borrowed time. Something drastic has to be done if they are to rescue their
business from the ravages of recession.
'When we moved here from Kent and set up the business five years ago we
didn't expect to make much of a profit for the first two or three years. We
bought this house and 12 acres plus the large outbuildings for Pounds 90.000
and had ample loans from the bank to tide us over.' said David, 38 and
worked in the motor trade before the move to Wem.
'By 1990 however we were turning over Pounds 31,000 and were poised to go
into profit. We had taken on our first employee - although only on a casual
basis - and people were beginning to discover us in our rather remote rural
surroundings and bring us work.'
Then came the disaster of 1991.
'I daren't think what sort of a loss we made. I'll know when we pay the
accountant,' Kiss said.
The order book for the 15 styles of traditional wooden rocking horse made by
the Kisses just dried up. Restoration work - usually a good fallback - also
took a nose dive.
Fortunately Paul Hamblet, the jack-of-all-trades employee, was able to turn
his hand to agricultural work when not working for the Kisses.
The only thing that kept them afloat last year was the nursery school they
had opened in late 1990 at the end of the long brick built building at the
rear of their house that also houses the rocking horse business.
'We were lucky,' said Noreen. 'The word had got around, and we managed to
fill all 20 places quite fast. But even then by the time we had paid the
full-time qualified supervisor our turnover in 1991 of Pounds 24,500 still
registered a loss of Pounds 4,000.' To meet all the health and safety
requirements the Kisses had been obliged to find Pounds 15,000 to convert
the end of the building into the school. They did this by extending their
mortgage a second time to a total of Pounds 130,000.
In spite of selling five acres for Pounds 13,000 last year they are still
running an overdraft and struggling to keep up with their mortgage payments.
'The beginning of 1992 was more promising, with a lot of restoration work,'
David said. 'But by mid-summer I had nothing to do that would earn me money.
In a deep recession people tend to leave the old family rocking horse that
they have intended to have restored in the roof until times get better.'
With Christmas fast approaching there has been a definite upturn.
David has been able to get back to hand carving of some of the top range
English oak rocking horses that sell at Pounds 2,225 and upwards. Paul has
been rehired and Noreen has got back to painting the horses, as well as
overseeing the nursery.
However with the bank continually asking awkward questions the Kisses reckon
business will have to remain at the present level continuously for at least
two years if their enterprise is to survive.
All this is set against the background of a splendid range of products that
includes some cheaper wooden rocking horses named after the three Kiss boys
and priced at Pounds 500 to Pounds 900, and a high degree of skill and
determination.
David is an excellent craftsman. His designer wife takes a pattern off every
historic rocking horse that comes into the workshop. They now have 29
patterns that they could make, in addition to their standard range.
They do nearly all the work in-house to save money, and this includes some
quite advanced leatherwork for the high quality bridles and tack. They also
trade in and restore period toys and take individual commissions for wooden
toys. They have a first class workshop, an excellently presented showroom,
and literature to match.
All the qualities of a successful business are there. But in a recession as
deep as the present one it seems these are just not enough.
'It's hard to see where we've gone wrong,' David said. 'Why blame the bank
for lending us money freely when we asked for it in the first place? But I
really do think they let us have a large overdraft too easily.
'We spent too freely - particularly on restoring the property - as the money
was there and we allowed ourselves to be sidetracked into doing that rather
than concentrating on getting the business established.
'However there was a lot to do, and five years ago we were both energetic 33
year-olds, with two young sons and another on the way.
'I have to admit that I am better at creating things than running a
business.' The property is currently on the market at Pounds 200,000,
together with the nursery school, which is for sale as a going concern. The
Kisses are hoping they will be able to stay, but if a suitable buyer is
found they have alternative smaller premises in mind in a neighbouring
village. There they would aim to concentrate on their first love - the
rocking horses.
Noreen said: 'Something has got to happen. We are at the stage where the
bank could foreclose at any moment. It's not a nice thought, with Christmas
just round the corner and all those lovely unfinished wooden beasts with
their flowing manes and rolling eyes waiting to be completed in order to
bring happiness to children.
'Like David, I'd love the opportunity to create a dozen horses from scratch
between now and Christmas. I'd welcome the pressure and we'd work round the
clock to finish them.'
The Rocking Horse Workshop, Ashfield House, The Foxholes, Wem, Shropshire
SY4 5UJ. Tel. 0939- 232335.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6311</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Minding Your Own Business: Women and sin - As they say in
Europe
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES MORGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
I HAD thought the British fuss over supplying arms-making equipment to a
valued customer like Iraq would have hit the European headlines. But it did
not; instead, it was women priests who created the real stir. There was
front-page comment right across Catholic Europe, not only in Rome and Madrid
but also Brussels, Paris and Vienna. But not Munich. The Protestants,
meanwhile, found women priests a bit of a bore - except, for some reason, in
Geneva.
I had always thought the Church of England occupied such an odd position in
the spectrum of European religious observance that it would be too esoteric
an institution to interest foreigners. It is, after all, only one of the
many strands in the fabric of Anglo-Saxon devotion.
General de Gaulle observed (presumably after a particularly bruising Sunday
dinner in wartime London) that 'les Anglais ont beaucoup de religions mais
seulement une sauce.' (The English have many religions but only one sauce).
But, the Church of England possesses considerable charms for continental
newspapers. Not only is it a part of the always newsy aspects of English
quirkiness, it also represents a sort of unleaded Catholicism which such
sophisticated liberals prefer.
Thus, El Pais devoted two pages to the story and there were days of comment
in Italy. The Spanish paper managed to start a useful row in domestic
religious circles: it quoted the secretary of the Episcopal Commission for
Interconfessional Relations, Julian Garcia Hernando, as saying that the
incorporation of women as priests 'is an open question since, from the
doctrinal point of view, there is no dogmatic definition.' But he added that
the step should not have been taken in isolation.
The article continued much to my surprise: 'Theologians and Christian
communities have expressed satisfaction at the Anglican position and have
seen it as proof of its sensitivity to secular society.'
This went to the heart of the matter. What are Catholics coming to if they
can talk about 'sensitivity to secular society?' Fortunately, the auxiliary
bishop of Madrid, Javier Martinez, was there to underline why the the
Reformation had been such a ghastly mistake: 'It is a tendency of the great
Protestant churches to dissolve themselves into the dominant culture.'
The other religious story was the publication of the new catechism, the
Church's list of dos and, more importantly, don'ts. The press revelled in
the new areas of sin. The latest additions seem to reflect the increasing
weight of Latin Americans among the faithful. It is now possible to indulge
that old Brazilian pastime of escaping the clutches of the taxman by driving
blind drunk through the rain forest and commit three sins at once.
Traditionalists who were disappointed by the pardoning of Galileo for his
subversive notions regarding the motion of the planets will be reassured by
the inflexibility of this first catechism in four centuries. The Archbishop
of Tours, Mgr Jean Honore wrote in La Croix, this latest edition 'which
hopes to be a clear affirmation of faith' also risked 'accentuating a sort
of rupture with the modern world.'
Thus masturbation continues to be right up there with mass-murder as a bad
thing and delights those reporters whose job it is to summarise catechisms.
Liberation even managed to produce a comparative analysis of policy on such
sins today and yesterday, creating what is known in the trade as a 'box'
devoted solely to prostitution, sodomy, lasciviousness, and impure thoughts
as well as what is also known as 'solitary vice,' at least until Madonna
came along.
But there was one voice that objected to the levity that the subject of
religion seems to inspire in certain quarters. Writing under the one-word
headline 'Priestesses' in Die Presse of Vienna, Thomas Chorherr castigated
the 'scurrility' of certain kinds of religious reporting which at best sees
a church as a cultural monument. 'Only Christendom enjoys religious
voyeurism. Perhaps because there there is so much transparency. Sometimes it
emerges as exhibitionism.'
Most people know the old Jewish story of what happened when the Rabbi was
asked why Jews always answered a question with a question. He said, 'And why
shouldn't a Jew answer a question with a question?' Now as it happens the
Cardinal-Archbishop of Paris, Mgr Jean-Marie Lustiger, born a Jew, was asked
why it was that the new catechism appeared first in French. 'Would you
rather it had been in English?' he replied.
James Morgan is diplomatic correspondent of BBC World Service.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6312</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Finance &amp; the Family: Better a spender than a saver be -
Diary of a Private Investor
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN GOLDSTEIN-JACKSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT DOES not seem all that long ago that Britons were being criticised by the
government for not saving enough. Now, it would appear they are at fault for
not spending enough. Chancellor Norman Lamont's autumn statement, which was
really a mini-Budget, was designed partly to give people confidence enough
to spend. But will they?
Abolishing the special car tax should reduce the average price of a new car
by around 4 per cent. But cars are still overpriced compared with, say, the
US where I could buy a beautiful, luxurious Lincoln Continental, complete
with air-conditioning, for less than the cost of a rather ordinary car sold
in Britain. People with money to spend still feel they are being ripped off,
and the product range available in the UK is rather limited.
As a private investor, I shall be keeping a close watch on companies which
may suffer (or benefit) from the chancellor's actions in 1993. But he is
unlikely to want to increase tax on too many items for fear of producing
increases in the retail prices index, which would have a big impact on his
wish to keep pay claims low and inflation under control.
The chancellor's injection of Pounds 750m, to be used before the end of the
financial year to help remove 'the overhang of empty properties in the owner
occupied sector,' is unlikely to halt the fall in house prices. This sum is
equivalent only to 20,000 homes at Pounds 37,500 each - not much help to the
middle and upper end of the market, where prices are likely to remain
depressed due to record levels of unemployment in the managerial sector and
continuing problems for many Lloyd's underwriters.
Housing Corporation and other public spending on existing homes could even,
in some areas, reduce the demand from the private sector. After all, a
housing estate or apartment block loses its attractions to many private
buyers if they think their neighbours might be council tenants.
If interest rates were to fall further, say to 3 or 4 per cent, perhaps the
chancellor could announce in his next Budget a phased ending of mortgage
interest tax relief. This could be spread over 10 years and would help to
balance the government's books.
It is also worth pointing out that, quite often, one person's pain is
another person's pleasure (and vice versa). Rather like cars, house prices
in the UK remain at rather high levels compared with those in many other
countries.
While people with hefty mortgages and 'negative value' homes obviously will
resent further falls in the value of their properties, the situation would
be very helpful for first-time buyers.
A further cut in interest rates is expected widely. Again, this is
double-edged. People with mortgages and other borrowings welcome such cuts
but savers - particularly those who depend for part of their income on
interest payments - find it painful. Savers have less to spend, and many
borrowers use an interest rate reduction not to increase their spending but
to reduce further their debts.
Thus, I shall continue to avoid investing in stores groups, as I cannot
envisage much increase in people's spending. I will also keep an eye on
items which might attract new taxes next year and I am reconsidering my
investment in premium bonds. From March 1, the prize fund is being reduced
from 6.5 to 5 per cent, thus increasing the odds of any Pounds 1 bond unit
winning a prize in each draw from 11,000-1 to 15,000-1.
Increasing the minimum purchase of bonds for children from Pounds 10 to
Pounds 100 from February 1 seems particularly mean. I thought the government
needed to borrow as much as possible from the British public  - including
children's pocket money - in order to afford all its spending plans and its
vast armies of civil servants.
The chancellor also announced the establishment of a 'new panel of
independent forecasters' to be in operation in time for next year's Budget.
As my youngest daughter (now eight) and I have predicted economic events
consistently with more accuracy than the Treasury, we await eagerly our
summons to 11 Downing Street. We can then also tell the chancellor what he
can do with premium bonds . . .
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6313</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Briefcase, Q&amp;A: Caught in the net
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
RECENTLY, I bought some Bradford &amp; Bingley PIBS (Permanent Interest-Bearing
Shares) halfway through the dividend period. I paid my broker for these and
for the gross interest accrued from the previous dividend date.
When I receive my dividend in three months' time, it will be paid net. How
do I recover the tax deducted for the period when I was not the holder of
the shares? And how is the tax on the interest adjusted?
It all depends on what you mean by 'some.' If this indicates an amount less
than Pounds 5,000.01, then the answer hinges on whether, on at least one day
in 1991-92 or 1992-93, your total nominal holdings of securities covered by
the accrued income scheme (AIS) amounted to at least Pounds 5,000.01 (using
the London closing rate of exchange for each day to translate nominal
amounts expressed in a foreign currency.) The AIS is outlined in a free
pamphlet, IR68 (Accrued Income Scheme: Taxing Securities on Transfer), which
is obtainable from your tax office.
But if 'some' means an amount less than Pounds 5,000.01, and you do not meet
the overall Pounds 5,000.01 test at any time between April 6 1991 and April
5 1993 (inclusive), then not entitled to the benefit of the AIS.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns.  All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6314</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Briefcase, Q&amp;A: Write to your MP
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
OVER THE past four/five years, I have paid about Pounds 500 in extra
accountants' fees due entirely to repeated errors by the Inland Revenue. I
wrote to them recently requesting compensation and was informed that my
request did not fall within their 'statement of practice.' But the errors
and consequent expenses are continuing. Is there anything further I can do?
If you ask your tax office, or your accountants, for a copy of the
Taxpayer's Charter (2nd version, August 1991) you will see that your next
move - under the heading 'If you are not satisfied' - is to write to your MP
and ask him or her to refer your complaint of maladministration to the
parliamentary commissioner (the ombudsman).
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns.  All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6315</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Briefcase, Q&amp;A: Refund on a Tessa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
I AM unemployed and have a Tessa which I propose cashing in to supplement
funds and which will, therefore, earn net interest only from inception. As
my earnings last tax year (and most likely this as well) fall short of my
individual tax allowance, will I be able to obtain a refund from the Revenue
after April 5 which will effectively restore the status quo and give me
gross interest, even though I am only two years into the contract?
If your total income for 1992-93 is below the tax limit, the tax on your
Tessa interest will be refunded. Ask your tax office for the free pamphlets
IR41 (Income Tax and the Unemployed), IR111 (How to Claim a Repayment of Tax
on Bank and Building Society Interest), and IR114 (Tessa - Tax-free Interest
for Taxpayers).
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns.  All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6316</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Briefcase, Q&amp;A: So who gets the house?
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MY WIFE and I own our house jointly and we should like to arrange our
affairs so that, if she dies before me, she could leave her half to our
children. It appears to be easy to do this in England by substituting a
tenancy in common for a joint tenancy. But what about Scotland?
The Scottish legal system does not recognise the concepts of a tenancy in
common or joint tenancies. But it is possible to incorporate a survivorship
destination in the disposition (ie, deed) of the property.
If the disposition says it is in favour of you both equally, and to the
survivor, then the half share of the person who dies first goes
automatically to the surviving spouse.
If however, the disposition is to you both without any reference to
survivorship, then either is entitled to leave their half share to whoever
they wish.
If there is no reference to survivorship, then you both are entitled to
leave your half share to whoever you wish by drawing up individual wills.
If you find there is a survivorship destination, this can be evacuated if it
is the wish of both parties. You should consult a solicitor in that regard.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns.  All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6317</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Finance &amp; the Family: How to stay abreast of school fees -
As base rates fall, John Authers suggests ways to adjust planning
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FALLING base rates are making it harder to save for school fees. This area
of financial planning has always been more risk-averse than others  -
parents want to make sure that they can at least afford to pay the fees when
their children go to school, and do not mind going without any up-side
beyond that. That usually means investment products based on deposits or
fixed-interest securities.
But recent changes in rates make this harder to sustain. As Martin Jones, of
accountant Coopers &amp; Lybrand, puts it: 'It's time to reassess investment
policy. Basically, we've just followed base rates down from 15 per cent. I'm
beginning to wonder how much longer this will go on.'
That means a slight shift from fixed interest and traditional school fees'
planning products to equity investments - particularly, unit and investment
trust personal equity plans (Peps) which are tax-efficient and allow
diversification of risk.
Planning for education costs remains a cautious business, so deposits cannot
be banished altogether. Anthony Murrell, of school fee adviser Fraser Marr,
said his company's philosophy had not altered, but added: 'Where our view
has changed is that we might now be closer to Peps than ever before for 40
per cent taxpayers. I, personally, am not that keen on locking into fixed
interest rates at this low level.'
The two crucial variables in choosing a plan are the time you must wait
before your child starts at school, and your household's tax position. If
you have time on your side, and a large tax bill, you can afford to make
moves which would be too risky for someone whose children are about to go to
school.
So what products now make most sense?
Tessas
These tax-exempt special saver accounts are free of tax and usually still
offer a better return than the top gross rates available. The maximum amount
which can be invested in the first year is Pounds 3,000 a person, falling to
Pounds 1,800 in the second year. But Tessas must be held for five years to
maintain their tax advantages, so they are less useful for people whose
children are about to go to school.
High interest deposit accounts
When one parent does not pay income tax, it is still worth using up their
personal allowance in a high interest deposit account. This pays interest
gross, which will continue to keep you respectably ahead of inflation. It
also makes sense to transfer assets if one parent pays top rate (40 per
cent) tax and the other pays basic rate. Murrell suggests this as the limit
of adventure for those whose child starts school within three or four years
 -equity-derived products are too risky over this time scale.
Capital gains tax (CGT)
It is good to use up the annual CGT allowance of Pounds 5,800. This can be
done using the zero-dividend preference shares of investment trusts, which
deliver a fixed level of interest taxed as gain rather than income. They are
offering growth of around 9.5 per cent a year, which is tax-free for anyone
who does not pay CGT. Richard Boyton, of Boyton Financial Services, believes
these can form the basis of a school fees plan, and offer secure growth.
Peps
Higher-rate taxpayers might now move on to Peps, which invest in equities,
and can accumulate free of both income tax and CGT. But the charges
associated with the plans mean that the tax advantages have a chance to
become significant only after several years.
Educational trust schemes
For 40 per cent taxpayers who have used up both their personal income tax
allowances, and their annual CGT allowance, Murrell suggests educational
trust schemes. These allow funds for children to be invested in a tax-free
environment, provided they are used for educational fees.
Educational trusts work typically by taking a large lump sum and buying
annuities with it. They then pay out income three times a year while the
child is at school to meet the fees.
But these products have been damaged by base rate cuts, as they are invested
wholly in short and medium term gilts (UK government bonds), on which the
yields tend to be very sensitive to base rates.
Annuity rates cannot be renegotiated once they have been bought, so people
investing in such a scheme now will effectively lock themselves into
historically low interest rates.
One scheme on the market does offer some improvement on this, though.
Ecclesiastical Insurance's school fees capital plan is available until
November 30, and is funded using annuities which were bought while base
rates were still at 9 per cent.
The rates involved are guaranteed, but unspectacular. As is usual, you get a
better deal if you plan further ahead.
For an investment of Pounds 10,000, Ecclesiastical will pay Pounds 1,237 a
term for nine terms starting in September 1993 - which means you will get
only Pounds 11,113 from your initial investment of Pounds 10,000. But if
your child does not start at school until September 1996, and then stays for
21 terms, Ecclesiastical will pay Pounds 759 a term - a total of Pounds
15,939.
Many advisers also recommend with-profits endowments for parents who are
able to plan a long way ahead. They are less volatile than Peps but they are
inflexible and provide poor value if cashed-in early. Also, they are loaded
heavily with commission and are less tax-efficient.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6318</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Finance &amp; the Family: An ethical question - Scheherazade
Daneshkhu asks if ethical funds are a good thing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SCHEHERAZADE DANESHKHU
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ETHICAL and environmental funds, which restrict their investments to
companies that meet their strict criteria, are growing steadily although
they remain a 'niche' market. Most are unit trusts but there are also
ethical investment trusts, insurance and pension funds.
The amount invested in ethical and environmental funds has been rising -
reaching Pounds 321.1m in July from Pounds 273.9m a year earlier - according
to figures from the Ethical Investment Research Service (Eiris), which
researches companies to see if they meet the criteria. By contrast, the
amount invested in unit trusts in general grew by only 3 per cent over the
same period.
Increased demand for ethical funds has prompted one banking group, Mercury
Provident, to launch two occupational pension schemes aimed at the ethical
market, and it will be introducing an ethical private pension scheme in the
new year. Mercury Provident's Christian Nunhofer said the schemes were
launched because of the many enquiries made by depositors.
The cash holdings of the pension funds - amounting to about 10 per cent of
the total - will be held by Mercury Provident, which lends to projects
involved in ethical or environmental issues. Borrowers include charities,
businesses run for the benefit of the community, and environmental projects
such as organic agriculture or re-usable energy schemes.
Sun Life this month launched an ecological fund within its Luxembourg-based
Global Portfolio range, but with an eye to attracting funds from Germany
rather than the UK.
Ian Sampson, managing director of Sun Life portfolio counselling services,
said it was an international portfolio of companies which would allow
investors to satisfy their consciences without damaging their wealth. He
added, however, that while the British regarded environmental funds as a
good thing, Germans were more likely to provide the funds.
One concern for interested investors is the performance of ethical and
environmental funds. Buckmaster, a subsidiary of Credit Suisse Asset
Management, has turned in a consistently poor performance from its
Fellowship trust.
Recently it widened its ethical criteria to try to improve performance. A
spokesman said: 'We had excluded Sainsbury and Tesco because they sold
alcohol. We now say that if alcohol forms only a small proportion of total
sales, the company can qualify.'
The fund had been restricted to 35 per cent of the companies in the FT-SE
100 index, but now it can invest in about 60 per cent of them.
The table shows the performance of ethical and environmental funds to
November 1. Most have been launched only within the past three years, which
makes a judgment about long-term performance impossible (although the
largest ethical fund, Friends Provident's Stewardship, launched in 1984 is
also the oldest).
Of the eight funds listed in the UK Growth sector, half matched or
outperformed the average UK Growth unit trust in the year to November 1 and
more than half did better than the average in the two, three and five years
to November 1.
Results are more mixed for those in the international growth sector. Half
showed better performance than the average international growth unit trust
in the year to November 1, but only two of seven funds did so over two
years. Three of five beat the average over three years; over five years,
performance is polarised starkly between the poor performance of Buckmaster
Fellowship and Framlington Health, which came top of its sector and owed
much of its success to growth in the US biotechnology sector.
On balance, therefore, ethical and environmental funds have matched or
bettered the performance of other unit trusts. It is important for them to
maintain this performance edge, as ethical investors are unlikely to accept
their investments going down the drain in order to support their ideals.
Another area of concern is the ethical criteria used to select companies.
British Telecom has been dropped from the companies in which Friends
Provident invests because it supplies equipment to the Royal Air Force, and
has other defence links. But NM's Conscience fund is still investing in BT
because it has decided the defence supplies account for only a small
proportion of the overall business.
Nunhofer added: 'We've had objections from vegetarians with our lending to
organic farms because the farms have animals on them.'
NM met unitholders in its Conscience fund this month and found many were
upset about investing in retailers who break Sunday trading laws. A vote
ensured that, until the laws are clarified, NM will not disinvest and will
lobby retailers instead.
Ethical investors are, therefore, limited to the criteria applied by fund
managers (unless they want to build and manage their own portfolio).
About half the collective funds use research provided by Eiris, which
categorises stock according to the level of involvement a company has in
such areas as alcohol, tobacco, gambling, pollution, oppressive regimes,
armaments and animal testing. It also produces Choosing an Ethical Fund for
independent financial advisers. This analyses the ethical and environmental
criteria used by the funds.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6319</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: If you think you can do it better
yourself . . . - Planning Your Pension
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ERIC SHORT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INDIVIDUALS who think that they, or their stockbrokers, can make a better
job of investing their contributions into a personal pension than the
investment departments of life companies have, for the last three years, had
the chance to find out if they are right.
Individuals can control their investments on a personal pension through a
self-administered arrangement. They can decide on where their money goes,
what equities to buy and sell and when, just like their personal investment
portfolios.
One main difference between a self-invested personal pension and a private
portfolio is that the assets have to stay within the overall pension
arrangement until the individual takes the benefits in the usual form, or
dies prior to retirement. And the usual procedures apply when benefits are
taken: only one quarter of the fund can be taken as tax-free cash, the rest
must be used to buy an annuity.
A self-invested personal pension still has to be launched by an approved
personal pension provider, usually a life company and the contract remains
under the control of the provider. Individuals, or their advisers, cannot
set up their own personal pension contract.
The investments under the contract are registered in the name of the
provider. The individual or his investment adviser is the investment manager
of the assets of that particular contract.
The life company will provide administration services according to
individual requirements - including record keeping, periodic valuations and
reclaiming tax. Equity dividends are paid net of advance corporation tax
which can be reclaimed by gross funds such as personal pensions.
Individuals are permitted to manage their own investments without
authorisation under the Financial Services Act. But if the individual uses a
professional adviser, that person needs to be authorised.
Problems arise if individuals want to manage the self- invested personal
pension portfolios of family members. SIB is unclear on this point.
Life companies generally play safe by retaining the right to veto the
appointment of an investment manager. If an IFA wants to manage the
portfolio, the life company wishes to be sure that the IFA is experienced in
managing a self-invested portfolio rather than a series of life company
funds.
The industry has been slow to design and market self- invested personal
pensions. In the first place, the administration procedures are complex and
secondly, intermediaries did not actively market the product because
effectively it is a one-off operation, with no consequences of generating
further contracts.
However, enough life companies are offering self-invested personal pensions
to give interested individuals a choice over the type of contracts and the
charges attached to them.
Investments which can be made by the individual include:
Stocks and shares such as equities, gilts and other fixed interest
securities, quoted on the UK stock market
USM securities.
Securities traded on recognised overseas stock markets
Unit and investment trusts
Life company unit-linked funds
Deposit accounts
Commercial property
On this last permitted investment, a self-invested personal pension offers
investors, especially the self-employed, the opportunity to buy property
which can then be leased to a business or partnership connected with the
investor, subject to the lease and the rent being on commercial terms.
If a partnership moves, the new building can be bought as an asset of the
pension contract from contributions of one or more partners - that is coming
effectively from the gross income of the partnership - and then leased to
the business, with the pension fund able to reclaim the tax while the rent
paid by the partnership is allowable as a business expense.
However, any such property must be bought on the open market - so it is not
possible to transfer property already owned by the business into his
personal pension contract.
Care will be needed when the individual is nearing the time to take the
pension benefits and the property has somehow to be converted into cash.
There are a few categories of assets not permitted as investments in a
self-invested personal pension - the main ones are residential property,
works of art and chattels (loans to the individual are not permitted even
for business purposes).
There are three basic formats on the market for self- invested pensions. The
first is an execution-only plus basic administration contract. This is
suitable for a portfolio of quoted securities but unsuitable for investing
in property.
The second type is a full self-invested contract but providing the full
range of services including handling property and other types of investment.
The third type is a hybrid contract with a minimum insured element, that is
a normal personal pension with a life company, with a self-invested contract
on top, plus full administration.
This hybrid arrangement is intended to ensure that the individual has a
safety net of benefit through the normal personal pension should the
self-investment turn sour. It also enables intermediaries to collect their
commission making it attractive to market.
The hybrid allows employees changing jobs to self-invest their transfer
money into a protected rights contract, with the insured element providing
the required guarantees.
The minimum contributions required to set up a self-invested personal
pension are high - Pounds 10,000 appears to be the lowest contribution that
certain life companies will accept. So such schemes are only available for
higher net worth individuals.
Charges on self-invested personal pensions are levied on a money basis,
rather than as a percentage of the contributions or fund. These can vary
from Pounds 500-Pounds 1,500 (plus VAT) to set up the plan and Pounds
300-Pounds 500 (plus VAT) annual fee thereafter. In addition, there are
usually transaction charges. With a hybrid, the usual charges apply to the
insured element. Of course, the individual may have to pay an adviser's
charges on top.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6320</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Directors' Share Transactions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS MACDONALD, Directus Ltd
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DEALING by directors remains at a relatively low ebb, but we are starting to
see a pick-up in option-related activity which indicates that normal trading
conditions are about to be restored.
Marks and Spencer is very much the giant in the stores sector. The recent
interim results further enhanced its reputation but Simon Sacher has sold
50,000 shares at 326p, still near their 1992 high of 348p.
The sales in Betterware should be taken in context with purchases made by
other directors at the same time. Managing director Andrew Cohen disposed of
372,500 shares but Robert Thornton acquired 937,500. Since Cohen continues
to hold almost 60m jointly, this sale is relatively insignificant.
Betterware has proved one of the success stories of the '90s so far, and
recent interim results were again much better than analysts' expectation.
Louis Goodman, managing director of City Site Estates has proved a keen
supporter of his own shares. The latest purchases were made at 12p, since
when the shares have bounced quite sharply.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
  DIRECTORS' SHARE TRANSACTIONS IN THEIR OWN COMPANIES (LISTED &amp; USM)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                            No of
Company            Sector       Shares     Value         directors
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
SALES
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Alumasc             Misc        18,000       73              1*
Betterware          Stor       437,500      700              2
Blenheim             Med        10,443       50              1
Delta               Elts         5,500       21              1
Dixons Group        Stor        40,800       96              1*
General Accident    InsC        16,118       88              1*
Kleinwort Benson    Merc         4,523       13              1
Marks &amp; Spencer     Stor        50,000      163              1
Sainsbury (J)       FdRe        16,333       79              1*
St Ives             Pack         6,000       17              1
Staveley Ind        OthI       251,996      512              4*
VSEL Consortium     EngG         4,500       22              1
Warburg (SG)        Merc        80,000      369              1
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
PURCHASES
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
ASDA Property       Prop       275,000      110              1
Betterware          Stor       947,500    1,516              2
City Site Estates   Prop       500,000       60              1
Densitron           Elns       325,000       51              1
Downiebrae          Metl        60,000       15              1
Expedier             H&amp;L     5,000,000       25              1
Hall Engineering    EngG        50,000       50              1
Invesco MIM         OthF        20,000       18              1
Jupiter Tyndall Grp OthF        12,000       14              1
Menzies (John)      Stor         5,488       22              1
Mercury Asset Mgmt  OthF       115,838      357              3
United Uniforms     Text       680,000      476              4
Waterman Ptnrship   Misc       290,000       35              6
Wholesale Fittings  Elts        15,000       24              1
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Value expressed in Pounds 000s. Companies must notify the Stock Exchange
within 5 working days of a share transaction by a director. This list
contains all transactions, including the exercise of options (*) if 100%
subsequently sold, with a value over Pounds 10,000. Information released
by the Stock Exchange 9-13 November 1992.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Directus Ltd, Edinburgh
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6321</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Finance &amp; the Family: The Week Ahead
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
COMPETITIVE pressures in the food industry have worsened over the summer
period and will be commented on this week by both food manufacturers and
retailers. Argyll, the Safeway supermarket group, should still show a good
increase in interim pre-tax profits when it reports on Tuesday.
Estimates are for a rise from Pounds 177.8m recorded a year ago to Pounds
200m or so this time. Argyll is expected to have achieved better sales
growth than its main competitors and margins are rising as well.
On Wednesday Tate &amp; Lyle, the sugar and sweeteners group, will reveal the
damage caused in the US from overcapacity in the sweetener market and the
delay in getting approval for Sucralose, its calorie-free sugar substitute.
Provisions, redundancy costs and the start-up costs for Sucralose will cut
profits for the year to end September from Pounds 234.6m to around Pounds
190m.
Northern Foods by contrast, will on Thursday announce higher interim profits
of Pounds 67 to Pounds 68m against Pounds 55.2m, despite higher interest and
depreciation charges and a competitive squeeze on some divisions. Earnings
per share growth will be limited after last year's rights issue to pay for
the Express acquisition.
Kwik Save is expected on Wednesday to report an increase of about 10 per
cent in pre-tax profits for the year ended August to about Pounds 112m from
Pounds 101.7m. Its market share is thought to have increased from 7.6 per
cent a year ago to around 9 per cent.
Interim results from Thorn-EMI on Tuesday are expected to provide little
excitement as the music business has been in the doldrums. Thorn itself has
warned the City not to expect much while the newly acquired Virgin music
business will will have made virtually no contribution in the first half.
The rental business, however, has remained fairly resilient and forecasts
for the interim are for around Pounds 95m (Pounds 94.9m). Earnings are
likely to be diluted by about 17 per cent to 15p due to the Virgin
acquisition.
Thorn is likely to face questioning from analysts about the impact of the
slowdown in the music market, particularly in Europe.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6322</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Finance &amp; the Family: Health debut by insurance giant
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE MARKET for permanent health insurance (PHI) got a boost this week when
the UK's largest mutual life insurer, Standard Life, offered a product for
the first time. And the Life Association of Scotland (LAS), which entered
the market last year, relaunched its scheme.
PHI is named awkwardly and might better be described as 'sick pay insurance'
or 'income replacement.' It pays out an income while you are unable to work,
and tends to be of most use to those who are self-employed or in the
professions. (Those employed by large companies may well have adequate cover
in place already).
State provision is unlikely to be adequate for anyone with extensive
financial commitments as it offers sickness benefit of only Pounds 66.70 a
week for the first 28 weeks of disability, and an invalidity pension of
Pounds 108.40 thereafter.
The industry standard is to pay a maximum of 75 per cent of your income.
Insurers will not pay a whole salary because they feel this could encourage
people not to return to work.
Premiums are cheaper the longer you are prepared to have off work before
receiving an income. The new Standard Life policy offers deferred periods of
13, 26, 52 and 104 weeks. LAS also offers a deferred period of only four
weeks, which will interest those who might need a replacement income most
quickly.
Premiums will also be affected by your age when you start the policy, and
your job. Standard Life will charge a 30-year-old male accountant a monthly
premium of Pounds 15.23 for benefit payments of Pounds 12,000 a year,
payable once he has been out of work for 13 weeks. This drops to Pounds
12.18 if he is prepared to wait 26 weeks for replacement income.
For cover of Pounds 20,000 a year, these figures rise to Pounds 23.98 and
Pounds 18.90 respectively.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6323</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Finance &amp; the Family: Mortgages - fixed as low as they can
go?
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SCHEHERAZADE DANESHKHU
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ABBEY NATIONAL yesterday withdrew its 6.99 per cent mortgage fixed until the
end of January 1995 launched just five weeks ago, because of the level of
demand.
After a period in which borrowers have opted for variable rates, the Abbey
sell-out indicates that borrowers are beginning to feel that the new fixed
and capped rates on the market are about as low as they are going to get.
The main benefit of a fixed rate is to enable mortgage-holders to budget
with confidence, since monthly payments will be fixed for a guaranteed
period. This argument will be of little comfort to those who took out one of
the many fixed-rate mortgages of more than 10 per cent a year ago.
The main drawback of these loans is that you are taking a gamble on the
direction of interest rates. The standard variable mortgage rate a year ago
at Halifax, the largest lender, was 11.5 per cent.
So, a fixed 10 per cent appeared an excellent deal, especially since
mortgage rates had been above 15 per cent for most of 1990. People flocked
to take advantage.
Yet, despite fixed rates of 7 per cent, few lenders had reported a rush,
although interest has picked up lately, as the Abbey offer shows. 'People
have short memories,' said David Duncan, of mortgage broker Chase de Vere.
'When rates are falling, they think that they will fall further.'
Walter Avrili, of mortgage broker John Charcol, also believes it would be a
mistake to hold off in the hope of lower rates. 'People will wait for
another base rate cut but they will be disappointed,' he said.
Lenders arguing in favour of taking a fixed rate now say they have not been
this low for the past 15 years. But a year ago, they were saying a 10 per
cent fixed rate was the lowest for a decade.
In any case, borrowers may be wrong to assume that mortgage rates will
follow base rates down to the same degree.
In recent years, the standard variable mortgage rate has been about 1.5
percentage points above the base rate (although in November 1971, when base
rates were 4.5 per cent, Halifax's standard variable rate was 8 per cent - a
full 3.5 percentage points higher). And, as Halifax's Mark Hemingway said
this week: ' We still have to maintain rates for our savers.'
The money markets play an important role in determining mortgage rates.
Lenders fund a fixed-rate mortgage by borrowing a tranche of funds on the
money markets; Abbey National, for example, borrowed funds at 6.45 per cent
to offer a fixed rate of 6.99 per cent to homeowners.
But sterling money market rates changed direction this week by charging
interest above the 7 per cent base rate, with dealers taking the view that
the next base rate cut might not happen this year.
If this mood persists, lenders might be unable to offer lower fixed-rate
mortgages for the time being than the ones now on offer.
The table shows a number of fixed and capped rates on the market. John
Charcol recommends the Halifax's 9.29 capped rate until the end of January
2000 as an outstanding scheme. This is because it runs for a relatively long
period and gives borrowers the benefits of lower variable rates while
setting a ceiling of only 9.29 per cent if base rates increase.
But borrowers should know that fixed and capped rates carry a fee, and that
they impose early redemption penalties of three months or more.
Finally, do not be lured into a short fix with a lender which does not have
a competitive standard variable rate. You might get a good rate for a year
or two - but what about the next 20?
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6324</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Finance &amp; the Family: How to invest your savings for income
 -Philip Coggan asks financial advisers to construct a portfolio of Pounds
100,000 to produce earnings for a single person
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HOW DOES the saver invest for income, now that the rates available from
building societies have fallen?
The graph shows how the net income from Pounds 100,000 invested in a Halifax
Building Society 90-day account has fluctuated over the last 10 years. Some
years, such as 1990, have been great times to be invested in cash.
But anyone who had kept all their money in a building society account for
the past decade, drawing income as they went, would now be earning less than
they had earned in 1983, even in nominal terms. Ten years of inflation would
have done serious damage to their standard of living.
So the Weekend FT asked expert financial advisers to construct a portfolio
of Pounds 100,000, with the aim of producing income for a single person. We
outline their recommendations below. Most seem to have opted for a plan
which produces a growing income, rather than the maximum income immediately.
(We have deducted basic rate tax to give readers a rough means of comparison
but, in some cases, advisers have chosen instruments which pay income gross.
Yields given reflect those available earlier this week.)
COLE'S PORTFOLIO
John Cole, of Berry, Birch &amp; Noble, in London, says: 'The danger with
interest rates continuing to decline is that investors are tempted to
stretch the income returns by introducing more risk. It is essential that
investors are realistic about the potential income returns and we would
prefer to take a marginally lower income to allow a little emphasis for
capital appreciation and rising income in the years ahead.'
'I am particularly keen to balance the Providence Capitol Building Society
Bond, which provides a premium deposit-based rate of return, with a solid
backbone provided through gilts and the Hill Samuel Guaranteed Income Bond.
The latter is particularly important in building up the monthly income which
is likely to be required.'
'Moving into the non-guaranteed investment areas, we do favour investment in
international bonds and providing a hedge against currency fluctuations by
way of the Hambros EMMA Managed Fund. This has a good yield and a solid
track record. Rather than invest directly into Permanent Interest Bearing
Shares (PIBS), we prefer the Exeter Balanced Fund which combines investment
in PIBS with zero coupon shares in investment trusts. It achieves a lower
overall income return but does provide the prospect of income and capital
growth. A Personal Equity Plan is an essential ingredient and we would
favour a high yielding fund.' His suggestions are:
Providence Capitol Building Society Bond. Amount Pounds 15,000. Annual
Income Pounds 876 (net).
Northern Rock TESSA. Amount Pounds 3,000. Annual income Pounds 174.
Treasury 10 per cent 2003. Amount Pounds 10,000. Annual income Pounds 680.
Treasury 2 per cent index-linked 2006. Amount Pounds 10,000. Annual income
Pounds 254.
Hill Samuel Guaranteed Income Bond. Amount Pounds 25,000. Annual income
Pounds 1,500.
Hambros EMMA Managed Fund. Amount Pounds 15,000. Annual income Pounds 693.
Exeter Balanced Fund. Amount Pounds 16,000. Annual income Pounds 739.
Murray Income Trust PEP. Amount Pounds 6,000. Annual income Pounds 318.
Total income (net of basic rate tax) Pounds 5,234.
KAUDERS' PORTFOLIO
David Kauders, Taunton-based fee-charging financial adviser, is a long-term
fan of fixed-interest investments. 'In our opinion, the dollar is cheap at
the moment and likely to rise against the pound,' he says. 'Therefore
investments based in dollars and arising in dollars will be worth more in
sterling in the future. We would therefore recommend purchasing long
maturity US Treasury bonds.
'In addition, we would purchase two gilts on the Bank of England Register.
We would suggest the Treasury 8 1/2 per cent 2007 and the 8 per cent 2009.
This will give you a further income of around Pounds 4,000 per annum gross.'
Suggestions:
US Treasury 7 1/2 per cent 2022. Amount Dollars 80,000. Annual income
Dollars 6,100 (Pounds 3,965 gross, or Pounds 2,974 after basic rate tax.)
Treasury 8 1/2 per cent 2007. Amount Pounds 23,000.
Treasury 8 per cent 2009. Amount Pounds 25,000. Combined annual income on
gilts Pounds 4,000 gross (Pounds 3,000 after basic rate tax)
Total income on this portfolio would be around Pounds 7,965 gross at present
exchange rates (Pounds 5,974 net).
HIGGINS' PORTFOLIO
James Higgins, of the London-based Chamberlain de Broe, disagrees with
Kauders on this point. 'We think gilts might be more attractive in a little
while, particularly if the government decides to wade in with a new issue.'
Higgins says of his portfolio. 'It is designed for a five year term. It is
silly for anyone to go near equities unless they are prepared to look at
five years at least. The portfolio yields just over 7 per cent net to a 40
per cent taxpayer, and slightly more to those on basic rate.'
'The deposit can be either a straightforward one or the Hambros EMMA managed
currency fund: the opportunity cost of the latter is not high in terms of
deposit interest foregone.'
The next element of Higgins' portfolio is a back-to-back 'generator' plan
involving an annuity, which provides high income (but loss of capital) and
some tax-efficient non-income providers. 'Our objective is to generate a
fixed basic income the investor can use each month' he says. 'A five year
temporary annuity provides a tax efficient income. We back this up with a
combination of national savings index-linked certificates, investment trust
zeros and a cash-backed Business Expansion Scheme.'
For the zeros, Higgins suggests the Kleinwort High Income Trust, where the
zeros are fully covered and offer a redemption yield of more than 8.5 per
cent. Although the Bank of Scotland Linen Bank BES has sold out, Higgins
thinks similar schemes will be available.
A further big chunk of the portfolio - Pounds 32,000 - would be in
investment trusts. 'The first Pounds 6,000 would be held within a PEP and
more to be transferred-in next year. Jove, River &amp; Mercantile or River Plate
look good,' he says. He adds Pounds 3,000 in a single company PEP,
suggesting Bristol Water on a gross yield of 8.75 per cent.
Finally, Higgins includes a with-profits bond. 'I usually hate these' says
Higgins 'but Royal's bond clearly spells out the dangers of a market value
adjustment. It carries no 5 per cent initial charge but it does impose
penalties if the client pulls out early. I like the penalty  - it protects
longer term investors and makes potential investors aware that investment in
any equity product cannot be short term. Royal guarantees return of capital
after five years and a first year 9.25 per cent bonus. Suggestions:
Deposit or currency managed fund. Amount Pounds 20,000. Annual income Pounds
750 for basic rate payer, assuming 5 per cent yield.
Generator, consisting of five- year temporary annuity from Standard Life
(amount Pounds 15,000), 6th issue index-lined national savings (amount
Pounds 5,000), investment trust zeros (amount Pounds 10,000) and a
cash-backed BES. Annual income Pounds 3,440 for basic rate payer.
Investment trusts. Amount Pounds 32,000. Annual income Pounds 2,805.
Single company PEP in Bristol Water. Amount Pounds 3,000. Annual income
Pounds 262.
With-profit bond from Royal. Amount invested Pounds 5,000. Annual income
Pounds 400.
Total income (net of basic rate tax) Pounds 7,657.
SCOTT-HOPKINS' PORTFOLIO
Clive Scott-Hopkins, of Towry Law in Windsor, Berks, suggests a broad range
of investments, starting with Pounds 19,000 in Barclays Jersey-based
sterling bond fund, which invests in UK gilts and corporate bonds. Another
Pounds 10,000 would be invested in Perpetual's International Bond unit
trust.
Another unit trust which Scott-Hopkins chooses is the ExBal fund, managed by
Exeter, which invests in zeros and PIBS. ExBal has a gross yield of 6.5 per
cent, which converts into an income of Pounds 500 on his proposed investment
of Pounds 10,000. Scott-Hopkins then selects three with-profits bonds (from
the Prudential, Commercial Union and General Accident) which he says offer
yields of between 9.5 and 10.5 per cent, converting into an annual income of
Pounds 2,250.
Two equity investments follow - Pounds 6,000 in Foster &amp; Braithwaite's PEP
(investing in splits and other investment trusts) and Pounds 10,000 in
Foreign &amp; Colonial's Jersey-based protected equity scheme. This locks in the
bulk of the growth of the FT-SE 100 Index on a quarter-by-quarter basis.
Finally, Scott-Hopkins opts for Pounds 15,000 in the Generali Lifetime
Income Bond, which is based on war loan and pays a fixed income for life.
Suggestions
Barclays sterling bond Fund. Amount Pounds 19,000. Annual income Pounds
1,300 (after basic rate tax)
Perpetual International Bond Fund. Amount Pounds 10,000. Annual income
Pounds 500.
Prudential/Commercial Union and General Accident with profits bonds. Amount
invested Pounds 30,000. Annual income Pounds 2,250.
ExBal unit trust. Amount Pounds 10,000. Annual income Pounds 500.
Foster &amp; Braithwaite PEP. Amount invested Pounds 6,000. Annual income Pounds
500.
Foreign &amp; Colonial Protected Equity fund. Amount invested Pounds 10,000.
Annual income nil.
Generali Lifetime Income Bond. Amount invested Pounds 15,000. Annual income
Pounds 1,200.
Total income Pounds 6,250, net of basic rate tax, plus any gains from the
F&amp;C fund.
NOBLE-WARREN'S PORTFOLIO
The portfolio chosen by Robert Noble-Warren, of London-based Murray Noble,
has a distinctly international flavour. His cash holding is in French franc
deposits, via one of Rothschild's offshore currency funds, yielding 9.3 per
cent.
Noble-Warren would invest a further Pounds 60,000 in European bonds, which
he says 'are very good value at present.' He feels interest rates will have
to start coming down again because the German economy is slowing and needs
stimulus. The two funds he chooses are offshore, CMI German Bond, yielding
6.4 per cent and Hambro Continental European Bond, yielding 7.5 per cent.
'We believe UK gilts are not a good buy compared to German, Swiss or French
bonds' says Noble-Warren. The exception is the index-linked sector, where
Noble-Warren suggests investing Pounds 10,000 via Guinness Flight's offshore
index-linked gilt fund, yielding 2.2 per cent.
Finally, Noble-Warren suggests an investment of Pounds 10,000 for capital
growth, choosing a combination of Latin American Investment Trust, and
Templeton Emerging Markets Investment Trust. Suggestions:
Rothschild Old Court French franc fund. Amount invested Pounds 20,000.
Annual income Pounds 1,395.
CMI German Bond Fund. Amount invested Pounds 30,000. Annual income Pounds
1,440.
Hambro EMMA Continental European Bond fund. Amount Pounds 30,000. Annual
income Pounds 1,687.50.
Guinness Flight Index-linked gilt fund. Amount Pounds 10,000. Annual income
Pounds 165.
Latin American Investment Trust. Amount Pounds 5,000. Annual income Pounds
11.25.
Templeton Emerging Markets Investment Trust. Amount Pounds 5,000. Annual
income Pounds 56.25.
Total income, after basic rate tax, Pounds 4,755.
BOYTON'S PORTFOLIO
Rather than construct a single portfolio, Richard Boyton of the Halstead,
Essex-based Boyton Financial Services suggests a series of options. The
first would be a portfolio of zero preference shares (for example, Sphere,
Gartmore American, Fleming International High Income, Ivory &amp; Sime Optimum
Income and Drayton Blue Chip), with the investor steadily selling the zeros
and using the capital gains as tax-free income.
Option two would be traditional preference shares, issued by institutions
such as Bank of Ireland, Bank of Scotland, Nat West, Co-op Bank or
Commercial Union. Further possibilities include:
PIBS. A slightly higher risk, but yielding approximately 11 per cent gross
(8.25 per cent net).
International bond funds, such as Baring's or GT's offshore funds, yielding
around 6 and 7 per cent gross respectively (4.5-5.25 per cent net)
Income and growth unit trusts, such as Newton Income (yielding 4.78 per cent
gross, or 3.59 per cent net) and James Capel Income (yielding 5.55 per cent
gross, or 4.16 per cent net).
Income and growth investment trusts such as Investors Capital UK Blue Chip,
TR City of London, Murray International, Value and Income and TR Far East.
Gross yields on the above vary between 5.3 per cent and 6.8 per cent (3.98
per cent and 5.1 per cent net).
NEXT WEEK: saving for capital growth
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6325</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Finance &amp; the Family: BES launches
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE WIND of change continued to blow through the Business Expansion Scheme
market this week.
Some very speedy investment decisions came in its wake.
On Monday, the British Linen Bank launched a series of BES companies which
would invest in assured tenancy rental accommodation. But, like schemes
launched in September by Johson Fry in association with TSB, and by Close
Brothers in association with Barclays, it came with a guarantee that a
non-recourse loan would be available after six months.
This loan facility proved so popular that the entire Pounds 15m offer had
been snapped up by Thursday - even though the scheme had had little chance
to gain any publicity.
Another scheme, without a non-recourse loan, also managed to sell out this
week.
The 'non-recourse' loan changes all the ground rules of BES investment. The
extensive tax advantages of owning BES shares are sacrificed if you dispose
of the shares within five years.
This made the investment somewhat inflexible and inappropriate for those who
needed their money sooner.
However, the Inland Revenue has decided that it will permit banks to lend
money to BES shareholders with only the value of the BES shares themselves
as security.
The lenders have no recourse to any other of the shareholders' funds apart
from the BES shares.
That means that the shareholders can effectively walk away from the
investment as soon as they have taken the loan.
The tax reliefs on offer make it possible to offer high returns - for
example, for every Pounds 1 invested, the British Linen Bank was offering
72p after six months.
Once tax relief of 40p in every Pounds 1 is taken into account, that means
that before expenses each investor has managed to convert 60p into 72p in
the space of six months.
None of this works for basic rate tax payers, who will have paid 75p after
tax for each share.
These schemes offer a heavy advantage to top-rate payers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6326</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: At A Glance - Setback for smaller
companies
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Smaller company shares suffered a setback this week, ending their recent
rally. The Hoare Govett Index (capital gains version) fell 0.6 per cent from
1111.5 to 1104.34 over the week to November 19, while the County Index
dropped 0.3 per cent from 857.9 to 854.99 over the same period.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
Weekend Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6327</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: At A Glance - New monthly income fund
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Foster &amp; Braithwaite, the private client stockbroker, is launching a monthly
income fund based on investment trusts. To stabilise the income flow F&amp;B
will pay a level amount each month for a year. The fund will initially pay
90 per cent of the net dividend yield at the time of purchase, with the
remaining 10 per cent credited to an interest-earning account. The minimum
investment is Pounds 10,000; initial charge is 3 per cent plus VAT, annual
charge is 1.25 per cent and there is a dealing charge of 1 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
Weekend Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6328</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: At A Glance - Fidelity launches
balanced fund
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Fidelity has launched a new money management service called Asset Manager
which will aim to provide a better long term return than a building society.
The service will balance portfolios between cash, bonds and Fidelity's new
futures funds, which aim to provide exposure to equities at reduced risk.
The initial asset mix will be 30 per cent cash, 30 per cent bonds and 40 per
cent futures funds. Minimum investment will be Pounds 10,000 (minimum
withdrawal is Pounds 1,000) and the expected gross yield will be 5 per cent.
Initial charge is 4 per cent plus VAT, with an annual charge of 0.5 per cent
plus VAT.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
Weekend Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6329</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: At A Glance - Savings scheme for
Services
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The Ministry of Defence has launched the Services Home Savings Scheme for
members of the Armed Forces. Those who save between Pounds 50 and Pounds 200
a month for 60 months will be entitled to an additional payment, called the
Home Savings Allowance (HSA), when they buy a home. The HSA will be paid at
a rate of Pounds 1 for every Pounds 3 saved in the account, including
interest earned.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
Weekend Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6330</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: At A Glance - Gloom for British Steel
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
British Steel shares slumped to an all-time low this week after it declared
a first half loss of Pounds 51m and omitted its interim dividend. When the
company was privatised in 1988, it was perceived as an income stock. Its
shares were trading at around 50p yesterday, compared with 125p on
flotation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
Weekend Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6331</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: At A Glance - Mortgage lending picks
up a little
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Building societies reported a small increase in mortgage lending activity
last month. Net advances increased to Pounds 683m in October, up from Pounds
446m the month before. But the new figure is still less than half the amount
lent by building societies in most months during the first two-thirds of the
year.
Mark Boleat, director-general of the Building Societies Association, said
that the pick up 'although very modest, occurred against the backdrop of
considerable uncertainty in the financial markets and extinguished household
confidence.'
Meanwhile, a large number of banks and building societies cut their mortgage
rates to about 8.5 per cent this week. Cheltenham &amp; Gloucester, which had
undercut the market with its 9.05 mortgage rate when the standard rate was
9.25 per cent, also dropped its rate to 8.5 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
Weekend Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6332</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Markets: An elusive glimpse of a silver lining - London
Markets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARTIN, Financial Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ON Friday morning, this newspaper's headlines were as gloomy as any in
recent memory. 'Industry sheds 10,000 jobs'; 'Recession maintains its grip
for ninth quarter'; 'Sweden floats krona after outflow threatens reserves'.
And so on
Yet on Friday afternoon, the FT-SE 100 index was racing ahead, closing at
2,732.4, up 26 points on the day and within six points of its record close
of 2,737.8, reached in May.
Such a contrast is not unusual, of course. Looking out into the future for
anything up to 18 months, the market has traditionally been able to peer
through the cloud to find the silver lining.
This time, however, the contrast seems particularly marked. The long-lasting
nature of the recession has made it hard to see an end; and the experience
of the US has been that even after interest rates are cut sharply, a healthy
recovery cannot be guaranteed.
Britain's own woes are compounded by the growing sense that continental
Europe - especially Germany - is running into more serious economic problems
than seemed likely even two months ago. The long-drawn out crisis over the
Gatt and oilseeds issues, raising the possibility of a world trade war, have
added to the sense of unease.
It was the news, on Thursday afternoon, that a Gatt deal had been clinched
that led to the market's surge. The market had earlier shown a marked
ability to shrug off the worst of the trade fears, however: by Thursday's
close it had already recovered all but five points of its loss since the
Gatt talks between the EC and the US broke down in early November.
Behind the week's stock market optimism, another force was at work: signs
that, even though the international outlook seemed bleaker and job losses
continued to mount, the British economy is - at worst - avoiding a further
downward slide. The volume of retail sales for October, published on
Wednesday, showed a seasonally adjusted rise of 0.1 per cent; perhaps more
significant, in the three months to the end of October, retail volumes rose
by 0.9 per cent compared with the previous three months.
One factor behind those rises has undoubtedly been the steady gain in
effective earnings of those who have managed to keep their jobs. Robin
Aspinall of Panmure Gordon drew attention to the numbers shown in the chart:
average earnings deflated by the tax and price index, a measure of inflation
which adds in the impact of income tax changes.
In the last recession, it was a truism that those people who stayed in jobs
did well. In this recession, though the air of gloom is shared a lot more
evenly between north and south, and between service sector and
manufacturing, the steady upward path of effective earnings has been more
marked than a decade ago. Against that background, the upturn in the trend
of retail sales since the summer appears less surprising.
Though the stock market was cheerful this week, the gilt and money markets
were more apprehensive. Three month money stayed resolutely above the 7 per
cent level of base rates for most of the week, closing around 7 1/4 per cent
on Friday. The market clearly felt that the latest cut in base rates, a week
ago, is the last for some time - a view reinforced by the latest edition of
the Bank of England Quarterly Bulletin, which emphasised the government's
commitment to low inflation.
That commitment is still much in doubt, if the gilt market is to be
believed. The drop in short-term rates as a result of last week's base-rate
cuts has not been reflected in bond yields, which are up to a quarter of a
percentage point higher than their pre-Autumn Statement levels. The
announcement of another gilt auction for December 2 did not please the
market, which is still jumpy about the level of issuance likely next year.
One step to ease that burden was Wednesday's announcement that the
government plans to sell more of its remaining stake in British Telecom,
currently worth something over Pounds 5bn. Details of the sale, to take
place in the financial year starting in April 1993, are not yet available.
BT's shares were trading at 403p before the announcement; they closed on
Friday at 395 1/2 p, up 5 1/2 p on the week.
Two other privatised companies, National Power and PowerGen, were among the
week's most active shares. On Tuesday, National Power company reported a 10
per cent increase in pre-tax profits, and a 10 per cent increase in the
dividend - despite a slight fall in total electricity demand, the first for
over a decade. PowerGen's figures, published the next day, were not quite so
rosy.
The difference between the two generators is still more cosmetic than real,
however: timing of investment and slightly different accounting policies
explain the gap between the results. Both rose on the week: National Power
closed at 287 1/2 p, up 17p; PowerGen at 287, up 14 1/2 p.
For two company chairmen, the week brought some unwelcome comments. Sir
Denys Henderson, the chairman of ICI, found little enthusiasm for his
announcement that the group's bio-sciences division, once demerged, would
bear the name of Zeneca. 'Sounds like a foot infection, not a company,' said
one City wit. Analysts have also started to question just how much
shareholders will benefit from the spin-off.
The other man on the end of unfavourable comment was Alan Sugar, chairman of
Amstrad, the computer and consumer electronics business. The offer document
detailing his plan to take the company private again, at 30p per share, was
greeted with marked lack of enthusiasm by City commentators. Some idea of
the mood of shareholders will be given by next Tuesday's AGM, which may give
some pointers to the outcome of the vote on the bid on December 10. In the
meantime, Amstrad shares closed the week at 28, unchanged.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6333</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Markets: New rules bring companies to account - The Bottom
Line
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE EFFECT of changing British accounting standards became starkly apparent
to investors last week with preliminary results from BOC, the UK industrial
gases and healthcare group. BOC reported pre-tax profits down 31 per cent to
Pounds 215m in the 12 months to September 30, well below market
expectations. Without accounting changes, this year's figure would instead
have been up by 10 per cent to Pounds 341.9m.
The company is one of the first among many likely to be altering their
figures substantially as a result of the new regime for financial reporting
being introduced by the Accounting Standards Board (ASB). BOC said the
culprit was FRS 3, the new financial reporting standard on the profit and
loss account launched by the ASB at the end of last month, which becomes
mandatory for year-ends after June 22 next year.
A number of other companies are beginning to change already. In the past few
days, Courtaulds and De La Rue both have published interim results in
compliance with FRS 3. It alters the shape of the accounts radically,
particularly for those companies with active acquisition and disposal
programmes. Among the principal changes are:
The virtual abolition of the extraordinary item. Only extremely rare and
unpredictable events outside the normal course of business activities will
be allowed. That might include expropriation of a company's assets following
a political revolution in the UK, but not in Iraq.
Calculation of earnings per share will include any remaining extraordinary
items. This will make earnings far more 'lumpy' year by year and will
discourage readers of accounts from relying so exclusively on this single
published figure - and the price/earnings ratio based on it - which has been
subject to considerable manipulation in the past.
Gains or losses on the disposal of revalued assets must be shown in the
profit and loss account at their carrying value given in the balance sheet,
not at historical cost.
The treatment of goodwill - the difference between the net assets and
purchase price of a business - is changed. Previously, goodwill could be
written off to reserves and companies could make a 'profit' on the sale of a
business without taking account of the goodwill. Now, any stated profit or
loss on resale must reflect the original purchase price. Any goodwill
written off must be written back.
For BOC, most of the impact on profits came from this final item. Its
disposal of subsidiaries during the year - principally Glasrock, its
domestic medical gases business - resulted in a loss of Pounds 117.1m which
it had written off previously as goodwill.
Readers of future accounts will also find other revelations required by FRS
3. Companies must continue to disclose separately three types of exceptional
item: profits or losses on the disposal of fixed assets or businesses, and
the costs of fundamental restructuring. In BOC's case, these items include
the Pounds 117.1m goodwill write-off and a Pounds 25.4m provision for
reorganising its health care division. As the table shows, FRS 3 would not
have had a significant impact for BOC in the past five years except in 1988,
when there was a loss on disposals of businesses of Pounds 17m and Pounds
24.5m written off as goodwill.
Companies must also show turnover and profit, divided for the first time
between continuing and discontinued operations and those acquired during the
year. That should help those trying to make estimates of underlying and
future maintainable performance.
The danger of creating these 'pigeon-holes' for profits and losses is that
numbers shown previously in a single extraordinary or exceptional item may
now be concealed in a variety of figures.
The ASB hopes to force investors to sift through more information and make
their own calculations and judgments rather than relying on published
earnings alone. Its rationale for FRS 3 has been to make accounts more
transparent, allowing in sunshine by providing additional financial
information.
But the effect might be more like a prism, scattering considerable
information over a wide area. That could prove confusing and intimidating
initially for many readers of accounts.
 ----------------------------------------------------
      BOC PRE-TAX PROFITS: BEFORE AND AFTER
 ----------------------------------------------------
               1988   1989    1990    1991   1992
Before        287.1  324.8   350.2  310.13   41.9
After           254  324.8   350.2  310.12     15
 ----------------------------------------------------
Source: BOC annual reports
 ----------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6334</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Markets: Make bonds find the balance - Serious Money
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN, Personal Finance Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BOND FUNDS are the flavour of the month in the world of personal finance.
Many fund management groups will be hoping that the public gets the message.
They have been battling for years to get British savers to move their funds
from cash into equity products. Persuading investors to buy bonds, which
allow a greater degree of security and certainty of return, might be an
easier task.
British savers are not stupid. The reasons they have been so reluctant to
move into bonds are twofold. The first is inflation; the high rate
prevailing in the British economy since the 1960s has taken a big dent out
of capital invested in fixed-interest securities.
Secondly, during the late 1980s, short term interest rates have been higher
than the returns on long term bonds (an inverted yield curve in the jargon).
Thus, there was little incentive for investors to remove cash from building
societies.
The situation has changed drastically over the past year. Short-term
interest rates have fallen substantially, with the result that the yield
curve has a traditional upward-sloping shape. In other words, the yields on
long-dated gilts are above base rates.
Private investors have thus been piling into the gilts causing problems in
the market, with a back-log in settlement, because of volume of business.
In addition, there has been a steady stream of bond fund launches in the
unit trust sector. Some of these funds have grown substantially - Mercury's
Global Bond fund, launched in early 1991, has almost Pounds 200m under
management.
Suddenly everyone seems to be in favour of the fixed-interest market. Five
out of the six financial advisers polled on Page III this week picked bonds,
or bond funds, in their income-producing portfolios.
Investors will be aware of one of the golden rules of personal finance; when
everybody in the industry is plugging a particular product, that is the
worst time to buy it.
There is a possibility that the rule could apply to the enthusiasm for
bonds. In the UK, devaluation and the recent rapid reductions in base rates
could cause inflation to rise; and the government's deteriorating financial
position means that the Treasury will have a lot of gilts to sell over the
next few years. Both factors would normally be bad news for gilt prices.
On the other hand, institutional fund managers, such as pension funds and
insurance companies, have plenty of scope to buy more gilts. Only 3 per cent
of the average pension fund was invested in gilts at the end of 1991,
according to Combined Actuarial Performance Services; in 1982, that
proportion was 19 per cent. So it is possible that the extra supply of gilts
could be absorbed.
Given that so many complex factors affect the bond market, should the
private investor deal on his own behalf or opt for the management skills of
a bond fund?
Fund managers claim, unsurprisingly, that their expertise is vital.
According to Whittingdale, its short-dated gilts fund has outperformed the
FT's short dated gilt index over the past one, three and five years.
The services of a fund manager do not always come cheap. Initial charges can
be 5 per cent and annual charges 1 per cent. That takes quite a chunk out of
returns when gilt yields are only 8-9 per cent.
The good news is that competition has helped reduce these fees, with no
initial charge at all on two recent Abtrust fund launches.
A further potential problem with bond funds is that gains are subject to
capital gains tax, unlike profits on direct holdings in gilts. However,
since most investors do not use up their annual Pounds 5,800 CGT threshold,
this is only a significant factor for a few.
There is no 'right' answer to the question of bond funds versus direct
investment. If you are buying just one or two gilts, and you intend to hold
them to redemption, it is probably alright to deal on your own. But if you
intend to have a large proportion of your savings in bonds, and you are not
financially sophisticated, then it is probably worth paying for the
manager's services.
It is almost certainly best to opt for a fund if you are thinking of
investing in overseas bonds. There are sound arguments for doing so as,
again on Page III, some advisers state.
Many other countries are going through the same recessionary problems as the
UK. In Europe, particularly, the high interest rates imposed by the
Bundesbank have proved a drag on economic activity.
The hope is that interest rates will fall (and bond prices rise) across
Europe once the Germans decide to loosen the deflationary grip on their
economy. Given that the record of European countries on inflation is
generally better than that of the UK, Continental bond yields may be able to
fall further than those in the UK.
There is of course an exchange rate risk, namely that the pound will rise
against other currencies. That might seem an unlikely prospect, but some
believe sterling could rebound once European interest rates start to fall.
The answer is probably that overseas bond funds, like gilts, should form
part of, rather than all of, a portfolio.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6335</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Markets: Market tires of Clintonomics guessing game - Wall
Street
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IF INVESTORS were hoping to use the immediate post-election period to pass
judgment on President-elect Clinton's policies to revitalise the economy,
they have been sorely disappointed.
In the nearly three weeks since polling day more has been learned about
Socks the cat, the soon-to-be First Pet, than about Clintonomics.
The Democrats' decision to keep their presidential plans under wraps has
left the stock market somewhat adrift. Investors have not even been able to
indulge in a favourite post-election game - giving the thumbs up, or down,
to new cabinet appointments.
Even trying to guess the names of the cabinet is no longer fun. The market
has ceased caring whether Paul Volcker, the former Federal Reserve chief, or
Robert Rubin, the Goldman Sachs supremo, gets the top job at the Treasury,
or whether Harvard scholar Robert Reich becomes the new White House economic
adviser.
To make matters worse, the market has also lost interest in monetary policy.
Since 1990 the direction of interest rates has been one of the most
important factors influencing the market, alongside corporate profitability
and economic performance. Speculation about whether, when, and by how much,
the Fed might cut interest rates has kept investors busy for the best part
of the last two years.
Today, however, interest rate policy appears locked in neutral. Although the
rash of positive economic statistics after the election has since been
undermined by fresh gloomy news about the state of the recovery (just this
week housing starts were reported to be down sharply and unemployment
insurance claims up sharply), the Fed appears to be in no mood to touch the
monetary accelerator again.
This week's meeting of the Fed's key Open Market Committee, normally an
occasion keenly watched by both stock and bond markets for signs of changes
in policy, passed almost unnoticed.
Operating in a political and monetary policy vacuum, the market has been
forced to look elsewhere for inspiration. Tax issues have been unusually
prominent this week. President-elect Clinton's campaign pledge to increase
taxes on the wealthy has raised fears that he may put up the capital gains
tax as well, and a desire to book profits now rather than later may have
been partly behind some of the recent profit-taking.
Investors may also have been indulging in some loss-taking. Late November is
usually the time when investors begin to sell stocks that have performed
badly in their portfolio as part of a seasonal plan to maximise the tax
benefits from their investment losses.
This tax-related trading is thought to have played a large part in the fall
in IBM's share price. On Thursday IBM fell to Dollars 61 1/4 , its lowest
level since July 1982. Analysts said that concern that the weakness of
European economies will hit overseas orders for IBM mainframes was also
behind the selling of the stock.
Corporate tax issues have also been at play in the wider market. Stocks of
small and medium-sized companies traded over the counter on the Nasdaq
market have been much in favour recently (the Nasdaq composite index has
risen almost 6 per cent since November 3, polling day), and one of the
explanations put forward by analysts for the buying is that investors are
focusing on the Democrats' proposal during the election to cut taxes on
capital gains from long-term investment holdings of small and mid-sized
companies.
Among individual corporate news, the news that telecommunications giant AT &amp;
T and financial services combine Transamerica, are planning to take parts of
their operations public in 1993, suggested that some large companies are
confident the market will be in reasonably good shape next year.
Of the two deals, AT&amp;T's looks the largest. The company wants to float 15
per cent of its equipment leasing and finance subsidiary, AT &amp; T Capital.
The subsidiary earned revenues of over Dollars 1bn last year, and has assets
of over Dollars 7bn, and while the idea behind the move is to give AT &amp; T
Capital a large measure of financial independence, the interesting point
about the partial spin-off is that it leaves AT &amp; T free to concentrate on
its core businesses of telecommunications and computing.
Transamerica is also getting rid of non-core assets to focus on what it does
best. It plans to sell its property and casualty insurance business next
spring through an initial public offering of stock. The demerger will enable
Transamerica to apply all of its energies to its life insurance and finance
business.
Monday     3205.74 - 27.29
Tuesday    3193.32 - 12.42
Wednesday  3207.37 + 14.05
Thursday   3209.53 + 14.05
Friday     3227.36 + 17.83
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6336</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEADAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Pequot turn tables on their conquerors: David Spanier tells
the tale of the Pequot tribe, almost wiped out in by the English 350 years
ago and whose very name came to symbolise doomed hope. Now 250 survivors
have regrouped and exploited their special legal status to build the most
profitable casino in the US on their reservation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID SPANIER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN 1637, English soldiers acting in the name of Charles I attacked the tribe
of Pequot Indians on the east coast of America, burned their fort and
massacred everyone they could find.
An Englishman who saw the slaughter wrote: ' . . . the fire burnt their very
bowstrings . . . down fell men, women and children . . . great and doleful
was the bloody sight.' After expressing Christian remorse, he concluded: 'We
had sufficient light from the word of God for our proceedings.'
Now, more than three and a half centuries later, a small group descended
from survivors of the Pequot massacre are taking a spectacular economic
revenge.
They have exploited their status as a 'defeated nation' under the US
constitution to avoid the puritan traditions - and laws - which restrict
gambling in Connecticut. A casino on their reservation is making huge
profits for the Pequots who are using the money to reclaim land they lost so
many years ago.
This extraordinary renaissance of tribal fortune is based on the Pequots'
ancestral love for their land which they never forgot and never lost hope of
regaining.
This land, rising in gentle slopes of forest from the coast, east of the
Connecticut River, has been inhabited for 10,000 years by the distant
forebears of the present tribe before the Pequots were almost wiped out.
Herman Melville chose the name Pequod - 'now extinct as the ancient Medes,'
so he wrote - for his doomed ship in Moby Dick.
Even now the tribe numbers barely 250 people living on the Mashantucket
Pequot Indian Reservation in the backwoods of Connecticut, a few miles from
the town of Mystic.
This is no dusty, dispiriting stretch of empty land, like so many Indian
reservations out west. Mashantucket means wooded land. And here, in the
colonial heartland, an entrance sign, in red and green on a stone pillar,
proclaims: Foxwoods High Stakes Bingo &amp; Casino.
Overnight, Foxwoods has become the most profitable casino in the US. It is
likely to make the tribe a profit this year of around a Dollars 100m. Every
day, in the nine months since the casino opened, 10,000-12,000 people have
poured in. They come from Boston, two hours away, and Rhode Island and all
the little towns around with English names such as Oxford and Norwich and
they love to gamble. Foxwoods is coining money faster than any casino in Las
Vegas, even though it is not at all like Vegas. First, there are no slot
machines. Secondly there is no neon.
A long low building, with outstretched wings, in brown and grey brick,
curving round in welcome, greets the visitor. The surface is lightly
decorated with Indian motifs. Beyond the acres of car parking, trees ring
the horizon.
In the entrance, a fountain splashes down over a rocky outcrop. The casino
floor is vast. Under glass roofs, it stretches into the distance.
The players are buzzing with youthful exuberance. The atmosphere is noisy,
friendly and unthreatening (no security men with guns and handcuffs). The
casino is run by American staff, 3,300 strong. The Indian presence is
reflected in touches of green and red colour and ornament.
The Pequot logo - on gaming chips and table mats and match books - is
everywhere. It contains a bare branched tree, a white fox beneath it looks
out over a dark curving hill, whose centre displays the mysterious mark of a
former tribal leader.
The main games played are roulette and blackjack, with a non-stop poker
parlour on a lower floor. There are over 200 tables in play, which exceeds
by far any US or European casino. Bingo is catered for in a separate wing.
Bingo has long been a staple of Indian reservations. At Foxwoods it attracts
upwards of 2,500 people a night. It is the casino gambling which is new,
made possible by the Indian Gaming Regulatory Act, passed by Congress in
1988.
Indian tribes are not generally subject to state laws: they have the status
of defeated nations, recognised by Washington as sovereign authorities in
their own lands. It took a series of court actions in Connecticut,
culminating in a ruling by the US Supreme Court, before the Mashantucket
Pequot's right to regulate gaming was upheld: and the tribe set to it with a
will, starting in February this year.
In the centre of the reservation is a cedar swamp, which was the Indians'
refuge and hiding place, called the owl's nest. A unique species of
rhododendron, with a blood-red centre in a white flower, said to represent
the blood of the Pequot, blooms there.
By the 1950s there were only two old women living on the reservation, then
reduced to 250 acres. One of them was Elizabeth George who vowed: 'Hold on
to your land.'
'For 350 years, there was no Pequot life and no Pequot history,' says Terry
Bell, a grand-daughter of George, and tribal affairs co-ordinator. 'There
was nothing here.'
In 1983, a few surviving Pequots, who had been scattered over New England,
secured federal recognition and a grant big enough to build half a dozen
houses. An effort to find local employment led to the opening of a bingo
hall.
It was only a small beginning but the Pequots were back on their land once
more. They now own just under 2,000 acres. The band of survivors
re-organised themselves and elected Richard 'Skip' Hayward, a grandson of
Elizabeth George, as leader of their tribal council. He had formerly been
employed as a fitter in a local shipyard; but he has shown sound commercial
judgment.
Permission for a casino was secured only after a long wrangle with the State
of Connecticut, which on the whole disapproves of gambling. Now the state
gains substantial taxes and must screen and licence gaming staff and
suppliers, to prevent criminal infiltration - a danger common to all US
gaming.
The casino proved an immediate success. Not simply because it was the first
in the region - there are about 30 casinos on Indian reservations, mostly in
the mid-West - but in the Pequots' style of management. After all, how could
a tribal council, gathered together from humdrum occupations in inner
cities, with no experience in business find the expertise to run a modern
casino? The explanation seems to be that the tribal council had the
imagination to recruit good people and, even more important, the maturity to
allow them to run the place on professional lines.
'Of course it's based on trust. We meet every week and we argue things out,'
says Foxwood's chief operating officer, Al Luciani. 'Sometimes they are very
conservative in their decisions. But we thrash things out together.'
Luciani, 47, is an experienced manager: he has worked both in Atlantic City
and Nevada and was one of the drafters of the New Jersey casino legislation.
Most recently, a decision by Luciani to resign his job, after a difference
of opinion with the tribe, suggests that problems of control may prove
serious.
Like the Pequots themselves the senior staff, who were persuaded to come out
to Connecticut, are making a new life, which explains perhaps why Foxwoods
seems so country fresh - 'gaming in its natural state', is its motto.
How much money Foxwoods is making is a secret. The original estimate for the
first year was high, a 20 per cent 'hold' (money won) on a 'drop' (money
gambled) of Dollars 500m. Results to date suggest the latter figure was too
low. The drop is likely to be around Dollars 1bn in the first year. If so,
the Pequots can look forward to a net profit this year, after running
expenses (Dollars 350,000 a day), approaching Dollars 100m.
So what will a tribe of 250 Indians do with such a huge sum? The Pequots
have no doubt. Not for them the extravagances of the consumer society. The
score or so houses on the reservation, dotted round the hill behind the
casino, are simple two or three-bedroom structures, the cars on the
driveways family saloons. A community centre is being built, tennis courts
are being asphalted. There are child and medical care and scholarships.
The aim of the Pequots is first and foremost to replant themselves on their
land. There are possibly another couple of hundred tribal members scattered
around the country, if they can be traced and persuaded to come home.
The casino is the means to continuing economic self-sufficiency. But Hayward
has a more ambitious aim. A Native American Museum is planned, at a cost of
Dollars 65m, to promote Indian studies and research. It will also be a
popular attraction. The Pequot land is to become a focus for Indian life and
culture.
Work has started on a Dollars 142m entertainment complex, including a second
casino. (If Connecticut ever approves slot machines, which the US public
finds irresistible, Foxwoods' turnover will double, or even treble.) The
expansion includes a 300-room hotel, three theatres and a performance
centre, a shopping concourse and a huge underground car park. All this will
be completed by the summer of 1993.
A second phase of expansion will include still more gaming space, a
convention centre and another hotel off the reservation. Employment at the
casino will rise to over 5,000. 'We are trying to create an overall
destination resort as part of our economic base,' says Hayward.
Hardly surprising that Foxwoods, so unlike Vegas but on a Vegas-type of
roll, has attracted the notice of other casino operators. Steve Wynn,
president of Mirage Resorts in Las Vegas, has been eyeing the prospects of
opening a casino in downtown Hartford. Other Indians may try their luck. The
attractions of the area, drawing on a regional population of some 25m, are
obvious: the Pequots' intention is to be firmly established before any
rivals follow suit.
The Mashantucket Pequots are rebuilding their tribal life with the gambling
losses of the descendants of the colonists who dispossessed them. There is a
Pequot saying: in everything you do, think of the seventh generation ahead.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6337</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAC9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / The Long View: Victim of M4 slowdown
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARRY RILEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ONE OF the most dramatic economic changes during the past few years has been
the slowdown in the growth of the money supply. For 20 years until 1991 the
broadly-defined version of money, M4, which includes all bank and building
society deposits, had grown by an average of 14 1/2 per cent a year,
reaching a peak expansion rate of 19 per cent at the beginning of 1990. Now,
that growth has collapsed to a mere 5 per cent over the past 12 months.
It is a sign that, whatever happens to the British economy in the immediate
future, we would be unwise to look for any clues from what has happened
during the years since monetary growth first accelerated into double digits
back in 1971.
Since M4 represents, largely, the liability (or deposit) side of bank and
building society balance sheets, the slowdown simply reflects the crisis of
the banking system. Proud Barclays may now be heading for a trading loss in
1992 and, as its gleaming new building emerges above Lombard Street, we are
reminded of the time-honoured investment rule, sell the shares when a
company builds itself a new head office. Barclays is not the only one of the
big clearers to face tough decisions over dividends. The bankers will
remember that Midland, which fell from grace and cut its dividend earlier,
has this year lost its independence.
The axe hangs over thousands of employees. The English Big Four raised staff
numbers from 229,000 to 280,000 during the 1980s but they are now tumbling.
This week's news on the labour-shedding front came from the Royal Bank of
Scotland which is to cut 3,500 jobs over five years.
The banking contraction could go much further. The great expansion went
hand-in-hand with the creation of the financial bubble in housing and, to
some extent, a lesser bubble in the small business sector. There was a huge
lending boom on the basis that customers need never repay their debts,
except to the extent that they would eventually be liquidated painlessly out
of the sale of the assets (to buyers who would, of course, be financed by
more loans).
How different it is now, when prices are falling; home owners feel under
pressure to reduce their debts, and when the houses are eventually sold the
new owners may be able to buy them on smaller loans and at much lower
interest rates. For them, at least, all this is thoroughly good news.
During the 1980s it worked like this. Borrowing was strong, largely because
of demand for homes which were rapidly rising in price all the time. The
authorities kept interest rates high, often between 12 and 14 per cent, in
order to keep some sort of lid on monetary growth. But these high interest
charges themselves tended to be rolled up as higher and higher debt.
By 1989 the housing bubble started to burst and small businesses began to
collapse. Within the ERM interest rates could not be brought down quickly
and the debt interest roll-up has continued. Now, at last, rates are lower.
But this has exposed other distortions at the banks. High interest rates
generated all sorts of opportunities for cross-subsidising customers and
services, but these opportunities are now disappearing.
There was scope for offering interest on current accounts, but this is now
being squeezed out. All sorts of charges are being slapped on to fill the
revenue gap. More importantly, the banks and building societies are being
forced to widen the margins between their borrowing and lending rates in
order to pay for their bad debts. The good customers pay for the defaulters,
something which the politicians find embarrassing in public but no doubt in
private regard as an entirely satisfactory way in which the financial system
can recover from the mess: better, certainly, than bailouts by the taxpayer.
Extreme conditions provide grand opportunities for niche players, but the
stories do not always have a happy ending. In the later 1980s there were
great openings for the so-called centralised mortgage lenders, which raised
money market funds to finance mortgage propositions brought to them by
brokers - often for large and risky loans. Many of these centralised lenders
are now in financial trouble and are closed for new business.
However, they have on their books thousands of existing borrowers who are
mostly trapped by the fall in value of their property: according to the Bank
of England this week as many as one in five mortgaged home owners in London
and south-east England now has 'negative equity'. Sitting ducks, they are
often being charged the high mortgage rates of a year ago.
On the other side of the banking system's balance sheet, there is now scope
for money market funds and cash unit trusts to cream off the liquid
investments of investors. Banks and building societies are announcing
'revised' or 'adjusted' savings rates (they are never reduced, a word
apparently only applied by marketing men to lending rates). Word from the
Building Societies Association is that the societies have a difficult task
in balancing the interests of borrowers and savers, to which you might
reply, why not simply bring both savers' and borrowers' rates down in line
with money market rates?
In fact the average pre-tax retail deposit rate being paid by building
societies was much in line with bank base rates until about two years ago
but is now more than a percentage point below. The deal has become worse for
savers because the societies are not lending much, so do not need new money,
and in any case are trying to widen their margins in order to pay for bad
debts.
The answer, as far as the saver is concerned, is not to complain at the
injustice of this but to switch to money market funds if substantial sums
are involved. Do not be a victim of the M4 slowdown.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6338</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAC8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / EC companies to shed 40,000 jobs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART and Our Foreign Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NEARLY 40,000 redundancies were announced throughout the European Community
this week, about a quarter of them in the UK. Britain has been leading the
upturn in EC-wide unemployment, which began in early 1991, and accounted for
more than 50 per cent of the increase in the year to August 1992.
Much worse is likely to come in Britain and the rest of the EC. Mr Henning
Christophersen, the EC economics commissioner, predicted that EC
unemployment would rise from its present rate of 9.6 per cent to 11 per cent
next year. That would be higher than in the last economic cycle when EC
unemployment peaked at 10.9 per cent in early 1986.
Compared with the early 1980s, the latest increase has been more gradual but
it started from a much higher base, with unemployment rising from a low of
8.4 per cent in 1990 compared with a low of 5.7 per cent in 1979. After
Britain, this week's heaviest job losses were recorded in Germany.
Daimler-Benz confirmed a cut of 40,000 in total by the end of 1994, most of
which had already been announced, BASF announced another 2,000 jobs to go,
Audi about 3,500. Separately, post office workers warned that 30,000 to
40,000 jobs are threatened by rationalisation plans.
In the Netherlands, as in Germany, compulsory redundancies are rare and much
discussion this week has centred on whether to freeze wage rises in order to
secure jobs. Philips, however, announced another 250 job losses and PTT
Telecom about 230.
In Italy, the impact of recession on employment continues to be cushioned by
complex labour legislation which makes cutting jobs costly for employers.
Fiat, the bellwether of industrial employment in the north, has 35,000
workers laid off until the end of the month because of falling car demand.
The main alarm this week has been over estimates by the three main union
confederations that the government's privatisation programme could cost
150,000 jobs.
In Portugal, which has the second lowest unemployment rate in the EC at 4.5
per cent, 1,300 workers are expected to take voluntary redundancy from
TAP-Air Portugal. In the Republic of Ireland, the EC country with the
highest rate at 18 per cent, virtually no redundancies were announced,
unusually. A general election campaign is under way and unemployment is a
key issue. Aer Lingus, the national airline, has put off a restructuring
announcement.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6339</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAC7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Art works threatened as blaze sweeps through Windsor Castle
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD EVANS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE QUEEN and the Duke of York helped save hundreds of art treasures
yesterday as flames engulfed Windsor Castle.
Hundreds of firefighters battled into the night with a blaze in the castle
that houses one of the greatest privately-owned art collections.
The Queen went to Windsor from Buckingham Palace when told of the fire by
the Duke. He was carrying out research work at the castle as flames were
discovered in a private chapel near what is known as the Equerry's entrance.
The Duke said: 'Her Majesty is absolutely devastated. She is inside the
building, helping to take stuff out - works of art and other things - as a
precaution.'
He added that the fire was already 'a great deal worse' than the Pounds 10m
Hampton Court blaze six years ago.
The Prince of Wales last night spent about an hour inspecting the damage.
Fire incident commander David Harper said last night he was satisfied the
blaze was now under control.
'At certain times it seemed worse than it was. That is because the fire
voided itself through the roof and that was a deliberate ploy by ourselves
to let gases escape.'
The fire started shortly before midday in the basement of the Brunswick
Tower overlooking Windsor Great Park and swept through the north-east wing.
It spread rapidly to St George's Hall where many of the Queen's most
valuable paintings are hung below the vaulted wooden roof.
More than 200 firefighters from four counties struggled to control the blaze
but after nearly four hours the flames burst through the roof of Brunswick
Tower.
Many of the most valuable art works were saved by teams of firemen, soldiers
and castle employees, but the final cost of lost pictures and other
valuables, and of damage to the castle structure, will be considerable.
Buckingham Palace said first assessments were that 'only a handful' of works
of art had been lost. 'It is certainly too early to say how much damage has
been done, but we can say a great deal has been saved.'
Sir Roy Strong, former director of the Victoria and Albert museum, said the
Queen had one the of the world's greatest art collections, much of it held
at Windsor.
In common with most government buildings, royal palaces are not insured
because premiums would be too high. The repair bill will probably be the
responsibility of Mr Peter Brooke, national heritage secretary.
The heritage department said: 'We are responsible for financing the repair
and maintenance of occupied royal palaces. If it turns out there is a
significant repair bill the royal household will come to us and we will be
expected to pay it.'
The fire broke out in an area of the castle closed for a Pounds 2m
renovation, including rewiring.
Windsor Castle, founded by William the Conqueror, ranks sixth among historic
properties as a tourist attraction, with 630,000 visitors last year.
Fire destroys hall, Page 6
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6340</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAC6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / The Lex Column: Japan
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
This week's sharp rise in the Nikkei index had the feel of an orchestrated
move and was in marked contrast to yesterday's 21 per cent fall in NTT's
half-year profits. The government does not want the market to slip back
below the 16,000 level and released public savings for investment in
equities to halt the slide. In the short-term government support may keep
the market in a trading range, but longer term problems remain.
The government's supplementary budget was designed to reflate the economy
and support land prices, thus easing pressure on the financial system and
industrial companies. That package is currently bogged down in parliament
and public money will not be available to help fund the banks' bad debt
lifeboat. Some tax relief may be allowed on such debts, but with land prices
continuing to fall and regional banks under pressure as their industrial
loans start to turn sour, the financial system is still rickety.
Ironically, industrial companies may not benefit much if the emergency
package is eventually passed, because they may be tempted to avoid tackling
their underlying problems. Costs in Japanese manufacturing grew far too
quickly in the boom years. The ratio of costs to total sales increased from
76 per cent in 1979 to 88 per cent last year. That left companies vulnerable
to the slightest downturn in sales. Tackling those costs is a long term
structural problem which will take almost as long to resolve as the bank
fiasco. Companies which manage to attack their cost bases quickly stand the
best chance of outperforming.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6341</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAC5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / The Lex Column: Building materials
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
This week's announcement that Blue Circle is closing or mothballing 15 per
cent of its UK cement capacity is depressing news for investors in the UK
building materials sector. It is the most striking admission to date that
cost cutting alone is not enough. Output remains excessive given the low
levels of demand expected by the industry for another couple of years.
Blue Circle, at least, has a sufficiently robust balance sheet to be able to
absorb an 8 per cent hit to shareholders' funds (including the planned
property write down also revealed on Thursday). The cement market, moreover,
is concentrated into just three big players, which not only makes capacity
cuts easier to manage but helps maintain price discipline and thus the
chance of an early payback. Elsewhere, things are less happy. Redland is
playing a longer game but so far its efforts to cut brick capacity in the
wake of the Steetley takeover have had little effect on prices.
In aggregates Tarmac is making some cuts, but progress towards a better
balance is hindered by the fragmented nature of the market and companies'
need to run for cash. With construction output expected to be down 5 per
cent in 1993 - on top of this year's likely 10 per cent - it is hard to be
enthusiastic about any shares in this sector.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6342</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAC4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / The Lex Column: Privatised debt
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
If the government is pleased with its auction of privatised company debt it
should tell the market why. The competition in the bidding process certainly
suggests the bonds were not sold at bargain-basement prices. In this respect
the auction could be something of an improvement over the original
privatisations. Even so, the total lack of price data makes the auction
uniquely opaque for a sale of public assets.
Given the size of the PSBR, the Treasury will probably come back for more
next year. By then covenants stopping it from offering electricity company
debt to third parties will have expired. That might encourage those
electricity companies which declined to put in a bid this time to take part.
After all, BT can hardly be pleased to see Pounds 410m of its debt passing
from the Treasury vaults into the hands of investment bankers.
In theory the government, too, might have preferred to see BT buy back all
its own debt. One can hardly imagine UBS Phillips &amp; Drew and Goldman Sachs
bought the bonds as an investment. The risk is that the Bank of England may
face competition for its gilts auction next week as BT debt, with the same
maturity, is hawked around the City. But BT bonds are by no means a direct
substitute for gilts and the banks will repackage some of the bonds before
selling them on. With a bit of luck, most will find their way overseas. With
10-year gilt yields little more than 1 per cent higher than German bunds,
there is little immediate hope of foreign investors buying gilts.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6343</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAC3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / The Lex Column: That strain again
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
At least sterling is on the sidelines this time. Otherwise, the unrest in
the ERM looks like a re-run of last September when one currency after
another came under attack. Norway may now end up having to float and at some
stage an ERM realignment involving the Spanish peseta, Portuguese escudo and
Irish punt looks inevitable. That much would simply settle business left
unfinished from the last bout of trouble; the three weakest currencies in
the system were clearly overvalued after the depreciation sustained by
sterling and the lira.
The harder questions are whether the French franc is vulnerable and, if so,
whether Germany can be persuaded to calm the markets down with a rate cut.
The Bundesbank is still worried about government's lack of grip on the
budget, not to mention the effect of January's VAT increase and the level of
wage increases. Short of a sustained attack on the French franc - which is
still showing no sign of strain within the system - it would probably still
be reluctant to relax further for the time being.
Yet Sweden's decision to float its currency has again highlighted the
absurdity of running a tight money policy in the face of recession.
Germany's problems are not nearly as bad, but the weakness of the D-Mark
against both the dollar and the Swiss franc suggests the foreign exchange
markets are less convinced than before about how long a tight money policy
can be sustained. One must be wary of premature celebration, but the day may
not be too far off when monetary policy across Europe as a whole shifts
towards growth. That prospect, and the hope that the French can be finally
persuaded to sign up to a Gatt agreement, amply justify yesterday's 26 point
gain in the FT-SE.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6344</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAC2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / World Stock Markets (America): Farm subsidy accord boost for
Dow
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Wall Street
US SHARES rose across the board, lifted by news that a trade war with Europe
may have been avoided. Trading was exceptionally heavy because of the
monthly expiration of options contracts, writes Patrick Harverson in New
York.
At the close the Dow Jones Industrial Average was up 17.83 at 3,227.36, not
far off its high for the day. The more broadly based Standard &amp; Poor's 500
also ended notably firmer, up 3.04 at 426.65, while the Amex composite put
on 2.85 at 392.19. The Nasdaq composite firmed 4.04 to 642.61, nearing its
all-time high of 644.92 in February.
Turnover on the NYSE was extremely high at 258m shares, while rises outpaced
declines by 1,086 to 699.
After posting only modest gains in the first two hours of trading, stocks
began to climb higher as news came out of Brussels that the EC and the US
had reached an agreement to cut farm subsidies which would clear the way for
a conclusion to the Uruguay Round of Gatt trade talks.
The news that the EC-US talks had been successful was welcomed by investors,
who had feared that a combination of a weak domestic economy, even weaker
European mar kets and a damaging trade war, could wreak havoc on the world
economy. Later reports that the French agriculture minister had said France
had not yet accepted the new accord failed to dampen enthusiasm.
Prices were also affected by the monthly expiration of options on stock
indices and individual stocks. Motor stocks were one of the beneficiaries of
options-related trading. Ford rose Dollars  7/8 to Dollars 40 1/4 , Chrysler
put on Dollars  7/8 at Dollars 29 and General Motors climbed Dollars  5/8 to
Dollars 31. Both Chrysler and GM confirmed that they had temporarily shut
down a total of six assembly lines because of slow sales.
Monsanto rose Dollars 1 1/8 to Dollars 56 1/2 after the chemicals group
announced that it was initiating a series of cost-cutting measures which
would leave the company with an after-tax charge in the fourth quarter of
Dollars 425m. Monsanto hopes to realise savings of about Dollars 200m a year
from 1994 onwards.
Damon Corp rose Dollars  3/4 to Dollars 22 1/8 on speculation that the
financier Mr Ron Perelman and a European drug company had approached Damon
about a merger or acquisition.
On an otherwise mostly buoyant Nasdaq market, Dell Computer, which posted
strong gains on Thursday following its earnings release, slumped Dollars 3
3/4 to Dollars 34 5/8 amid concern about currency hedging by the personal
computer company. Dell denied reports that the Securities and Exchange
Commission was investigating the currency hedging.
Canada
TORONTO share prices ended the week on a positive note, posting a solid gain
in continued active trading.
Based on preliminary data, the TSE-300 index gained 30.13 points, or 0.93
per cent, to 3,263.86, for a drop on the week of about 5.5 points. Winning
issues led losers by 323 to 273. Trading volume of 37.701m shares was down
slightly from Thursday's 38.938m shares, while value of trading was CDollars
422.3m against CDollars 325.1m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6345</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAC1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / World Stock Markets: South Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
JOHANNESBURG ended mixed after drifting sideways in quiet trading. Gains in
selected index-linked industrial shares boosted the index 12 to 4,077 and
the all-share index rose 8 to 3,047. The gold index added 3 to 768.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6346</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAC0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / World Stock Markets: Adjusting to life under President Bill
Clinton - Wall Street's election tactics
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
In this tumultuous election year, the stock market got its retaliation in
first.
Instead of waiting until after polling day, investors responded to what they
thought would happen - a win for the Democrats - well before November 3.
Investors imagined what life would be like if Governor Bill Clinton became
president and re-positioned their portfolios accordingly. The beneficiaries
were stocks closely tied to the economic cycle, especially those which would
benefit from heavy expenditure on infrastructure projects.
The biggest losers were pharmaceutical companies, on fears that a Clinton
administration would impose controls on drug prices to slow the pace of
healthcare inflation.
While there was plenty of activity in a few individual sectors and stocks,
there was no discernible pattern to trading in the months before the
election. From early July, when the Democratic challenger first began to
build a solid lead in the polls, to the campaign's final day, the Dow Jones
Industrial Average fell 3 per cent to just over 3,250, and the Standard &amp;
Poor's 500 rose 1.7 per cent to around 420.
Secondary stocks, however, fared much better. Between July and November the
Nasdaq composite index rose more than 7 per cent to around 600, a move that
probably had more to do with the oversold nature of this market in the
spring and early summer than it did with the likely outcome of the
presidential vote.
Once the pre-election manoeuvres were completed, the result was an
anti-climax. Anyone who had looked for a big sell-off immediately after the
Clinton landslide - sparked by a pro-Republican Wall Street fearful of what
the new administration would do to the deficit and to top-bracket taxpayers
 -was disappointed.
Similarly, anyone who thought that equities might stage a big rally in
anticipation of a massive boost to capital spending and economic growth also
saw their hopes dashed.
Since polling day, the market has lacked a firm direction, and stock
performance has been decidedly mixed. The Dow has fallen just over one per
cent in the past two-and-a-half weeks, while the S &amp; P 500 has posted a
small gain of just under one per cent.
Once again, secondary stocks have made a much more determined showing. The
Nasdaq composite index rose 5.6 per cent between November 3 and November 19
in extremely heavy trading. Although much of that rise was concentrated in a
few big names such as Microsoft, Apple Computer and Intel, demand was
reasonably widespread.
The gains here, however, have had little to do with the election result.
Part of the explanation is technical - secondary issues were heavily sold in
the first half of the year, led by depressed technology and healthcare
stocks. It was not long before many began to look cheap again, attracting
the attention of bargain-hunters and speculators.
The fundamentals were also moving in the right direction. A recent analysis
of corporate earnings shows that small companies reported better profits
during the second and third quarters of this year than their larger
counterparts. Smaller companies have also benefited from their relative lack
of exposure to overseas markets which are either entering or stuck in
recession. One factor can be tied to the election result and that is Mr
Clinton's campaign pledge to cut taxes on the capital gains which small- and
medium-sized companies earn from long-term investment holdings. Investors
have not been slow to act on the implications.
Secondary stocks aside, there are several reasons why the broader market has
failed to make a decisive move since election day. One is the economy.
Although there have been signs of life in the last week or so, they were
insufficient to convince investors that the hoped-for robust recovery is
around the corner.
Another is the lack of a lead from the president-elect and his transition
team. Both have taken great pains not to raise expectations too high about
what will be accomplished during the first months of the new presidency.
Specifics about which policies will be introduced first have been notable
for their absence. Reports have placed the size of an early 1993 economic
stimulus package as high as Dollars 50bn but Democrat advisers are refusing
to offer anything other than vague assurances that they will concentrate
their efforts on job growth and the economy.
The time Mr Clinton is taking over cabinet appointments has also left the
market in limbo. The question of who fills the top economic posts is
especially important. Investors would love to see Mr Paul Volcker, the
former Federal Reserve chairman, installed as Treasury secretary or perhaps
Mr Robert Rubin, currently co-chairman of Goldman Sachs. Either man would
bring much-needed credibility to the new administration.
Mr Clinton is unlikely to announce any appointments before next weekend's
Thanksgiving holiday. Until then, and probably until the new president is
inaugurated on January 20, the stock market is going to have to sit tight.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6347</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / World Stock Markets (Europe): Bourses influenced by Swedish
krona float
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff and HILARY BARNES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BOURSES took their cue from the Swedish krona float as renewed currency
tension moved from Scandinavia to the rest of Europe, writes Our Markets
Staff.
STOCKHOLM rose another 8.8 per cent in record turnover of SKr2.7bn, fuelled
by the positive impact of devaluation. According to Goldman Sachs, past
historical experience in Sweden suggested that, on average, a 15 per cent
devaluation increased share prices by 35 per cent to 40 per cent.
The Affarsvarlden General index closed 66.3 higher at 821.1, up 13.9 per
cent on a week during which the krona was effectively devalued by 11 per
cent against the dollar.
Forestry shares were the outstanding winners on their sharp increase in
competitiveness. Modo B put on SKr35 or 30 per cent to SKr150 and Stora
B-frees gained SKr44 to SKr256.
Mr Peter Lawrence at Kleinwort Benson said that investors were buying into
Sweden for its big international blue chips and their sensitivity to reduced
costs and higher export margins.
Among other Nordic markets, OSLO rose 4.1 per cent on speculation that
Norway would also be forced to devalue. The all-share index closed 14.14
higher at 356.27.
HELSINKI retreated from morning highs on the failure of income settlement
talks between the government and trade unions, although the Hex index rose
9.3 to 794.2.
COPENHAGEN, more associated with the hard-currency bloc in mid-Europe, was
affected by rising short-term interest rates, writes Hilary Barnes. The
all-share index fell 3.38 to 265.82, 2.7 per cent lower on the week. Danisco
closed DKr20 down at DKr641 after forecasting lower-than-expected current
year profits as a result of devaluations in Britain and Sweden.
PARIS steadied after its recent fall on hopes of a Gatt trade deal between
the US and Europe. This helped to offset a rise in overnight rates to defend
the franc, which weakened on Sweden's decision to float the krona.
Position-squaring ahead of the close of the account on Monday also supported
share prices. The CAC-40 index added 1.85 to 1,724.18, down 4 per cent on
the week, in turnover of FFr2.4bn.
Euro Disney continued to drop after its annual results, closing FFr2.30 or
3.4 per cent down at FFr65.70. Elf fell FFr8.20 to FFr323 as an analyst at
Kidder Peabody in New York downgraded the oil company from 'buy' to 'hold'
and lowered his 1992 and 1993 earnings estimates. One of the big UK brokers
is about to lower its forecasts for Elf following a visit to the company.
Havas dropped FFr6.2 to FFr419 following news late on Thursday that it owned
3.06 per cent of its media rival, Hachette. Last month Havas denied that it
had any interest in buying shares in Hachette.
MILAN ended lower but a late recovery led by Credito Italiano trimmed
earlier losses. The Comit index fell 5.65 to 459.07, down 0.4 per cent on
the week, in turnover estimated at around Thursday's L263.5bn.
Credito rose L155 or 5.8 per cent to L2,830 on rumours that its shares would
be valued at as much as L5,000 for the forthcoming sale of Iri's 67 per cent
stake in the bank. Banca Commerciale Italiana followed suit, adding L184 to
L4,615.
Sme remained suspended but Consob said that trading in the shares could
resume on Monday, provided that Iri gave a clear indication of its plans for
the state-controlled food group at a board meeting scheduled for today.
FRANKFURT was soured by a cut in the Metallgesellschaft dividend and only
slightly appeased by better-than-expected profits from Hoechst. The DAX
index closed 6.89 lower at 1,544.76, fractionally down on the week in
turnover of DM4.4bn after DM5.5bn.
The metals company fell DM4.80 to DM323 and the chemicals group rose DM1.40
to DM241.90. BASF fell another DM2.30 to DM207.70 after seriously
disappointing figures on Thursday.
Carmakers fell, with VW losing DM2.80 to DM287.50 following its Audi unit's
announcement of plans to cut its workforce.
BRUSSELS rose on hopes that further interest rate cuts were on the way. The
Bel-20 index added 7.62 to 1,142.82, up 0.4 per cent on the week.
Shares in Banque Bruxelles Lambert remained suspended after news that
Internationale Nederlanden Groep was withdrawing its bid for BBL. But the
shares were quoted 12 per cent down at BFr2,900 in the pre-bourse. BBL's
shareholder, Groupe Bruxelles Lambert, fell BFr100 or 3.6 per cent to
BFr2,700.
AMSTERDAM was mixed to easier as the CBS Tendency Index fell 0.3 to 103.4,
down 1.3 per cent on the week. ING jumped Fl 1.60 or 3.3 per cent on news
that it had decided against taking over BBL.
MADRID saw profit-taking and the general index fell 2.73 to 212.75, but it
still came out 5 per cent ahead on the week, lifted by better-than-expected
inflation figures last Friday.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                    FT-SE ACTUARIES SHARE INDICES
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
November 20                                         THE EUROPEAN SERIES
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Hourly changes                Open      10.30      11.00      12.00
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100        1043.81    1044.39    1046.14    1046.32
FT-SE Eurotrack 200        1111.22    1107.87    1110.18    1112.45
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Hourly changes               13.00      14.00      15.00      Close
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100        1047.09    1047.63    1051.40    1051.29
FT=SE Eurotrack 200        1112.39    1111.78    1119.35    1117.40
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                       Nov 19    Nov 18    Nov 17    Nov 16    Nov 13
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100   1047.93   1051.36   1056.32   1058.27   1059.26
FT-SE Eurotrack 200   1110.76   1106.59   1109.66   1110.19   1114.93
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Base value  1000 (26/10/90)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
High/day: 100 - 1051.81; 200 - 1119.61
Low/day: 100 - 1043.17 200 - 1107.83
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6348</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): Nikkei rises on hopes of
political pact
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
REPORTS that the ruling Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) and opposition
parties were ready to strike an agreement over parliamentary testimonies by
leading LDP politicians bolstered sentiment, and the Nikkei average closed
above the 17,000 level for the first time since November 5, writes Emiko
Terazono in Tokyo.
The 225-issue average gained 162.29 to 17,033.60, a rise of 4.3 per cent on
the week. The index fell to the day's low of 16,679.64 in the morning on
profit-taking, but gathered upward momentum on index-linked arbitrage
buying, setting a day's high of 17,188.37 in the afternoon.
Volume fell marginally from 319m to 300m shares ahead of the long weekend.
The market is closed on Monday for a public holiday.
Advances led declines by 544 to 434 with 149 unchanged. The Topix index of
all first-section stocks rose 2.38 to 1,276.91 and in London, the ISE/Nikkei
50 index added 0.07 to 1,026.00. Comments by leading politicians suggesting
an imminent conclusion of the current political stalemate prompted investors
to place buy orders. Mr Kozo Watanabe, minister of international trade and
industry, said that the government's supplementary budget package would be
approved in parliament early in December.
Bank shares were higher on short-covering. Industrial Bank of Japan gained
Y40 to Y2,410 and Fuji Bank gained Y10 to Y1,780.
Dealers actively traded speculative theme stocks. Mitsui Mining and
Smelting, which previously attracted buying on reports that gold veins were
found in the company's mining area, was the most active issue of the day,
rising Y9 to Y481, while SS Pharmaceutical advanced Y20 to Y1,230.
Trading companies lost ground on reports of large hidden losses on tokkin,
specified money trusts. Nichimen fell Y12 to Y345 and Marubeni lost Y2 to
Y377.
Electronic issues lost ground on corporate and foreign selling. Hitachi fell
Y16 to Y710 and Toshiba fell Y3 to Y609.
In Osaka, the OSE average gained 68.84 to 18,280.46 in volume of 27.1m
shares. Nintendo, the video game maker, rose Y100 to Y10,100 on
bargain-hunting.
Roundup
ADVANCES led the declines among the region's markets at the end of a
volatile week.
BANGKOK ended 4.5 per cent higher on the day, but 4.1 per cent lower after a
topsy-turvy week, as the finance ministry began to use a Bt5bn fund to buy
up shares. The market had plunged in the previous two days on legal action
by the Securities and Exchange Commission against a major investor and his
associates.
The SET index rose 37.55 to 871.72 in turnover of Bt10.64bn. The central
bank also encouraged investors back into the market and said that it was
making unlimited amounts of cash available to banks and finance companies to
help them with liquidity problems.
AUSTRALIA was underpinned by a recovery in banks as the All Ordinaries index
rose 17.3 to 1,410.1, up 2.1 per cent on the week.
Westpac and ANZ rose 6 cents to ADollars 2.73 and 9 to ADollars 2.79 after
reporting 1991-92 losses within expectations this week.
TAIWAN climbed on strong buying of financial shares and on news that Oung
Ta-ming, head of the Hualon Group and a major market player, had decided to
be a candidate in the December legislative election. The weighted index rose
41.95 to at 3,724.33, 4.7 per cent higher on the week.
HONG KONG rose for the second day, the Hang Seng index ending 23.38 higher
at 5,878.79 but 7.7 per cent lower on a week during which the apparent
Sino-British rift widened. Turnover shrank from HKDollars 4.57bn to
HKDollars 2.75bn.
BOMBAY recovered from a sharp two-day fall after the BSE authorities
tightened curbs on sales. The BSE index rose 56.30 to 2,479.56 but fell 4.1
per cent on the week.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6349</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / London Stock Exchange: Retailers busy on bid hopes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVE THOMPSON, CHRISTOPHER PRICE and PETER JOHN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ACQUISITION rumours swirled around retailer Kingfisher yesterday, sending
the shares into reverse as investors worried about the potentially diluting
effects of any funding requirements. Early talk centred on Kwik Fit, sending
shares in the automotive parts group racing forward and forcing its board to
issue a statement saying it knew of no reason for the price movement. The
shares had jumped 10.5p on Thursday and a further 8.5p yesterday to close at
97p.
Analysts were mostly sceptical about the Kwik Fit speculation, arguing that
Kingfisher's earlier attempts to break into the automotive parts market had
not been a great success. Also the company had privately said on a number of
occasions it would not bid for Kwik Fit, one of the market's bid favourites.
However, the rise in Kwik Fit's shares was offset by a stronger rumour that
Kingfisher was considering buying a 32 per cent stake in the leading French
DIY group, Castorama. Carrefour, which owns the shares, was said to have
confirmed to analysts yesterday that its holding was up for sale. Castorama,
which is capitalised at around Pounds 700m, turned over FFr5.7bn in the
first half of this year making pre-tax profits of FFr88.9m. It holds 13 per
cent of the French DIY market. A potential buyer would have to pay in the
region of Pounds 250m if it were to buy the Carrefour stake.
A full bid for Castorama is thought unlikely. One fifth of the shares are
family-controlled and a further 5 per cent owned by employees. Kingfisher,
which owns the UK's leading DIY group, B&amp;Q, is known to want to expand its
European operations. However, the takeover talk unsettled investors with
worries over the cost of particularly the Kwik Fit venture, and Kingfisher
shares fell 8 to 553p.
Rolls-Royce weak
A substantial downgrading of its profit forecast for Rolls-Royce by the
company's own brokerage house drove stock in the aerospace engineering group
to a post-privatisation low. The new estimates from broker Hoare Govett are
believed to be at the lower end of the market's range and the shares fell 9
before closing a net 4 1/2 lower at 96 1/2 p. Turnover of 16m shares was
among the heaviest in the London market and Rolls was also the most actively
traded stock option in the derivatives market.
Hoare has cut its forecast for the current year by Pounds 20m to Pounds 50m
and for 1993 by Pounds 35m to Pounds 80m. It has also raised questions about
the fate of the dividend. The house believes that R&amp;D costs will remain high
while the outlook for spares sales, civil engine orders military orders and
overall turnover in the aerospace industry continues to prompt concern. BZW
was said to have cut its dividend forecast to 5.1p per share from 7.25p.
Fisons trimmed
Pharmaceutical group Fisons dropped 10 to 200p on turnover of 8.8m shares
with a forecast review from Japanese securities house Nomura contributing to
weakness in the stock. A new pharmaceuticals team at Nomura has decided that
estimates for Fisons were lagging the market view. While unwilling to
comment yesterday, the team is believed to have reduced its 1992 profit
forecast of Pounds 130m to Pounds 100m, around the bottom of the range.
There was also talk that Goldman Sachs had been a seller but the US house
said it had not changed its recommendation or its forecast.
The Gatt agreement reversed an early decline in the shares of drinks stocks
with international exposure. Allied Lyons, closed 14 ahead at 655p, Grand
Metropolitan added 6 to 414p, and Guinness jumped 7 to 544p.
In-depth research of the UK newspaper industry by integrated securities
house SG Warburg benefited United Newspapers. The shares lifted 7 to 466p as
Warburg reinforced its buy stance on the stock as part of a sector review
discussed with clients yesterday. The house also liked Daily Telegraph,
which added 4 at 317p.
Various rumours of increased competition gave some dealers the chance to
offload an overhang of Carlton Communications and sell the shares down 16 to
709p. Full-year profits on December 8 are expected to be impressive but some
analysts were arguing that after Wellcome and Glaxo Carlton had the highest
price/earnings ratio in the FT-SE 100 index and the rating was not
justified. Meanwhile Wellcome lifted 18 to 1024p and Glaxo rose 12 to 825p,
both on a stronger US dollar.
Retailer Dixons fell back 5 to 231p after UBS Phillips &amp; Drew issued a sell
recommendation, highlighting worries over the effects of devaluation of
sterling on the company's costs.
Albert Fisher was the biggest traded stock in the market, turning over 17m
shares, the shares rising 4 to 57p. SG Warburg was again said to be pushing
the stock.
British Gas shrugged off the debilitating effects of higher than expected
third-quarter numbers announced on Thursday and raced higher in the wake of
determined buying said to have emanated from Continental institutions.
At the close Gas shares were 7 higher at 286 1/2 p. Energy specialists said
the shares were viewed by European investors as offering an exceptionally
attractive prospective yield.
BP edged up 2 1/2 to 232p on 4.2m traded and Shell 7 to 545p on 2.6m, helped
by an upturn in crude oil prices. Enterprise Oil jumped 9 to 449p, also
stimulated by hints of strong European buying.
Aitken Hume, the banking and investment management group, surprised the
market by announcing it was involved in talks that could lead to a bid for
the company. Aitken shares rocketed 14 to 49p on the news.
An agency cross of 4.7m shares at 245p a share had little impact on London &amp;
Manchester which eased 2 to 248p.
Hints that about 2m shares were on offer early in the day upset Blue Circle
Industries. The shares dipped to 171p but later picked up to close only 3
easier at 174p with dealers convinced that a bid for the group may well
appear.
Simon Engineering jumped 20 to 99p amid speculation of a possible bid or
that the group has found a buyer for one of its businesses. However, some
analysts said the stock was higher because it had been oversold.
The price of Caird Group halved after the environmental services company
warned of lower results in the second half. Caird added that it was unlikely
to pay a final dividend, after a first half 1.33p per share payout. The
shares slumped 16 to 17p.
The Caird profits warning unsettled water stocks with waste disposal
interests. Among these Severn Trent, which owns the Biffa waste disposal
business, ran back 4 to 472p. Yorkshire Water eased 2 to 529p and Wessex
eased to 589p.
Container leasing group Tiphook rebounded 19 to 239p after US investment
bank Lehman Brothers raised its rating on the company to a buy from
outperform.
NEW HIGHS AND LOWS FOR 1992
NEW HIGHS (59).
NEW HIGHS (70).
AMERICANS (2) Lockheed, Southwestern Bell, BANKS (1) Abbey Natl., BREWERS &amp;
DISTILLERS (2) Bulmer (HP), Kirin, BUSINESS SERVICES (2) Chubb Security,
Willis, CHEMICALS (2) Evode 7p Pf., Schering, CONTRACTING &amp; CONSTRUCTION (1)
NSM, ELECTRICITY (1) Scot. Power, ELECTRONICS (2) Siemens, Multitone,
ENGINEERING GENERAL (3) FKI, Hobson, Vosper, FOOD MANUFACTURING (1) Dalgety,
FOOD RETAILING (2) Iceland Frozen, Morrison (Wm) 5 1/4 pc Pf., HEALTH &amp;
HOUSEHOLD (4) AAH, Amersham, Huntleigh Tech., Smith &amp; Nephew, INSURANCE
BROKERS (1) Berry Birch, INSURANCE COMPOSITE (2) Aegon, Gen. Accident,
INSURANCE LIFE (3) Britannic, Transatlantic, Do B 6pc Pf., INVESTMENT TRUSTS
(20) Anglo &amp; Overseas, Brit. Assets, CST Emrg. Asia, Drayton Blue Chip Zero
Pf., ECU Wts., Flmg. Amer., Gartmore Euro., Govett Amer. Smllr. Co's, Hong
Kong Wts., London Amer. Venture, Murray Inc., Do B, New Zealand, Rolinco
N/V, Do Sub Shs., Second Alliance, Select Assets ULS '13, Do Series II, US
Smllr. Co's, Do Wts, MEDIA (6) Central ITV, Metal Bulletin, News Intl.,
Reuters, Sterling Publsg., Utd. News., MISCELLANEOUS (2) BAT Inds., Frost,
MOTORS (1) First Tech., OIL &amp; GAS (1) Brit. Gas, OTHER FINANCIAL (2) Aitken
Hume, Perpetual, OTHER INDUSTRIAL MATERIALS (1) Scapa, PACKAGING, PAPER &amp;
PRINTING (2) Filofax, Portals, PROPERTY (2) Embassy, Helical Bar 5 1/4 pc Pf
'12, STORES (3) Burton, Fine Art Dev., Oriflame, TRANSPORT (1) GATX, MINES
(1) Navan Res.
NEW LOWS (39).
AMERICANS (1) IBM, CANADIANS (1) Brascan, BREWERS &amp; DISTILLERS (2) Macdonald
Martin A, Matthew Clark, BUILDING MATERIALS (1) CRH, BUSINESS SERVICES (3)
Bridgend, Corp. Services, Gardiner, CHEMICALS (2) Caird, Do 7p Pf. '09,
CONGLOMERATES (1) Hanson Wts., ELECTRONICS (2) P &amp; P, TGI, ENGINEERING
AEROSPACE (1) Rolls-Royce, ENGINEERING GENERAL (2) Bullough, Hall, FOOD
RETAILING (1) Appleby Westward, HEALTH &amp; HOUSEHOLD (1) Specialeyes,
INSURANCE LIFE (1) Irish Life, INVESTMENT TRUSTS (2) I &amp; S UK Smllr. Co's,
SPLIT Inc., MEDIA (3) Metro Radio, Trans World Comms., Yorks. Tyne-Tees TV,
MISCELLANEOUS (1) EFG, OIL &amp; GAS (1) Crossroads, PACKAGING, PAPER &amp; PRINTING
(2) PrinTech, Stat-Plus, PROPERTY (2) Bolton, YRM, STORES (1) Dunhill,
TEXTILES (3) Camapri, Foster (J), Martin Intl., TRANSPORT (1) Seafield,
SOUTH AFRICANS (1) Barlo Rand, MINES (3) Gencor, Renison, Zandpan.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6350</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Coffee retreats from 9-month
highs - Week in the markets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD MOONEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LONDON COFFEE futures retreated from nine-month highs reached early in the
week as traders played down the prospects of significant progress being made
at next week's London talks on renegotiating the International Coffee
Agreement.
African coffee producers are ready to compromise with consumer countries on
export controls in a new world pact, the Reuter news agency reported
yesterday from Abidjan, capital of the Ivory Coast. After a four-day
meeting, delegates to the 25-member Inter-African Coffee Organisation said
it would recommend that producers take the main responsibility for stopping
illegal exports at the London talks. Producers had been pushing for the
burden of policing export controls to be shared.
But London traders expected decisions on a new price-support pact to be
delayed until the new US and Brazilian administrations had settled down.
The January robusta contract at the London Futures and Options Exchange,
which on Tuesday had peaked at Dollars 990 a tonne, fell back to Dollars 942
before closing yesterday at Dollars 968 a tonne, up Dollars 9 on the week.
Traders said this reflected pressure from hedging sales and profit-taking
following the recent highs and was further influenced by signs of producer
seling, notably from Uganda and Indonesia.
A forecast that the 1992-93 coffee crop in Colombia, the world's
second-biggest producer, would fall by between 2m and 2.5m bags (60 kg each)
from 1991-92's 17.5m bags failed to buoy sentiment. 'It would seem as if
comments from Colombia (the forecast was made by the head of the country's
exporters' association) are counter productive,' said GNI, the London trade
house, in its daily Commodity Report yesterday. 'If they are bullish the
market thinks it is trying to talk the market up - if so, then what does it
have to hide?'
Base metals prices were mostly firmer at the London Metal Exchange as
markets continued to consolidate following recent falls. The rally was led
by copper, which closed Pounds 19.50 up on the week in the cash position, at
Pounds 1,404.50 a tonne, though the market was again aided by sterling's
weakness.
Zinc also moved higher in a thin market, the cash position gaining Dollars
27.50 to Dollars 1,046.50 a tonne, and aluminium prices built on last week's
rally, helped by concern about a possible strike at Pechiney, the French
producer.
Lead prices bounced after reaching the lowest levels for five months in
sterling terms and for six years in dollar terms. As the market responded to
bullish chart patterns, good recent trade interest and sterling weakness,
the cash price rose to Pounds 306.50 a tonne and closed yesterday at Pounds
305.50 a tonne, up Pounds 12.50 on the week.
One metal that did not join in with the upturn was nickel, which closed
yesterday at Dollars 5,405 a tonne, down Dollars 22.50 on the week. The
market was not in the mood to respond positively to news early in the week
that Cuban nickel output was expected to to fall 15,000 tonnes short of the
50,000-tonne target for this year. It remained more concerned about the
continuing flood of metal from the former Soviet Union. The Commonwealth of
Independent States, as it is now called, is expected to export 120,000
tonnes of nickel in 1992, up from 100,000 in 1991, the Interfax news agency
said this week, quoting officials from Norilsk Nickel, the main CIS
producer.
The precious metals market livened up yesterday after a generally downbeat
week. Dealers said gold was supported by expectations of a realignment of
the weaker currencies within the European Community's Exchange Rate
Mechanism and rumours of a Bundesbank rate cut next week. The price rose to
Dollars 336.35 a troy ounce, up Dollars 2.20 on the day but down 10 cents on
the week.
The earlier fall to Dollars 334.15 an ounce had been influenced by
Australian selling induced by the weakness of the national currency. 'If
Australian producers are willing to sell at Dollars 335, then how much
upside does the market have?' asked the GNI report . . . 'Very little we
believe.'
Platinum moved up with gold to Dollars 356.25 an ounce at yesterday's
afternoon fixing, up Dollars 2.60 on the week. Dealers said the white metal
was also boosted by Japanese buying as hopes of a government boost to the
economy lifted the Nikkei stock index.
Silver was also influenced by gold's upturn and the London market's cash
position regained 2.5 cents yesterday to close 1 cent down on the week at
378.5 cents an ounce.
 -----------------------------------
      LME WAREHOUSE STOCKS
     (As at Monday's close)
 -----------------------------------
tonnes
 -----------------------------------
Aluminium  +8,275 to 1,447,575
Copper     +1,000 to   324,100
Lead         -150 to   194,100
Nickel       +648 to    60,870
Zinc       -3,475 to   376,725
Tin          +210 to    14,490
 -----------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6351</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / London Stock Exchange: Equity futures and options trading
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PRICE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NEWS from the Gatt talks gave a quiet session in the derivatives market a
positive and lively flourish, writes Christopher Price.
The December contract opened firm at 2,719, before drifting back as the
10.30am deadline for expiry of the November index options approached,
hitting its low of 2,710 at around 10am.
A positive opening on Wall Street lightened the mood which turned to
something approaching euphoria when news on the Gatt negotiations came into
the market at around 3.30pm. December raced forward as buyers rushed in and
some traders were caught short, reaching its high of the day of 2,757
shortly before the close.
It finally finished at 2,751, 25 points ahead of the previous session and
around an 11-point premium to its fair value level of nine. Volume was 7,496
contracts.
A busy day in the options market saw 34,231 trades. Rolls-Royce was the top
stock option, with 2,281 contracts, including a seller of 1,000 of the
December 90 calls at 10p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6352</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / London Stock Exchange: FT-SE Index peak attacked again
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY BYLAND, UK Stock Market Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ONCE AGAIN, the UK stock market bounced successfully off its support level,
moving ahead strongly towards the close on news of favourable progress at
the GATT talks in Washington, to close within a whisker of the all-time peak
reached in May. Trading volume remained high, underlining the return to
profitable levels of activity recorded since Britain quit the European
exchange rate mechanism in September.
Reports of a GATT deal inspired sharp rises in food and brewery stocks which
were threatened by the prospect of an international clash on agricultural
product pricing. Among the internationals, Unilever stood out well and
firmness in the US dollar helped the rest of the blue chip sector.
Equities opened cautiously, discouraged by confirmation overnight of savage
workforce cutbacks at British Rail and in the UK building industry.
An early rally was not held and the FT-SE Index repeated Thursday's initial
trend to slip to within two points of 2,700 as doubt was cast over
Thursday's hints that rates cuts in German rates might come sooner than
expected.
But this level again brought out buying support and when stock index futures
began to move higher - following news that the GATT talks had successfully
achieved agreement on an agricultural trade agreement - share prices rose
very sharply.
At best the FT-SE Index touched 2,732.9 before closing at 2,732.4, a net
rise of 26.2 on the day. Traders sounded ebullient at the close and hoped
that, as the GATT news is absorbed, the Footsie will shortly challenge the
closing peak of 2,737.8 and trading peak of 2,744.5, both reached on May 11
when the market was still responding to the re-election of Mr John Major's
Conservative government.
This week, the Footsie has gained nearly 2 per cent, helped both by more
favourable views on the GATT talks and also by news of unexpectedly better
UK retail sales in October. Trading volume has also recovered after a brief
pause at the beginning of the week. Yesterday's Seaq total of 545.7m shares
traded compared with 659.3m on Thursday, when retail business was worth
Pounds 1.2bn.
UK government bonds, about easier for most of the session as investors
continued to worry about public funding prospects, steadied on reports from
the GATT talks.
After falling away briefly at the beginning of the week, retail business has
recovered to regain the average levels of the past two months.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6353</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Foreign Exchanges: ERM rumours boost dollar
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BLITZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SWEDEN'S devaluation of the krona earlier this week continued to cause
ripples across the world's foreign exchange markets yesterday, consolidating
the D-Mark's gains against most European currencies, writes James Blitz.
The latest uncertainty in exchange rates raised increasing speculation that
the Exchange Rate Mechanism was ripe for its second formal realignment in
three months. Late last night, agency reports that a realignment of the ERM
was underway sent the dollar to a level of DM1.61 in US trading.
The devaluation of the Swedish krona triggered a spate of D-Mark buying on
Thursday. Dealers believe that the Spanish peseta, Portuguese escudo and
Irish punt are overvalued against the D-Mark, and will need to be devalue
soon in order to boost badly-needed economic growth in those countries.
Inside the ERM, the Portuguese escudo suffered most yesterday. It plunged
through the psychological barrier of Esc90 per D-Mark despite intervention
from the Bank of Portugal. It later closed at Esc90.63.
The central banks of Belgium and Ireland intervened to support the Irish
punt as it threatened to touch its floor against the Belgian franc, the
strongest currency in the system. The punt later closed at IPounds 2.6243.
The French franc fell to a three-week low against the D-Mark, bottoming out
at FFr3.3910 against the D-Mark. The franc later recovered to a close of
FFr3.386, helped by the announcement of a FFr1.45bn current account surplus
in September, underlining the economy's strong position. It was still down
0.6 centimes on the day.
Outside the ERM, the Italian lira continued to weaken, falling another L4 to
a close of L863.3 against the D-Mark.
Some analysts said that Mr Helmut Schlesinger, the Bundesbank president, had
intensified speculation by approving of Sweden's decision to float the Ecu
yesterday. But there are fundamental differences between the current ERM
tensions and the ones which developed into a full scale currency crisis in
the autumn.
The market is now looking at Germany in a different way. In the previous
crisis, the market chose to ignore the fact that the German economy was
slowing down and teetering on the brink of recession. Now, the D-Mark is not
perceived as the strong currency it was.
The market also saw in the early autumn how resilient the French franc can
be to speculative attack. 'People know that speculating against the French
franc would be a costly blunder,' said Mr Christian Dunis, of Chemical Bank
in London.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6354</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Money Markets: D-Mark futures rally
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BLITZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EUROMARK futures yesterday continued the strong rise of recent days as
growing tensions in the European exchange rate mechanism added to
speculation that there will be a further easing of German monetary policy,
writes James Blitz.
The sterling cash market was a good deal quieter. Some period rates were
slightly firmer despite the speedy removal of a large shortage forecast by
the Bank of England.
The ERM tensions which followed the devaluation of the Swedish krona on
Thursday continued to cause serious adjustments in European exchange rates
and monetary policy yesterday. The Portuguese escudo was pushed towards its
floor against the D-Mark, and the Irish authorities intervened to support
the punt.
This prompted more intense speculation that the Bundesbank will cut interest
rates before the end of the year to ease tensions.
One commercial bank dealer said that he would not be surprised to see an
easing of 25 basis points in the rate at which the Bundesbank sets its
repurchase agreements in forthcoming weeks. Mr Neil MacKinnon, chief
economist at Citibank in London, believes that the week's events make it
even more likely that there will be a 50 basis point cut in the Discount
rate before the end of the year.
The December Euromark contract rose 9 basis points to a close of 91.45,
while the March contract closed up 15 basis points to a close of 92.51. At
this level, the markets are pricing in a fall of 34 basis points in the
price of 3-month money before the end of the year.
Conversely, French franc futures fell sharply yesterday morning as the
currency fell through the FFr3.39 level against the D-Mark. The December
contract dropped 16 basis points to a low of 90.50, but later recovered with
the currency to close unchanged at 90.66.
Sterling's suspension from the ERM meant that events on the continent
continued to have little effect on money rates. However, some dealers
interpreted the Bank of England's Quarterly Bulletin as giving slightly more
cautious view on interest rates. 'It is vital that a steady and stable
transition to price stability be maintained, ' the Bank said.
This may have ben the reason why the December sterling contract fell back 5
basis points at the start of trading to a low of 93.05. Three month money
closed  1/16 per cent firmer at 7 1/4 per cent offered.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6355</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / International Company News: Job cuts and Dollars 425m charge
at Monsanto
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MONSANTO, the US chemicals group, yesterday disclosed an extraordinary
after-tax charge of Dollars 425m, or about Dollars 3.45 a share, against
fourth-quarter earnings and substantial job cuts at its Searle
pharmaceuticals division.
Its shares rose Dollars 2 to Dollars 57 3/8 in afternoon trading after
initially being halted on the news. The price has fallen from a high of
Dollars 71 1/4 in the last 52 weeks, largely reflecting concern about
Searle's performance.
Mr Richard Mahoney, chairman, said the company was responding to a fiercely
competitive environment, with consumers worldwide demand ing dramatically
lower prices for products and services.
'In our view, these conditions are a permanent shift in requirements rather
than simply a reflection of currently depressed economic conditions.'
The latest move follows Monsanto's Dollars 1.275bn sales of its Fischer
Controls valve and systems subsidiary in August and two large restructurings
in the 1980s.
Monsanto will cut about 3,200 jobs, mainly at Searle whose earnings have
been hurt by the patent loss of its important Calan drug earlier this year
and by the steep costs of bringing drugs to market. Its nine-month operating
income dropped to Dollars 23m from Dollars 84m last year, with operating
losses in this year's first half.
Searle is to sell and consoli date facilities, sell assets and reduce
marketing, administration and technical expenses.
Monsanto expects its cost-cutting measures to generate pre-tax savings of
Dollars 200m a year, starting in 1994.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6356</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / International Company News: Dell Computer's forex practices
questioned
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LOUISE KEHOE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAN FRANCISCO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DELL Computer's share price fell sharply yesterday, when a Wall Street
analyst expressed concerns about the personal computer company's foreign
exchange hedging activities.
Dell was trading at Dollars 35 yesterday, down Dollars 3 3/8 , giving up its
gains on Thursday when it reported much higher than expected third-quarter
sales and earnings.
Mr David Korus, of Kidder, Peabody &amp; Co. lowered his rating on the stock
yesterday. 'We have some serious and unanswered questions about Dell's
foreign exchange policies and treasury activities,' Mr Korus said. 'It
appears that . . . Dell's foreign exchange risk management practices may
have been unorthodox and potentially speculative in nature.'
However, he denied market rumours that he felt currency hedging inflated
Dell's third-quarter results. Dell Computer denied any improprieties. 'We
absolutely deny any accounting adjustment or activity being responsible for
our strong performance,' the company said. 'We have acted in accordance with
accepted accounting principles in all of our activities.'
Responding to market rumours of a Securities Exchange Commission
investigation, Dell said it had no knowledge of such an investigation and
believed the rumours to be untrue.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6357</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / International Company News: Relief as Dutch bank drops its
plans to bid for BBL
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RONALD VAN DE KROL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   AMSTERDAM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES in Internationale Nederlanden Groep (ING), the Dutch banking and
insurance group, rose yesterday as investors registered relief at news on
Thursday night that the company had abandoned plans to bid for Belgium's
second-largest bank, Banque Bruxelles Lambert (BBL).
The takeover, which would have valued BBL at BFr63.6bn (Dollars 2.0bn), was
regarded by some Dutch analysts as expensive and liable to put pressure on
ING's profits.
However, the collapse of the bid is also a blow to ING's strategy of carving
out asecond home market in Belgium. The bid unravelled after ING lowered its
offer after examining BBL's books.
In September, ING, which already owned 11 per cent of BBL, indicated it
would be willing to pay up to BFr 3,600 a share for the outstanding shares,
provided that it was able to secure a total stake of at least 51 per cent.
It declined to say yesterday what its lower bid would have been.
ING said it and BBL had disagreed on the value of certain assets held by the
Belgian bank, but it would not say what its investigation of BBL's finances
had revealed.
The Dutch group, which intends to hold on to its BBL shares, said it would
continue to try to conclude an agreement with BBL whereby the Belgian bank
would sell insurance policies written by ING, in line with ING's strategy of
combining banking and insurance services.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6358</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / International Company News: Hoechst profits down 19% as
dollar fall cuts turnover
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PARKES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PRE-TAX profits at Hoechst, the German chemicals group, fell 19 per cent in
the first nine months of this year to DM1.54bn (Dollars 960m), compared with
DM1.9bn in 1991 and DM2.5bn in the previous year.
A 'summer recession' set in at the start of the third quarter, continued
into the autumn and there is still no end in sight, Mr Wolfgang Hilger,
chairman, said yesterday.
The results, following a 45 per cent profits fall at BASF, further
highlighted the impact of international and now domestic economic weakness
on Germany's top companies. But the news was not as bad as expected, and
Hoechst shares closed DM1.40 up at DM241.90.
The company's fortunes were saved from a more dramatic plunge by its strong
pharmaceuticals business, which accounts for about half its earnings and is
less prone to violent cyclical swings.
But Hoechst could not escape the effects of exchange rate changes. The
effective devaluation of the US dollar against the D-Mark was responsible
for most of the DM770m fall in third-quarter turnover, Mr Hilger said.
Group sales, down 7 per cent in the three months to end-September, were 2
per cent lower after nine months at DM11.9bn.
Cost-cutting programmes, including job losses 'in three figures' next year,
are under way. One move, announced yesterday - the merger of Hoechst's PVC
activities with those of Wacker-Chemie - could save DM50m a year.
According to Mr Hilger, prospects have been dimmed by falling demand. Orders
on hand at end-October were 15 per cent lower than a year earlier.
Fourth-quarter results would be 'virtually the same' as in the third
quarter.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6359</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / International Company News: Competition eats into NTT
earnings
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHARLES LEADBEATER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO.
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE DOWNTURN in the Japanese economy, combined with intensifying
competition, has forced Nippon Telegraph and Telephone into a 21 per cent
decline in pre-tax profits for the six months to the end of September.
NTT said yesterday its income from dial charges had been slashed to maintain
market share against mounting competition from a range of new entrants into
Japan's liberalised tele-communications market.
Pre-tax profits fell to Y105bn (Dollars 853m) on a 0.5 per cent fall in
sales to Y2,963bn. The company's after-tax profits dropped from Y69bn in the
first half of last year to Y45bn in the first half of this year.
Non-operating income fell by Y6bn to Y32bn. The company was unable to cut
its operating costs, which rose by Y31bn to Y2,751bn.
The turnover of dial telephone services fell by 5.9 per cent to Y1,253bn
partly because NTT had to cut its long distance call charges in response to
cuts by its smaller competitors.
NTT's results were also hurt by the demerger in July of its profitable
mobile telephone company.
Mr Masashi Kojima, NTT's president said the company would respond by cutting
costs and by marketing recently developed network services to domestic
subscribers, such as call forwarding and credit card services.
Mr Kojima said further cuts in NTT's long dist-ance rates were unlikely, but
other charges such as its basic subscription charge would be reviewed in
February.
Turnover of the group's general telephone services fell by Y36bn to
Y2,383bn, largely reflecting lower charges and reduced usage.
Sales of its pocket pager services, widely used by businesses were also
down.
However, other parts of NTT's business, including leased circuits for
private use and directory services, increased their turnover markedly.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6360</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / International Company News: Restructuring raises Ricoh
margin
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHARLES LEADBEATER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A RADICAL restructuring programme at Ricoh, the office equipment maker, was
the main factor behind a threefold increase in its operating profits despite
the slowdown in the Japanese economy.
The sharp improvement in Ricoh's financial performance in the midst of the
downturn is testimony to the effort it has devoted to cutting costs.
Most Japanese manufacturers - burdened by high fixed costs of heavy
investment in the late 1980s and unwilling to cut swiftly into employment
costs - have seen their profits fall sharply as revenues have declined.
But Ricoh's restructuring, one of the most radical yet attempted by a
Japanese company since the economy began to slow, has reduced the ratio of
manufacturing costs to sales by 1.8 per cent. The ratio of selling and
general expenses to sales fell from 25 per cent in the first half of 1991 to
22.7 per cent in the six months to the end of this September.
Most Japanese manufacturers which have announced their interim results
recently have complained they were unable to restrain cost increases.
However, several other manufacturers - such as Fujitsu, Honda and Sony  -
have also announced restructuring plans designed to cut costs and improve
profitability.
Ricoh's operating profits rose to Y3.85bn (Dollars 31.3m) in the six months
to the end of September from Y1.18bn in the first half of last year
But pre-tax profits fell by 37 per cent to Y4.4bn from Y7bn last year,
largely because successive interest rate cuts reduced its interest income by
43 per cent to Y6.5bn.
The company said the yen's appreciation against the dollar had also affected
its profit margins, reducing its pre-tax profits by a further Y1.3bn.
After-tax profits were 56.5 per cent down at Y2.04bn. Turnover was 0.7 per
cent up at Y336bn. A 3.6 per cent increase in sales of copiers was partly
offset by a fall in sales of information and optical equipment, especially
in export markets.
A reorganisation of the overseas sales network helped to expand export sales
of facsimile machines by more than 10 per cent.
Ricoh said it hoped to increase its share of the Japanese copier market
through a new range of digital copiers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6361</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / International Company News: Taking a slice of Hungarian
salami
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS DENTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUDAPEST
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
HUNGARY has launched the privatisation and stock-market flotation of Pick
Szeged in the hope investors will extend their taste for public offerings to
the company's famous spicy salami.
James Capel, the UK brokerage which has advised on and managed the
transaction, announced yesterday that the issue was fully underwritten and
that the international part of the placement was comfortably oversubscribed.
Members of the syndicate for the Hungarian offering, for which subscription
begins on November 27, said initial indications of domestic demand were also
encouraging.
The placing price of Ft1,200 (Dollars 14.45) per share represents a ratio to
prospective 1992 earnings of 7.8, compared with a Hungarian market norm of
11-12, and values the company at Ft2.72bn (Dollars 33m).
The managers of the offering are placing 30-40 per cent of Pick with
institutions in the US, the UK and Germany.
It is matched by an allocation of 10-15 per cent for Hungarian cash
investors and a further 20 per cent to be distributed over time in exchange
for 'compensation coupons'.
The state plans to retain a 5 per cent stake and veto rights over the use of
the Pick trademark. The remaining shares will be distributed among Pick's
two primary creditor banks, local authorities and employees.
The Pick launch marks a revival of privatisation flotations after a drought
of more than a year.
Subscription for Pick shares will be followed three days later by that for
Danubius Hotels, one of Hungary's three large hotel chains.
Brokers say both issues have to overcome the aversion to Hungarian
flotations among investors who were burnt by the collapse in the share price
of Ibusz, the travel agency which was the first Hungarian state company to
go public, in 1990.
James Capel executives say Pick differs because the government is firmly
behind the flotation and has granted a 10 per cent discount to small
investors.
In addition, the lead-managers have carefully prepared the after-market to
prevent a spike in the share price, and Pick is widely regarded as one of
Hungary's most promising companies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6362</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / International Company News: Kyocera slips 30.1% on sluggish
demand
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
KYOCERA, the leading Japanese maker of ceramic packages for integrated
circuits, suffered a 30.1 per cent earnings fall due to sluggish demand and
foreign exchange losses.
Consolidated pre-tax profits for the first half to September fell to Y24bn
(Dollars 195m) from Y34.4bn the previous year. Sales declined 6.9 per cent
to Y215.5bn, while after-tax profits fell 23.9 per cent to Y12bn.
Kyocera's profits were hurt by foreign exchange losses totalling Y1.9bn due
to appreciation of the yen. Sluggish demand from vehicle manufacturers and
office equipment manufacturers also hit sales.
The electronic parts division saw a 1.1 fall in sales to Y79.6bn, while
semiconductor components sales plunged 14.7 per cent to Y47.6bn. Electronic
equipment sales also declined, by 11.1 per cent to Y28.6bn.
On a parent company basis, Kyocera suffered a 16.3 per cent fall in pre-tax
profits to Y18.3bn, while sales fell 9.1 per cent to Y148.1bn.
For the full year to March, Kyocera hopes to boost profits on sales of its
new printer and new mobile telephones.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6363</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / International Company News: Minebea posts its first-ever
loss
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MINEBEA, a leading Japanese machinery maker, posted its first loss since it
was founded in 1951, following heavy losses at its semiconductor subsidiary
NMB Semiconductor.
The world's foremost maker of miniature bearings saw consolidated losses of
Y4.9bn (Dollars 39.8m) on the pre-tax level for the 12 months to September.
After-tax losses mounted to Y13.6bn after special losses. Sales fell 2.4 per
cent to Y276.6bn.
NMB posted losses of Y12.4bn due to heavy competition in the semiconductor
market. Overall special losses surged 146.9 per cent to Y7.2bn. Losses on
inventory liquidation rose 43.1 per cent to Y2.4bn, while those on asset
sales totaled Y1bn.
The company relied on the stock market to boost earnings in the 1980s, but
the stock market slump forced it to book losses on holdings. Losses on
securities sales totalled Y45m, while appraisal losses on securities
holdings increased 73 per cent to Y2.9bn.
On a non-consolidated basis, Minebea reported a sales drop of 3.4 per cent
to Y200.8bn, while pre-tax profits plunged 45.4 per cent to Y8.2bn, and
after-tax profits fell 63.8 per cent to Y2.7bn. Next year, Minebea expects
consolidated pre-tax profits of Y5bn on a 2.2 per cent sales rise.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6364</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / International Company News: Olympus in Y4.2bn patent payment
to Honeywell
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHARLES LEADBEATER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OLYMPUS, the leading Japanese camera maker, yesterday disclosed it had paid
Y4.2bn (Dollars 34.1m) to Honeywell, the US high technology group, to settle
a patent dispute over an automatic focus optical lens for cameras.
The company announced earlier this year it had settled the dispute, one of
several that Honeywell has successfully pursued against Japanese camera
manufacturers over their recently introduced automatic-focus cameras.
The payment was one of the main factors behind Olympus' Y275m after-tax loss
for the six months to the end of September. It made an after-tax profit of
Y3.7bn in the same period last year.
Olympus' pre-tax profits fell by 41.4 per cent for the first half of the
financial year to Y4.2bn, higher than its earlier estimates largely due to
its efforts to cut costs.
Turnover rose by 1.8 per cent to Y94bn, led by higher sales in Japan of a
new camera with a panoramic lens, and medical camera sales.
A cost-cutting drive helped to limit the drop in operating profits to a 1.5
per cent fall to Y6.8bn. A rise in financial costs, related to Olympus' bond
issues to raise additional capital, were the main reason for the fall in
pre-tax profits.
Kenwood, the Japanese audio equipment manufacturer, reported a 41 per cent
fall in interim pre-tax profits to Y1.8bn, on a 4.9 per cent increase in
turnover in the first half of the year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6365</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / International Company News: Hoechst profits down 19% as
dollar fall cuts turnover
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PARKES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PRE-TAX profits at Hoechst, the German chemicals group, fell 19 per cent in
the first nine months of this year to DM1.54bn (Dollars 960m), compared with
DM1.9bn in 1991 and DM2.5bn in the previous year.
A 'summer recession' set in at the start of the third quarter, continued
into the autumn and there is still no end in sight, Mr Wolfgang Hilger,
chairman, said yesterday.
The results, following news of a 45 per cent profits fall at BASF, further
highlighted the impact of international and now domestic economic weakness
on Germany's leading companies.
Hoechst shares gained on the news, which was not as bad as expected, and
closed in Frankfurt DM1.40 higher at DM241.90.
The company's fortunes were saved from a more dramatic plunge by its strong
pharmaceuticals business, which accounts for about half its earnings and is
less prone to violent cyclical swings. With 75 per cent of sales overseas,
the group was also less affected than BASF by the sudden downturn in the
domestic market in the third quarter.
Even so, Hoechst could not escape the effects of exchange rate changes. The
effective devaluation of the US dollar against the D-Mark was responsible
for the lion's share of the DM770m turnover fall in the third quarter, Mr
Hilger said.
Group sales, down 7 per cent in the three months to end-September, were 2
per cent lower after nine months at DM11.9bn.
Cost-cutting programmes, including plans for job losses 'in three figures'
next year, are under way. One important move, announced yesterday - the
merger of Hoechst's PVC activities with those of Wacker-Chemie - could save
DM50m a year, Mr Hilger claimed.
Hoechst, which owns 50 per cent of Wacker, has suffered badly from worldwide
depression in the PVC business. But Mr Hilger believed the deal, which would
create a company with a 10 per cent share of west European capacity, would
help improve competitiveness.
According to Mr Hilger, prospects have been dimmed by falling demand. Orders
on hand at the end of October were 15 per cent lower than a year earlier, he
said. Results for the last three months of the year would be 'virtually the
same' as in the third quarter.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6366</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / World Commodities Prices: Spices
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A softer trend has emerged in the pepper makret, reports Man-producten. A
general lack of fresh buying interest in most consuming markets created more
selling presure in most origins, resulting in declining prices of both black
and white pepper.  But when demand picks up prices will harden again.  White
pepper is available at Dollars 1.525 a tonne on the spot and at Dollars
1.475 cif for prompt shipment.  Black pepper stocks remain tight.  Hence the
premium price for ready goods at Dollars 1.400 to Dollars 1.450 ex-warehouse
whereas Dollar 1.250 to Dollars 1.300 cif is quoted for prompt shipment.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6367</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Economic Diary
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
TODAY: Group of Fifteen summit meeting in Dakar. Discussions centred on
environment and development issues.
TOMORROW: Elections in Peru for an assembly to rewrite the constitution.
MONDAY: Engineering sales and orders at current and constant prices
(September). Balance of payments current account and overseas trade figures
(October). European Community finance ministers meet in Brussels.
Provisional agenda includes relations with the Commonwealth of Independent
States (CIS) and eastern Europe. European Fisheries ministers meet in
Brussels. House of Commons debates the sale of arms to Iraq. Mr Suleyman
Demirel, Turkish prime minister, visits London for talks on bilateral ties
and international issues.
TUESDAY: US durable goods (October). European Community industrial affairs
council meets in Brussels. United States hands back final military base to
the Philippines. Strike threatened on the London Underground. Institute of
Directors annual dinner.
WEDNESDAY: New construction orders (September-provisional). US real GDP
(preliminary release - third quarter), import/export prices (October).
Ireland holds general election and referendum on lifting blanket ban on
abortion. Partial privatisation of Portuguese reinsurance company COSEC.
THURSDAY: Energy trends (September). New vehicle registrations (October).
Financial Times holds conference 'Financial Reporting in the UK' in London.
FRIDAY: Inland Revenue statistics 1992. Confederation of British Industry
monthly trends enquiry (November). US jobless claims; personal income
(October). European Community foreign and finance ministers hold joint
'conclave' to prepare for European Council meeting.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6368</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / International Company News: Improvement in North America
props Electrolux
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER BROWN-HUMES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ELECTROLUX, the Swedish white goods manufacturer, said profits after
financial items fell to SKr736m (Dollars 112.7m) in the first nine months
from SKr890m in the same period a year ago.
The result would have been 4 per cent higher if the 1991 figure had not been
inflated by SKr184m in capital gains.
Rationalisation and an upswing in North America has helped the group offset
the impact of weak demand in key European markets.
Sales for the nine months fell to SKr58.9bn from SKr59.8bn. Operating income
after depreciation dropped to SKr1.89bn from SKr2.12bn, which the group
blamed on the weaker performance of its commercial appliance and industrial
product operations.
In the third quarter, the group recorded a SKr22m loss, SKr5m less than in
the same 1991 three months.
The period saw intensified competition and reduced sales in Europe,
particularly in the Nordic countries. In Germany demand for white goods
remained strong, but it declined in other product areas.
On prospects, the group commented: 'High interest rates, restrained
investment and consumption, and general uncertainty about the future will
involve a continued weakening of the market situation in Europe.
'However,a continued but slow improvement in business conditions is expected
in North America.'
The group noted that changes in European currency rates would improve its
long-term competitive position.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6369</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / International Company News: Ice-cream ambitions take a
licking - The rapid rise and fall of Clarke Foods and its colourful founder
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HENRY CLARKE landed in Britain three years ago with a mission. The colourful
American, with a flair for promotion, legendary in the ice-cream industry,
aimed to teach Britons the delights of quality mass market ice-cream.
A firm fan of maple walnut, Mr Clarke was horrified to discover most Britons
using ice cream as a mere moistener for apple pie.
Yet it was precisely his aim to upgrade British eating habits during a
recession, and the manner in which he set out to achieve it, which many cite
as a substantial reason for the demise of his company, Clarke Foods.
Nestle, the Swiss-owned foods giant, earlier this week was able to snap up
the assets and business of what had become, in just 20 months, Britain's
second largest ice-cream manufacturer.
The problems behind Clarke's demise appear to have been manifold.
They include personality clashes with Mr Clarke, whose impish face and cosy
Henry Fonda voice mask an iron will, and inflexible financing arrangements.
Finally, sheer bad luck dogged the company through its most crucial summer.
Mr Clarke was known to be a shrewd dealmaker in the US, where he built up
two companies covering nursing homes, guns and the inevitable ice cream over
some 20 years.
When he was ousted from the second, he packed up his family and came to the
UK to start again. Here, he and his three sons, Robert, David and Michael,
set about building up Clarke Foods from a series of disparate loss-making
and largely ignored companies.
Even the most critical industry observers give Mr Clarke credit for making
tight deals. For example, in 1991 he swapped a 16.75 per cent stake in his
company, Yelverton Investments - then an untried investment vehicle - for
Hillsdown Holdings' ice cream businesses, including the Hortons and Fiesta
brands.
'He was virtually given the assets,' said one industry analyst.
When he bought Lyons Maid for Pounds 12m, one of Britain's best known
ice-cream's names, Mr Clarke got a discount to offset redundancy payments
planned for later in the year.
Yet it was with the Lyons Maid purchase that Mr Clarke's dreams began to
melt. Arguments over the use of the Lyons name delayed the deal by five
months until February 1992. The delay eventually played a key part in the
company's final difficulties, when problems with the installation of
equipment dragged on into the crucial summer months.
Few disputed that Lyons Maid was a golden opportunity. However, many doubted
whether the small family-run company could meet the Herculean task thrust
upon it. It had to focus on maintaining the successful turnround of the
Hillsdown businesses while reviving the long-ignored Lyons Maid brand name.
To add to the task, Mr Clarke had his own private agenda. The man credited
with transforming a chocolate covered vanilla square into America's
best-selling novelty ice-cream, the Klondike bar, he planned to repeat that
success in the UK. The launch of the Clarke bar and a take-home premium
ice-cream brand under the Clarke's flag, was added to the timetable.
Finally, a mammoth capital investment programme was begun to install
high-tech manufacturing equipment.
'He was trying to fight on five fronts with inadequate financing and
marginal resourcing,' said Mr Michael Landymore of the company's former
brokers, Henderson Crosthwaite. 'Basically, he wanted to be in Berlin before
landing the tanks at Omaha Beach.'
The fifth front was the longest recession in Britain since the 1930s. 'He
was also trying to launch a premium brand at a time when the consumer was
trading down,' another analyst said. 'Everything had to go well for him to
achieve his targets.'
Unfortunately it did not. The installation of the equipment was plagued by
setbacks. Instead of churning out ice cream in February as planned, the
factories were not fully operational until the middle of July. By that time,
Britain was being drenched by record rain levels.
August, normally one of the best months for ice-cream sales, was the wettest
in 53 years.
Mr Clarke, who has a home in Florida, then appeared to make a crucial
mistake. He believed that the rain in Britain could not continue for ever.
Factories worked round the clock to produce record amounts of ice-cream
which never left the freezers.
Insiders claim Mr Clarke refused to heed warnings. 'He grew increasingly
autocratic,' said one. 'He would not listen to advice, nor to his own
management team.'
Mr Clarke insisted on carrying out a Pounds 6m advertising campaign over the
summer. This included Pounds 1m on the Clarke's premium brand, featuring
photographs of himself and his three sons, when the product was not getting
to the shops.
Industry observers said that at the very least, the Clarke brand should have
been shelved. The premium sector is minute in the context of the overall
Pounds 750m UK ice-cream market and highly competitive.
Mr Clarke's sons, however, are proud of the work completed in the rainy days
of July and August. American through and through, their fondness for unions
is less than warm. However, they cite the super human efforts of the
unionised Liverpool factory to save the company.
The decision to build stocks was justified, they said, because Clarke was
under pressure to deliver to retailers who had been let down by the long
delays and sporadic service in the early summer. And they point to the
successful relaunch of Lyons Maid, when accused of ignoring the impulse
brands.
Yet without the proper financing the outcome became increasingly inevitable.
The company funded its working capital with a restrictive invoice
discounting facility which provided cash only after sales had been achieved.
The drop in demand due to production problems and the wet weather meant
Clarke had only used Pounds 2.5m of this Pounds 8m facility by the time
National Westminster called in the receivers in October. The bank's total
exposure to Clarke was less than Pounds 6m, including a Pounds 3m loan which
industry observers suggested was secured against a disproportionate amount
of collateral. The company's total debts came to about Pounds 25m.
Approaches in August to convert the facility into an overdraft had been
rebuffed after six weeks of negotiation. NatWest has been criticised for
taking so long at a crucial period and opting for receivership, which meant
an asset sale, rather than administration which could have protected
shareholders.
However, the bank says it acted on the advice of professionals. 'Clarke's
faced acute liquidity problems,' it said. 'The scale of their additional
needs was very large.'
Part of the problem seemed to many to be that Clarke owed too little to the
bank. 'If it had owed Pounds 50m, it certainly would have been put into
administration,' said one company insider.
But Mr Clarke himself sees a more basic flaw contributing to his company's
collapse: The simple question of equity. 'You can't slug it out with
Unilever with only Pounds 17m of net worth,' he says. We probably needed to
raise another Pounds 8m, but it would have been better for Pounds 15m.'
At the end of the day, Mr Clarke has no regrets. He has a different
interpretation of what many will see as his failure.
'Yes, I could be criticised for trying to do too much,' he said, 'but we
took companies that were an absolute collection of nothing . . . and turned
them round.'
If Mr Clarke is certain of anything, it is that ice-cream will continue to
play a part in his life and that of his family. 'We are not leaving the
ice-cream business,' he said. And just in case you wondered, he plans to
stay in the UK as well.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6370</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Caird shares hit by warning
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES in Caird Group almost halved to 17p after the waste management
companyitny issued a warning about profits and said it would not pay a final
dividend.
Mr John Ashton, chairman, said the City had been expecting pre-tax profits
for the year to be above Pounds 6.9m but that Caird would only make Pounds
4.5m.
The group would still pay the interim and preference dividends and would
look at the ordinary payments again next year.
Mr Ashton said the decline in profits was due to new sites coming onstream
more slowly than expected and falls in the price of landfill of up to 50 per
cent in certain areas.
The slide in the ordinary shares from 33p was accompanied by a 15p fall to
51p in the 7 per cent convertible preference shares.
'We have a highly geared effect,' said Mr Ashton. 'The preference shares are
taking the first Pounds 2.5m of post-tax earnings which is not helping
earnings per share and the ordinary shares.'
'We are going to have to batten down and run the business for cash,' he
said.
Yesterday's profits warning is the latest in a long line of surprises that
Caird has sprung on the City since Mr Peter Linacre, chief executive and a
former stockbroker, began transforming the sleepy property company in 1987.
In October 1989, it raised Pounds 34.5m in the form of convertible
preference shares. While the proceeds enhanced earnings per share by
repaying debt that was costing 16 per cent, these shares have become an
increasing burden now that profits growth has run into a wall.
A year after the rights issue Caird's market value fell 44 per cent as Caird
reported pre-tax profits of Pounds 5.4m, some Pounds 3m lower than
previously expected for the year to June 1990.
Three weeks later Severn Trent, the then recently privatised water company,
launched a Pounds 78m bid for Caird.
Mr Linacre escaped Severn Trent's clutches by deploying the unusual defence
of refusing to confirm a profits forecast made before the bid. Severn Trent
lapsed its bid.
Mr Ashton said Caird's current problems stemmed partly from changes in the
waste disposal site licensing laws which come into effect next April as part
of the 1990 Environment Protection Act.
Before March 31, operators of landfill sites are free to relinquish their
licences and avoid environmental liabilities that should subsequently
emerge. According to Mr Ashton, less scrupulous operators 'are filling their
sites like mad and undermining the price structure'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6371</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAB9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Debt level leaves Evode unstuck - The
reasons behind Wassall's hostile offer
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OVER the next few weeks Mr Christopher Miller, chief executive at Wassall
said he would repeatedly ask Evode how it planned to finance itself if it
remains independent.
Wassall, the mini-conglomerate run by former Hanson executives who have
launched a Pounds 94.3m hostile bid for Evode, is likely to highlight the
chemical and plastics group rise in net debt when it publishes its offer
document, expected early next week.
According to the conglomerate's financial adviser the document is likely to
underline Evode's net indebtedness which is estimated to be about Pounds
62m, including the Dollars 43m (Pounds 28m) in US redeemable preference
shares.
Mr Andrew Simon, chairman of Evode, has said its borrowing facilities were
sufficient for its needs. The group's financial adviser said it would not
comment further until it sees Wassall's offer document.
However, the weakness of Evode's balance sheet, stretched by borrowings to
fuel acquisitions, was one of the reasons that Wassall launched its Pounds
94.3m hostile bid.
Wassall is one of the few companies content to be labelled as a conglomerate
and Mr Miller was loath to justify a purchase on the grounds of product
synergy.
Wassall was no stranger to a number of Evode's businesses, such as
adhesives, sealants and plastics. DAP, a US supplier of construction
products and filling compounds, bought by Wassall last year, boasts similar
products.
But the fact that Mr Miller knew something about adhesives was not the
reason for the bid.
Wassall wanted it for the same reasons that it bought into office furniture,
luggage, bottle-tops and construction products and filling compounds. It
believed it had found a low-tech manufacturing business, which was
under-managed with low margins.
Evode's margins were around 5 per cent, similar to the those Wassall
inherited at DAP and Metal Closures Group. It managed to almost double them
at both businesses.
Mr Mark Cusack, conglomerate analyst at Barclays de Zoete Wedd, believed
Evode was a classic vulnerable target. It was under-performing in much the
same way as Wassall's previous targets.
'In spite of good underlying businesses Evode is underperforming in
operational terms, he said. 'It is financially overstretched with effective
gearing of 200 per cent and little shareholder loyalty, having cut last
year's dividend by more than 40 per cent.'
Mr Miller did not pretend to be an expert in plastics any more than he
pretended to know much about bottle-tops when Wassall launched its
successful hostile bid for Metal Closures in 1990. 'What I do know about is
strategy,' he said.
Plant closures, cutting the workforce and a reduction in product ranges have
been some of the tools used by Wassall to boost margins.
However, Mr Miller is adamant that Wassall wants control of Evode not just
to streamline the production process but to expand the businesses.
Wassall has earmarked Dollars 20m of capital expenditure over the next two
years to replace old machinery, open a new warehouse and expand DAP's DIY
sheds.
Evode's capital expenditure was running at Pounds 1.8m for the half year to
March 28 compared with Pounds 9.4m for the end of its last financial year.
Mr Miller says he would expect to reverse that trend if Wassall wins its
takeover battle.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6372</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAB7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Waterglade plans for reorganisation
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
After a disappointing year for the property group Waterglade International,
which saw pre-tax losses more than triple to Pounds 18.5m, the new board is
well advanced with reorganisation.
Mr David Cunningham, the new chairman, said the plans were aimed at
maximising revenue and reducing costs and borrowings. Given the substantial
erosion of assets - from Pounds 25m to Pounds 3.35m over the year - the next
stage 'must include some form of capital reorganisation'.
In the year ended March 31 1992 turnover rose from Pounds 9.64m to Pounds
24.6m, reflecting disposals. But there was a trading loss of Pounds 1.51m
(profit Pounds 3.43m) offset by rents received maintained at Pounds 1.7m.
Net interest paid surged to Pounds 5.24m (Pounds 2.98m).
On top of that, exceptional charges totalled Pounds 13.26m (Pounds 8.35m)
including Pounds 12.85m (Pounds 6.66m) provisions against developments to
account for declining market values.
Losses per share in the year were 84.5p (25.8p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6373</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAB6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / UK Company News: TR Property cuts interim dividend
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Hit by a severely weak UK property market, TR Property Investment Trust
reported an 18 per cent fall in net asset value per share to 25.34p at
September 30, against 30.7p six months earlier.
In the light of the difficult conditions, the interim dividend has been
reduced by 33 per cent to 0.4p (0.6p) despite increased earnings per share
of 0.5p, against 0.39p last time.
Mr Paul Hyde-Thomson, chairman, said the dividend decision reflected the
board's continuing strategy of readying the trust to move swiftly on
opportunities once the property market allowed.
Pre-interest profits rose 48 per cent to Pounds 3.64m (Pounds 2.46m) mainly
due to to the increase in rental flow that offset an expected fall in
franked and unfranked dividend income. Pre-tax profits rose 43 per cent to
Pounds 2.2m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6374</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAB5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Gartmore European net assets improve
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Gartmore European Investment Trust raised net asset value to 99.4p per share
at the end of September 1992, against 94.7p a year earlier,
After-tax revenue fell to Pounds 165,000, against Pounds 384,000 for the
previous 15 months, and earnings per share worked through at 0.97p (2.25p).
The single final dividend is 1.1p (1.6p for 15 months including special
0.5p).
The trust reminded shareholders that its prime objective was to achieve
capital growth over the longer term. Dividend income was therefore of
secondary importance and it might not be possible in future to pursue a
consistent dividend policy.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6375</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAB3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Benchmark losses doubled at Pounds 9.5m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Benchmark Group, the financial services group, reported pre-tax losses
doubled at Pounds 9.5m, against Pounds 4.93m, in the year to June 30.
The loss is made up of trading losses of Pounds 2.17m (Pounds 117,000
profit), provisions against development properties of Pounds 3.91m (Pounds
4.21m), provisions against investments of Pounds 1.7m (Pounds 840,000) and
provision in respect of leased premises Pounds 1.7m.
After an unchanged extraordinary charge of Pounds 2.71m, relating to
provisions on the sale of Benchmark Bank, the loss for the year came out at
Pounds 12.4m (Pounds 7.63m). As a result net assets are less than half the
called-up share capital.
The company said that various options for the future had been examined and
it was decided that it should become a property investment group.
Discussions were being held to bring in the necessary expertise.
Turnover was Pounds 16.7m (Pounds 18.8m). Losses per share were 6.04p
(8.42p) after taking into account last year's rights issue.
Hong Leung Group has a stake of 48 per cent while Guocco Group holds a
further 14.99 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6376</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAB2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Losses of Pounds 854,000 for Ferromet
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Ferromet Group, the USM-quoted metals trader whose 1991 accounts were
heavily qualified by its auditor, Touche Ross, has fallen from pre-tax
profits of Pounds 414,000 to losses of Pounds 854,000 in the six months to
June 30.
It has also appointed Mr Phil Edmonds, the former England Test cricketer, as
chief executive. He has committed Pounds 100,000 to the company in a loan
note, which may be convertible to ordinary shares at a maximum price of 1p.
The group has contracted sharply. In the corresponding six months turnover
was Pounds 46.4m: this time turnover fell to Pounds 6.46m, with continuing
activities - Portsmouth Metals, the Bermuda-based metals trader, and Clogau
(Nevada), a gold mine - contributing only Pounds 820,000. Pre-tax losses for
these businesses were Pounds 241,000.
Losses per share including discontinued activities came to 0.42p (0.12p
excluding discontinued activities) against earnings of 0.14p last time.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6377</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAB1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / UK Company News: A Fisher pays Pounds 0.85m to ex-chief
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BOLGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ALBERT FISHER, the food processing and distribution group, has paid Pounds
852,000 in compensation to Mr Tony Millar, who stepped down in July as
executive chairman of the company he built into one of the stockmarket stars
of the 1980s, writes Andrew Bolger.
Mr Millar, who resigned following pressure from non-executive directors, was
on a four year contract and a salary of Pounds 252,000 in the year to August
31.
His departure came after a plunge in the share price and a profits warning,
as concern mounted about the acquisitive Mr Millar's ability to manage at a
time of faltering growth and a glut of fresh produce in Europe and North
America.
Last month the group reported a drop in annual pre-tax profits from Pounds
89m to Pounds 52.1m on flat sales of Pounds 1.18bn. The share price, which
fell from 82p in May to a low of 31p in August, yesterday rose 4p to 57p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6378</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAB0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Gardiner accounts 'overstated' by Pounds
4.8m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JANE FULLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE SHARE price of Gardiner Group, the UK-based distributor of security and
surveillance products, plummeted from 15 1/2 p to 8 1/2 p yesterday after
the company announced there had been a Pounds 4.8m overstatement in the 1991
accounts.
Gardiner's directors said they believed 'the mis-statement resulted from the
deliberate falsification of the company's records'.
Mr Harvey Samson, who took over as finance director in June, said profits
had been overstated up to October 1991, but it was not known how far back
the problem went. He replaced Mr Ian Nellist, who resigned in January.
Gardiner's shares have fallen from 69p in September last year. The 1990-91
pre-tax profit figure of Pounds 6.03m was significantly below City
expectations.
Mr Samson said the mis-stated figures mainly related to stocks of burglar
alarms. The two subsidiaries acquired last year - Multi-Video Distributors
and AW Alarm System - were not involved. A Pounds 10.6m rights issue, at 52p
a share, accompanied those purchases.
The problem was picked up internally after the October 31 year-end
stock-taking. Ernst &amp; Young, the group's auditors, had helped quantify the
amount involved. Outside accountants would be asked to mount a full
investigation.
After a tax rebate, the amount knocked off the October 31 1991 net assets
figure would be Pounds 3.5m, leaving a total of Pounds 16.2m. Figures for
that year's stocks, creditors and profit and loss account would also be
restated, said Mr Samson.
There was no material effect on profits earned since October 1991, which
were 'believed to be in line with the board's expectations'. The tax rebate
would benefit cash flow.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6379</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / UK Company News: BET poised for 44% downturn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BET is likely to report interim profits down 44 per cent at Pounds 40m when
it reports on Monday, as the business services group continues to suffer
from the lack of turnround in the economy.
The pre-tax profits fall from Pounds 71.5m in the corresponding period last
year is likely to include about Pounds 14m of exceptional provisions to
cover an increase in the number of disposals.
The City is expecting the full year dividend to be maintained after last
year's cut.
However in order for BET to maintain its practice of paying two thirds of
the dividend at the full year, the interim dividend is likely to be halved.
City observers are most interested in the progress of a disposal programme
that Mr John Clark, chief executive, has flagged as a prerequisite for a
return to a growth path.
Most of the companies likely to be sold are low-margin businesses like plant
hire and office cleaning.
One analyst said that BET had been hoping for an upturn in the economy which
had not materialised.
'Not only was the volume not there, but price competition has gone from bad
to worse,' he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6380</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / UK Company News: National Grid shares will not be floated
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE 12 regional electricity companies (RECs), which own the National Grid,
yesterday decided against selling shares in the company.
National Grid Holdings, which is made up of representatives from the 12,
said in a brief statement that after extensive board discussion it had
decided listing the shares would be inappropriate.
A flotation had been under consideration for several months. Some of the
RECs had been pressing strongly for it, though the uncertainty surrounding
the industry during the pit closures review had made an immediate move
unlikely.
Many shareholders will nonetheless be disappointed. Mr Chris Rowland,
electricity analyst for Barclays de Zoete Wedd, said he would be very
disappointed if a listing had been ruled out on principle.
The RECs would be passing up the opportunity to add value of about 80p per
share, he said. As a result some shareholders would sell their holdings
earlier than they would otherwise have done, he maintained.
The 12 companies each control between 5.5 and 12.5 per cent of the National
Grid Company's shares. Supporters of a flotation say it would release funds
for distribution to shareholders.
Opponents say it would antagonise politicians and the electricity industry
regulator.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6381</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / UK Company News: NHL losses hit Pounds 146m but decrease
predicted
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GAPPER, Banking Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NATIONAL HOME Loans, the centralised mortgage lender whose debt was
restructured this year after it came close to collapse, yesterday declared
increased pre-tax losses for the year to September 30 of Pounds 146.4m,
against Pounds 47.9m.
'We are still alive,' said Mr Jonathan Perry, the group's executive chairman
who took over in February. He predicted a 'significantly reduced loss' for
the current year and a future return to profitability.
The group made provisions to cover loan losses of Pounds 138.5m (Pounds
88.7m). It has been trying to restore earnings by improving payments on
mortgages, and has cut the number of accounts in arrears by three months or
more to 6,130 (7,564).
Net assets at the year end were cut to Pounds 11.2m (Pounds 157.5m). NHL
received Pounds 219.5m (Pounds 335.8m) in interest payments while paying
Pounds 209.1m (Pounds 288.5m) interest on borrowings.
Losses per ordinary share were 141.9p (50.2p). Shares yesterday fell 20 per
cent in value from 3 3/4 p to 3p, and were trading on a wide spread.
The results, and the elimination of distributable reserves, led to it making
no dividend payment on ordinary shares, and passing payment on convertible
preference shares.
In a lengthy chairman's statement, Mr Perry said 36.9 per cent of group
losses were attributable to the National Mortgage Bank (NMB) subsidiary. The
bank is running down its business, and will not require further investment.
The group holds loan notes of Pounds 283.7m (Pounds 326m), and bank loans
and other borrowings of Pounds 1.085bn (Pounds 1.54bn). Mr Perry said the
task of restoring value to shareholders was 'a significant challenge'.
He said the group continued to derive considerable income from Pounds 2.2bn
of mortgage assets held by securitised vehicle companies, most of which were
off balance sheet. These were 'a key component' of future income and value.
The gross mortgage assets under management on September 30 - excluding NMB -
fell to Pounds 2.62bn compared to Pounds 3.1bn a year earlier. The cut
mainly resulted from redemptions of mortgages and sales of repossessed
properties.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6382</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Harland core division subject of buy-out
bid from ex-chief
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS FOSTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR ROY ASHMAN, former chairman of Harland Simon, the controls company placed
in receivership by its banks last month, is negotiating a management buy-out
of a remaining Harland core division.
Mr Ashman, who resigned in February, has joined with two former executive
directors and a leading venture capital company to bid for the control
systems division.
The bid is being considered by Touche Ross, administrative receivers, and a
decision is expected next week.
Mr Ashman's return would be highly controversial. He is widely blamed by
Harland's institutional shareholders for the company's collapse.
Mr Ashman resigned following Harland's issue of a profits warning only days
after he had assured institutions trading was sound. Harland had been
expected to make profits of about Pounds 12.5m in the year to 31 March. It
later announced pre-tax losses of Pounds 6.3m.
Harland went into receivership seven months after Mr Ashman's departure. He
was paid Pounds 360,000 for loss of office and a further Pounds 960,000 from
Harland's small pension fund.
The company's downfall was largely due to a loss of confidence among its
bankers and customers because of two ventures for which Mr Ashman was
blamed. These were Perfect Information, a loss-making database service, and
Contraves, acquired with substantial liabilities last year.
Several institutional shareholders expressed concern about Mr Ashman's
attempt to buy back part of the company. 'It would be outrageous for someone
largely responsible for the collapse in shareholder value to buy back assets
on the cheap,' one said.
Harland's shares stood at 585p before the profits warning, but collapsed to
20p before suspension on the Stock Exchange in September, after Barclays,
Harland's main banker, cut the company's working capital facilities.
Touche Ross announced yesterday that Harland Crosfield, the Harland
subsidiary involved in printing controls, has been sold to Dobson Park
Industries for Pounds 2.3m. Crosfield's UK and overseas businesses had
unaudited net assets of Pounds 5.4m and profits in the year to March 31 of
Pounds 400,000 on turnover of Pounds 10.8m.
Other than the control systems division, only certain small subsidiaries -
including Contraves - remain unsold.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6383</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Sugar says offer is 'best shareholders will
get'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHIYO NAKAMOTO and PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INSTITUTIONAL investors in Amstrad said yesterday they were still studying
Mr Sugar's offer to buy back their shares at 30p per share, but several said
they were unlikely to join disgruntled private shareholders who are opposing
the deal.
Meanwhile Mr Sugar vigorously defended his 30p-a-share buy-back offer saying
that it was 'the best shareholders would get.'
A group of private shareholders who are unhappy with Mr Sugar's offer has
appealed for institutional investors' support in attempting to block the
offer.
The general view among institutional investors, however, is that although
the offer by Mr Sugar was not necessarily an attractive one, few
alternatives exist and those that do, involve considerable risk that they
are unwilling to take.
One institutional investor summed up the view in saying that 'we don't like
30p but it is not at all clear to us that we can do any better.'
The consumer electronics business was not an area most of them felt they
could judge with confidence. 'If we had confidence in the business we'd do
something about it. But you've little choice as a minority shareholder in a
business you know little about,' one institutional investor said.
'If the gap between the offer and what you thought the company was worth
were large enough it may be worth trying to get more out of it,' but in
Amstrad's case the risks of doing so were probably not worth it, he said.
'Our position is one of resigned acceptance,' said another institutional
investor.
However, some institutional investors said that they were still considering
the alternatives in the light of the changing scenario.
Mr Sugar said yesterday that he felt 'very frustrated' that some
shareholders and commentators had criticised the offer and emphasised 'no
one is trying to pull the wool over anyone's eyes.'
He drew attention to the fact that if his bid succeeds he has promised to
use 'up to Pounds 50m' of his own assets to provide collateral for the
working capital a slimmed down Amstrad will need. On his bid he said 'I have
offered 30p, and if it is turned down, I feel that I have morally done my
job.' He pointed out that since he first mooted his buy-back proposal 'no
one has come along with a better offer.'
'I cannot find anybody to buy my shares because everyone says Amstrad is
Alan Sugar,' he said. But if someone offered 31p per share he said he would
sell his 205m shares, provided the offer was made to all shareholders.
He rejected suggestions that Amstrad should pay out its balance sheet cash
in the form of a special dividend. He said Amstrad's 'core' cash, excluding
seasonal fluctuations, was about Pounds 60m, equivalent to just 7.7p a share
after Advanced Corporation Tax is paid.
He warned that if his bid is not approved it would still be necessary to
drastically 'shrink' the company, and he said he was the best person to
undertake the task.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6384</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Letter: Touchable and untouchable
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From PARVIZ DABIR-ALAI
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Tony Jackson finds it 'increasingly difficult to unscramble' the output
of services from those of manufacturing ('The incredible shrinking
industrial base', November 16). I offer him a simple rule: if you can touch
it then it is almost certainly manufactured; if you cannot, it is a service.
This works with all of his examples: financial services provided by General
Motors and by the City of London, GM's cars, the City of London's need for
computers etc. On the more substantive point that services cannot replace
manufacturing, well, that argument is untouchable.
Parviz Dabir-Alai,
department of business
and economics,
Richmond College,
Queens Road,
Richmond, Surrey TW10 6JP
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6385</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Letter: Regulation of share options
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Ms CAROL ARROWSMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, The tenor of Michael Cranna and John Samuels' article on executive
share options ('Omissions on options', November 18) paints a lurid picture
of an unregulated area, populated by rapacious executives and inattentive
investors. The reality is different.
For example, equity dilution under share schemes is strictly limited by
institutional shareholders' guidelines which have been in place. Discounted
options are also already regulated by institutional guidelines which impose
demanding performance conditions on their exercise and limit the number of
discounted options an individual can receive. Finally, the practice of
replacing voluntarily lapsed options with new options is subject to detailed
regulation by shareholders, and in fact is a fairly rare occurrence.
It is certainly true that the disclosure of share option details in most
companies' annual reports is insufficient to calculate individual directors'
remuneration, and that there is room for debate on the nature of the
executive option benefit. But it is important the debate takes place in an
informed atmosphere, and focuses on the practice of the vast majority of
companies, rather than the small minority where misuse takes place.
Carol Arrowsmith,
managing director,
New Bridge Street Consultants,
2 Tallis Street,
London EC4Y 0BJ
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6386</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / The wealth cascade runs dry: Britain's inheritors may
receive bills rather than property
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS and PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
When Mr Nigel (now Lord) Lawson was chancellor he had a vision of a nation
of inheritors. 'Inheritance, which used to be the preserve of the few, will
become a fact of life for the many,' he said in 1988. But that prospect is
fading in the recessionary climate of the early 1990s, as the value of
estates falls and more resources are devoted to caring for Britain's ageing
population.
The idea was beguilingly simple. The owner-occupiers of the post-war
generation would gradually die out. They would pass on, via their estates,
the wealth built up in their houses. For their children, this would
represent additional resources, since most would already own their own
homes.
The result would be the revival of the rentier class, living off the income
from its investments, just like P G Wodehouse's hero, Bertie Wooster. John
Major was impressed by the notion, telling last year's Conservative party
conference that he wanted to see 'wealth cascading down the generations'.
Whether this was consistent with his vision of a 'classless society' is
debatable. Sir Peregrine Worsthorne, the Sunday Telegraph columnist was
explicit about the prospects in an editorial in 1988. He wrote: 'Hundreds of
thousands of middle-class families are going to be able to leave their
children loads of money, if only in the form of one (or in many cases two)
houses . . . The tide of egalitarianism, which has been sweeping all before
it for 100 years, is about to be decisively reversed.'
How strong was the evidence for such hopes? Total wealth passed directly
from one generation to another in 1990-91 was Pounds 8.1bn, according to
Mintel, the market research company, a figure projected to rise to Pounds
13bn by 2000.
According to Mintel, 20 per cent of Britons inherit money between their
mid-40s and 50s, and 9 per cent are left a house or flat. An NOP survey
shows that 67 per cent of all property inheritors are aged 40 or over, when
most will have a house and may be well on the way to repaying their
mortgages.
This inheritance is highly concentrated. The average value of inheritances
between 1985 and 1989 was Pounds 29,730, according to the Joseph Rowntree
Foundation, the social research organisation. But this average was boosted
by a few large estates; the median figure was just Pounds 10,000.
The value of inheritances in heirs' pockets was raised by 13 years of
Conservative government which looked kindly on inherited wealth.
Inheritances have never been taxed more leniently. No inheritance tax is
payable at all on estates of less than Pounds 150,000, while a competent
accountant can exploit loopholes to avoid paying any tax on estates much
larger than this. One accountant even described inheritance taxes
'voluntary'.
Whether the idea of an 'inheritance dividend' for the middle-aged middle
classes ever filtered into the public consciousness is uncertain. Perhaps
the notion contributed to the general feeling of prosperity, and thus the
rapid increase in consumer spending, of the late 1980s.
But the theory that Britain was heading towards a society of inheritors is
now being questioned, and its premises may never have been watertight: It
was never likely that Britons, as a whole, could become more wealthy simply
by buying and selling each other's houses.
One of the planks on which the theory rested, the rapidly increasing values
of domestic properties during the 1980s, appears to have rotted away. The UK
is suffering its fourth successive year of falling real house prices -
reducing the value of estates.
Demographic change has cancelled out even more of the potential benefit for
the current middle-aged generation. Indeed, the mass of elderly could soon
be a burden on their children, not a benefit to them. And that would turn
the 'inheritance society' theory on its head.
According to some actuarial estimates, the number of people aged over 75
could rise from 3.9m in 1991 to between 5.1m and 9.2m by 2031. This has
significant implications for the UK economy, as a smaller workforce
struggles to support a greater dependent population.
When people live longer, they tend to need long-term care. And that costs
money. According to Mr Dryden Gilling-Smith, managing director of Employee
Benefit Services, the needs of the 'old old' (those aged over 85) tend to be
labour-intensive, as they become less and less independent.
Mr William Laing, of consultancy Laing &amp; Buisson, believes that the burden
on the nation will increase rapidly. In the next 10 years, he forecasts that
the total cost of financing long-term care in the UK will rise by 17 per
cent in real terms from the current annual level of Pounds 9bn.
By the year 2050, when long-term care spending should peak as the children
of baby-boomers reach their old age, he predicts the real cost of long-term
care will be 70 per cent greater than it is today. In other words,
expenditure on care for the elderly will rise from 2 per cent of gross
domestic product today to about 4 per cent in the next half century.
Britain's tax and benefit system does nothing to protect estates from these
high costs. Income support is only available to pay for long-term care when
an individual's total assets are less than Pounds 8,000. So there is
effectively no state help for those who still own their houses (although
certain exemptions exist where there are resident carers or relatives).
Research by the Family Policy Studies Centre suggests that the costs of care
could even wipe out the value of some inheritances. The sum raised by
selling an average house, which the FPSC puts at about Pounds 66,000, would
not be sufficient to pay for more than five years in a nursing home, or for
more than eight years in private residential care without nursing.
Once this money has run out the income support available from the government
falls seriously short of the average costs incurred by people in long-term
care. This shortfall has been estimated, by Francis McGlone of the FPSC, at
between Pounds 27 and Pounds 44 a week.
In a recent report*, Mr Chris Hamnett, visiting senior research fellow of
Nuffield College, Oxford, cites inland revenue statistics which show the
number of homes passed on at death has been relatively constant over the
past 20 years. 'Above all,' says the Hamnett report, 'older homeowners are
increasingly selling or transferring ownership of their houses prior to
death. They are doing this either to pay for residential and nursing care,
or to provide additional income in old age.'
This only serves to force house prices down further and squeeze out any
wealth effect from the economy.
According to Mr Hamnett's calculations, between 120,000 and 190,000 people
enter care homes each year. Nearly half of them own their own homes. About
two-thirds of these need to sell their houses to pay for the care. Mr
Hamnett estimates that these houses fetch about Pounds 2.5bn a year.
Far from funding a new leisure-class spending boom, the nation's accumulated
wealth is currently being used to come to the rescue of escalating care
bills for the elderly. In the process it is forcing down the property
market. There may come a point where the wealth runs out.
So the rentier class may have to stay within the fictional confines of P G
Wodehouse's comedies. Nursing home bills, rather than wealth, could cascade
down the generations.
*Inheritance in Britain; the Disappearing Billions, published by PPP
Lifetime.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6387</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Letter: A clear lead from government that would help rural
areas
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr R H M SYMONS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, With reference to the letter from David Grayson, of Business in the
Community (November 17), City Challenge has indeed given a new opportunity
to the inner cities through harnessing individual and specific networks that
exist in these areas.
Rural areas also have severe problems, causing, among other things, the
drift of the young to the urban areas. Villages have suffered from poorly
planned development, an increase in numbers of commuters and retired
residents, and a decline in agricultural employment. These changes threaten
the way of life and structure of the countryside.
In Dorset, we are particularly aware of these problems as they are
exacerbated by cutbacks in defence expenditure. We are already working in
partnership with the local authorities and the Rural Development Commission
on initiatives to help rural Dorset.
We believe that where the City Challenge, with a clear central lead from
government, has helped urban areas, a similar lead should be given to a
Rural Challenge.
We are already developing this idea with our colleagues from the Rural
Development Commission in order to present a model programme for government
consideration, and we are encouraged by the extent of the interest.
R H M Symons,
chairman,
Dorset Training and Enterprise Council,
25 Oxford Road,
Bournemouth, Dorset BH8 8EY
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6388</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / A division lesson in the classroom: School league tables
reveal a widening gap in English education
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW ADONIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
One message comes loud and clear from this week's school league tables
published by the government: England is still two nations.
When Disraeli coined that phrase in the middle of the last century, he was
referring to the rich and the poor. Now the gap is between the educated and
the uneducated. The gulf between them is as great as the chasm separating
the classes in the Victorian era.
Consider the central-south London borough of Southwark. The league table for
the borough includes three independent schools: in all three, between 92 and
97 per cent of the 15 to 16-year-old pupils this year achieved five or more
good GCSE passes (grades A, B or C). Virtually all are going on to take
A-levels, and the great majority will proceed to university - a fair
proportion to Oxbridge.
By contrast, in not a single state school in Southwark did more than 34 per
cent of the pupils gain five good passes. Across the whole of Southwark's
state sector, excluding special schools, only one in six 15 to 16-year-olds
gained five good passes. It would be surprising if more than one in 10 makes
it to university.
There lie the two nations. Attending schools often a stone's throw apart,
their career paths will never meet and their salary and lifestyle
expectations are at polar extremes. It is the same in most other English
cities.
Educationalists and sociologists will tell you those two nations are none
other than Disraeli's rich and poor revisited. For the most part they are
hostile to the private education sector, and argue that the state sector is
woefully underfunded. In general they are also opposed to selective
admission policies, to the publication of what they term 'raw' exam results,
and to state funds being used to give children from deprived backgrounds the
same opportunities to opt out of the state sector that are available to the
upwardly mobile.
As one distinguished University of London professor put it in yesterday's
press: 'There are damned lies and government league tables', and where
schools are under-performing, 'inspectors and advisers are a better way of
supporting (them) than market forces'.
The political right will have none of that. It wants the market to play a
greater role, or at least what analysts are coming to term the 'quasi
market' of extending choice and diversity within the public sector. As to
financial support, it points to the poor performance of inner London schools
despite their relatively generous state funding.
Arguments over resources could keep the controversy going single-handed.
Secondary schools in Southwark will this year have about Pounds 2,200 per
pupil to spend; include services such as special needs schooling and the
figure rises to about Pounds 3,300. Dulwich College, the borough's top
private school, charges fees for day students of Pounds 5,700 a year.
The 'two nations' thesis embraces not only the children who go to school,
and their parents, but the teachers and staff who have responsibility for
their welfare when at school.
The contrast between the teaching life at Dulwich and the typical inner
London comprehensive is so stark, you might as well class them as separate
careers. In fact, they largely are, since the interchange of staff across
the divide is minimal, and they recruit from largely separate pools.
Nearly 60 per cent of Dulwich's staff are Oxbridge educated, and many hold
doctorates. Salaries are distinctly higher than in the state sector. With
nearly 200 A-level candidates a year, teachers have an ample and
appreciative audience. The pupil:teacher ratio is about 12:1.
'That, more than anything is what parents are paying for,' says Mr Anthony
Verity, Dulwich's headmaster. 'If we had to take our fees down to
Southwark's level of funding, we would have to lay off a lot of staff and
reduce pay.'
It is not, however, just pay - or even the subsidised housing and staff
creche - that attract staff to the school. 'It's the whole ambiance. The
beautiful grounds, the relative absence of discipline problems, and so on.
There's no 'knock-off-at-five' mentality. Success and confidence breed
confidence,' says Mr Verity. Of Dulwich's 120 staff, barely nine or 10 leave
each year - and that includes retirements.
Move the few miles to Morpeth School, a comprehensive in Bethnal Green, and
it is a different story. The school has no sixth form. Not atypically for a
Tower Hamlets School, one in three of its pupils does not have English as
his or her first language. (In four of the borough's schools, more than 80
per cent of the pupils are not native English speakers.) Its buildings need
urgent repairs.
More than half of Morpeth's pupils gained five GCSEs this year, but the
number gaining grades A-C was far smaller.
Mr Alasdair MacDonald, the headmaster, talks of the problems he faces: 'Of
our last year's intake of 11-year-olds only 97 of our 200 pupils were fluent
in English. The strain on the staff cannot be overestimated.'
The staff turnover is not unduly high - about 10 out of 70 staff leave each
year. 'But many of our staff have to play the role of parent as much as that
of teacher. We work hard to build up trust among the parents, but it's a
tough job.'
Like all schools in the area, Morpeth has to struggle against absenteeism,
and parents who take little interest in the education of their children. For
Mr MacDonald it means a fair amount of time with education social workers,
and continuous efforts to maintain staff morale. 'With persistent truants,
we write, we visit, we telephone, but many of the parents themselves have
their hands full.'
One of the worst problems, he says, is the feeling among teachers that the
government does not care. 'Teachers have been persistently undervalued by
the government - and are too often seen as an obstruction,' he says. In his
view, it is not just, or even mainly, salaries that are the problem, but the
perception that ministers and officials do not understand Morpeth's
difficulties.
Here, too, we are back to the two nations. Not just the educated and the
uneducated, but the government and the teachers. Nothing could bode worse
for the prospects of tackling the education problems facing England's inner
cities in the post-league table world.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6389</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Letter: Fund roads and rail track alike
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr I R BLOOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, The conflict of interests over the Heathrow Express project, as you
correctly stated in your leading article, 'A rail link for Heathrow'
(November 17), does indeed go to the heart of the issue of whether private
train operators can make a commercial return while paying a full economic
price for the use of the railway track.
However, an alternative solution is available to that of increasing the
charges upon road users to obtain a better balance between the pricing of
road and rail facilities. Like roads, railway track and other infrastructure
have the characteristics of public goods in that, up to the point of full
capacity, their usage by one person or service does not preclude usage by
others.
Thus the railway infrastructure, like the roads, could be provided by the
state with users paying a proportion of the costs on an analogous basis to
the vehicle licence, but at a rate which would enable commercial operators
to make a commercial return as in the case of road hauliers and bus
operators.
The country would thus be able to experience the alleged benefits of a
competitive environment for rail services at a net cost to the government
not necessarily different from that which is currently paid in support of
British Rail.
I R Bloor,
1 Brickfields Close,
Wirksworth,
Derbys DE4 4GT
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6390</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Letter: Minimum lending rate that hits small businesses
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr CLIVE S DAVIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Following last week's 1 per cent reduction in base rates I have read
with interest the chancellor's exhortations to banks and building societies
to pass on to borrowers the full amount of the reduction.
Two weeks ago (with base rate at 8 per cent) I renewed my firm's modest
overdraft facility and obtained a 1 per cent reduction in the rate charged
'over base'. Knowing that base rates would be coming down further over the
next six to nine months, I pointed out to my bank manager that I did not
wish a minimum rate to be applied to the arrangement. The manager had
forgotten about minimum lending rates but confirmed that they still applied.
This week I received the written confirmation of the facility with a minimum
rate of 12 per cent equating to the 'x' over base just negotiated. At a
stroke the bank has increased its margin by 1 per cent. To add insult to
injury there is, of course, the arrangement fee of 1.5 per cent of the
facility.
It seems most small business - and also private - loans linked to base rate
have pre-set minimum rates. Result? Borrowing costs remain constant - bank
margins improve measurably.
I wonder whether small business owners generally - and, more importantly,
the chancellor - realise this. Clive S Davis,
managing director,
Pisces Management
&amp; Financial Services,
44 Highmore Road,
Caversham,
Reading, Berkshire RG4 7BH
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6391</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Leading Article: Friendly trends
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
STOCK MARKETS are not noted for the delicacy with which they treat
depressing news, and this week was no exception to the rule. In the face of
further dismal announcements of job cuts across the economy the FT-SE 100
Index rose cheerfully to within striking distance of the all-time high
reached in May this year. No matter that the third-quarter GDP figures,
excluding oil and gas, showed a decline of 0.3 per cent on the second
quarter and a fall of 0.8 per cent on the comparable period last year. Since
Black Wednesday, when Britain parted company with the ERM, the trend in
equities has been inexorably upwards. And rightly so: few market turning
points have been so clearly signalled by changes in government policy. Even
allowing for any setback after the recent rise, it is too soon to expect the
upward trend to be reversed.
It is not as if the coincidence of rising share prices and bad news is
difficult to rationalise. Unemployment is a lagging indicator. Indeed, in
the recession of the early 1980s, the unemployment figures did not stop
rising until well after the middle of the decade, even though the economy
turned the corner in early 1981. In any event there was also some modestly
encouraging news around last week. The British consumer, hitherto assumed to
be moribund, was seen to twitch a little, with retail sales showing a rise
of 0.9 per cent in the three months to the end of October. The market also
took heart from the US and European trade negotiators' potential compromise
on the intractable issue of farm trade.
Inflationary risk
Nor is the news on the job front devoid of a silver lining. A depressed
labour market has contributed to a decline in earnings growth over the six
months to September from 7 1/2 per cent to 5 1/2 per cent, while pay
settlements, a forward indicator for earnings, were down to 3.9 per cent in
the three months to October. That is a trend that needs to continue if the
inflationary risk inherent in the recent devaluation is not to render the
whole exercise nugatory. Note, though, that despite the continuing
stagnation in the economy and under-utilisation of industrial capacity,
productivity has started to improve, while output per head has actually been
on a rising trend. The other encouraging point for the future is that
inflation tends to go on falling well into an economic recovery, helped by
high productivity growth as companies reap the benefit of the good
housekeeping measures undertaken in the recession.
Against that background the Bank of England's latest Quarterly Bulletin
argues that the impact of sterling's recent depreciation on prices will be
delayed, compared with experience in previous devaluations, and may even be
smaller than in the past. Coming from an institution that is not accustomed
to risk its central banking credentials by belittling a potential
inflationary threat, that is quite an admission. That said, worries are not
confined to conditions in the labour market. In so far as investors have had
second thoughts on the Autumn Statement, they simply confirm earlier
thoughts that the deterioration in Britain's public finances will be giving
gilt-edged investors nervous moments for the foreseeable future.
Remarkably resilient
Ultimately, equities cannot escape the backwash from turmoil in the gilts
market. But for the moment that prospect looks just sufficiently distant to
allow the equity party to continue. If there is a more helpful signpost to
the future, it lies in the United States, where equity prices have proved
remarkably resilient despite the delayed effect of monetary loosening on the
economy. British investors are now confronting a steeper yield curve, with
short interest rates significantly lower than long rates. This tends to
enhance the attractions of securities against bank and building society
deposits. Not only are professional investors adjusting their portfolio
dispositions accordingly; private investors are showing interest in such new
issues as Commercial Union's Pounds 100m offering of irredeemable preference
shares.
If the inflationary threat to the British economy can be exaggerated, so too
can the prospects for export-led growth. While the unspectacular improvement
in the US economy is good news for British exporters, the slowdown in the
European economy is not. Nor is the increasing preoccupation of European
policymakers with fiscal expansion necessarily the best way out of a bind
which has been precipitated by the combination of loose fiscal and tight
monetary policies in Germany.
But nothing in continental Europe is set in concrete. This week saw Sweden
finally give up its fight to shadow the ERM and the peripheral ERM
currencies weaken. And despite having weathered the earlier currency storm,
even the franc is not without risk. How long can France sustain such high
real rates of interest against a background of rising unemployment and an
impending election in the spring? The markets are not only indelicate. They
have a nose for inconsistent domestic and external policy. The speculators'
game is not over yet.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6392</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Stranded on the road to Split: In Bosnia, David White
witnesses a desperate exodus by 'displaced persons'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WHITE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Aid lorries and British military vehicles ploughing their way daily up the
rough mountain backroads into central Bosnia meet buses struggling the other
way, with optimistic signs reading 'Linz' or 'Vienna'.
More than 1.5m Bosnians, one in three of the population, are now considered
'DPs' - displaced persons - within the former territory of Yugoslavia. This
is roughly the same as the population of Northern Ireland. Of these, some
800,000 are still in Bosnia-Hercegovina itself.
The UN High Commissioner for Refugees (UNHCR) puts the total of people
uprooted by the Croatian and Bosnian wars at 2.1m. In addition, there are
more than 550,000 ex-Yugoslavs classed as refugees in Germany, Switzerland,
Sweden, Austria, Hungary and other countries.
The wanton internecine conflicts of former Yugoslavia have created the
biggest dislocation of population in Europe since the second world war. This
was something people said should never happen in Europe again.
This week's argument over 175 or so Bosnians expecting entry to Britain and
stuck on the Austrian-Slovenian border was only an indication of the strains
the exodus is likely to create in Europe. The number seeking refuge abroad
could reach hundreds of thousands in the coming months. How many depends on
the fighting - there are signs that it could get worse rather than better -
and how severe winter is. Both these affect how much aid, even with UN
military escorts, can reach stranded and displaced populations, and how far
they can cope by themselves.
In some high places temperatures have already fallen as low as - 20 degrees
Celsius.
Local UNHCR representatives say only half the aid needed has been getting
through. The only hope for transporting sufficiently large supplies is by
negotiating safe conduct by main roads that are now crossed by battle lines
or exposed to Serb gunfire. Convoys under British, French and Spanish
military escorts all came under fire in different parts of Bosnia this week.
Most immediate of the refugee organisations' tasks is dealing with men
released from prison camps. The International Committee of the Red Cross
knows of 41 Serb, Moslem and Croat camps where there are some 6,500
prisoners left - about half of them at one Serb camp, Manjaca - but there
are thought to be more. European countries have offered a total of 3,700
places for the detainees. Britain has proposed taking 150, with their
families.
Others trying to emigrate face a series of frontier barriers, unless they
have visas to another country further on. The first barrier is Croatia,
which already has 340,000 Bosnian refugees to cope with. But UN officials
say they have indications of a 'mercenary trade' getting people out through
unofficial networks, in some cases by way of Macedonia, Bulgaria and
Romania.
Moslems and Croats from 'ethnically cleansed' Serb-held areas pour into
central Bosnia and western Hercegovina. A principal stress point is the old
Ottoman town of Travnik. Once the seat of the Turkish viziers, it is the
setting of a famous novel by Ivo Andric, the only Yugoslav ever to win a
Nobel literature prize. The high school he attended has now become a
Dickensian-style hostel, where the heating does not work and 40 to 50 people
live to a room. Shells fall on the town almost every night.
Refugees come through Travnik, sometimes in surges, before being channelled
to other centres. The Croats are more likely to find shelter with host
families. At the 'collective centres' 90 to 95 per cent are reckoned to be
Moslems.
The Moslems - southern Slavs whose families converted during the 500 years
of Ottoman rule - are categorised as such because, unlike the other main
groups in former Yugoslavia, there is no substitute ethnic, national or
linguistic epithet to distinguish them. They were the least ready for this
war and stand to fare the worst from it.
The people stranded at the centres are peasants, modest townspeople and
middle-class families. At the refugee centre in Posusje, in the Bosnian
Croat heartland, where living conditions are visibly worse than at Travnik,
one family said they used to have two houses and three cars.
They leave their homes with what possessions they can grab. Few have money,
unless they managed to keep savings abroad. In Bosnia savings have become
meaningless. The banking system has collapsed. Seven different currencies
are in use, depending on the part you are in. In much of the
Croat/Moslem-controlled area of central Bosnia, the currency is not
Bosnia-Hercegovina's own dinar but the Croatian dinar or, preferably, the
D-Mark.
Aid workers say most displaced people want to remake their lives in Bosnia.
But, while peace negotiators in Geneva hold to the principle that people
should be able to return to their homes, many have no homes to return to. It
is difficult for refugees to envisage ever rebuilding the mixed communities
that existed before.
At Kiseljak, a spa town west of the Bosnian capital where the UN has
established a military headquarters, two sisters had arrived from Sarajevo
in a 14-bus convoy. 'It's so strange not to hear shells and bullets,'
14-year-old Jesenka said.
Every day for seven months they had gone to the cellar for shelter. 'You are
not safe in the house, not safe in the street,' said Vedrana, 19, an
economics student. They lived on rice, macaroni and beans. Electricity came
on a few hours every week. For a month there had been no running water.
They had been allowed to take two bags each. They had left behind their
parents and Vedrana's boyfriend, a member of the Croat militia. At a Serb
checkpoint, they had been surprised to be classed as Moslem, because of
their family name. They had been brought up to consider themselves Yugoslav.
They were heading for Split, had papers to get them to Czechoslovakia and
aimed eventually to make it to France. It was at least something to hope
for.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6393</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / No place for classic theories
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WHITE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A medieval kind of war is being waged in Bosnia, with this century's
weapons. Over seven months it has settled into a pattern of prolonged
sieges, in which towns are held in terror by seemingly casual pounding from
tank guns, mortars, howitzers and rocket launchers, and local warlords
ignore one ceasefire agreement after another, writes David White.
The fighting, in which Bosnian Moslems and Croats have been in loose
alliance against Serb forces since independence in April, has already lasted
as long as last year's war in Croatia. It is also a continuation of that war
by proxy. Despite official denials, soldiers from both Croatia and the rump
Yugoslav federal republic are directly involved.
Bosnia's Croats were much more prepared than the Moslems to face attack by
the Serbs, and had managed to stockpile some arms.
The Serb militia has taken 70 per cent of the territory, reducing so-called
'free' Bosnia to a gradually shrinking core, with a few isolated patches
north-west and east, and with the capital, Sarajevo, under permanent siege.
Across the north of the country the Serbs have established a corridor
linking Serbia itself to the Serb stronghold region of Croatia, the Krajina.
An apparent tacit agreement about the limits of Serb territorial claims is
now in question. The front line passes around Turbe, a deserted small town,
prey to Serb gunners, just west of Travnik. There Filip Filipovic, former
general manager of a nearby ironworks, was commanding the local Croat HVO
militia from a barricaded headquarters. He glumly described how Serb forces
had concentrated there since the overrunning of the besieged town of Jajce,
further to the west, three weeks ago. 'It seems their appetite is growing,'
he said.
Croat forces have mounted recent offensives in the south, pushing east of
Mostar to try to secure territory behind the thin coastal strip of Croatia
where Dubrovnik is. They have also managed temporarily to cut off the Serbs'
northern corridor, at one point only a few miles wide. There are some signs
that the Serbs could now try to slice through the northern salients of
Moslem and Croat-held territory along an axis from Maglaj to Olovo.
What is puzzling is that the Serbs, with their military tradition and
ostensibly with all the advantages, have not been achieving greater success.
They have more artillery and more ammunition, and their senior officers from
the former Yugoslav national army are immersed in Soviet-style training.
But this schooling in high-tempo warfare is of little application in Bosnia.
The mountains are no place for the classic theories of armoured battle. The
top level evidently has difficulty controlling local commanders, and Serb
forces are stretched out over a long front. On the other hand, they have
little difficulty protecting their hilltop gun positions and pursuing
sporadic shelling of towns and link roads. They are believed to be using
helicopters to bring up ammunition, in breach of the ban on military flying.
High-flying Nato Awacs aircraft deployed for the UN cannot always detect
them.
The forces on the other side eye with envy and some wonderment the military
hardware being deployed by British, French and other UN troops to protect
aid supplies. But many Croat and Moslem militiamen carry new weapons. Small
arms and ammunition are known to have been arriving through the Croatian
port of Ploce, and possibly also in consignments of Islamic aid coming
through Split.
Motley foreigners have also joined Croat and Moslem ranks. The village of
Mehurici near Travnik, said to be packed with mujahedin from various Islamic
countries, is now out-of-bounds for journalists. 'Don't even try,' a local
commander said. In Travnik itself I approached three men in uniform who had
been talking among themselves in German. 'Sprechen Sie Deutsch?' I ventured.
'Nein,' was the reply.
In places, the mood is close to defeatism. Outside one town, defended
jointly by Moslems and Croats, more than 40 military trucks and coaches were
concealed, waiting for the evacuation. This is a war in which the targets
are mostly civilian.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6394</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Man in the News: A case of double vision - Andrew Buxton
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT PESTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The man born to be chairman of Barclays is facing unrest in his realm.
Andrew Buxton is scion of one of the families which has held the reins at
Britain's biggest bank for a century. At the beginning of May, a month after
his 53rd birthday, this private family man - described by friends as
'unflappable' and 'unflamboyant' - became its chief executive. He is
scheduled to become chairman in January.
Some Barclays' shareholders - already disappointed by the scale of losses
the bank faces on imprudent company loans - have become unhappy at the
prospect of so much power being concentrated in one person's hands. For the
first time, Mr Buxton this week acknowledged the unrest.
He made a concession which he hopes will pacify them. Though he still plans
to take the chairmanship, he said his dual role would 'be kept under review'
by the board. If a different sharing of management responsibilities seemed
necessary, he would give up one or other post.
The statement does not appear, however, to have reduced pressure on him.
Shareholders said they were in no mind to drop the issue.
Mr Buxton and the Barclays' board accept that combining the two roles runs
counter to the consensus on best management practice, as enshrined in the
report of Sir Adrian Cadbury's committee on corporate governance. However,
Mr Buxton argues that other directors, notably Sir Peter Middleton, the
former Treasury permanent secretary who is a deputy chairman of Barclays,
act as a counterbalance.
His views are echoed by Sir Martin Jacomb, another Barclays' deputy chairman
and an influential board member: 'The board is completely satisfied that the
checks and balances (in the management structure) that Cadbury wanted are
there,' Sir Martin said.
But Mr Buxton must make a special effort to show shareholders that Barclays
is adopting best management practices, because he has on occasion faced the
slur - which colleagues say is unfair - that his rise owed something to his
membership of the 'Barclays families', as they are known in the bank.
These are a number of inter-married clans which owned local banks in the
18th and 19th centuries. The banks were merged in the 1890s to form
Barclays, but the families continued to occupy senior positions on the
bank's regional boards.
In the past century, only two chairmen, including Sir John Quinton, the
present incumbent, have been drawn from outside the families' ranks. As
recently as the mid-1980s, about a quarter of the main board directors were
connected to the families (though there are now only two family members on a
board of 21).
Mr Buxton said before he joined the bank he was never particularly aware of
his family connection with Barclays. However, the Buxtons, an East Anglian
family, were closely involved in the private Overend Gurney Bank, which was
absorbed by Barclays.
He joined the bank in 1963 - after reading philosophy, politics and
economics at Pembroke College, Oxford, and completing national service in
the Grenadier Guards - largely because of the encouragement of his
step-father, Mr Alexander Grant, a local Barclays director.
Mr Buxton's first job was as a clerk in a branch - since buried beneath a
roundabout - in west London's Holland Park. He then rose steadily. He had
first-hand experience of the 1973-74 recession as head of a special team set
up to work with companies, especially property businesses, which faced
financial difficulties.
His rise accelerated in the 1980s. In quick succession, he became general
manager for East Anglia and the east Midlands, then head of a new corporate
banking division. In 1987 he temporarily acted as chief executive of
Barclays de Zoete Wedd, the investment banking subsidiary which Mr Buxton
helped to set up. In May 1988, he became group managing director.
'My progress in the bank has always surprised me,' he said yesterday from
Riyadh, where he is visiting the bank's Middle Eastern clients. 'I would not
like to think of myself as ambitious.'
In the spring, he was chosen to become both chairman and chief executive by
a sub-committee of the Barclays' board which was considering who was to
succeed Sir John.
Directors have rather different recollections of the sequence of events.
There is, however, a consensus that there was not a coup to oust Sir John.
On the other hand, although Sir John was probably content to retire next
year, he is believed to have been disappointed that he was asked to give up
his executive duties to Mr Buxton in May this year.
Sir John may have found it galling to go at the nadir of the bank's
fortunes. Analysts believe Barclays may make its first loss this year.
A Barclays' director said the board was overwhelmingly convinced that the
time had come for new blood at the top, because the bank faced different
challenges from those Sir John confronted when he became chairman in 1987.
Mr Buxton has to reshape the bank so that it can cope with the aftermath of
the lending explosion of the 1980s and the slow economic growth expected in
the coming few years. That means cutting costs and withdrawing from business
earning a low return.
Though the board might have preferred to split the roles of chairman and
chief executive, it did not see how this could be done. There was no one
inside the bank, apart from Mr Buxton, qualified to be chief executive,
according to one director.
But, he added, the board was also reluctant to break a Barclays' tradition
by appointing a non-banker as chairman - Sir Peter Middleton was not thought
experienced enough.
The board hopes that in time a natural candidate for the post of chief
executive will emerge from inside the bank to take Mr Buxton's executive
duties. It does not want to ask Mr Buxton to revert to the sole position of
chief executive for fear of alienating him.
As for Mr Buxton, he said that if the board decided there should be another
chairman, 'I would accept it'. But he added: 'I would feel a sense of
disappointment.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6395</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Accountancy leader dies
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MR ANDREW SANSOM, the secretary of the Chartered Association of Certified
Accountants, has died. He was aged 55 and leaves a wife and a son.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6396</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Grand prix date for Donington
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
DONINGTON Park, the Leicestershire motor racing circuit, is to stage its
first grand prix since 1938. FISA, the world governing body of motor sports,
has revived the concept of a European Grand Prix and it will be at Donington
on April 11. Silverstone will retain the British Grand Prix, held in July.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6397</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Firm fined Pounds 250 over investments
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
SLATER MARTIN, an accountancy firm based in Northampton, has been fined
Pounds 250 by the disciplinary committee of the Institute of Chartered
Accountants in England and Wales for handling investment business clients'
money when not authorised to do so.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6398</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Apricot plans to create 140 jobs
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
APRICOT Computers, owned by Mitsubishi Electric of Japan, expects to create
an extra 140 jobs at its manufacturing plant at Glenrothes, Fife, over the
next three years, increasing employment there by 75 per cent. That follows
the opening yesterday of a Pounds 5m extension to the plant.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6399</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Mirror journalists to picket HQ
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
DAILY MIRROR journalists will picket MGN's headquarters today in an attempt
to disrupt production of two Sunday newspapers, the Sunday Mirror and The
People.
The journalists protested outside the London headquarters of Mirror Group
Newspapers yesterday to try to bring about the reinstatement of 100 sacked
colleagues.
More than 100 freelance journalists, many of whom have worked on various MGN
titles for years, have been locked out of the building since Monday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6400</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Ninth plea for freedom fails
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Lorrain Osman, the banker who is Britain's longest-serving unconvicted
prisoner, failed yesterday in his ninth court move to avoid extradition to
Hong Kong for trial on fraud charges.
Two High Court judges refused to grant a writ of habeas corpus and accused
him of taking the action 'to filibuster'. Mr Osman has been fighting
extradition for five years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6401</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Fresh BCCI charges for Virani
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN MASON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Nazmu Virani, the former chairman of Control Securities, was charged
yesterday with 14 fresh offences by police investigating the collapse of
Bank of Credit and Commerce International, John Mason writes.
A warrant was also issued for the arrest of Mr Mohammed Moizul Haque, a
former member of the central credit division of BCCI London and the bank's
property investment department. Mr Haque is believed to be in Pakistan,
which has no extradition treaty with the UK.
Mr Virani was charged on one count of conspiring with Mr Haque to defraud
depositors. The two men face 12 joint charges of false accounting. Mr Virani
was also charged with the theft of Pounds 674,998.94 from Zelva Anstalt, a
Liechtenstein company.
The single original charge against Mr Virani of conspiracy to account
falsely was dropped.
Alleged bogus loans and debts covered by the charges total more than Pounds
27m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6402</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Major rejects Matrix claims
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS, Political Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR JOHN MAJOR indicated yesterday that he was unaware of attempts by the
Department of Trade and Industry in June 1990 to circumscribe the Customs
and Excise investigation into Matrix Churchill.
His move to underline that he had no direct involvement in the oversight of
exports of defence-related equipment to Iraq came as the government tabled
its amendment to a Labour motion condemning it for breaching its own
guidelines on the sales.
The amendment for Monday's full-scale Commons debate on the affair says it
will be for the inquiry under Lord Justice Scott to determine whether the
guidelines were breached. It underlines the wide-ranging nature of the
inquiry and 'deplores the sensationalised attempts of Her Majesty's
Opposition to anticipate the inquiry's findings'.
Mr Major, then chancellor, said yesterday that a letter to Customs from the
office of Mr Nicholas Ridley, then trade secretary, had been copied to
Treasury officials.
The letter gave conditional DTI approval to an investigation into the sale
to Iraq of Matrix Churchill machine tools. It emphasised that Mr Ridley was
happy for investigators to visit the company on the assumption that 'no
action would be taken as a result without consulting ministers'.
In a written parliamentary reply to Mr Tam Dalyell, Mr Major said the
document was copied to his private secretary. 'Treasury records do not
reveal whether I saw this correspondence, but I have no recollection of
doing so.'
The prime minister said that in 1990 the then paymaster general was
responsible 'in the first instance' for matters involving Customs and
Excise. Mr Richard Ryder, at present chief whip, became paymaster general in
1990. It was unclear last night whether he handled the correspondence.
Mr Major's reply added that Customs had made clear at the time to the DTI
that 'decisions about follow-up' action in the Matrix Churchill affair
'would rest with the Commissioners of HM Customs and Excise in accordance
with their statutory responsibilities'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6403</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Windsor fire destroys historic hall
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTONY THORNCROFT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE QUEEN'S art collection, most of which will have escaped destruction in
yesterday's blaze at Windsor Castle, is possibly the greatest private
collection in the world.
The castle holds the greatest concentration of items in the collection. As
well as the works of art there are collections of armour, furniture and
18th-century French tapestries.
Last night the Duke of York said he believed only six paintings had been
lost in the blaze, which spread from the Brunswick Tower to St George's
Hall.
Buckingham Palace said that all the works of art were safely removed from St
George's Hall - one of the main state rooms - and the long corridor, where
many of the most valuable paintings were hanging. The fabric of St George's
Hall had been 'very badly gutted'.
Fire incident commander David Harper said last night: 'It's such a
complicated building. You have to rely an awful lot on the people who work
in it. The structure is very weak in certain places.'
Mr Adair Lewis, manager of information services for the for the Fire
Protection Association, said: 'Blazes can spread quickly and undetected in
the nooks and crannies of large old palaces and castles.
'It was found after the Hampton Court fire that there were all sorts of
voids which were not known about.' The restoration of Hampton Court Palace,
which took five years, was completed last year.
The serious damage to the hall is a blow for the national heritage. The
original room was built in the 14th century as the banqueting hall of King
Edward III. It could have been there that he inaugurated the Order of the
Garter.
For more than 600 years it has been the site of the annual banquet of the
Garter Knights. Their coats of arms, now numbering almost 1,000, cover the
ceiling.
The walls are lined with sets of arms and armour and with portraits of
British sovereigns from King James I to King William IV, including works by
Van Dyck and Kneller. Among the special treasures is a bust of George II by
Roubiliac.
The hall in its present form was the creation of King George IV in the early
19th century.
George IV lengthened the hall to 185ft and made it a triumph of Regency
Gothic.
Many of the paintings had been taken down because of the electrical rewiring
in progress at the castle. That helped the rescuers when they formed human
chains to lift the paintings, vases, armour, tapestries, carpets and other
works of art to safety, but many works of art will have been damaged by
smoke.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6404</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEABAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Whitehall told to plan cuts in red tape
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS, Political Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR JOHN MAJOR sought to give teeth yesterday to his pledge to ease the
regulatory burden on business by demanding that every government department
produce proposals by the new year to sweep away unnecessary bureaucracy.
His announcement, after a meeting with Mr Michael Heseltine, the trade and
industry secretary, and Mr Neil Hamilton, the industry minister, signals the
start of an intensive Whitehall exercise designed to strike a better balance
between costs and benefits of regulation.
Mr Major plans to chair a cabinet review of the outcome in January or
February, intensifying the pressure on each department to come up with
substantive propo-sals.
There were also signs at Westminster yesterday that the government may move
soon to meet the commitment in its election manifesto to overhaul the
present law on restrictive practices.
Ministers have been studying ways to replace the present system - based on
the restrictive practices court - with one modelled along the lines of
Article 85 of the Treaty of Rome.
Mr Hamilton, who has been given specific responsibility for deregulation,
said he planned a 'zero-based' budgeting exercise to secure the repeal or
simplification of unnecessary rules and regulations.
He also wanted a rigorous examination of the 'over-implementation' of
European Community directives.
The government was determined that all future regulation - European as well
as national - should be subject to a stringent test that calculated the
impact on business alongside the potential benefit to consumers.
The aim would be to ensure that rules were a result of rational analysis
rather than it being easier to opt for 'the 100 per cent safe solution
regardless of cost'.
Mr Hamilton added that the government was determined to apply the same
criteria to existing regulation: 'Each department will be expected to trawl
through all its regulations and come up with candidates for repeal and
simplification'.
The minister singled out environmental health, fire, food safety, and
building regulation as areas where the burden placed on business was often
disproportionate to the benefits for consumers. He also pointed out that big
food retailers had to apply for between 15 and 30 licences before opening
each new store. That might be streamlined into a single licence.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6405</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAA9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Banks fear green policy effects
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GAPPER, Banking Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BANKS MAY stop lending to companies in industries that are perceived to be
'environmentally risky' unless their liability is limited under British and
European law, the chief executive of National Westminster Bank warned
yesterday.
Mr Derek Wanless said the creditworthiness of enterprises in industries
including natural resources, forestry and chemicals might suffer if their
lenders were held responsible for environmental damage.
Mr Wanless, chairman of the financial sector working group of the
government's advisory committee on business and the environment, said
environmental damage for which a polluter could not pay should be treated as
a 'social cost'.
He argued that European law was in danger of straying from the 'polluter
pays' principle by extending liability for pollution to lenders, and thus
making banks liable to pay amounts 'considerably greater than the loan'.
He told a Brussels conference on business and the environment: 'A small loan
to purchase a small industrial site could result in millions of pounds in
clean-up costs for lenders or investors if the site is or becomes polluted.'
Mr Wanless said there was an increasing number of cases of lenders deciding
not to extend credit because of the risk of being held liable for
environmental damage. 'A large segment of Europe's economy is subject to
some form of visible environmental risk.' That might lead to businesses
being unable to find finance to clean up existing environmental damage.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6406</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAA8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Councils attack cut to Urban Programme
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRIS TIGHE and PAUL CHEESERIGHT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DEPARTMENT of the Environment has angered local authorities with a
notice that it is not prepared to support financially any new schemes to
help economic, environmental and social projects through the Urban
Programme.
The Urban Programme, for which during the current financial year there is a
budget of Pounds 237m, has been used to help the poorest urban areas of 57
local authorities. But it is being scaled back by 66 per cent over the next
three financial years as the government makes economies in its own spending
and reorganises its urban spending.
A previously unpublished letter to the 57 local authorities from Mr Robin
Squire, the junior environment minister for local government and inner
cities, sent after the Autumn Statement, said that the government's new
Capital Partnership scheme would supersede the Urban Programme.
But, the letter said, 'we will continue to meet Urban Programme commitments
arising from approvals in this and previous financial years'.
Ms Jane Todd, manager of Nottingham's Urban Programme, said: 'The government
is getting us to jump through smaller and smaller hoops to get to a smaller
pot of money.' And such concerns will be raised when local-authority leaders
meet Mr Michael Howard, the environment secretary.
The leaders are Mr Jeremy Beecham, leader of the Newcastle City Council and
chairman of the Association of Metropolitan Authorities; Mr Bill
Dixon-Smith, chairman of the Association of County Councils; and Lady
Elizabeth Anson, who chairs the Association of District Councils.
Mr Beecham complained that Mr Squire's letter had been 'rather obfuscatory'
and that there had been no consultation about the Urban Programme cuts.
Mirroring comments from other councils, he was sceptical about the
government's commitment to inner-city regeneration.
He said: 'It's not evident on the resources being devoted to it. They've
gone for the cosmetic. The fundamental problems are getting worse.'
Next financial year the Urban Programme budget will be Pounds 176m, but the
government is holding back Pounds 20m of that as a specifically urban
element of Capital Partnership.
Under that scheme, local authorities may use recently accumulated capital
receipts as a base for urban schemes run jointly with the private sector.
They will have to bid competitively for portions of the Pounds 20m to
supplement their own spending.
Underlying the concern of council leaders is the fear that they will not be
able to replace the Urban Programme funding through the competitive process.
The switch in funding methods will mean that Newcastle will lose Pounds 2m a
year in Urban Programme funding.
Nottingham's Urban Programme budget will decline from Pounds 5m this year to
Pounds 3m next year, to Pounds 1m in 1994-95 and to zero the following year.
Coventry expects to lose a third next year of its present Pounds 4.65m Urban
Programme budget.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6407</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAA7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Call for terror insurance
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE GOVERNMENT may come under pressure next week to help provide business
with financial protection against terrorist attack, in the wake of last
week's announcement by the Association of British Insurers that terrorism
might be excluded from commercial insurance policies.
The ABI, the industry's trade association, earlier this month issued its
members with a model insurance policy wording excluding terrorism.
Few companies are prepared to comment, but a number are known to be
concerned about facing possible losses from terrorism without insurance
cover.
At a meeting on Monday the Association of Insurance and Risk Managers in
Industry and Commerce (Airmic), which represents buyers at more than 300
leading British companies, will voice industry's concerns with
representatives of the CBI and the ABI.
Mr John Greenway, the Conservative MP for Ryedale, the chairman of the
all-party insurance and financial services committee, is also expected to
meet Airmic on Monday.
He wrote earlier this week to Mr Michael Heseltine, the trade and industry
secretary, suggesting that the government could help provide reinsurance to
allow insurers to continue to cover terrorism.
Mr Tony Baker, head of public relations at the ABI, said without reinsurance
UK insurers could offer only up to Pounds 600m of cover, compared with
potential demand of Pounds 240bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6408</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAA6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / BR halts Tilbury line upgrade
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD TOMKINS, Transport Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH RAIL has reversed a decision to spend Pounds 50m on the
re-signalling of the London Tilbury and Southend line, one of the country's
worst-performing railways.
Thousands of commuters had expected the re-signalling to end frequent
interruptions to services caused by breakdowns in the 60-year-old equipment.
BR blamed the move on the financial settlement imposed in the Autumn
Statement last week. It said it no longer had enough money to go ahead with
the project.
The scheme is one of several investment programmes BR has put on indefinite
hold. Others are the renewal of trains and track on the west coast main line
from London Euston; the replacement of the 40-year-old trains on the Kent
Coast routes; and implementation of the Thameslink 2000 project to improve
capacity of the north-south cross-London link.
In addition, BR said much of the routine renewal of the railway
infrastructure would give way to temporary repairs.
BR said safety would not be compromised by the cuts. On the London Tilbury
and Southend line, fail-safe devices meant equipment failures caused signals
to turn to red.
The Department of Transport said BR had been given as much money as the
government could afford in a tough spending round, and had been left Pounds
230m better off as a result of the settlement.
BR said the extra funds would be mopped up by the purchase of 188 Networker
trains which the government approved during the general election campaign
this year.
London Underground has set up a hot-line to provide managers with up-to-date
information on workers' support ahead of next week's Tube strike called by
the RMT rail union. The company is determined to run a strike-breaking
service from Tuesday but the RMT said: 'We are confident that our members
will support the strike call.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6409</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAA5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Society sues ombudsmen
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SCHEHERAZADE DANESHKHU
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ALLIANCE &amp; Leicester, the third-largest building society, is taking legal
action against the building society ombudsmen, the industry's watchdogs, and
suing two individual investors 'to clarify certain issues relating to the
ombudsmen scheme', particularly the scope of the ombudsmen's jurisdiction.
The specific issue is that of obsolete accounts - those that are no longer
being marketed. Many investors complain when their savings account is
replaced with a new one and the rate of interest paid on the obsolete
account is reduced. Investors are often unaware that their account has
become obsolete.
The Alliance &amp; Leicester has issued a writ claiming that the ombudsmen are
not entitled to investigate its Gold Plus, Ready Money Plus and Ordinary
Share accounts - all instant-access accounts now closed to new savers.
The three building society ombudsmen say they are required to consider all
complaints within their terms of reference, and especially to consider
whether a complainant has be unfairly treated. 'This includes looking at the
interest rates set by a society on the complainant's account.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6410</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAA4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Lloyd's offers new measures to Names
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LLOYD'S OF London announced new moves yesterday to help pave the way for an
ambitious negotiated settlement of legal actions by aggrieved Names,
underlining a mood of conciliation at the insurance market.
A six-month moratorium covering 3,000 Names is to be extended to a further
196 against whom Lloyd's has served writs to recover debts. Lloyd's
announced the moratorium - during which Lloyd's will take no action to
recover debts - earlier this month.
Separately, solvency rules, which govern the amount of money Names must
deposit with Lloyd's in order to continue underwriting, are to be relaxed to
enable tax rebates due to Names to be taken into account. At least 1,000
Names might benefit from the measure, which has followed negotiations
between Lloyd's and the Inland Revenue.
Mr Peter Middleton, chief executive, said both measures were designed to
'lower the temperature' at the market, and followed talks this week with
leaders of action groups of Names. Mr Middleton hopes negotiations designed
to achieve an 'arbitrated settlement' of the various legal actions between
Names and their agents could begin by as early as mid January. Lloyd's
'wanted to avoid three to four years of litigation. The primary
beneficiaries (would be) lawyers,' said Mr Middleton, who took over as chief
executive two months ago.
Last month Mr Middleton announced the formation of a working group of market
professionals and Names to examine ways errors and omissions underwriters
(which insure underwriters and agents against the cost of legal awards for
negligence) might contribute to a settlement.
A separate working group is examining the difficulty of open years, which
emerge when syndicate managers are unable to close years of account because
of uncertainty over the size of future claims.
Names have welcomed the move. Mr Alfred Doll-Steinberg, chairman of the
Gooda Walker Action Group, described the measures as 'superb' and said the
measures might defuse tension. He said Gooda Walker Names would reinforce
existing powers to take legal action when they meet on November 30, but he
is enthusiastic about the prospects of an agreement. 'We've got to offer
something in return,' he said.
Mr Christopher Stockwell, chairman of the Lloyd's Names Associations Working
Group, said he was 'delighted that Lloyd's is serious about talks. It is
clear that Peter Middleton will do all in his power to bring about a
settlement of Lloyd's historic problems.'
Mr Val Powell, of the Association of Lloyd's Members, said the moves would
'give breathing space to consider other ways out of the problem'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6411</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAA3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Terrorism insurance by state is urged
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE GOVERNMENT may come under pressure next week to help provide business
with financial protection against terrorist attack, in the wake of last
week's announcement by the Association of British Insurers that terrorism
might be excluded from commercial insurance policies.
The ABI, the industry's trade association, issued its members with a model
insurance policy wording excluding terrorism on November 12.
Few companies are prepared to comment, but a number are known to be
concerned about facing possible losses from terrorism without insurance
cover.
At a meeting on Monday the Association of Insurance and Risk Managers in
Industry and Commerce (Airmic), which represents buyers at more than 300
leading British companies, will voice industry's concerns with
representatives of the CBI and the ABI.
According to Mr Alan Fleming, the purpose of the meeting is to negotiate a
common approach to the government.
Mr John Greenway, the Conservative MP for Ryedale, the chairman of the
all-party insurance and financial services committee, is also expected to
meet Airmic on Monday.
He wrote earlier this week to Mr Michael Heseltine, the trade and industry
secretary, suggesting that the government could help provide reinsurance to
allow insurers to continue to cover terrorism.
Mr Greenway thought it would not be viable to introduce the scheme that
compensates for terrorist losses in Northern Ireland to the mainland.
Mr Tony Baker, head of public relations at the ABI, said without reinsurance
UK insurers could offer only up to Pounds 600m of cover, compared with
potential demand of Pounds 240bn.
Brokers said yesterday that reinsurance policies to cover terrorism might be
made available on the London market but would be expensive and cumbersome.
Reinsurers would be likely to demand a detailed schedule of every building.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6412</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAA2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Daily Mirror journalists picket
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JIMMY BURNS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DAILY MIRROR journalists protested outside the London headquarters of Mirror
Group Newspapers yesterday to try to bring about the reinstatement of 100
sacked colleagues, Jimmy Burns writes.
The journalists will picket MGN's headquarters today in an attempt to
disrupt production of two Sunday newspapers, the Sunday Mirror and The
People,
More than 100 freelance journalists, many of whom have worked on various MGN
titles for years, have been locked out of the building since Monday.
Yesterday they were joined by other trade unionists and readers in a
demonstration that demanded the dismissal of Mr David Montgomery, MGN's new
chief executive, and the reinstatement of all those sacked over the past
week.
The sackings form part of a reorganisation of MGN by the group's new chief
executive Mr David Montgomery.
According to MGN executives, several casual shifts were being worked a week
with unnecessary costs for the company.
Mr Montgomery said yesterday that 'no nook or cranny' of the MGN business
would be untouched in a reorganisation aimed at achieving a 'tight and
efficient operation.'
The reorganisation has the backing of a group of banks that effectively own
54 per cent of MGN, held as collateral for loans made to the Maxwell
interests now in administration.
Mr Trevor Davies, father of the National Union of Journalists chapel (office
branch), said the absence of casuals had disrupted production and
advertising at the Daily Mirror this week.
The MGN chapel is balloting its members on strike action today with a result
expected to be announced next week.
Photograph by Fergus Wilkie
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6413</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAA1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Housing associations to receive money from government
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The Housing Corporation yesterday announced that 27 housing associations
will receive the first Pounds 577m of the Pounds 750m provided by the
government, in its Autumn Statement, to buy up to 20,000 empty homes, Andrew
Taylor writes.
The associations are: Bedfordshire Pilgrims, Bromford Carinthia, Circle 33,
Devon and Cornwall, Ealing Family, East London, English Churches, Family
Housing Association, Focus, Guinness Housing Trust, Knightstone, Leicester,
Liverpool Housing Trust, London and Quadrant, North British, North,
North-ern Counties, Notting Hill Housing Trust, Orbit, Paddington Churches,
Peabody, Southern Housing Group, Suffolk Heritage, Swaythling Housing
Society, West Berkshire and Yorkshire Metropolitan.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6414</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAA0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Contracting-out attack rejected
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
FOR the second time in two days, the government yesterday denied that its
Pounds 1.5bn programme of contracting out government services was in
disarray over new EC regulations protecting pay and conditions of workers
when they transfer to the private sector.
A document sent to government departments by Mr Don Brereton, head of the
cabinet office efficiency unit, said it was 'nonsense to suggest that the
Foreign and Commonwealth Office or any other department has had to suspend
its programme of contracting out'.
SLATER MARTIN, an accountancy firm based in Northampton, has been fined
Pounds 250 by the disciplinary committee of the Institute of Chartered
Accountants in England and Wales for handling investment business client's
money when not authorised to do so.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6415</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAAZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Correction
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Yesterday's Financial Times carried a photograph of Mr Ong Teng Cheong, a
Singapore deputy prime minister, who was wrongly identified in the caption
as Mr Lee Hsien Loong, another deputy premier.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6416</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAAYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / East Timor rebel leader captured
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JAKARTA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Indonesian troops captured the leader of East Timor's rebel Fretilin
movement yesterday, the army said, Reuter reports from Jakarta.
The rebel chief, a shadowy figure, has long been regarded as a symbol of the
resistance to Indonesian rule imposed on East Timor in 1976, a year after
the departure of East Timor's Portuguese colonial rulers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6417</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAAXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / German attacks on foreigners rise
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Violent attacks on foreigners living in Germany are rising significantly,
with most incidents committed in western Germany and by young people,
according to a report by the Interior Ministry of Lower Saxony.
Between January 1 and November 8, right-wing extremists used violence
against 1,760 people, compared to 1,483 over the same period last year.
Eleven people have been killed this year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6418</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAAWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Swiss bank chief rejects criticism
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN RODGER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ZURICH
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Markus Lusser, president of the Swiss National Bank, has rejected
criticism by the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development
(OECD) of the central bank's monetary policy, Ian Rodger writes from Zurich.
'The significant fall in inflation confirms that our way is right,' Mr
Lusser said in a speech in Basle. Swiss inflation has declined steadily from
a peak of 6.6 per cent in mid-1991 to to 3.5 per cent last month.
The OECD said in its annual survey of the Swiss economy, published last
week, that the SNB's policy leads to confusion in financial markets about
exchange rate and monetary policy objectives.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6419</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAAVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / De Klerk rejects plea by inquiry judge
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATTI WALDMEIR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PRESIDENT F W de Klerk yesterday rejected a request from Judge Richard
Goldstone, head of a judicial commission into political violence, for added
powers to investigate the South African security forces.
Judge Goldstone, who met the president yesterday in Pretoria, said this week
he could not properly investigate the security forces - focus of a political
scandal after revelations of a military intelligence plot to discredit the
African National Congress - without added powers and resources.
Mr De Klerk said last night he saw no need to increase Mr Goldstone's
powers. He said additional policemen would be assigned to assist the
inquiry, but implied that these were not to be used for probing covert
intelligence activities.
Pretoria has come under severe criticism from opposition parties in South
Africa, as well as from abroad, over its decision on Wednesday to launch an
internal military inquiry into such activities. The head of the military
investigation, General Pierre Steyn, is to conduct his investigation in
parallel with Judge Goldstone.
The fact that the investigation is to conducted by a serving officer, and
not by an independent judicial commission, has cast doubt over its
impartiality.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6420</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAAUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Pessimistic companies cut back on investment
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHARLES LEADBEATER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JAPANESE companies are making deeper than expected cuts in investment as
they become pessimistic about the economic outlook, according to a clutch of
official figures released yesterday.
The Ministry of Trade and Industry reported that a survey of 1,808
businesses in October found investment would fall by 3.9 per cent in the
financial year to next March. A similar survey in March this year forecast
that investment in the following 12 months would fall 1.4 per cent.
Meanwhile the economic planning agency published its closely-watched index
of leading economic indicators, which suggests the economy will contract for
at least another three to six months.
Miti said companies were becoming increasingly cautious about investment as
the economic downturn gathers pace. A big fall in consumption means that
inventories of unsold products are still growing despite deep cuts in
production.
The cuts in investment will be particularly pronounced among manufacturers.
Manufacturing companies expect to cut investment this year by 11.9 per cent.
In the electronics and motor industries the cuts will be about 16 per cent.
In March the companies had forecast an 8.9 per cent cut in manufacturing
investment.
The contraction in investment is gradually spreading to non-manufacturing
sectors such as retailing. Non-manufacturing companies forecast a 1.9 per
cent cut in investment; earlier they forecast a 3.4 per cent increase.
The report said companies were cutting investment in all areas which did not
directly contribute to improvements in short-term profits. Even previously
sacrosanct areas such as research were being cut as well as investment in
labour-saving machinery.
Investment in the next financial year is expected to be a further 1.5 per
cent down on this year, according to the report. However, most companies
said they could not predict their plans because the economic situation was
so uncertain.
Household consumption, especially of consumer goods such as electronics, is
still stagnant, according to a household spending survey. Spending rose 0.8
per cent in September from the same month last year, according to a survey
by the Management and Co-ordination Agency.
Despite the recent pick-up in housing starts, sales of household items such
as electrical appliances were 11.6 per cent down on last year, while
spending on transport and communication was 10 per cent lower.
However, Japanese families are still spending heavily on what they regards
as necessities, such as their children's education, which enjoyed a 14.5 per
cent rise in expenditure.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6421</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAATFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Japan's leaders to testify on scandal: Ruling party backs
down after opposition blocks economic package in parliament
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHARLES LEADBEATER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
JAPAN'S parliament yesterday cleared the way for debate on the long delayed
Y2,990bn (Pounds 16bn) supplementary budget to boost the economy after the
ruling Liberal Democratic Party agreed to produce three key figures at the
heart of the Tokyo Sagawa Kyubin scandal for questioning.
The budget, which is central to the implementation of the Y10,700bn
emergency public spending package announced in August, has been held up for
more than two weeks by the dispute over testimony about the scandal.
The LDP, under heavy economic and political pressure, agreed to opposition
demands that Mr Hiroyasu Watanabe, the former president of Tokyo Sagawa
Kyubin should give evidence under oath.
Mr Watanabe's testimony could provide the long running scandal with a new
lease of life by linking up to 12 LDP leaders to his former company, which
made illegal donations to politicians.
In court this month Mr Watanabe alleged that he gave money to several LDP
leaders. It is also alleged that Mr Watanabe acted as an intermediary
between LDP politicians, right wing nationalists and organised crime
syndicates.
Mr Watanabe is in prison during his trial on breach of trust charges brought
by his former employer, a leading trucking and courier company. It is not
clear when or where he will be questioned.
The LDP also agreed that Mr Noboru Takeshita, the powerful former prime
minister and Mr Shin Kanemaru, the former leader of the LDP's largest
faction should give sworn testimony.
Mr Takeshita is likely to testify next Thursday, while Mr Kanemaru is likely
to be questioned at his hospital bedside after undergoing eye surgery next
week.
Mr Kanemaru recently resigned from parliament after admitting that he had
received an illegal political donation of Y500m from Tokyo Sagawa Kyubin in
1990. Mr Takeshita faces allegations that he enlisted the company's help to
ask organised crime syndicates to quell a right wing smear campaign against
him when he was seeking to become prime minister in the late 1980s.
The parliament's budget committee began work on the supplementary budget
immediately by questioning Mr Tsutomu Hata, the finance minister. The
committee will question the cabinet on the budget next week.
Although the agreement is a reflection of the public pressure on the LDP
over the affair, it also marks an important step in its attempt to regain
the political initiative after more than two weeks of drift and stalemate.
In the past few days the party has come under increasing pressure from
business leaders to break the parliamentary impasse which has held up the
budget.
Mr Kiichi Miyazawa, the prime minister has attempted to respond to business
criticism and assert his authority over the fractious squabbling at the top
of the party by calling on the finance ministry to draw up plans for an
expansionary budget for 1993.
The LDP also signalled yesterday that it may be prepared to amend its
limited proposals for political reform by taking on board some of the
opposition's demands.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6422</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAASFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Lone farmer blocks Japan's gateway to the world: A system of
consensus that means things sometimes do not happen at all, even
international airports
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GORDON CRAMB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT COULD almost be England. Sturdy hedgerows flank the narrow lane. A Boeing
grinds overhead through a grey sky. At the farmhouse, a marmalade cat
appraises arrivals.
But the farm, owned by 69-year-old Mr Kohei Ogawa, lies in Japan's Chiba
prefecture. Chiba is also home to Narita airport - the scruffy, overcrowded
first port of call for most of the 3.5m visitors to the country each year.
For more than 20 years Narita has caused a bitter dispute between farmers
and those who want their land for a bigger airport.
Mr Ogawa and seven other farmers whose land is directly threatened by the
extension plans have been locked in battle with the government for 26 years.
The dispute has the hallmarks of a Japanese political tussle - intrigue,
faction fighting, hidden agendas, dirty tricks, even death.
Last month the Tokyo high court ruled that the government was entitled to
procure land for the project. Rejecting a complaint by 39 farmers (most of
whom were contesting the expansion on noise grounds), Mr Shigeru Sato, the
judge, said that 'public benefits from the construction of the airport
outweigh the disadvantages to local citizens.'
But the ruling will go to appeal. The building of the first of two
additional runways, with which Narita wants to double its capacity to
220,000 flights a year, is no nearer. A total of 23 other lawsuits are
pending, and Japan's civil legal system - the latest case stemmed from a
lower court finding in 1984 - can be as circular and slow-moving as a
baggage carousel.
The Narita dispute vividly demonstrates that Japan's consensual way of
getting things done sometimes means they do not get done at all. 'A few can
hold up something which would benefit the whole country,' observes Ms
Victoria Menendez, airline analyst with Jardine Fleming in Tokyo.
Even if all went well, a new runway would not be ready before 1996.
Meanwhile, carriers are being required to provide funds for terminal
facilities which cannot until then be properly used.
Inside the farmhouse where the runway would be, Mr Ogawa brings out a
dog-eared ring-binder containing an application from the airport authority
dated September 13 1969. The submission tells the Transport Ministry that
three quarters of the land has been bought and the rest will be no problem.
Completion is expected in March 1974.
The protestors' main ground for objection is that the government pushed
ahead with the project - Narita with its one runway opened eventually in
1978 - without securing adequate local backing. But the issues are muddied,
and Mr Ogawa has grudges against the government which go back much further.
After the war, the family lost land in a government reorganisation of
agriculture. In 1969, he took the government to the supreme court to
challenge his father's death duties, arguing unsuccessfully that these did
not recognise that the property was farmland.
'This has been going on for the past 26 years, I'm still here, I have been
deceived by the government but not defeated,' he says. 'The government
started from the wrong place - like buttoning a shirt, if you get it wrong
you have to go back to the beginning.'
Although Mr Ogawa is one of only eight farmers whose land is under threat,
such is the faction-ridden nature of even the most localised Japanese
politics that the eight are split into three camps.
They differ, family feuds aside, on the use of violence and the extent of
the involvement of 'outsiders' in the campaign. The 39 who lost their case
last month were the residue of more than 1,600 original plaintiffs, most of
whom were affected on noise grounds. Some Y5bn (Pounds 27m) a year from
airport revenues goes on local environmental spending, most of it funded
through landing charges.
Mr Ogawa speaks for four households, the more radical Kitahara faction for
another two, and the Atsuta faction for the remainder. Atsuta, the only
faction to be involved in round-table talks with the authorities - which
began a year ago and on which both pin wan hopes - is now deemed the most
moderate. Its spokesman, Mr Hiromishi Ishige, admits his own commitment has
also led him to the borders of legality. 'In the past we and the government
fought even dirtier than the yakuza,' Japan's tattooed and intimidating
gangsters. 'People were killed.'
Four policemen and two protesters died in the early 1970s, three of the
police in a 1971 incident where the government demolished a house. A friend
of Mr Ishige (and the apparent culprit) committed suicide immediately
afterwards.
Incidents continue. The new home of a former airport opponent was bombed
this summer after he sold up and moved three years ago.
The talks have brought a pledge from the government not to take land by
force, although Mr Ishige concedes that the legal power to make a compulsory
purchase order does exist.
'The Narita issue is something to do with the whole trend of the world,' he
argues. 'Ten years ago the government ignored our proposals to solve it by
negotiation. The Japanese economy was growing fast and the government
thought it could take the leadership. This was neo-nationalism. After the
cold war ended, there has been and there must be less emphasis on conflict.'
At the Transport Ministry an official says only that the authorities will
'continue negotiations with landowners peacefully and rationally.' And, it
still appears, inconclusively.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6423</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAARFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Yeltsin wins over South Koreans
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BURTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SEOUL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PRESIDENT Boris Yeltsin left Seoul yesterday having won the confidence of
South Koreans and dispelling much of the distrust that South Koreans have
harboured against Russia since the Korean war.
Symbolic gestures, such as Mr Yeltsin's personal delivery of the 'black box'
from the Korean airliner shot down by the Soviet Union in 1983, were meant
to convince the public of Russia's friendly intentions.
Mr Yeltsin also assured his hosts that Moscow was ending its military
support of North Korea, while supporting South Korea's demand that Pyongyang
accept spot inspections of its suspected nuclear weapons facilities.
The signing of several accords, including one establishing regular bilateral
consultations and another on military co-operation, appears to place
Moscow-Seoul relations on a firm foundation only two years after the
countries established diplomatic links.
But Mr Yeltsin may still be disappointed if he expects these measures will
result in a sharp increase of Korean investment in Russia.
One indication of the troubles involved in economic ties was the failure
yesterday to sign an agreement establishing an Korean industrial complex at
the port of Nakhodka.
Although a contract was signed on a feasibility study for the joint
development of natural gas reserves and construction of a gas pipeline to
South Korea, this massive project will take at least 20 years to complete if
undertaken.
Korean companies, meanwhile, are more attracted by the immediate gains
promised in the rapidly developing Chinese market. Korean direct investments
in China are 10 times larger than in Russia.
In the context of South Korea's Nordpolitik policy to isolate North Korea,
China is also considered to be more important than Russia because it has
greater influence in Pyongyang.
Seoul wants to use Beijing's influence to persuade North Korea to make
concessions on the nuclear issue and open up its economy to market forces.
By selecting South Korea as the first nation he visited in Asia as Russian
president, Mr Yeltsin was also perceived as delivering a diplomatic snub to
Japan over the Kurile Islands dispute.
Russian officials indicated that Moscow's closer economic ties with Korea
would force Tokyo to make a concession on the territorial issue.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6424</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAAQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Sweden EMS rebuff before flotation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LIONEL BARBER and DAVID MARSH
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS, FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SWEDEN was given a final rebuff in its efforts to link the krona to the
European Monetary System last Monday, just three days before a wave of
speculation forced the central bank to abandon its policy of pegging the
krona to the European currency unit.
The rebuff was delivered by the European Monetary Committee, the 26-strong
committee grouping senior EC treasury and central bank officials, which lies
at the heart of EC economic and monetary policy, senior officials in
Brussels and Stockholm said yesterday.
The rejection was a blow for Mr Carl Bildt, the Swedish prime minister, who
pushed for associate membership of the EMS to form links with a more stable
exchange rate framework ahead of Sweden's planned EC membership in 1995.
The disclosure that the EC appeared to have turned its back on the country
may spark controversy in Sweden, where opposition to Community membership
recently broke the 50 per cent level.
Mr Helmut Schlesinger, president of the German Bundesbank, yesterday
criticised as 'mistaken' Sweden's policy of trying to peg the krona to the
European currency unit.
The Bundesbank maintains that the Ecu is the wrong unit on which to base
either the European monetary system or economic and monetary union.
At a banking conference in Frankfurt, he said Sweden's decision to float the
krona could help correct 'misconceptions' about the fixity of European
exchange rates.
Mr Schlesinger called the Ecu 'a currency which doesn't really exist'.
Although he did not specify the D-Mark, he recommended a 'natural currency'
as the best yardstick for a currency like the krona.
Sweden's request for a more formal exchange rate link with the EMS dates
back to its decision in June 1991 to link the krona to the Ecu. Both Norway
and Finland prospective EC members, expressed interest in associate
membership of the EMS.
A Swedish official said the Swedish request for associate membership of the
EMS was not new, but last Monday 'the door was closed'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6425</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAAOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Germany acting to strengthen Euro-MPs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By QUENTIN PEEL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GERMANY is set to approve a string of key constitutional amendments which
will ensure no further steps are taken towards European union without real
strengthening of democratic control at the level of the European parliament.
The parliamentary committee set up to prepare the Maastricht treaty on
European union for ratification will complete its work on Monday, paving the
way for changes that will also significantly extend the power of the German
Lander, the 16 federal states, over EC legislation.
Mr Gunter Verheugen, the Social Democrat chairman of the committee, said
yesterday no further moves towards European union would now be possible
without fulfilling the German constitution's strict conditions.
'There will be no approval of a European defence union without ensuring that
the democratic deficit has been removed,' he said.
At the same time, there would be no move to final implementation of European
economic and monetary union (Emu) without the express approval of the two
houses of the German parliament, the Bundestag and Bundesrat, in a joint
resolution.
Mr Verheugen also claimed victory for the parliamentarians over the
government, to ensure that only a European central bank, as strictly defined
in the Maastricht treaty, could be set up. He suggested that the
government's looser wording would have allowed another form of European
central bank to go ahead, for example between just Germany and France, even
if Maastricht was not ratified.
The Bundestag is due to vote on ratification of the treaty, and on the
constitutional amendments, on December 2.
The constitutional amendments require that future transfer of national
sovereignty to Brussels will need a two-thirds majority in both houses. Mr
Verheugen said that would affect any moves to increase defence co-operation,
and co-ordination at a Community level of police work and law enforcement.
At the same time he expressed considerable pessimism about the prospects for
ratification of the Maastricht treaty, insisting that Denmark's objections
could not be met in any form short of full treaty amendments. Such
amendments were unacceptable to other member states.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6426</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAANFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Nato to enforce Yugoslav embargo: Ships suspected of
violating UN trade ban may be stopped and searched
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LAURA SILBER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NATO agreed yesterday to enforce the United Nations Yugoslav trade embargo,
giving its ships in the Adriatic Sea power to stop and search ships
suspected of violating the ban, Nato sources said yesterday.
The decision by Nato coincided with a similar one by the Western European
Union (WEU) defence grouping, which announced in Rome that it had ordered a
full naval blockade in the Adriatic to tighten the economic noose around the
rump remainder of Yugoslavia.
The decisions came as Mr Cyrus Vance, the international mediator, accused
local Serb authorities of violating the UN peace plan in eastern Croatia.
Mr Vance and Lord Owen, co-presidents of the Geneva Conference on the former
Yugoslavia, made a two-day visit to UN peacekeeping zones in Serb-held
territory in Croatia in an attempt to break the deadlock over
demilitarisation.
The Vance plan, agreed on January 3 by the presidents of Serbia and Croatia,
calls for the disarming and disbanding of paramilitary units and the return
of refugees to the four UN zones.
Mrs Blandina Negga, UN civil affairs officer, yesterday said: 'We have
become deadlocked with the local authorities. The militia has refused to
give up its arms.
'They are not in favour of any refugees returning. Until the militias are
disarmed no civilian will be safe. No refugees can return.'
One UN official said: 'The whole situation is sliding.'
In Rome Mr Salvo Ando, the Italian defence minister, said he expected the
Nato and WEU blockade would begin on Tuesday at midday. But details of the
operation would be settled on Monday when WEU and Nato officials met to
settle procedures. There are five vessels in the Adriatic under the aegis of
the WEU and seven attached to Nato.
Nato ambassadors meeting at the North Atlantic Council approved the plan in
line with Monday's United Nations Security Council resolution calling for
enforcement of the ban.
The WEU said it committed its members to order their aircraft and warships
to ensure 'strict implementation of the (UN) embargo at sea' against Serbia
and Montenegro, the two republics making up what is left of the old Yugoslav
state.
Nato sources said the rules of engagement agreed for the alliance ships
would allow them to stop and search suspect vessels to prevent illicit cargo
from reaching the former Yugoslavia.
Nato and the WEU have shared patrolling duties in the Adriatic Sea since
July to monitor ships suspected of breaching the trade embargo, but they
have not had power until now to halt vessels or order them to turn back from
their intended destinations.
Serbian President Slobodan Milosevic will stand in early elections on
December 20, the ruling Socialist Party announced yesterday.
Mr Milosevic is seen by the international community as the main instigator
in the violent break-up of Yugoslavia in recent years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6427</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAAMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Major relishes credit for deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS, Political Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR JOHN MAJOR last night appeared on the steps of Downing Street to
characterise the Gatt agreement between Europe and the US as 'the best
possible news' for the world economy and a triumph for the British
presidency of the European Community.
Exuberant that his intensive diplomacy over the past few weeks had helped
avert a transatlantic trade war, Mr Major voiced confidence that the
outstanding issues in the Uruguay trade round would be quickly settled.
The British prime minister, who has harangued and harassed Mr Jacques
Delors, the EC Commission president, to ensure the Community's negotiators
reached an agreement with Washington, won the immediate congratulations of
Mr Howard Davies, the director general of the Confederation of British
Industry. 'It's quite clear that the prime minister was personally involved
and we congratulate him for it . . . It would have been very serious to have
no settlement,' Mr Davies said.
US President George Bush yesterday also praised Mr Major for 'his key role
in the negotiations'.
Mr Major, who has been desperate for a diplomatic success to stem a rising
tide of criticism from other governments in Europe as well as his own
electorate at home, brushed aside suggestions that France might yet seek to
veto the deal.
Reminding reporters that the Community's decision could be based on
qualified majority voting, he commented: 'I don't believe Europe will say No
to this deal when it is finally concluded.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6428</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAALFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / US farmers outraged at burning flags in Paris: Agricultural
lobby feels wronged by comeback on 'patience and generosity'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID DODWELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DOWN on Bluebird Farm, near Tallahassee, north Florida, Mr Steve Yoder has
seen his soyabean acreage steadily dwindle over the 1980s - from 1,300 acres
a decade ago to 450 acres today.
'While we were having to address the problems of surplus production in the
world, the Europeans were continuing to take advantage of that situation,
flooding the world with their oilseed surpluses,' he said in Washington
yesterday, furious over reports of French farmers burning the US flag in
protest at demands for reform of the EC farm subsidies regime.
The five-year oilseeds dispute, which has been at the heart of a wider US-EC
battle over Europe's farm subsidies, has for two years blocked progress
towards settlement of the Uruguay Round.
The ambitious plan to liberalise international trade would boost world trade
by Dollars 200bn a year by the end of the century, economists say.
Worse still, the US threat to impose punitive sanctions worth Dollars 300m a
year, mainly targeted at EC white wine exports, in retaliation for losses it
says US farmers suffer as a result of EC subsidies, brought the world's main
trading powers to the brink of a potentially calamitous tit-for-tat trade
war.
Mr Yoder, who is president of the American Oilseeds Association, was
ensconced in a suite at the down-at-heel Washington Hotel - its only virtue
being closeness to Blair House, where US and EC trade negotiators were
wrestling on Wednesday and Thursday this week to settle the dispute.
He was seeking to exert whatever pressure he could on negotiators to avoid a
US 'sell-out' on oilseeds, although he acknowledged that the American
government represents more than just farmers, who would not get all they
wanted.
What most inflames Mr Yoder is the suggestion that US 'inflexibility' on the
oilseeds issue has triggered an international trade crisis.
From his point of view, US farmers are on the side of the angels - or at the
very least have shown the patience of Job: 'We have been extremely patient,
working on the issue for six years, playing everything by the book,
following the rules of the Gatt.'
When the US first took a complaint to the General Agreement on Tariffs and
Trade in Geneva, subsidised EC oilseeds output stood at around 5m tonnes a
year. Binding agreements made in the early 1960s essentially made oilseeds
subsidies illegal.
So US farmers see themselves not as inflexible, but as generous in the
extreme, when they say they are willing to set a ceiling of 8m tonnes on
subsidised EC production.
The fact that EC production has risen to more than 13m tonnes a year since
1985, with French farmers enraged at the prospect of lowering the ceiling
even to 10m tonnes, should not weaken the justness of the US demands for
deeper cuts, Mr Yoder argues.
US soyabean farmers say the EC oilseed subsidy regime costs them Dollars 2bn
a year in lost sales and lower prices.
They have taken their case twice to Gatt, where independent dispute
settlement panels have endorsed their claims, and condemned EC practices.
In the meantime, US farmland under oilseeds has fallen from 76m acres to 57m
acres, and they have been prevented from growing other crops by long-term
set-aside schemes and restrictions on land sown to corn, wheat, cotton or
rice.
Oilseeds were once the US's largest export earner, with the second largest
acreage of any crop in the US, he says.
Conceding that EC farmers, including those in France, are likely to feel
pain as a result of production cuts resulting from the US-EC settlement of
the oilseeds dispute, he insists: 'We are not asking European farmers to do
anything that we have not already been willing to do ourselves.'
'It is not US farm policies that have created this crisis, but European
ones,' he says.
'We absolutely refuse to accept blame for the damage European farmers are
doing to the international trading system. The US is not the guilty party
here: the Europeans are the ones that have violated an international
agreement.'
Unable to find words that match his frustration and anger at the
anti-American antics of French farmers on the streets of Paris, Mr Yoder
simply says it is 'totally amazing' that US farmers should be accused of
unreasonableness after six patient years of pressing their case through
international legal channels, when French farmers are assaulting the US
embassy in Paris, and threatening sanctions against US farm exports, just
weeks after they detect that planned farm reforms may hurt their
livelihoods.
Let European farmers take their case against the US to the Gatt, wait six
years for two favourable rulings, and then threaten counter-retaliation, he
says.
'Then I would support them 100 per cent.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6429</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAAKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / French government faces fury at home
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BUCHAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FRANCE'S political predicament over the farm deal has been sharpened by
last-minute US concessions, which look likely to isolate Paris within the
EC.
The French agricultural lobby has geared itself, and most of the country, to
believe that almost anything the US can agree to must be bad for France's 1m
farmers. Correspondingly, therefore, the government feels it has to show the
strongest suspicion - if not opposition - towards the Washington deal.
'For, if we don't take a firm attitude on the Gatt, this government could
well fall,' Mr Jean-Pierre Soisson, France's agriculture minister, predicted
in an interview with the Financial Times yesterday.
Mr Soisson was last night adopting 'a firm line' to assuage the passions of
furious French farmers, who were burning the US flag in Paris and storming
McDonald's on the Champs Elysees, and who have even threatened to attack Mr
Soisson's own house in Auxerre. The mood in France is hardly conducive to
the calm study which Mr Soisson has called for to examine the
'compatibility' of the Gatt accord with the EC's recent reform of its common
agricultural policy (CAP).
He claimed that the 21 per cent cut in subsidised exports for each and every
farm product would be opposed by countries such as Denmark and the
Netherlands which would not want to see their cheese and milk product
exports so drastically curtailed. But the agreement on oilseeds is unlikely
to attract objections from Germany, France's crucial ally.
The narrower the gap between the Gatt deal and the CAP reform, the harder it
is for France to paint the former as black and the latter as at least
off-white. But it is certainly in these stark terms that Mr Soisson sees the
political consequences for his government, if it cannot plausibly represent
the Gatt deal as acceptable to the French public, and if it is not seen to
mobilise all possible opposition against the accord.
The first condition may now be impossible to fulfil, because it may be too
late to shift public opinion in favour of a Gatt deal. And, the French
government may now be prisoner of its own anti-Gatt mobilisation plans.
The starting gun for mobilisation is due to go off next Wednesday. With a
Commission report before it from Mr Ray MacSharry, EC agriculture
commissioner, on the compatibility of the Gatt deal with the CAP, the French
cabinet will produce a draft resolution to be debated by parliament that
afternoon. It will commit itself to abiding by whatever parliament decides.
'In EC negotiations, John Major tells us incessantly that he cannot move
because of the House of Commons, Helmut Kohl says he has to be careful of
his fragile coalition and of the Bundestag, the Danes are always saying they
must heed their Folketing,' Mr Soisson said. 'Well, we are not so free with
regard to our parliament as many of you (outsiders) think.' A French
president may be above parliament, but his government is not.
'If we do not take a tough stand on Gatt, the Communists will vote against
us,' predicted Mr Soisson. This happened last June. The Socialist government
was saved only when Mr Raymond Barre, the centrist leader, and one or two
others decided not to support a censure motion that failed by just three
votes.
Looming, too, are next March's parliamentary elections. According to Mr
Soisson, 'the outcome in some 150 seats will be determined by the
government's attitude to the Gatt.' That would make the difference between
the Socialists succumbing to likely defeat, or being swamped in a certain
landslide. 'Agriculture still determines parliamentary majorities in
France,' the minister said. An unreformed electoral system, which gives the
countryside more deputies per voter than the cities, 'gives agriculture a
political weight that is out of proportion to the number of farmers'.
Mr Soisson criticised - in more measured tones than some of his government
colleagues - the UK presidency for trying to rush through a Gatt accord in
order to 'have something for their Edinburgh summit, because they haven't
got much else to show'.
If a Gatt deal proves incompatible with the new-style CAP, Mr Soisson said
there might have to be 'a reform of the reform'. But he concedes this could
be disastrous. 'Everyone will have their own strong demands, and we will
never agree.' This, he suggests, must have entered into Washington's
calculations. Reforming the reform could produce no CAP at all, and European
farming would henceforth go into decline.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6430</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAAJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Schlesinger firm on interest rates
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WALLER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MINIMAL room exists for German manoeuvre on interest rates, Mr Helmut
Schlesinger, Bundesbank president, warned yesterday, in remarks which will
dampen widespread hopes of a cut in German rates this year.
Speaking at the European Banking Congress in Frankfurt, he emphasised that
the Bundesbank's policy is aimed at medium-term price stability, cautioning
that this goal is being challenged by sharply growing money supply, strong
credit growth, considerable price rises and the weakening of the D-Mark
against the US dollar.
By sticking to its policy objectives, the Bundesbank was simultaneously
doing the best it could to ensure stability in Germany, and helping the
process of economic and monetary integration in Europe, he argued.
His speech contained a highly sceptical assessment of the path to monetary
union as outlined in the Maastricht treaty. He said that monetary union was
desirable and realisable - but not necessarily within the timetable laid
down in the treaty.
The treaty specifies that countries should complete the process of monetary
union before the end of the decade. Mr Schlesinger said that the timetable
should not be regarded as a 'straitjacket'. Going beyond his prepared text,
he said that the timescale could even be prolonged if things developed in a
more difficult way than expected.
He laid heavy emphasis on the economic convergence criteria that have to be
met before the move to monetary union. He said these were not excessively
ambitious, but the path to fulfilment would lead to a painful process of
adjustment in some countries.
'You don't have to be a prophet to see that setting up a European central
banking system, with the overriding commitment to price stability, will for
some countries mark a profound caesura with traditional ways of doing
things,' he said.
The Bundesbank's policymaking Council meets only twice more this year, on
Thursday next week and again on December 10, when a money supply target will
be set for next year. Any decision on whether to cut the key Lombard or
discount rates will be influenced by provisional data for October money
supply growth and November inflation, to be published next week.
The internationally sensitive Lombard rate is currently 9.5 per cent, cut
from 9.75 per cent in mid-September. The domestically important discount
rate stands at 8.25 per cent, cut from 8.75 per cent in September. Money
market rates are about 8.80 per cent, around a percentage point down from
the beginning of September.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6431</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAAIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / US puts Gatt before soya beans
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID DODWELL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
OILSEED farmers in the US may have been bitterly disappointed yesterday as
details of the US-EC settlement on their five-year dispute over Europe's
oilseed subsidies trickled out.
But a possibly disastrous trade war has been averted, and important
obstacles have been removed to a Uruguay Round trade liberalisation package
that could by the end of the decade boost world trade by Dollars 200bn
(Pounds 132bn). For that, even US oilseed farmers may have cause for
celebration.
According to Mr Dale Hathaway, a former US agriculture official, President
George Bush's negotiators 'decided that the future of the Uruguay Round was
more important than the soyabean case'. A leading farm lobbyist was more
philosophical: 'The deal offers a mixed bag, but it is the first time in my
22 years dealing with European farmers that their production will have to go
down, rather than up.'
On the critical issue of the US dispute with Europe over its subsidised
oilseeds production - which if unresolved by December 5 would have triggered
trade sanctions of around Dollars 300m against Europe's white wine exports -
the EC has agreed to limit production to 5.13m hectares. Mr Ed Madigan, US
agriculture secretary, said yesterday this would result in production of
8.7m-9.5m tonnes a year.
US oilseed farmers have insisted that anything above 8m tonnes was
unacceptable. But from current production levels of more than 13m tonnes,
the EC's cuts will be significant. As important, the US has won assurances
that no more than 1m tonnes of oilseeds output can be produced for
industrial use.
The EC has also agreed to binding arbitration if its output overshoots - a
litmus issue for the US, which has been increasingly frustrated over its
inability to make the EC in any way accountable for missed production
targets.
The most significant element of a wider farm trade deal is EC agreement to
cut its volume of subsidised farm exports by 21 per cent over six years. The
US was demanding 100 per cent cuts as little as a year ago, and even
recently has been calling for a 24 per cent cut.
Of compensating comfort to the US is an agreement by the EC to make
permanent two thirds of the land taken out of production as part of its
set-aside scheme. The EC target is to set aside 15 per cent of farm land,
but the US was concerned that rotation arrangements would eliminate any
possible set-aside gains.
The so-called 'Andriessen compromise' also forbids subsidised EC beef
exports to Asia.
Negotiators insisted yesterday that the farm trade breakthrough would
provide the momentum needed to resolve other outstanding obstacles to a
Uruguay Round settlement.
They have agreed to shift negotiations immediately to Geneva, where the
other 106 contracting parties to Gatt will have the chance to endorse the
EC-US farm deal. Most critical here will be the Cairns group of farm
exporting nations, which include such countries as Australia, Canada and
Argentina. There were no immediate reactions last night, but US negotiators
have remained in close contact with Cairns group officials during their
negotiations with the EC, and it is thought unlikely it would back a deal
without Cairns group support.
Focus will turn in Geneva to the other areas vital to a Uruguay Round
settlement - most notably agreement on trade in services, and on general
tariff reductions.
US and EC negotiators have agreed a common position on the contentious area
of financial services, and will in the coming days be putting fierce
pressure on countries like Japan, South Korea and the Asean states to
liberalise their markets in this area. Difficult negotiations also lie ahead
on trade in maritime services, on trade in audio-visual services, on
telecommunications, and on public procurement.
A joint EC-US statement said yesterday negotiators had agreed 'to seek
maximum liberalisation and minimum exemptions' in the areas of services and
market access.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6432</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAAHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Plenty more tough bargaining in store
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By FRANCES WILLIAMS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   GENEVA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AFTER nearly a year of sitting impotently on the sidelines while the US and
European Community scrapped over farm trade, Gatt negotiators are impatient
to get the six-year-old Uruguay Round of world trade talks moving once
again.
But trade officials, while delighted that the key to unlock the round is now
to hand, warn that much hard bargaining is still needed to secure a
successful conclusion.
The terms of the US-EC deal on agriculture will first have to be agreed by
all 108 countries taking part in the negotiations. While it would be highly
improbable for trading partners to throw out the long-awaited accord between
the world's biggest economies, there could still be lively discussion over
details.
That hurdle over, other difficult issues will come to the fore, especially
in the areas of services and improved market access for foreign goods.
As soon as the protagonists signal that they are ready to present their farm
trade deal, Mr Arthur Dunkel, director-general of the General Agreement on
Tariffs and Trade (Gatt), will call a meeting of the round's top-level trade
negotiations committee.
Negotiators will be asked to agree a work programme designed to wrap up
agreements on all 28 subject areas within three months. This is to meet the
March 1 1993 deadline for submission of a trade liberalisation package under
the US administration's 'fast-track' negotiating authority, which requires
Congress to approve or reject the package without amendment.
Changes in the dramatis personae also pose some tricky timing problems. Mr
Dunkel will want to get all the policy issues contained in the draft 'Final
Act' he presented to negotiators last December sewn up by the end of this
year, when Mr Ray MacSharry, the EC's agriculture commissioner, leaves his
post.
Officials acknowledge that detailed country-by-country negotiations on
tariffs and access to services markets, which form an integral part of the
Uruguay Round package, will probably run into February. But the bulk of the
work must be completed by January 20 when Mrs Carla Hills, US trade
representative, leaves office along with the rest of the Bush
administration.
Mr Dunkel will be concerned to minimise the changes to the draft 'Final Act'
so as to prevent a general unravelling of hard-fought and carefully balanced
agreements already negotiated. He has already said changes can be made only
by consensus.
Thus Japan and South Korea are unlikely to succeed in keeping their bans on
imported rice. The US will be told not to re-open talks on intellectual
property protection to gain a better deal for the US pharmaceutical and
entertainment industries.
More problematic will be services, where the US is refusing to liberalise
shipping, and the complex bilateral negotiations on opening services markets
to foreign suppliers are a long way from completion. Negotiations on tariff
cuts averaging a third on farm and industrial goods have also been
difficult, though officials say resolution of the US/EC dispute on farm
subsidies and tariffs should now give the talks momentum.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6433</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAAGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / French minister wants pound and lira back in the ERM
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT MAUTHNER, Diplomatic Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FRANCE 'earnestly wishes' to see the pound and the lira return to the
European exchange rate mechanism (ERM) as quickly as possible, Mr Michel
Sapin, the French finance minister, said in London yesterday.
He told the Royal Institute of International Relations the fact that there
was now a de facto core of two stable currencies in western Europe, the
D-Mark and the French franc, should not act as a pretext for the exclusion
of other currencies from closer monetary integration.
He was fundamentally opposed to a 'two-speed Europe', which would relegate
such an important participant in the Community's development as Britain to
the sidelines.
However, Mr Sapin, who held up the stability of the franc in relation to the
D-Mark within the ERM as one of the main reasons for France's economic
success over the past six years, was implicitly critical of the British
government's decision in September to float the pound.
A strong currency resulted in less imported inflation as well as the
obligation to keep up and constantly improve the economy's competitive edge.
A reduction of cost and price inflation, as had been achieved by France, was
a prerequisite for growth. To grow faster than others, countries had to sell
proportionately more both on domestic and foreign markets.
'I am convinced that the policy of competitive devaluation does not allow
one to reach this goal,' the minister said.
He said his government was examining further steps to restore confidence in
the system. These steps would be aimed at reinforcing the joint intervention
mechanism through 'voluntary' intervention.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6434</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAAFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Stock &amp; Currency Markets
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 ------------------------------------------------------
STOCK MARKET INDICES
 ------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE 100: 2,732.4 (+26.2)
Yield 4.41
FT-SE Eurotrack 100 1,051.29 (+3.36)
FT-A All-Share 1,294.43 (+0.8%)
FT-A World Index 136.64 (+0.2%)
Nikkei 17,033.6   (+162.29)
New York:
Dow Jones Ind Ave 3,227.36 (+17.83)
S&amp;P Composite 426.65 (+3.04)
 ------------------------------------------------------
US RATES
 ------------------------------------------------------
Federal Funds: 3% (3 1/8%)
3-mo Treas Bills: Yld 3.26% (3.219%)
Long Bond 100 1/32 (100 7/8)
Yield 7.532% (7.546%)
 ------------------------------------------------------
LONDON MONEY
 ------------------------------------------------------
3-mo Interbank 7 1/4% (7 3/16%)
Liffe long gilt future: Dec 99 31/32 (Dec 100 1/16)
 ------------------------------------------------------
NORTH SEA OIL (Argus)
 ------------------------------------------------------
Brent 15-day (Jan) Dollars 19.375 (19.425)
 ------------------------------------------------------
Gold
 ------------------------------------------------------
New York Comex (Dec) Dollars 335.3 (335.4)
London Dollars 336.35 (334.15)
 ------------------------------------------------------
STERLING
 ------------------------------------------------------
New York:
Dollars 1.513 (1.5385)
London:
Dollars 1.5205 (1.5325)
DM 2.4225 (2.42)
FFr 8.2025 (8.18)
SFr 2.1775 (2.195)
Y 188.75 (189.25)
Pounds Index 78.4 (same)
 ------------------------------------------------------
DOLLAR
 ------------------------------------------------------
New York:
DM 1.6055 (1.5715)
FFr 5.4225 (5.322)
SFr 1.4465 (1.4173)
Y 124.38 (123.35)
London:
DM 1.5935 (1.579)
FFr 5.395 (5.3375)
SFr 1.432 (1.4325)
Y 124.15 (123.45)
Dollars Index 65.5 (65)
Tokyo close Y 123.5
 ------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6435</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAAEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / World News In Brief: Doctor can return to work
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Dr Nigel Cox, a consultant rheumatologist convicted of the attempted murder
of a patient, can return to work early in the new year, subject to several
conditions.  Wessex regional health authority said.  He is expected to
respond by November 30.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6436</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Shake-up in ERM likely after plea by Spain
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER NORMAN and JAMES BLITZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A REALIGNMENT of currencies in the European exchange rate mechanism is
expected this weekend following a request from Spain to devalue the peseta
in the system, European monetary officials said last night.
The EC's monetary committee, which hammers out the details of realignments,
is expected to meet today in Brussels to consider other possible moves among
the eight currencies that are still full members of the European monetary
system.
It was understood that pressure was mounting on the Irish authorities to
devalue the punt, a move that was resisted because of forthcoming Irish
elections. Speculation in financial markets also pointed to the Portuguese
escudo as a possible candidate for devaluation within the ERM.
It emerged last night that Spain had been seeking a 5 per cent devaluation
of the peseta against the D-Mark for at least two weeks.
Denmark, whose currency, the krone, came under heavy selling pressure in
foreign exchange markets yesterday, has apparently refused to move its
central rate against the D-Mark. The French franc will also stay pegged to
the D-Mark at existing parities in recognition of the government's
franc-fort policy.
There was no question of either the Italian lira or sterling re-entering the
ERM this weekend.
It is thought that a realignment could trigger a cut in German interest
rates, although the scale would depend on the extent of the effective D-Mark
revaluation. Earlier yesterday Mr Helmut Schlesinger, Bundesbank president,
said there was minimal room for manoeuvre.
Reports of a possible realignment broke as trading in European markets had
virtually ceased. They caused an intense burst of speculation, pushing the
dollar up to a five-month high against the German currency of DM1.6090 as
dealers calculated that German interest rates would fall if there were a
weekend realignment. In New York it closed at DM1.6055.
Sterling finished in the US at Dollars 1.513 after closing at Dollars 1.5205
in London.
Amid a flurry of often conflicting news agency reports, the peseta fell
sharply to its ERM floor against the D-Mark of Pta72.649, while the escudo
fell to Es90.50, just above its Es91.75 floor against the D-Mark.
Last night's speculation followed Sweden's devaluation of the krona earlier
this week, which continued to cause ripples across the world's foreign
exchange markets yesterday.
Dealers believe the peseta, escudo and punt are overvalued against the
D-Mark, and need to devalue to boost economic growth.
EMS rebuff to Sweden, Page 3
Currencies, Page 13
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6437</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / 40,000 Civil Service jobs to be put out to tender
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN WILLMAN, Public Policy Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MORE THAN 40,000 Civil Service jobs are to be put out to tender over the
next year under plans to be announced next week by Mr William Waldegrave,
minister for the public services.
In a white paper to be published on Wednesday, Mr Waldegrave will set out
ambitious plans to increase the scale of 'market testing' government
services from Pounds 25m this year to Pounds 1.5bn in the next. Tendering is
expected to be completed by September, with the new contracts operating in
1994.
Staff already doing the work will be encouraged to bid for the contracts,
either as an in-house team, or through a management buy-out. If the staff
bid wins, the team will be required to sign a binding contract giving
details of the standard of work, methods of monitoring and enforcement of
the agreement. The government expects to make savings from market testing of
25 per cent of the value of the services, even when services stay in-house.
Since pay accounts for more than half of Civil Service costs, there are
likely to be significant job losses as a result of the process.
However, Mr Waldegrave will emphasise that improving the quality of service
is as important to market-testing as cost savings.
The range of services to be put out to tender is far greater than in
previous contracting out, which has been largely confined to support
services such as catering, cleaning and security.
Core Civil Service functions such as the collection of statistics and
running the Treasury's economic model are to be included. So, too, will key
defence work such as helicopter maintenance and ship repairs for the armed
services.
The largest part of the programme will be in information technology
services, including the running of the 12 large computers which hold Inland
Revenue data.
Payroll, legal services, audit, accountancy, typing and secretarial services
are also to be contracted out.
The lists of targets for contracting out have been drawn up by departments
with the assistance of consultants. Among their responsibilities has been
ensuring that there will be more than one company interested in bidding for
each contract in order to ensure that there will be competition.
Consultancy advice will be available to advise staff on structuring bids and
reorganising work to become more competitive.
In local government, such restructuring has enabled existing staff to beat
outside contractors for about 80 per cent of the work put out to tender.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6438</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Trade war averted as EC and US reach deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GARDNER, NANCY DUNNE and DAVID BUCHAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS, WASHINGTON, PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE European Community and the US last night settled their long-running
disputes over subsidised food exports, averting a threatened trade war and
opening the way to a worldwide free trade agreement.
The agreement on agriculture is more favourable to the EC than expected,
raising hopes that it could be sold to the French, who have strongly opposed
a deal - and last night refused to accept it immediately.
US president George Bush, announcing the deal, called on the 108 nations
participating in the Uruguay Round of talks on the General Agreement on
Tariffs and Trade (Gatt) to return to the negotiating table in Geneva and
'show the flexibility' that will bring the talks to a conclusion. He said
this would spur economic growth and create jobs around the world.
Mrs Carla Hills, US special trade representative, announced the withdrawal
of threatened punitive tariffs against the EC because of its oilseeds
regime, while Mr Ray MacSharry, EC agriculture commissioner who negotiated
the agreement, said 'the real victory tonight is for international trade'.
Mr Frans Andriessen, EC external affairs commissioner, said the deal meant
'that trade war has been avoided'.
He added: 'It is not the end of the road, but we are convinced that it will
unblock the stalemate in the Uruguay Round in Geneva.'
In London, Mr John Major, the prime minister, greeted the accord as 'the
best possible news' for the world economy and a triumph for the British
presidency of the EC.
The agreement is expected to be endorsed by EC trade officials, foreign
ministers and heads of government at the Community's Edinburgh summit on
December 11 and 12 - before farm ministers get any chance to pick it apart
on December 14 to 16.
The accord settles a five-year-old bilateral row with the US over EC
oilseeds production, and agrees terms on the farm chapter of the Gatt
Uruguay Round. Progress on the Gatt round has been delayed for two years by
the farm trade dispute, which also opened serious rifts in the EC.
Mr MacSharry said that 'the US and EC go united now to Geneva' to seek a
conclusion to the Uruguay Round by the end of the year, a sentiment that was
echoed later by Chancellor Helmut Kohl of Germany.
A global accord, which some estimates believe could add Dollars 200bn
(Pounds 132bn) to world trade within 10 years, needs the approval of all 108
Gatt signatories not only on agriculture, but on 14 other sectors ranging
from services to intellectual property.
Yesterday's deal between the US and EC involves an enforcement mechanism,
which includes binding arbitration, to ensure the limit on EC oilseeds
production. The EC also agreed that any new entrants to the Community would
have to limit their oilseeds production.
Under the accord, EC oilseeds production will be restricted to the 5.128m
hectares sown area contained in the EC's reform of the Common Agricultural
Policy (CAP), instead of being subject to a formal tonnage limit as had been
previously discussed. This suggests an output limit of 9.7m tonnes on this
year's crop yields, or 11m tonnes on the basis of last year's yields.
The CAP implies taking 15 per cent of land out of production, but the
agreement reached yesterday obliges the EC to 'set aside' only 10 per cent
of oilseeds land.
The overall volume of EC subsidised farm exports will be cut by 21 per cent,
rather than the 24 per cent prescribed in the Uruguay Round draft 'final
act'. Mr MacSharry said this was 'well within, with a good margin to spare',
the projections on output and exports of the CAP.
Direct payments to EC farmers in compensation for CAP price and production
cuts will be exempt from Gatt cuts. The US will also undertake to monitor
exports to the EC of its cheap cereals substitutes such as corn gluten in
exchange for EC export restraint. This is the so-called 'rebalancing'
demand, which had been made by both France and Germany.
In a cautious response from Paris last night, Mr Jean-Pierre Soisson,
agriculture minister, acknowledged that in certain respects - notably on
oilseeds - the Washington deal was better for Europe than what had been on
offer by the US two weeks ago in Chicago. But he still said that 'at first
sight, I cannot accept it'.
France was insisting on proof that the 'draft agreement' was in line with
recent reform of the EC's Common Agricultural Policy, the minister said. He
doubted whether the French parliament would accept the Gatt deal.
This left open the possibility that France could be outvoted by a majority
in the EC council of ministers. But if President Francois Mitterrand invoked
a veto the deal could collapse.
Such a move is thought unlikely without German support. Last night,
Chancellor Kohl's government endorsed the deal and said it formed a good
basis for an early conclusion of the Uruguay Round talks. However, German
farmers, siding with their French counterparts, denounced the deal.
US puts Gatt before soyabeans; French face farmers' fury; Major relishes
credit, Page 2
KEY POINTS OF THE AGREEMENT
EC oilseeds output to be based on 11m acres against 13.5m acres
Oilseeds for industrial use limited to 1m tonnes
10 per cent of EC oilseeds land to be set aside permanently
The US agrees a 'peace clause' on outstanding disputes
Subsidised EC farm exports to be cut by 21 per cent in volume over six
years. Value will be cut by 36 per cent, with internal supports trimmed by
20 per cent
An 'Andriessen compromise' not to export subsidised beef from the EC to Asia
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6439</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Good news for UK's exporters
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL CASSELL, Business Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IF THE cost to British business of a Gatt failure is incalculable, the
benefits to be derived from a speedy and successful conclusion to the
Uruguay Round should be substantial.
Unofficial government estimates, now being dusted off in Whitehall in spite
of France's immediate reaction, suggest that British exporters could be a
major beneficiary of a new global trade deal.
The Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development has suggested
that agreement would boost world gross domestic product by nearly Dollars
200bn (Pounds 132bn) a year and increase GDP within EC countries by at least
1 per cent.
If the Uruguay Round target of a 30 per cent reduction in tariffs is
implemented, Britain's visible exports - which account for more than
one-quarter of the nation's GDP - could rise by more than Pounds 700m a
year.
The benefits for invisible exports could be even more substantial. The
inclusion of services in Gatt talks could lead to a 10 per cent expansion in
world trade in areas such as banking, insurance and tourism.
EC exports in services could quadruple as a result of liberalisation
measures and Britain's prospects for additional trade - it already has about
8 per cent of the market in services - should be considerably enhanced.
The inclusion of improved protection for intellectual property will also
help many British innovators. The recording industry, for example, is
thought to lose about Pounds 1bn a year through counterfeiting or piracy.
Despite last night's response from France, UK industry welcomed the news
with a mixture of relief and hope that a deal could help restore domestic
confidence and end the recession.
Mr Howard Davies, director general of the Confederation of British Industry,
said the agreement was 'excellent news'. He was confident that remaining
obstacles could be overcome and that a new Gatt deal would emerge soon.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6440</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCAAAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Lloyd's offers new measures to Names
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LLOYD'S OF London announced new moves yesterday to help pave the way for an
ambitious negotiated settlement of legal actions by aggrieved Names,
underlining a mood of conciliation at the insurance market.
A six-month moratorium covering 3,000 Names is to be extended to a further
196 against whom Lloyd's has served writs to recover debts. Lloyd's
announced the moratorium - during which Lloyd's will take no action to
recover debts - earlier this month.
Separately, solvency rules, which govern the amount of money Names must
deposit with Lloyd's in order to continue underwriting, are to be relaxed to
enable tax rebates due to Names to be taken into account. At least 1,000
Names might benefit from the measure, which has followed negotiations
between Lloyd's and the Inland Revenue.
Mr Peter Middleton, chief executive, said both measures were designed to
'lower the temperature' at the market, and followed talks this week with
leaders of action groups of Names. Mr Middleton hopes negotiations designed
to achieve an 'arbitrated settlement' of the various legal actions between
Names and their agents could begin by as early as mid January. Lloyd's
'wanted to avoid three to four years of litigation. The primary
beneficiaries (would be) lawyers,' said Mr Middleton.
Last month Mr Middleton announced the formation of a working group of market
professionals and Names to examine ways errors and omissions underwriters
(which insure underwriters and agents against the cost of legal awards for
negligence) might contribute to a settlement.
A separate working group is examining the difficulty of open years, which
emerge when syndicate managers are unable to close years of account because
of uncertainty over the size of future claims.
Names have welcomed the move. Mr Alfred Doll-Steinberg, chairman of the
Gooda Walker Action Group, described the measures as 'superb' and said the
measures might defuse tension. He said Gooda Walker Names would reinforce
existing powers to take legal action when they meet on November 30, but he
is enthusiastic about the prospects of an agreement. 'We've got to offer
something in return,' he said.
Mr Christopher Stockwell, chairman of the Lloyd's Names Associations Working
Group, said he was 'delighted that Lloyd's is serious about talks'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6441</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAFLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Andrew Sansom - accountant: Obituary
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MR ANDREW SANSOM, 55, the secretary of the Chartered Association of
Certified Accountants, who has died unexpectedly, matched his commitment to
the accountancy profession only with the enormous breadth of his other
interests.
It was entirely in character that he was on a visit to the ballet when he
suffered a fatal heart attack on Thursday night.
Andrew Sansom brought a strong international perspective to his work with
the association, which reflected his considerable overseas experience. He
set strong administrative foundations for the organisation and developed its
overseas and educational activities with a combination of determination and
a courteous, gentlemanly style reminiscent of a venerable bishop.
He was an active member of the Church of England and his other interests
included opera, ballet, gardening and amateur dramatics. Conversation in his
company ranged far beyond accountancy.
He is survived by his wife and one son.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6442</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAEBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Arts: Misled institutions - Off the Wall
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTONY THORNCROFT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PERHAPS it is predictable that academic institutions should live in cloud
cuckoo land. That is certainly the case at Edinburgh University and at Royal
Holloway College whose administrators think they can solve their financial
problems by selling off works of art entrusted to their keeping.
Not only are they betraying their benefactors and stirring up ill will, but
the rewards will be disappointing. Their views on art market prices are at
least two years out of date. On the advice of a not disinterested auction
house, Royal Holloway had visions of raising Pounds 20m from selling works
by Turner, Constable and Gainsborough from the collection of its founder,
the Victorian pill king.
The prices paid this week at auction for British pictures (the few that
sold, that is) suggest it should revise its expectations to nearer Pounds
5m, or even less. Constable's 'Harnham Bridge' failed to reach its Pounds 1m
target and was unsold, as was an important Turner Venetian watercolour when
the bidding ran out at Pounds 400,000.
Edinburgh University slipped a copy of Audubon's Birds of America to
Christie's New York earlier this year and ended up over Dollars 2m richer.
It is trying to repeat the trick by selling either an Adrian de Vries
sculpture or a river scene by Jacob van Ruisdael. Once again the sum
anticipated, Pounds 5m, is ridiculously high, the more so if the University
thinks that the National Gallery of Scotland, which has had the van Ruisdael
on its walls since 1846, can somehow conjure up that sort of money to ensure
it stays in its natural home.
In addition both institutions are alienating their natural friends. As a
Grade One listed building, Royal Holloway could seek a grant from English
Heritage. Edinburgh is actually asking the National Heritage Fund for money,
money that is unlikely to be forthcoming given its current anti-art stance.
The National Heritage Fund has other things to worry about at the moment. It
was the chief sufferer from the inadequate arts budget achieved by Heritage
Secretary Peter Brooke last week. Totally out of the blue, its grant for
1994-95 has been reduced from the current Pounds 12m to Pounds 8.2m, with
Pounds 7.8m earmarked for the year after.
Why this successful institution, given the task of safeguarding the national
heritage, both artistic and natural, should be singled out for the axe is
unclear. Reports are that the entire arts and heritage budget was still
being finalised on the morning of the Chancellor's statement and the Fund
was regarded as the softest fall guy.
The budget was delayed because the Government got belated cold feet on its
original idea to mothball the British Library, and instead decided to lavish
money on the project in an attempt to finally finish it off. So Brian Lang,
current director of the Library, gained at the expense of the Heritage Fund,
which he headed in years gone by.
The Fund hopes that quiet lobbying will get its grant raised again by next
year's statement. Its importance as the ultimate guardian of national
treasures could become obvious in forthcoming months. There are many country
houses, hit badly by falling property and land values, who are tottering
financially and will look to the Fund to shore them up.
It may well do so, but only at the expense of saving works of art from
export. The Fund feels that many British antiques appearing at auction are
currently over valued. For example it is advising the V&amp;A, which is keen to
acquire James II's wedding suit, not to pander to the owners, the de
Sausmarez family, who suddenly raised the reserve from Pounds 200,000 to
Pounds 300,000 at Christie's this week. This made the V&amp;A's bid of Pounds
200,000 inadequate. The museum is still negotiating, but why offer more when
there is no obvious alternative buyer?
The same goes for the 43 intimate letters the Earl of Essex wrote to Queen
Elizabeth I in the 1590s. Sotheby's is offering them on December 14 at over
Pounds 400,000. The Fund thinks this is excessive, and will advise the
obvious purchaser, the British Library, to keep its saleroom powder dry.
Prints by Royal Academician Norman Ackroyd sell for at least Pounds 250 and
the work of Eileen Cooper, Albert Irvin, William Crozier and Julian Grater
for not much less. You can acquire a print by these artists for Pounds 38 if
you move quickly.
And there is more. For your money you get an annual subscription to Art
Line, the well informed if idiosyncratic magazine of contemporary art. You
also help a good cause.
Art Line exposed an art world confidence trickster. He filed a malicious
complaint of libel before fleeing the country. In amassing an overwhelming
defence against the charge Art Line acquired legal costs that could bankrupt
it. The artists have rallied round by producing the prints for free and
1,000 new annual subscriptions should clear Art Line's debt. Details from
Art Line, 11, Phoenix House, Phoenix St. London WC2H 8BS.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6443</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / International Company News: PepsiCo sells stake in Italian
snacks venture
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT and REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK, ROME
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PEPSICO, the US soft drinks, food and restaurants group, said yesterday that
it was selling its 49 per cent stake in an Italian salty snacks joint
venture company, PIA, back to the majority owner, SME.
The US group gave 'differences in philosophy' over investment strategies for
PAI as the reason for the sale.
No figure was disclosed for the price at which SME, the Italian
state-controlled food retailing and catering group, is buying out the
interest, although PepsiCo said it would make a 'small gain on the
transaction'.
Some Italian press reports suggested that the price was around L20bn
(Dollars 14.5m).
The venture, formed in 1987, produced a mixture of PAI brands of potato
chips and corn snacks, and PepsiCo snack brands, like Cheetos, a
cheese-flavoured nibble, and BocaBits, a wheat-based product.
Explaining the split in investment philosophy, PepsiCo said that it viewed
the Italian market as 'one of great opportunity'.
The US company said it would plough ahead with the marketing of its own
brands in Italy, and introduce several new products via its snack food joint
venture with General Mills, another large US food company.
IRI, Italy's largest state holding company, said its board would meet today
to decide the future of food group SME, which is expected to be privatised,
at least partially, Reuter reports from Rome.
SME's stock was suspended last Monday by the bourse authorities pending an
announcement by IRI. The stock has soared in recent weeks on speculation the
whole group might be sold by public offer.
But the Italian Treasury Ministry recommended in a report released on
Thursday that the food group be sold in parts rather than as a whole to
bring in more money.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6444</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEACDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / International Company News: Digital seeks a successor to
Shingles
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN CANE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Geoffrey Shingles, who has been at the head of Digital Equipment's UK
subsidiary since 1968, announced yesterday that he will give up the role of
chief executive from the beginning of next year.
But he will continue as chairman, a position he has combined with chief
executive for the past two years.
A successor is now being sought and is expected to be in post by the middle
of next year. Mr Shingles, 53, said the company was starting with no
preconceived ideas about his replacement, who could come from within the
company or from outside. But it was likely that the eventual choice would
have extensive operation experience with a modern, high technology industry.
Mr Shingles is the longest-serving head of any large UK information
technology company.
His change of role is the latest in a series of senior management changes,
including the retirement of founder and chairman Mr Kenneth Olsen and the
resignation of European head Mr Pier Carlo Falotti, which are reshaping
Digital Equipment world-wide.
Mr Shingles said his move had been planned for some time and was not a
disappointed reaction to the appointment of Mr Richard Poulsen as head of
Europe.
As chairman he intends to concentrate on developing relationships with
Digital's customers in industry and Government.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6445</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAB8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Redundancies cut Bulgin's profit
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Higher costs for redundancies and reorganisation have eaten into the profit
at AF Bulgin, maker of electrical and electronic components.
After the costs of Pounds 114,000 (Pounds 93,000), pre-tax profit fell from
Pounds 57,000 to Pounds 32,000 in the six months ended July 31 1992.
Earnings per share were 0.11p (0.16p).
Turnover in the period improved from Pounds 6.57m to Pounds 6.58m.
New products were being brought forward and the directors were encouraged by
the response to the Mini-Buccaneer range of compact water proof connectors.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6446</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAB4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / UK Company News: CountyGlen still engaged in talks
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
CountyGlen, the Irish property group whose shares are suspended, is still in
talks with another party which may or may not lead to an offer for it.
Meanwhile, a circular is being prepared seeking shareholders' support to the
sale of the property in Patrick Street.
In the year ended April 30 1992 the group incurred a pre-tax loss of IPounds
157,000 (IPounds 96,000) after exceptional credits of Pounds 107,000 (Pounds
118,000). Losses per share came to 6.1p (2.7p).
The auditors will qualify the accounts relating to the recoverability of
IPounds 292,000 which is included in debtors.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6447</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKWCEAAPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Social Democrats demand a new broad-based government in
Sweden
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT THOMSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Sweden's main opposition Social Democrats yesterday demanded a new
broad-based government of national unity, to deal with the country's
problems, Robert Thomson writes from Stockholm.
Mr Ingvar Carisson, party leader, called on the small Centre Party and the
Liberals to break from the coalition and join the Social Democrats in a new
administration.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6448</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKZCGAGWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Project to put jobless into work: US 'workfare' offers
example
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IVOR OWEN, Parliamentary Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A SCHEME based on US workfare programmes, in which unemployed people will be
paid a wage above the level of benefit to do work for the community, is to
be tried by the government.
Mr Patrick McLoughlin, junior employment minister, told the Commons
yesterday a pilot scheme would be conducted in the North Norfolk
constituency of Mr Ralph Howell, the Conservative MP who has campaigned for
the adoption of workfare in Britain for more than 20 years.
The minister emphasised that the government did not believe that the
unemployed should have to work in return for their social security benefit,
and that it had no plans to introduce a compulsory workfare scheme.
He suggested that the pilot scheme would help to establish whether greater
flexibility could be introduced into localised facilities for the
unemployed.
Mr Howell said of some form of workfare would enable unemployment benefit to
be ended by providing everybody with an opportunity to earn a decent wage.
He said unemployed groups from all over the country shared his view that
they would escape boredom and be better off by undertaking 'caring work',
tree planting or other jobs that improved the environment or infrastructure
 -for a wage of Pounds 100 for a 40-hour week.
Mr Howell said youth training schemes should continue, but when they did not
result in employment, no more young people should move into 'the
something-for-nothing society which has destroyed our whole social system'.
He emphasised that his proposals would not affect disablement and other
benefits. Arrangements would be needed to ensure that individuals entitled
to social security payments in excess of Pounds 100 a week were not
disadvantaged by whatever form of scheme was introduced.
Mr Howell urged the government to make some form of workfare scheme the
'cornerstone of plans to revive the economy'.
Mr Tony Lloyd, a Labour frontbench spokesman, rejected as 'socially
unacceptable' the creation of a society with some doing real jobs and the
remainder allocated second-tier, devalued jobs. He urged full employment.
He said the government had failed to honour the guarantee that all school
leavers would either be offered a job or a training place.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6449</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKZCGAGVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Midlands report glimmer of recovery in economy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL CHEESERIGHT, Midlands Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GLIMMERS OF economic recovery have appeared in the Midlands, according to
the regional councils of the Confederation of British Industry.
The east Midlands council reports that delayed investment plans are being
reconsidered and the west Midlands council has found an increase in export
orders.
In their first meetings since the Autumn Statement, both councils were more
cheerful about the immediate economic prospects than at any time for the
past six months.
Mr Bob Little, chairman of the east Midlands CBI, said: 'One is seeing the
government start to have an economic policy.' Mr Bryan Townsend, chairman of
the West Midlands CBI, said: 'There is cautious optimism - nobody wants to
get too optimistic because it's all gone sour before.'
Mentioning particularly the leisure, heating appliance and water-associated
industries, Mr Little said, 'There is evidence of the pulling forward of
investment plans.' But, for east Midlands companies, there appeared to be
little evidence of growing order books.
By contrast, in the west Midlands there had been an increase in export
orders over the last two to three weeks, Mr Townsend said. The increase had
been foreshadowed in the recent CBI-BSL regional trend survey, which noted
that much of any immediate increased export demand could be met from
accumulated stocks.
There has been no such increase in orders from the home market. 'I wouldn't
expect that all of a sudden things would turn round,' Mr Townsend said. But
Mr Little implied that the best prospects on the domestic market were in the
north of the UK.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6450</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKZCGAGUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / MMC takes a sniff at perfume prices: An investigation into
an industry that thrives on its image
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GUY DE JONQUIERES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE OFFICE of Fair Trading this week handed perfume manufacturers an early
Christmas present of the sort every industry dreads: a searching
investigation of its affairs by the Monopolies and Mergers Commission.
The MMC has the task of deciding whether the retail distribution practices
of leading perfume houses are genuinely being used to enhance the image of
their brands - or whether they are used to rig the market and keep prices
high.
The investigation is likely to determine whether the recent trickle of
perfume price-cutting by high street retailers turns into a flood. It might
also have important longer-term consequences for multinational companies
such as the Anglo-Dutch Unilever group, L'Oreal and LVMH of France, which
own many top fragrance brands.
Perfume makers have long insisted on choosing the retail outlets they
supply, to ensure their products are sold in a setting consistent with the
aura of luxury cultivated by their lavish advertising and marketing
campaigns.
That principle has been accepted by the European Commission, which recently
negotiated selective distribution agreements with Givenchy and Yves Saint
Laurent which are exempt from EC competition rules.
The agreements allow manufacturers to restrict supplies to retailers who
meet their standards of display, stock-holding and customer service,
provided they do not try to fix retail prices or inhibit cross-border trade.
The application of the agreements - and the operation of the industry's
supply practices more generally - has been challenged by Superdrug, the
cosmetics and toiletries chain, which has led an energetic campaign to bring
down perfume prices.
Superdrug, part of the Kingfisher retail group, began selling a range of
perfumes at discounts of up to 30 per cent at two high street outlets last
year. It has since expanded sales to 15 more and wants eventually to extend
the range to 200 of its 670 stores.
The company, which says normal retail margins on popular perfumes are as
high as 60 per cent, has so far obtained products on the international
'grey' market.
Because such supplies are scarce and prices higher than those paid by
authorised retailers, Superdrug wants to buy direct from manufacturers.
The company says it is prepared to comply fully with manufacturers'
standards - and has invested in special perfume counters at Pounds 20,000 a
time - but the big perfume houses have given it a wide berth. Givenchy
inspected one of its stores but rejected it as unsuitable.
Superdrug complains that Givenchy's assessment system is too subjective,
relying on an apparently arbitrary allocation of 'points' to features such
as the lighting and location of sales counters and the size of nearby
windows.
After a year of tireless lobbying by Superdrug, the OFT has asked the MMC to
investigate whether manufacturers are applying supply restrictions fairly.
The MMC will also look at the refusal by magazines to carry Superdrug
advertisements for cut-price fragrances.
Sir Bryan Carsberg, the director-general of fair trading, is concerned that
supply restrictions may be being used as an indirect form of retail price
maintenance and might violate EC competition rules in ways not sanctioned by
Brussels' exemptions. If the MMC found that was the case, it could make it
much harder to restrict supplies to discounters. Existing authorised
retailers might then face pressure to cut prices, as chains such as Boots
and John Lewis have done at stores that face local discount competition.
In most markets, lower prices would be offset by increased sales. But
perfume houses have always insisted that their product is different, and
that high prices are essential to the illusion of exclusiveness on which
their appeal depends. Discounters, they maintain, simply damage their own
business by devaluing the brand.
It will not be clear how far the perfume houses should be alarmed until the
MMC reports in nine months' time. Whatever it recommends, Superdrug can at
least take quiet pleasure in the extensive free publicity generated by its
high-profile lobbying campaign.
Elusive scent, Section 3
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6451</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKZCGAGTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Slight rise in optimism recorded
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMMA TUCKER, Economics Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OPTIMISM about the economy crept higher yesterday as share prices rose to
within a few points of their all-time high and a survey suggested that fewer
people felt gloomy about the economy in general.
A survey of consumer confidence by Gallup, the market research company,
between November 5 and 17 found that the Autumn Statement last week appeared
to have had a positive influence on people's expectations.
Pessimists continued to outweigh optimists about the general state of the
economy but Gallup said there was now a greater tendency to expect an
improvement than there was a month ago.
Other results were less promising. In particular, the number of people
expecting unemployment to increase reached its highest ever level. Four out
of five people expect unemployment to increase over the next 12 months.
The survey concluded a week of conflicting evidence on the state of the UK
economy.
Better-than-expected retail sales figures and an increase in bank lending
last month added to the bullish sentiment on the stock market yesterday.
Other official figures this week showed that output of the economy,
excluding oil and gas extraction, fell in the three months to September,
dragging the recession into its ninth quarter.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6452</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKZCGAGSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / UK savaged over its Community presidency
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Foreign Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITAIN faced a barrage of criticism over its role as president of the
European Community from three European capitals yesterday.
In Bonn, the UK presidency was denounced by a leading parliamentarian as a
'downright disaster', because of its failure to resolve Denmark's rejection
of the Maastricht treaty.
France joined Germany's criticisms when Mr Dominique Strauss-Kahn, minister
of industry and foreign trade, described the UK chairmanship as
'calamitous', and a Spanish official accused the UK government of simply
'trying to seek a consensus within the Conservative party' instead of trying
to reach consensus among EC partners.
The criticism came before yesterday's Gatt agreement, in which UK Prime
Minister John Major played a significant role. He last night brushed off the
attacks, suggesting the critics wait for the outcome of the Edinburgh summit
next month before passing judgment.
Speaking on French radio, Mr Strauss-Kahn accused the UK of creating
difficulties for France in the farm trade negotiations with the US.
'It is the most calamitous presidency I have lived through in all my time in
government,' said Mr Strauss-Kahn. 'The British have a manner of presiding
over the Community which puts us in very great difficult against the
Americans and I can hardly wait for December 31, when this community
presidency will be over.'
Mr Gunter Verheugen, chairman of the special committee of the Bundestag set
up to prepare ratification of the treaty, expressed deep pessimism at the
prospects for saving it in the face of Danish demands for far-reaching
amendments.
'It is a cause for very sharp criticism that the British presidency has
simply not exercised its leading and co-ordinating role,' he said.
'The British presidency in the second half of the year is proving to be more
and more of a downright disaster. I have real doubt that it will prove
possible to find an acceptable solution to the Danish problem in Edinburgh.'
He said the German parliament faced ratifying a treaty, and amending its
constitution, for something which would never come to pass.
In Madrid, the Spanish government served notice that it would block an
enlargement of the European Community unless there was prior agreement to an
increased Community budget and ratification by all the partners of the
Maastricht treaty.
'There is a logical sequence that has to be followed: first the Delors II
package, then ratification and then enlargement. The sequence was laid down
at Maastricht, it was agreed at the Lisbon summit in the summer and we do
not want it altered,' a senior Spanish official said.
Senior Whitehall officials said Britain still hoped to agree future EC
financing, a package of proposals to regain Danish support for the
Maastricht treaty, and the opening of talks on enlargement.
They were unsurprised by French criticism, in view of Mr Major's
determination to stop Paris blocking a Gatt deal.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6453</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKZCGAGYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921121
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 NOV 92 / Treasury achieves Pounds 8bn target from privatisation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE TREASURY hit its target of raising Pounds 8bn from privatisations this
year with the announcement yesterday that it had sold Pounds 1.3bn of debt
owed to it by BT and three power companies.
The sale followed a complex auction in which 13 privatised companies were
invited to compete to buy back debt they owed the government. Outside
investors were allowed to compete for the BT debt, injecting an element of
outside competition into the auction.
No prices were announced for the seven tranches of debt that were eventually
sold, making it difficult to assess how effective the process had been.
Baring Brothers, the merchant bank that acted for the Treasury in the sale,
said that on average the debt was sold at a price 1.15 per cent higher than
it had targeted.
Baring said the fact that a total of Pounds 5.8bn of bids was received was
also a sign that the process had been keenly competitive. Several bidders
and their advisers contacted yesterday also said the bidding had been very
competitive.
Seven of the privatised companies submitted offers for their own debt, with
bids eventually accepted from BT (Pounds 320m), PowerGen (Pounds 150m),
Scottish Hydro-Electric (Pounds 116m) and Scottish Power (Pounds 142m).
Two out of six banks that took part succeeded in buying BT debt for onward
sale to investors - UBS Phillips &amp; Drew (Pounds 229m) and Goldman Sachs
(Pounds 180m).
By buying back their debt, the companies will no longer have to pay the
government interest ranging from 11 1/2 per cent to 12 1/4 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6454</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAHEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: Laurentian advances 13% to
CDollars 9.5m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GIBBENS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MONTREAL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
LAURENTIAN GROUP, a Montreal-based financial services conglomerate, recorded
third-quarter profits of CDollars 9.5m (USDollars 7.4m), or 16 cents a
share, up 13 per cent from CDollars 8.4m, or 14 cents, a year earlier.
Results from its general insurance subsidiary improved.
Nine months' profit was CDollars 23.8m, or 39 cents a share, down nearly 9
per cent from CDollars 26.1m, or 45 cents, a year earlier. The 1991 period
included a special gain of CDollars 2.5m from the sale of a British
affiliate. Nine months' revenues were CDollars 2.1bn, up 7 per cent.
Corporate assets at September 30 were CDollars 14.4bn, up 5 per cent from
December 31 1991 and including assets under administration, the total was
CDollars 20.9bn, up 6 per cent. The gain in corporate assets was due mainly
to expansion by Laurentian Bank.
Teck, an internationally-owned diversified mining group, is expected to take
over the Baler and Greenhills coal mines in southern British Columbia from
the bankrupt Westar Mining. Teck bid CDollars 85m, with the backing of the
Bank of Montreal, Westar's largest secured creditor.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6455</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAHDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Alliance winding up order abandoned
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GIROZENTRALE Gilbert Eliott has abandoned its attempt to wind up a former
client, Alliance Resources, the Louisiana-based oil and gas company which it
brought to the market in 1991.
The broker has reached an agreement with Alliance over its claim for Pounds
38,346 in flotation fees. Cash-strapped Alliance had already paid Pounds
71,635 in fees but disputed the outstanding amount.
Alliance, which remains in receivership, also announced a series of board
changes, which resulted in the reinstatement of former chairman Mr John
O'Brien and the appointment of two new non-executive directors, Mr Marcus
Black and Mr John Craven. Mr Don Bealer, former vice-chairman, has resigned.
The group was put into receivership last month by the unquoted Manx
Petroleum, where Mr O'Brien is managing director.
Manx claimed that Alliance had defaulted on the terms of a management
agreement and a Dollars 200,000 (Pounds 132,000) loan following the surprise
dismissal of Mr O'Brien.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6456</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAHCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Arts: Hawks and Doves - Theatre
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALASTAIR MACAULAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Without having had a premiere in the West End, or at the National or RSC,
Louise Page has become one of our best known younger playwrights. She is
author of Salonika, Golden Girls, Real Estate and more; last year, her Adam
Was a Gardener premiered at Chichester; in recent months, Radio 4 has
broadcast two of her plays. According to her programme biography, her work
has been performed in 21 countries. And it is usually intelligent,
sensitive, touching, adult and absorbing.
Last year's Adam Was a Gardener was subtitled 'an evocative love affair
between the past and present'; Hawks and Doves, her new play now at
Southampton's Nuffield Theatre, is subtitled 'a love story for the '90s.' In
both plays, love commences between a man and woman from different
backgrounds, a love based on shared values, not least on affection for the
English countryside. But here the love is between an upper-class Southerner
and a lower-class Northerner; and it goes wrong.
So, unfortunately, does the play. It begins promisingly, like some law court
near-plotless modern version of the attraction between Jane Eyre and
Rochester. But it becomes increasingly like a North/South adaptation of
Howard's End - a too-simple-by-half depiction of heartless toffs (ie. hawks)
exploiting honest working or unemployed folk (ie. doves) and a
skeleton-in-the-cupboard melodrama to boot. The toffs breed peregrine
falcons, whereas one of the working-class Northerners fancies pigeons.
Both classes admire open countryside, wild birds and Mozart. These shared
sympathies are enough to get Otto out of his upper-class marriage to Julia
and into a new one with working-class Marie - but that isn't far enough.
When it comes to croquet, Julia and Otto insist 'You can only learn the
rules as you go along,' as they win. Marie, refusing to play any more,
replies 'Some people are born knowing them.'
Well, croquet is enough to wreck any marriage, but worse is the fact that
Otto is hiding from Marie his complicity in - well, in the plot;
professional discretion forbids me to say more. Suffice it to say that Marie
finds out, and the play ends - fatuously - on her reaction (vengeful) and
his (terrified).
Earlier, there have been a few other scenes more intensely dramatic than
Page or the play's director, Patrick Sandford, knows how to handle  - not
least when Marie rounds on her ex-husband Ken with the carving-knife.
Gillian Bevan, playing Marie, has a charming housewife-Cinderella manner,
but also has an unbecoming hairdo and too many dropped syllables. Michael
Simkins carries off Otto's mixture of wimpish sensitivity and lordly
authority well, but he can't stop the final moment of terror from seeming
risible. But everybody is wrestling with a poorly-paced script and weak
direction.
Remarkably, only young Alex Scott, as Marie's son Paul, creates a full
three-dimensional character. He is as first-rate as he was last year in Adam
Was a Gardener: spontaneous and vivid.
In addition to her other achievements, Louise Page is also one of the
scriptwriters for Radio 4's The Archers. But for which bits? The scenes
between Robin and Caroline in recent weeks seem to have been written for -
remember Round The Horne? - those ageing juveniles Binky Huckerback and Dame
Celia Molestrangler, forever playing Charles and Fiona. If Page is
responsible for their episodes, then I take back any kind word I've ever
said about her.
Nuffield Theatre, Southampton
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6457</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAHBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Parliament and Politics: Catering move
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
CONSULTANTS working for the Commons catering committee have proposed changes
to MPs' refreshment facilities, including setting aside Westminster Hall,
where Charles I was tried, for use by tourists.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6458</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAHAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / N-industry angry over funding cut
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID LASCELLES and ALISON SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE UK nuclear industry reacted angrily yesterday to the government's
decision to cease funding for research and development of the European fast
reactor, the joint programme by the UK, France and Germany. Others welcomed
the decision, given the uncertain outlook for nuclear power.
Mr Tim Eggar, energy minister, told MPs that the government had concluded
that it could not justify continuing the research, because design validation
had been completed and there was 'general agreement that the commercial
deployment of the fast reactor will not be justified until well into the
next century'.
He said that about 270 jobs would be lost: about 40 of them at Dounreay,
Caithness, and about 160 of them at Risley, Cheshire. Some 40 people were
also likely to be made redundant at Winfrith, Dorset.
In a joint statement, Nuclear Electric, Scottish Nuclear, British Nuclear
Fuels and AEA Technology - all government-owned - said they 'greatly'
regretted the move. Mr John Collier, chairman of Nuclear Electric, said
there were signs of growing interest in fast reactors in Japan, the US,
Russia and Spain.
In spite of Mr Eggar's insistence that the government was following a
recommendation by the cross-party Commons energy committee in 1990, that it
should review the position after the design validation process, he came
under attack from across the Commons.
Tory and opposition MPs warned with dismay of the consequences of the UK's
giving up its lead in this field, because it was impossible 'to mothball
nuclear physics'.
Rejecting the charge that the government was not committed to the research,
Mr Eggar said that during the past 40 years more than Pounds 4bn (at 1992
prices) had been spent on the project.
Dr Brian Eyre, chief executive of AEA Technology, said he was deeply
disappointed by the decision because the EFR project 'was within reach of
building a commercial demonstration plant'.
Mr John Chesshire, of the Science Policy Research Unit at Sussex University,
said the government was correct because of what he described as 'the major
reassessment' being made about the economics of nuclear power. He estimated
that uranium would have to be 15 times as expensive before fast breeders
could come into their own financially.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6459</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAG9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Pounds 1m award after water source is polluted
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A WATER company was awarded more than Pounds 1m damages yesterday against a
leather producer that was held liable for contamination of the public
supply.
The Pounds 1,064,886 award against Eastern Counties Leather, of Sawston in
Cambridgeshire, is expected to almost double when interest is added.
Three appeal judges in London ordered payment of the damages after allowing
an application by Cambridge Water against the refusal of a High Court judge
to make an award.
The leather company said it would seek leave to appeal to the House of
Lords.
Cambridge Water started using a borehole at Sawston Mill in 1979. In 1983
tests were introduced for the chemical perchloroethene. Traces many times
the permitted level were found in the water. The company ceased pumping and
had to pay for a new borehole at Hinxton Grange.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6460</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAG8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Port of Tyne wins Nissan exports deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRIS TIGHE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NISSAN, the Japanese car manufacturer, is to move its export and import
operations from Teesport to a new custom-built terminal on the Tyne near
Jarrow, it announced yesterday.
The arrangements will include the export of Sunderland-made Nissan cars to
30 countries, including Japan, a traffic contributing about Pounds 900m this
year in export earnings to the UK economy.
Winning the Nissan contract, initially a five-year deal from January 1994,
is an important coup for the Port of Tyne, which depends for nearly half its
annual cargo tonnage on highly vulnerable coal shipments.
Teesport is part of the port of Tees and Hartlepool, Britain's
second-biggest port. Nissan's decision is a blow for Teesside Holdings, the
consortium that bought the port for Pounds 180m early this year after a
privatisation battle.
The traffic of Nissan cars through Teesport originated in 1970 as an import
operation by the now defunct independent distributor Nissan UK. When Nissan
began exports from its Sunderland plant in 1988, it decided to use Nissan
UK's Teesport facilities.
When relations with Nissan UK broke down last year, the carmaker evaluated
its future shipping needs, assessing quality of service, cost and efficiency
levels offered by six north-east England locations. Criteria included deep
water, needed for Nissan's huge 5,500-car 'mother ships'.
Since 1988, Nissan has exported 357,000 Sunderland-made cars, nearly all
through Teesport, which this year is also handling 40,000 imported Nissans
built in Spain and Japan. Under the new deal, a few Sunderland-made cars
will still be exported through Southampton.
Output of Primeras and Micras at Sunderland - 175,000 this year - will rise
in 1993 to 270,000. At least 70 per cent will be exported. In 1994, Nissan
plans to export more than 200,000 Sunderland-made cars from the Tyne.
Mr Terry Hogg, director of production control at Sunderland, said the
working relationship with Teesport had been excellent but that Nissan's
operating conditions had changed dramatically, largely because of export
business growth.
'The Port of Tyne offered the most commercially viable alternative; that
included a purpose-built berthing facility dedicated to Nissan,' he said.
Because the Tyne is much nearer Nissan's Sunderland plant and adjacent
national distribution compound, car transporter movements will be reduced by
900,000 miles a year. Nissan's 37 Teesport employees will be offered
transfers to the Tyne terminal.
Neither party would disclose the deal's financial terms. Work will start
immediately on constructing three roll-on roll-berths for Nissan on 27 acres
of an 87-acre site.
In a terse statement yesterday, Mr John Holloway, chief executive of the
Tees and Hartlepool Port Authority, said the THPA was 'obviously very
disappointed'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6461</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAG7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Plant exploits power of the 'battery hen'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BAXTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITAIN switched on to poultry power yesterday with the official opening of
what is claimed to be the world's first commercial power station fuelled by
chicken droppings, giving new meaning to the term 'battery hen'.
The Pounds 25m powerplant at Eye in Suffolk generates 12.5MW of electricity
 -enough for 12,500 homes - from poultry litter: a mixture of wood shavings,
straw and poultry droppings that can be burnt at very high temperatures to
produce steam.
The plant will use 130,000 tonnes of poultry litter a year - nearly 9 per
cent of the 1.5m tons produced every year in the UK or enough to fill 25
football fields two metres deep.
According to Fibropower, the London-based company that has built the plant
and developed the technology, chicken power is generating worldwide
interest. Mr Rupert Fraser, finance director, said it could be used wherever
there was sufficient density of poultry droppings.
The fuel used at Eye represents the 'output' of 70m chickens. As the birds
are harvested every few months, that is equivalent to a population of 12.5m
birds at any one time - so the plant's output is produced at the rate of one
watt per chicken.
Mr Fraser emphasised that the plant used poultry litter only from broiler
poultry farms, where the birds live on a bed of deep litter. This provides a
regular fuel source as the chicken farmers have to clear their sheds
frequently, and a consistent fuel because of supermarkets' need for uniform
quality chickens.
Although the process is no more efficient than a similar-sized coal-fired
power station, Fibropower says that replacing a coal power station with
chicken power, along with the associated handling in poultry litter, will
reduce carbon dioxide emissions by two thirds.
The only significant by-product is ash, which will be sold as an
environmentally friendly, nitrogen-free fertiliser.
The Suffolk plant was one of 75 renewable-energy projects approved in 1990
and is the largest to start operating under the non-fossil-fuel obligation
of the 1989 Electricity Act. That obliges the 12 regional electricity
companies to take fixed proportions of the electricity available from
renewable-energy projects.
Eastern Electricity has taken a minority stake in Fibropower, and has
invested Pounds 2m at Eye and a slightly larger 13.5MW chicken powerplant
being built at Glanford, south Humberside, by Fibrogen, a Fibropower sister
company.
The duopoly of National Power and PowerGen must be destroyed if there is to
be a future for independent generators, Dr James Smith, chairman of Eastern
Electricity, the biggest of the regional distribution companies, said
yesterday.
Dr Smith, officially opening the power station fuelled by poultry litter,
said more, similar renewable-energy projects were needed in the future.
Independent generators needed a more competitive market, he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6462</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAG6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Flexibility for audit firms wins backing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NEARLY 90 per cent of business executives believe accountancy firms should
not be banned from providing non-audit services to companies they audit, and
85 per cent oppose enforced rotation of audit firms, a survey by accountancy
firm Coopers &amp; Lybrand says.
Only 56 per cent believe firms should be permitted to conduct actuarial
services, 58 per brand valuations and 64 per cent executive search.
The survey - conducted as part of a wider market-research exercise by Gallup
for Coopers - questioned 151 finance directors, non-executive directors and
chief executives of FT 500 companies last July.
The majority said accountants should be able to provide a range of other
services to the clients, but many directors felt auditors did not have the
expertise and knowledge to offer general business advice.
Just 5 per cent said their auditors' objectivity had been compromised by
providing non-audit services, and only 7 per cent did not think auditors
demonstrated integrity.
But 28 per cent said the threat of reduced audit fees - which has been
driven by competition - is likely to undermine integrity.
Some 79 per cent said auditors did not set unrealistically low audit prices
to secure non-audit work, and only 23 per cent had used their audit firm for
management consultancy over the last two years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6463</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAG5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Taiwan SE open to foreigners
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The Taiwan Stock Exchange, in an effort to stimulate its ailing stock
market, is to permit foreign brokerages to invest in Taipei. But brokers
said it was little more than a welcome signal that the government does not
want to see share prices go any lower.
Under the new guidelines, foreign brokerages with equity assets of at least
Dollars 300m (Pounds 197m) will be encouraged to invest an initial Dollars
50m in the market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6464</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAG4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Norwegian MPs vote to apply to EC
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   OSLO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Norway's parliament voted yesterday to apply to join the EC even though
opinion polls show most voters oppose membership, Reuter reports from Oslo.
Parliament voted 104 to 55 in favour of applying in a victory for Labour
premier Gro Harlem Brundtland.
Mrs Brundtland plans to travel to London on November 25, to hand an
application to British Prime Minister John Major.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6465</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAG3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / UK accused of holding up TV deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BRITAIN was yesterday accused of abusing its position as European Community
president and hampering progress towards an agreement on European
high-definition television.
At a meeting of EC telecommunications ministers, the UK refused to issue a
statement backed by its 11 EC partners calling for another meeting after the
Edinburgh summit to discuss funding for an EC HDTV strategy.
Instead, Mr Edward Leigh, the British industry minister chairing yesterday's
meeting, said the UK would 'reflect' on the demand and decide after next
month's summit.
Britain has several times been accused of putting its national interests
above those of the EC during the six-month presidency. In particular, other
EC members have attacked the UK's insistence on a detailed reexamination of
the EC budget proposals for 1993-97.
Mr Leigh's stance incensed the European Commission and other ministers. Mrs
Hanja May-Weggen, the Dutch transport and communications minister, told
journalists Britain was 'sabotaging' progress towards an accord.
Britain opposes the Commission proposal to pump Ecu850m (Dollars 1bn) of EC
funding into the promotion of wide-screen HDTV over five years.
Yesterday 10 member states - all except Britain and Denmark - agreed to back
the substance of the Commission's HDTV action plan, conditional on later
budget decisions.
Sitting alongside Mr Leigh at a press conference afterwards, an angry Mr
Filippo Maria Pandolfi, EC telecoms commissioner, said: 'In my judgment
everything is ready for an agreement except the financial position.'
Formal agreement on the action plan, which would fund consortia wanting to
provide wide-screen TV services in Europe, has to be unanimous.
Britain said its hardline position on the vital cash element of the plan was
backed by six other member states. They include poorer EC members, worried
that the five-year project might cut into budget proposals to help economic
convergence in the Community.
Sceptical member states are also concerned that rival digital technology may
overtake the standards for European HDTV, agreed last year.
European television manufacturers - notably Philips of the Netherlands and
Thomson of France - have invested heavily in HDTV technology.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6466</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAG2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / German government and opposition hoping for agreement on
immigrants
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The German government and opposition hope to reach agreement this year on
new rules to curb the flood of would-be immigrants, party leaders said
yesterday.
They agreed to hold two days of talks to thrash out a compromise later this
month.
The move has been made possible by this week's agreement within the
opposition Social Democrats (SPD) to accept constitutional amendments on the
right to political asylum.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6467</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAG1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / World News in Brief: Trans World Airlines
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Trans World Airlines, bankrupt US carrier owned by Carl Icahn, posted an
Dollars 80.2m (Pounds 53.10m) third-quarter profit against a Dollars 51.3m
loss in the same period last year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6468</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAG0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / World News in Brief: Two die in Ulster shootings
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The outlawed Ulster Volunteer Force said it carried out an attack on a pub
near Castlewellan, Co Down, in which a Roman Catholic man died. Earlier, an
off-duty Protestant soldier was shot dead in Portadown, Co Armagh.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6469</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Survey of Home Entertainment 4: Spectacular growth as Europe
catches fever - Video Games
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHIYO NAKAMOTO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHILE the consumer electronics industry as a whole has been suffering from a
dearth of new products to whet the appetite of increasingly sophisticated
consumers, the video games market has been enjoying spectacular growth and
the fever is far from abating.
The video games market has grown over the years into a Dollars 14bn industry
and is increasingly attracting the attentions of large consumer electronics
manufacturers, which are suffering from sluggish demand in their traditional
markets.
The appeal of the video game compared with television or music, is that it
is active and interactive, says Mr Chris Anderson, managing director of
Future Publishing, which publishes specialist magazines for video game fans.
Japanese and American consumers have been under the spell of Nintendo's
Super Mario II game for several years now, with Nintendo regularly appearing
on the charts of most popular toys.
Europe has been somewhat slower to catch the video games fever but having
taken both Japan and the US by storm, Nintendo and Sega, its main
competitor, are currently replicating their success in Europe.
Sales in the UK are expected to nearly double from about Pounds 550m to
Dollars 1bn next year.
The appeal of video games is not limited to their games contents. The
synthesized music that accompanies Super Mario games and Tetris have been in
the pop charts and recording companies are said to be looking at the games
industry as a source of added revenue.
Meanwhile, Mario will become the hero of a film to be released next year
featuring Bob Hoskins.
While the growing European market has helped maintain a strong worldwide
rise in the video games market, it is inevitable that once markets mature
interest will die down.
However, fierce competition between Nintendo and Sega, the two leading
forces in the market, is fuelling innovation in both hardware and software
that has kept interest strong.
By continually developing new technology and new games titles the two have
been able to defy sceptics who say that the fad for what, after all, is just
a game, is bound to die sooner or later.
'If there wasn't any evolution in hardware, the software available would
inevitably become boring,' says Mr Philip Ley, marketing director of Sega
Europe.
Sega's drive to break Nintendo's pre-eminence in the market has led it to be
the first to introduce two of the latest state-of-the-art formats which are
keeping sales surging.
Sega was the first to introduce more powerful 16-bit technology in its Mega
Drive (known as Genesis in the US), which allows faster and more realistic
games to be played than on the previous generation of 8-bit machines.
It has also taken the lead in introducing a system based on compact discs,
which takes game-playing a significant leap forward by bringing increased
information storage capacity, quality digital sound, stunning graphics and
realistic motion video to the screen.
Amid much fanfare, Sega announced the launch of a CD-ROM attachment which
can be connected to the Mega Drive to play games on CD rather than
conventional cartridges and demonstrated its potential on an enormous 750 sq
ft screen in New York's Time Square.
Nintendo, meanwhile, has announced that it will also be launching a CD-ROM
system.
Together with Sega's announcement, it also confirmed expectations that the
future of video games lies with CD-ROM. 'Games will undoubtedly move to
CD-ROM,' says Mr Bob Tomalski of What Video, an industry magazine.
The disc format provides greater speed and that is what video games fans
want.
Another attraction of CD-based games is that because CDs are capable of
storing a much larger amount of information, and thus detail, the quality of
the visuals is much better than in cartridges.
Using CD-ROM also opens up the avenue to multi-media, the combination of
digital quality sound, graphics, still photography and moving video, thus
taking game-playing onto another level of interactivity.
In addition to graphics, the Sega CD-ROM games will use what it calls 'true
video,' or video that is close to television quality.
Software using footage from well-known films such as Batman Returns which
will involve the player in fights with the Penguin as played by Danny de
Vito, is in the pipeline - as are music games that allow players to make
their own music videos using film from the live concerts of popular bands.
Sega has invested Dollars 5m in Sega Multimedia Studio in Redwood,
California, where it will produce not only computer-generated animation but
also original movies for its interactive games.
It is working side by side with producer Steven Spielberg filming on the set
of his next film to produce a game that will be released at the same time as
the film.
Sega's aggressive move into new technologies is essential for it to gain
what market share it can from Nintendo and keep its rival on its toes.
For consumers, the battle between the two giants which keeps the search for
quality games and newer and better technology going, should be good news.
However, by moving into CD-ROM, Sega and Nintendo are treading on dangerous
territory. There are already many computer games based on CD-ROM widely
available, most notably Commodore's Amiga games which already have a strong
installed base in some countries and sales equivalent to Nintendo or Sega in
the UK.
Philips, meanwhile has introduced a CD-based entertainment system and the
wide variety of CD-based products available could create market confusion.
As the technology improves, 'you eventually get into the realms of virtual
reality (VR),' says Mr Ley.
When that happens, although it may be difficult to imagine today, we may
very well no longer be tapping away at games consoles but donning a VR
helmet with sensor pads attached to our eyelids and temples to enjoy a
virtual trip through space cities and fight intergalactic wars with our
minds rather than our fingers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6470</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Survey of Home Entertainment 4: Two new formats prepare for
battle - Audio
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE introduction of two new digital audio formats in Europe this autumn has
set the stage for another classic consumer electronics battle - this time in
the portable audio market.
Since the introduction of the Sony Walkman 13 years ago, the portable audio
market has been dominated by the analogue cassette tape. But while
Walkman-style personal stereos and other portable cassette players have
conditioned consumers to expect go-anywhere, mostly trouble-free music, the
digital Compact Disc player has raised sound quality expectations
significantly.
In an attempt to provide portability with high definition digital sound
quality, new formats such as Sony's Digital Audio Tape (DAT) have been
introduced, but have not proved a great commercial success, and standard CD
players have been shrunk in size but have mostly proved too sensitive to
movement.
So far none of these options has seriously challenged the conventional
cassette tape which remains the most popular format for pre-recorded music.
Recently, however, there have been some signs that dissatisfaction with the
sound quality, durability and appearance of cassette tapes may be growing.
Sales of pre-recorded cassette tapes peaked in 1989 but fell by 11.5 per
cent in 1990 and slipped again last year when 1.3bn pre-recorded cassettes
were sold worldwide compared to 1.1bn compact discs, according to the
London-based International Federation of the Phonographic Industry. This
year the IFPI is predicting that compact disc sales will overtake cassette
tape sales.
Consumer electronics companies believe that with pre-recorded cassette tape
sales slipping, the market for portable audio equipment built around
conventional tape players, estimated to be worth nearly Dollars 10bn in the
leading industrialised nations alone, could be at risk. This helps to
explain the determined effort which is now underway to define a new digital
standard for the portable audio market.
Leading the assault are Philips, the Dutch consumer electronics group, and
Japan's Matsushita, with the Digital Compact Cassette (DCC), and Sony with
the rival 2.5-inch MiniDisc (MD) - a scaled-down and re-engineered version
of the conventional compact disc.
The two new formats have many similarities and technically are fairly well
matched. However there are also some significant differences. Both the DCC
and the MiniDisc promise to deliver crisp, clear CD-quality portable digital
sound, without annoying 'sound skipping', the jogs and jumps that can occur
with conventional portable CD players.
Both formats can also be used to record CD-quality sound, although
sophisticated electronics have been built into the players to ensure that
only one copy of digital source, such as a CD, can be made. An extra track
on a DCC tape holds pages of text in a teletext-style form. This can be used
to provide a biography of the composer, album title, song title and artist -
or even display Karaoke-style synchronised lyrics on a TV screen, or on the
LCD display of a remote control.
The DCC tape and the MD are both enclosed in protective cases for easier
portability, and both players achieve miniaturisation by using new
technology to compress digital data.
Probably the main advantage of DCC equipment is that it can also play a
traditional cassette tape, which means the music enthusiast will not have to
abandon old cassette tapes. Philips sees DCC as eventually replacing the
conventional cassette tape. However, this also means DCC players will never
be smaller than the smallest Walkman-style machine.
Sony's MiniDisc player is smaller, giving it an edge in terms of
portability, and has the ability to skip from any one track to another very
rapidly, like an ordinary CD. Sony believe this random access feature is
something customers want more than backwards compatibility with earlier
portable formats - the Japanese group points out that standard CDs have
largely replaced the vinyl LP even though the two formats are wholly
incompatible.
Initially prices for equipment capable of playing the new formats are likely
to be considerably higher than those for conventional audio cassette
players. But the basic digital technology has been proven and tested in
earlier CD players and prices should fall quickly as volumes rise.
Similarly, the new digital tapes and MiniDiscs will retail at prices similar
to existing CDs - prices which are themselves coming under increasing
scrutiny in Britain.
Sir Bryan Carsberg, the new director-general of Fair Trading, has ordered a
fresh investigation into why CD prices in the UK are so high even though an
earlier 15-month study undertaken by Sir Bryan's predecessor found no
evidence that record companies were breaching competition law.
Some analysts believe the two new digital formats will both be able to
coexist, but most within the industry believe that, as with most other
consumer electronic devices such as video, there is likely to be only one
winner.
Which of the two formats does emerge as the most successful probably depends
as much on marketing as anything else. Both DCC and MD offer significant
technical advantages over earlier formats but, as Sony's Betamax video
format proved a decade ago, technical superiority does not itself guarantee
success.
The early availability of 'software' in the form of pre-recorded music could
also prove critical in the battle for supremacy, and in theory the DCC camp
should have had a key advantage because the format was formally launched
last month, well ahead of Sony's MD players.
Philips had said there would be about 500 titles ready for the October
launch in the UK, but in the event delays meant that, as in Japan, the
hardware went on sale before the tapes. Nevertheless, Philips, which is
spending Pounds 2m in Britain alone on a pre-Christmas advertising blitz to
promote DCC, has forecast that despite the initial hiccup, more than 1,000
titles from most of the big international record companies supporting DCC
will be on sale by the end of the year.
For both Philips and Sony, the stakes in the portable digital audio battle
have been raised even higher by the business difficulties they currently
face. Philips is in the middle of a group-wide restructuring programme aimed
at slimming operations and raising efficiency and profitability while
operating profits from Sony's worldwide consumer electronics business fell
sharply last year.
Both companies are therefore in dire need of a new hit product. But while
the hardware battle between DCC and MC digital formats is likely to dominate
the portable consumer electronics industry in the immediate future, other
methods of delivering digital-quality sound could herald an even bigger
shake-up in the delivery of high-quality digital music by the late 1990s.
The arrival of digital audio broadcasts (DAB), which is being pioneered in
Europe, could enable consumers equipped with suitable receiving equipment
and a digital recording device like DCC or MD equipment to make their own
CD-quality recordings direct from the airwaves.
DAB has several key advantages over conventional analogue broadcasting such
as FM radio. The main benefit is that the high quality sound of DAB, unlike
conventional FM radio, is effectively free from interference and provides
excellent reception even when the receiver is mobile. DAB also eliminates
the problem of having to re-tune car radios because, unlike conventional
radio, separate transmitters can broadcast on the same frequency.
A further important advantage of DAB is that it occupies relatively little
space on the radio spectrum. By packing broadcast information tightly
together DAB can provide a six-fold improvement in spectrum efficiency over
FM. That means it is possible to increase the number of radio stations
without congesting the radio waves. While each FM network needs 2.2
megahertz of spectrum to provide coverage to 98 per cent of the UK
population, a DAB service could pack five national stereo channels in 1.75
MHz.
To use DAB, consumers will need to buy a new type of programmable digital
radio built on computer chip technology. Although the cost of these new
digital radios will initially be higher than conventional receivers, there
are an estimated 2bn radios currently in use around the world and
manufacturers could therefore look forward to a huge replacement market, and
very significant economies of scale.
In Europe, digital radio systems are being tested in France, Germany and
Britain where the UK government has signalled its support for DAB and urged
UK manufacturers to be first into the market. NHK, the Japanese public
broadcaster, has also hailed the European DAB system. The prospects seem
less rosy in the US, however, where small regional radio stations are
resisting the introduction of expensive new technology.
In Europe it is likely that frequency bands generally used by television
will be opened up as temporary 'parking' bands for terrestrial DAB services
to be run in parallel with FM until sufficient receivers have been installed
to make the full switch from FM to digital services. In the UK, the first
DAB car radios are expected to be introduced as early as 1995, with other
sets likely two years later.
However, as with the fierce debate which preceded the launch of the new
digital recording formats, the thorny issue of copyright protection for
music distributed over DAB or cable systems, and then copied on to tape or
disc by subscribers, has yet to be addressed.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6471</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Survey of Home Entertainment (4): Chicken-and-egg problems -
Television
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHIYO NAKAMOTO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
It has been some time since the invention of colour television created a
sensation in the consumer electronics world and sent many television
enthusiasts out to buy new TV sets.
TV manufacturers are hoping that a new sensation will be created by what is
the hottest topic today in the market for television sets: wide-screen high
definition TV.
Compared with box-shaped conventional TV sets, wide-screen TVs, as the name
implies, have screens that are wider than they are high. The aspect ratio,
or the relationship between width and height is 16:9 compared with 4:3 for
conventional TVs.
The advantage of the wide-screen format, according to manufacturers, is that
it is visually more powerful and provides cinema-quality viewing.
Our field of vision, according to Philips, the Dutch consumer electronics
group which has been heavily promoting wide-screen TV, actually encompasses
more horizontal information than vertical information and therefore
wide-screen is closer to our natural view of things.
Whether or not this is true, the enthusiasm for wide-screen TV in the
industry has yet to see equivalent excitement among consumers who have been
rather muted in their response.
This is hardly surprising because as yet there are no programmes broadcast
in the UK in the 16:9 format. Consumers who buy wide-screen sets must be
content with zooming up conventional TV pictures to fill in the screen or
make do with pictures with black bands on the sides that make up the extra
width in the wide-screen format.
Broadcasters are naturally wary of introducing a new format for which the
majority of consumers do not have an appropriate receiver.
The same chicken-and-egg situation faces full High Definition TV (HDTV)
which has been hailed as the television event of the decade, if not of the
twenty-first century.
While HDTV has only been introduced in Japan where NHK, the public
broadcasting corporation, is transmitting a few hours of high definition
programming each week, the response has been just as muted as for
wide-screen TV.
The problem in the case of the Japanese HDTV project is that the cost of
HDTV sets, at several thousand dollars each, is still much higher than what
Japanese consumers are willing to bear in order to enjoy better quality
pictures.
Europe, meanwhile, faces an entirely different set of obstacles in
introducing its HDTV programme, which was somewhat belatedly launched in
response to the Japanese challenge.
The first obstacle concerns subsidies for satellite TV broadcasters who will
presumably be beaming HDTV programmes based on the European D2-MAC and
HD-MAC standard into viewers's homes. Terrestrial broadcasts will use a
modified standard called PAL-Plus.
HDTV is not being introduced in Europe until 1994 at the earliest. However,
Europe's HDTV programme has been stalled by failure among European nations
to agree to help broadcasters make the transition from conventional PAL
broadcasts to the new standard.
The European Commission, which is leading an EC-wide HDTV effort, has
recognised that the new standard is unlikely to attract consumers unless
there is sufficient programming available. It has therefore attempted to
obtain European Community agreement on an Ecu850m subsidy for satellite
broadcasters, to solve the chicken-and-egg dilemma. Once the programmes are
in place, with the help of the subsidy, it reckons demand for HDTV sets
should surge.
Not only are broadcasters divided over the merits of the subsidy, but there
is disagreement among Community members as to the necessary level of
subsidy, with the UK telling the EC Telecommunications Council this summer
that it does not see the need for a subsidy at all.
Mr Edward Leigh, Britain's technology minister, said that while the UK
supported development of HDTV, 'it totally opposed the EC's proposal' to
spend Ecu850m on it.
The second obstacle to HDTV in Europe has to do with the HDTV sets
themselves.
The unfortunate thing about Europe's HDTV programme is that in order for
HD-MAC, the standard agreed within the EC, to provide the better quality
pictures that it is supposed to, the TV set has to be fairly large.
The picture quality of a 36-inch HDTV may make it worth the cost to the
consumer of switching over to a new set but that would not be true of a
21-inch set, which is the most popular size in the UK, or even the slightly
larger TVs favoured in continental Europe.
The problem, however, is that even if the better quality of HDTV managed to
raise enthusiasm for larger-sized TVs, these would be extremely heavy, due
to the weight of the glass used on the screen. What's more, full enjoyment
of HDTV quality depends on sitting a certain distance away from the TV set,
and the larger the set the further away viewers should be seated.
While HDTV has been hailed as bringing cinema-like viewing to the living
room, it is evident that not very many living rooms could accommodate such a
massive piece of equipment as well as provide the required distance between
viewer and TV.
To add to Japan and Europe's HDTV woes, the US has opted to adopt a digital
advanced television system which would be fundamentally different from
either Japan's or Europe's analogue HDTV standards.
The US initiative affects the two other regions in that it has led to cries,
particularly in Europe, that they should abandon their somewhat outdated
HDTV standards and follow the US lead in going digital.
Digital HDTV would, in addition to providing enhanced picture quality,
enable viewers to receive many more programmes than would be available on an
analogue system. It would also allow viewers to manipulate programmes and
other information they receive via the television and could even allow
interaction between viewer and broadcaster by creating a two-way information
flow.
The US digital television initiative also provides an important opportunity
to form a worldwide television standard that has eluded consumers as a
result of reluctance on the part of one region or another to adopt a
standard that was developed elsewhere.
If Japan and Europe adopted the digital standard that the US eventually opts
for, that would at least be one way in which electronics could bring a large
number of people in the world a little closer together.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6472</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Survey of Home Entertainment (6): Monopoly is still leading
the field - Non-Electronic Games
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PRICE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PURVEYORS of Britain's board games must have blanched at the news of fights
breaking out among several thousand youngsters locked out of a computer
games exhibition in London earlier this month.
It is not the sort of thing that happens in the staid world of
non-electronic games, where Monopoly (circa 1930) remains the number one
seller, followed by old rivals Cluedo (circa 1950), Scrabble and the newer
Trivial Pursuit.
'The traditional board games offer a good value way of bridging the
generation gap and in which all the family can participate,' says Mr Alan
Thompson, managing director of Waddington Games, makers of Monopoly.
'Computer games are usually designed for single players.'
However, the new wave of electronic entertainment has dented the growth in
board game sales, although they have held up well in the face of the
recession.
Last year, board game sales grew to Pounds 127m from Pounds 114m in 1988,
with Monopoly selling 300,000 units - and Junior Monopoly an additional
200,000.
New growth areas are generally limited to one-off blockbusters such as
Trivial Pursuit, or adaptations from television game shows. Hence healthy
sales are expected this Christmas for the likes of 'Big Break', 'Give us a
Clue' and 'TV Addicts'. Toy executives maintain close contacts with
television companies, producing a two-way stream of games linked to TV and
vice versa.
Meanwhile, Subbuteo, the table football game, has seen a seven-fold increase
in sales in the past six years, mirroring renewed interest in the domestic
game. There has also been a flood of games on the 'Dungeons and Dragons'
theme.
However, a stroll down the aisle of any large toy store reveals hundreds of
board games lacking either the pull of television support or the staying
power of the established giants. One cannot help but fear a short shelf life
for the likes of 'Mall Madness' and 'Beware the Bog]'.
The cost of introducing new games is high, with its success dependent on
good distribution. Periphery players also struggle because with two-thirds
of sales made in the Christmas period, large amounts of stock have to be
held throughout the year. 'I think the industry will become centred around
fewer players,' says Mr Thompson. Experienced toy industry watchers predict
a New Year fall-out for some of the smaller manufacturers.
One of the few new companies to make in-roads into the UK market is the
Japanese group Tomy, which in the past 10 years has seen its sales grow from
zero to Pounds 60m.
With no traditional board game as a backbone, Tomy has concentrated on
developing activity games with an emphasis on skill and dexterity. 'There's
nothing more boring than a flat piece of cardboard,' says Mr Peter Brown,
managing director of Tomy UK. 'People, and especially children, want
something extra to do while they're playing.'
But despite Tomy's efforts to widen the market, the search for the lucrative
'new Monopoly' continues to exercise not only some of the great minds of the
toy world, but also the British public.
Mr Brown says he receives up to a dozen suggestions a week from the public
for new board games. At Waddingtons the number of suggestions regularly runs
to a hundred. In the meantime, Monopoly looks likely to live up to its title
and maintain its dominant position.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6473</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Survey of Home Entertainment (7): Writs fly after dirty work
at the crossbars - Sport on Television
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SPORT on television, particularly football, is increasingly a highly
competitive and sometimes dirty game.
There were many cries of foul and allegations of skulduggery earlier this
year when British Sky Broadcasting teamed up with the BBC to pay Pounds 304m
for five-year exclusive broadcasting rights to the new Premier League.
Writs started to fly. Mr Greg Dyke, chairman of the ITV Association which
had lifted the rugby world cup from what would have been in the past its
natural home - the BBC - accused the Corporation of being little more than
Rupert Murdoch's poodle over the soccer deal.
At the same time Mr Michael Grade, chief executive of Channel 4, urged the
Office of Fair Trading to intervene.
For the viewer there is more choice of sport - but at a price. After feature
films, the other main category of programmes attractive enough to persuade
people to pay a regular subscription is exclusive sports events.
The unprecedented bid by BSkyB - a consortium in which Pearson, owners of
the Financial Times has a significant stake - and a subsequent Pounds 75m
deal with the Football Association for FA Cup and England's home
internationals, has led rival broadcasters to look for competing deals.
ITV has acquired rights to broadcast the Football League apart from the
breakaway Premier division and live European cup games involving British
clubs. Channel 4, in the meantime, has signed up for live Italian football.
ITV has still managed to retain large audiences with football, despite being
outbid for the Premier League.
In the week starting September 28, for example, ITV won an audience of 6.6m
with live European football, compared with 5.3m for the BBC's Match of the
Day - edited highlights of Saturday's Premier League games.
Channel 4 attracted 2.1m viewers for Italian football and ITV in London had
an audience of 700,000 for a live First Division game. BSkyB had an audience
of 500,000 for live Premier League.
The apparently small BSkyB audience is, however, misleading. The Sports
Channel is now scrambled so that only those who pay Pounds 5.99 a month,
apart from discounts, can watch. With more than 1m subscribers, nearly 50
per cent of the possible audience was viewing.
The development for sport on television is pay-per-view: charging for
individual events rather than whole channels.
BSkyB is planning to introduce a pay-per-view system in time for the 1994-95
football season and once such systems are in place it will be possible to
charge for events such as world title boxing matches.
Cable television is also starting to change the way sport is viewed. During
the Barcelona Olympics Videotron, the Canadian-owned company, with cable
franchises in south and west London, offered its customers unprecedented
choice. The company devoted four entire channels to the Olympics. One was a
results service, the other three showed both live and delayed transmissions
so that viewers could chose the sports they were most interested in.
Starting with ice hockey, Videotron now plans to introduce sports coverage
from different perspectives. Viewers will be able to watch through the lens
of a camera behind their team.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6474</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Survey of Home Entertainment (3): TV grows in importance as
centre of entertainment
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHIYO NAKAMOTO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHILE the advent of HDTV is being anxiously promoted by television
manufacturers and somewhat less enthusiastically awaited by consumers, the
television set is still growing in importance as the centre of family, as
well as personal, home entertainment.
While the home video brought an element of greater choice to the TV, that
choice is being enhanced further by the availability not only of more
programmes through cable and satellite television, but of new forms of media
and entertainment such as laser disc, video games and compact disc-based
systems.
In the US, there are already moves to provide pay-per-view video directly to
consumers at home.
Bellcore, the research consortium for the regional Bell telephone companies,
for example, demonstrated earlier this month a way to provide consumers with
video-quality movies down the telephone line.
Meanwhile, TV-based consumer electronics products such as laser discs and
video games are turning the TV into a multi-media entertainment box used not
only to watch broadcast programmes but to enjoy music, video clips,
interactive games and interactive sing-along songs, also known as karaoke.
Philips has taken this one step further with the introduction of CD-I
(Compact Disc-Interactive) which combines video, photography, graphics,
data, animation and CD-quality sound on a compact disc player hooked up to
the TV.
The TV itself may be caught in a slump as a result of a lack of new ideas to
stimulate demand and the difficulties faced by both wide-screen television
and HDTV in taking off. But demand for entertainment systems using the TV as
a screen has never been greater and is likely to continue growing.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6475</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Survey of Home Entertainment (5): Explosion of activity -
Virtual Reality
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
In Japan and on both sides of the Atlantic the 'hot' new subject for
high-tech computer whizz-kids is Virtual Reality - or VR to those in the
know.
The past 18 months has witnessed an explosion of activity surrounding VR,
including heavyweight books on the subject, conferences, seminars and
exhibitions and an unexpected cinema box office hit - The Lawnmower Man.
Meanwhile, among all the hyperbole, the first practical applications of VR -
in the entertainment sector and in other fields - have begun to appear. At
the same time VR, and the mostly small start-up companies which have
pioneered the technology, are beginning to be taken seriously by big
multinational companies, academic institutions and government agencies.
Exactly what constitutes VR is still a matter of fierce debate. VR's roots
are in aeronautics and space research and it is a descendant of flight
simulators.
Today, VR is generally taken to mean a mixture of computer hardware and
software built around complex databases which enable the user to interact
with objects in an imaginary 3-D 'cyberspace' world.
This can either be achieved using using a 'dataglove' fitted with sensors
that pick up the real hand's movements and a helmet containing small LCD
screens in front of each eye - so-called 'immersion VR' - or using an
ordinary personal computer, a high resolution screen and a device, sometimes
called a 'spaceball,' to control movement - 'desktop VR.'
Some VR purists insist that 'immersion' VR is the only real VR, particularly
for entertainment applications.
However it has some serious drawbacks because using the equipment for more
than half an hour can result in a form of nausea called 'simulator
sickness', and the tiny screens inside VR helmets cannot provide the
high-quality images needed for virtual worlds to be convincing.
For 'serious' applications, such as architectural or engineering modelling,
design testing or process simulation, desktop VR is becoming increasingly
popular - helped on its way by tumbling hardware costs and increasingly
powerful microprocessors.
Nevertheless, some of the most immediate applications are likely to be in
the entertainment sector.
Virtual reality arcade games have begun to arrive and toy industry analysts
expect virtual reality versions of home video games to appear in the near
future.
Nintendo has already produced a Dollars 99 Powerglove, a simple version of a
dataglove, which lets video-game addicts play with hand gestures.
Outside the home in the US and elsewhere, leisure groups have plans for VR
entertainment centres and theme parks and Japanese electronics groups such
as Sony and Matsushita, which also own film studios and theatres, are said
to be watching developments closely.
For the moment, VR systems are a lot less sophisticated that most science
fiction writers would have the reader believe.
But this, too, will change.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6476</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Survey of Home Entertainment (2): A single box of tricks -
Multimedia
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
For years the gurus of high technology have been forecasting the arrival of
multimedia - the bringing together of text, sound, still images, full motion
video and computer graphics in one box of user-friendly electronic tricks.
Finally it seems, the waiting may be almost over.
The concept of multimedia has excited those in both the consumer electronics
and computer industries, and led some to predict that the next wave of high
technology products will boast interactive multimedia features.
By integrating some of the features of the personal computer, compact disc
(CD) player and television, multimedia's advocates argue that a new
generation of easy-to-use digital consumer electronics equipment will
emerge, capable of delivering high quality information, entertainment and
education.
Already a handful of new products have been launched which could help define
the shape of the home entertainment market into the next century. Most of
them are built around variants of the CD and appear to offer some, if not
all, of the promised features of multimedia.
The audio CD, developed jointly by Philips and Sony in the early 1980s,
revolutionised the pre-recorded music business. Since then it has been
followed by numerous spin-offs including digital video Laser Discs and
several variants of CD-Rom - a disc-based system for storing large volumes
of data and other information which can then be used and manipulated, for
example, by a personal computer.
But CD-Rom applications do not have to be big and bulky. Among the latest
CD-Rom developments is the Data Discman, a portable 'electronic book'
launched by Sony which gives the user instant access to a vast quantity of
visual information stored on an 8cm compact disc. Each disc can contain up
to 100,000 of A4 text and/or 32,000 images, or a combination of both. One CD
electronic book therefore contains the same amount of information as about
200 London telephone directories.
The Data Discman was launched in the UK in July with a Pounds 350 price tag
along with a selection of 'titles' including the 'Time Out' London guide, a
comprehensive English-French dictionary, and an electronic speech writer's
kit providing about 10,000 quotations and jokes classified to specific
topics 'for easy searching.'
Since then, new titles are being added at the rate of at least four a month
and have been designed to cater for reference and educational needs,
business use and general leisure.
In Japan, where the Discman was launched in 1990, more than 70,000 players
were sold in the first five months.
Certainly, with several million PC-based standard 12cm CD-Rom drives already
in use worldwide there seems little doubt that electronic publishing,
particularly of reference material for use with home computers or in schools
and libraries, is likely to grow.
An estimated 2,000 CD-Rom titles including telephone directories, medical
databases, service manuals, newspapers and other reference works are already
available. However, growth could be limited by the lack of comprehensive
standards.
A relatively new standard, CD-Rom XA, was launched in 1988 in an attempt to
bridge the gap between CD-Rom and CD-I or Interactive CD discs which can
store a fully digital multimedia mix of sound, video, text and graphics.
CD-I, backed by Philips, Sony and Matsushita, has been developed in
competition with several other multimedia standards including digital video
interactive (DVI) backed by Intel, the US chip maker, and others.
However it was the introduction in Europe earlier this year of the first
consumer electronics CD-I players by Philips which has really helped fuel
the growing public awareness of multimedia.
According to Philips, CD-I is 'the de facto multimedia standard' and since
CD-I players went on sale in the UK in May the company says 'sales are now
equalling CD-audio in terms of take-up at the same stage of introduction.'
The CD-I player, which hooks up to the TV and hi-fi system and costs Pounds
499 in the UK, allows users to manipulate material on screen. It is a
mixture of sophisticated video games machine, standard audio CD player and
information system aimed squarely at a family audience.
Without moving from an armchair using CD-I discs and a remote control
pointer, it is possible to 'tour' a museum, 'play' a round of golf on some
of the world's greatest courses or control the characters from 'Sesame
Street' - the popular children's programme.
Philips has learnt the painful marketing lesson of some of its earlier new
product launches and tried to ensure that there is sufficient software
available to tempt the first hardware buyers.
The availability of high quality CD-I 'software' is probably the single most
important factor in determining whether CD-I is a commercial success. About
50 CD-I discs costing from Pounds 14.95 and covering four main categories -
children's topics, games, music and special interest - are available in the
UK with between four and eight new discs being introduced each month.
The new CD-I players also support the pioneering Photo-CD standard jointly
developed by Kodak and Philips. Photo CD enables consumers to take an
undeveloped, or developed, roll of 35mm film into a designated high street
Photo-CD centre, typically the usual place used for getting films developed,
which then transfers up to 100 photographs onto a CD-style disc.
The high quality images can then be viewed on a conventional TV using a CD-I
player, a dedicated, and somewhat cheaper, Photo-CD machine which
nevertheless can also play audio CDs, or even a personal computer using a
CD-Rom XA drive.
Another option, called Photo CD Portfolio, will allow customers to combine
their photographs with text, voice commentary and sound effects on another
higher capacity disc, while pre-mastered discs are planned which will
provide a sort of 'talking book' with a narrative sound track accompanying
each frame.
According to Kodak, the world's 250m 35mm photographers produce a staggering
50bn colour exposures each year.
Mr Ravi Khanna, Kodak's Photo CD product manager in the UK, said: 'Kodak's
market research has identified that whilst many consumers enjoyed
photography they were often unable to find the time to put their photos in
albums or any other form of archiving system. . . the Photo CD system
overcomes this problem as well as offering a completely new way for the
consumer to view and enjoy their photographs.'
While Photo CD provides the CD-I player with still image capabilities, full
motion video is promised with a Pounds 130 upgrade cartridge due to be
available by the end of the year. This final multimedia element will enable
CD-I players to show up to 72 minutes of video using the latest video
compression techniques.
However if the highest quality video is required consumers should perhaps
take another look at the digital Laser Disc.
In Europe, and the UK in particular where video cassette recorder sales have
been particularly strong, the market for Laser Discs has lagged that in
Japan where 1m or one household in 10 has a LD player. Even in the US, LD
penetration has reached one in 100 homes.
In the UK, Pioneer, which has doggedly sold digital LD players since the
mid-1980s, has now been joined by Sony and Philips which have both
introduced new dual-standard PAL-NTSC players in the past few months, which
like Pioneer's three models are also capable of playing ordinary music CDs.
Recently, the UK Laser Disc Association has been formed to help promote the
benefits and availability of LDs, and there is a steadily increasing
catalogue of music and film titles available on LD, boosted by the entry of
Sony's Columbia Tristar Home Video subsidiary into the UK market.
About 550 laser disc titles are available in the UK and Mr John Bamford,
product information manager for Pioneer, says LD player sales are growing
rapidly for the first time, albeit from a low base. The number of players
installed in the UK is expected to top 15,000 by the end of the year.
This resurgence of interest in a new generation of LD players comes 10 years
after Philips introduced the original LaserVision analogue laser disc
player.
In the intervening decade, technology has moved rapidly, increasing the
power and complexity of silicon chips and enabling an embryonic multimedia
electronics industry to emerge.
Multimedia products destined for the home entertainment market will continue
to evolve, whether or not CD-I itself is a commercial success. Now the
electronics industry is awaiting the customer's verdict.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6477</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Survey of Home Entertainment (1): Science fiction becomes
reality - Multimedia, which is the combination of video, photography,
animation, data, voice and audio in one medium, is the hottest trend in
electronic entertainment today
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHIYO NAKAMOTO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Rapid advances in technology in the latter half of the twentieth century
have had a dramatic impact on how people entertain themselves in their free
time at home.
The boundaries of home entertainment have widened to encompass a huge array
of electronic products ranging from video games and laser disc players to
personalised stereos.
In Japan, where trends in consumer electronics are increasingly set,
toy-makers report that for the past few years children have shown little
interest in bicycles and bats, which can only be used outside. These changes
in how we spend our free time, brought about by new technologies and new
needs, have had a significant impact on how we relate to one another.
For one thing, the sheer variety of consumer electronic products on offer
and the dramatic fall in prices over the years, have made entertainment much
more personalised.
Instead of one family television set in one corner of the living room and
the grand stereo in the other, there will often be two or three television
sets in a household and an audio set for each member of the family.
Pioneer captured the trend in one word when it introduced an audio series
several years ago with the brand name 'Selfie.'
But it was Sony which took the concept of personalised entertainment to its
extreme when it introduced the Walkman, its portable cassette tape recorder,
although strictly speaking this is more often used outside the home.
The spread of video games, which are essentially an interaction between one
player and one machine, has now taken the trend to a point of no return.
This self-absorption in a world of science fiction is aggravated, in the
minds of many concerned parents, by the difficulty the older generation has
in relating to the thrills of shooting green lemmings and exploding
mushrooms. The world of video games is not of the same order as the world of
Mickey Mouse or Winnie the Pooh.
And while parents will always find it difficult to relate to their children
at some point, video games - highly popular among children from about the
age of five - may be pushing that alienation threshold significantly lower.
The popularity of video games points to another trend that is gathering
momentum in the home entertainment market - that of interactivity.
Video games entertain their players by propelling them into another world
which they not only observe but can actually interact with.
The immense appeal of video games has shown that, contrary to what the large
number of couch potatoes may suggest, many people enjoy active and
interactive participation, which conventional forms of in-house
entertainment such as television, radio and video, only provide vicariously.
Camcorders, which involve people in the creative process of filming, and
sing-along karaoke systems, also point to the popularity of interactive
entertainment.
But the technology that promises to bring out the full potential of
interactive entertainment is multimedia.
Multimedia, which is the combination of video, photography, animation, data,
voice and audio in one medium, is the hottest trend in electronic
entertainment today.
What it provides, apart from the combination of many forms of entertainment
in one convenient package, is a superb ability to interact with the material
 -to alter the visual image, combine different sound tracks with different
pictures, move one picture from a scene to elsewhere - much in the same way
that computers enable writers to alter vast amounts of writing at the touch
of a button.
A good example of how multimedia can be used for interactive home
entertainment comes from Philips, the Dutch electronics group, which has
launched a multi-media entertainment system it calls Compact
Disc-Interactive (CD-I).
By connecting a CD-I player to the television, players can wander through
the vast collection at the Smithsonian Institution in Washington, learn how
to play the guitar in lessons complete with slow-motion movement, or test
their creative skills in a musical game.
The increasing use of the digital format in consumer electronics is what has
brought interactivity into the home and future developments promise to take
this interactivity into other realms of entertainment.
So, rather than interact with material that is specifically created for that
purpose - such as video games and CD-I titles - we will increasingly be
interacting with films and music that have been produced primarily for other
purposes.
Sega, the video games player, has already launched a video game that allows
players to make their own music videos using film footage of popular
musicians and interact with characters in the recent box-office hit Batman
Returns.
Continuing work on digital television, and the US decision to adopt a
digital advanced television standard, means that we may soon be able to
interact with what is on the television screen.
Developments in technology are also at the root of the enormous increase in
the choice of entertainment programmes and the improving visual and aural
quality of the programmes that are available.
Greater choice in software again means that entertainment becomes more
personalised. In addition to choosing what we want to buy or rent at the
video store, we will soon be able to chose what we want broadcast into our
homes.
For example, digital technology is likely to bring a significant change to
radio broadcasting soon in the form of digital audio broadcast (DAB), which
will offer not only the possibility of vastly increased numbers of radio
channels available but also the ability to chose the contents and record
them in CD-quality sound.
The advent of DAB has prompted the idea of the arm-chair record shop where
consumers could choose to listen to specific tracks from a pre-published
catalogue and make perfect digital copies of the music on their recordable
digital tapes or discs.
The same idea could be taken further to 'video on demand,' an idea which has
already caught on in the US. Telephone companies, such as Bell Atlantic,
have been testing systems for video on demand over the telephone line.
While there are still some regulatory hurdles and, in the case of DAB,
industry resistance, technological developments and consumer demand indicate
that things are going in that direction. Pay per view is already widespread
in the US and could become more so in Europe in the near future. The picture
that these developments draw, and consumer electronics manufacturers would
like us to envision, is of an evening at home that is becoming more like an
evening at the concert hall or cinema.
High definition television and wide-screen TV are the obvious examples of
new products that are taking the home entertainment experience one notch
higher in terms of quality - although not necessarily of the quality of
programmes.
Eventually, flat-screen TVs and projection TVs are likely to encourage more
people to stay home and watch a film rather than go to the cinema.
These technological advances aim to replicate as best they can the
experiences in life which we define as entertainment; to create something
closer to the real thing.
All of which appears to be leading inexorably to a world of virtual reality.
And what can be more personalised, more interactive and more close to the
real thing than to don a VR helmet and experience the sensation of speeding
your way through shooting stars in a runaway spaceship?
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6478</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Survey of Mexico (14): Boom town snags - Profile of
Aguascalientes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAMIAN FRASER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHEN Xerox Corporation decided to move its manufacturing plant from Mexico
City 10 years ago, the company judged prospective sites by four criteria.
Was the new site centrally located - close enough both to Mexico City and
the US border?
Was there harmony between management and unions?
Were there qualified people nearby?
Did the state government promote industrial development?
Top of the list in answer to practically all these came Aguascalientes, in
the tiny state of the same name. This commercial, industrialised town of
500,000 people is in the very centre of Mexico, almost equidistant from the
northern and southern borders, and the Pacific and Atlantic coasts.
Labour relations are the best in Mexico, and there has not been a major
strike in 40 years. The city is home to two universities, two technological
institutes, and several American and Japanese schools, providing prospective
companies with a local skilled workforce. The state government has practised
(for Mexico) an enlightened industrial policy, building homes for new
workers, industrial parks for businesses, roads for better communication.
The result is that while most of Mexico stagnated in the 1980s,
Aguascalientes boomed. From 1986 to 1991 the state's economy grew by 6.8 per
cent a year, against just 2.8 per cent for the country. Industrial
production rose by 8 per cent a year. Social indicators - such as literacy,
access to potable water and electricity, improved far more rapidly than in
the rest of the country.
The boom was fuelled by foreign investment, which increased by an average of
40 per cent a year. Xerox, Nissan, Texas Instruments, Dupont and
Hewlett-Packard, among others, moved into the state, and helped exports
increase six times from 1986 to 1991.
Nissan has invested around Dollars 1bn in adding to its engine plant an
assembly plant with capacity for 120,000 cars that will be inaugurated in
December. Next year, Nissan Mexico expects to export 40,000 of these cars to
Japan, the first time the company will import foreign-made cars into Japan.
While Nissan has had terrible labour relations in its Cuernevaca assembly
plant, its engine plant in Aguascalientes has been trouble-free.
Aguascalientes' growth has brought its problems. Compared with poorer
neighbours such as Zacatecas or Guanajuato, the town is polluted, noisy and
unsafe. The huge demand for labour means the turnover of workers is high,
and salaries are higher than elsewhere. There is still a shortage of housing
and water. Says the state's new governor, Mr Otto Granados: 'We have
resolved the primary problems of employment and growth: now we have to
tackle the secondary ones.'
Mexico's centralised political system makes this difficult. States have
little power to raise money directly. Mr Granados would like to put
computers in the state's primary schools, but the federal education budget
does not permit it.
While there is some decentralisation - in education, for example - Mexico's
finance ministry shows no inclination to allow local government to raise
money, or decide how it should be spent. Richer states, such as
Aguascalientes, inevitably become constrained in their ability to grow.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6479</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Survey of Mexico (12): New era for trade - Damian Fraser
explains the Nafta pact
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAMIAN FRASER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TWO months ago, in San Antonio, Texas, trade ministers from Mexico, US and
Canada formally signed the text of the North American Trade Agreement,
concluding 15 months of negotiations. The September 7 treaty, if approved by
the countries' legislatures, is likely to mark a profound transformation in
Mexico's economy.
For while Mexico is already relatively open to trade, the treaty will almost
certainly ensure there is no going back to protection. Almost every Mexican
industry now knows it will have to compete with its most efficient North
American rivals in order to survive. However compelling the case for special
protection, the Mexican government will be prohibited by law from offering
it.
At the same time, the treaty gives Mexican exporters full and certain access
to the US and Canadian markets, irrespective of protectionist developments
in the US. Trade disputes will be settled by special trade panels which,
judging by the US-Canada treaty, will be objective and fair in their
rulings.
Most significantly, the treaty provides a legal framework for almost all
business and trade in Mexico, perhaps for the first time. The thousand pages
of text tie the hands of any Mexican government wishing to meddle in the
country's economy. Rules over foreign investment, tariffs, quotas, rules of
origin, customs regulations, export subsidies, intellectual property,
sanitary and anti-dumping measures, technical standards, even driving
licences and medical tests of lorry drivers, are precisely laid down for the
foreseeable future.
In a country where government policy has swung wildly over the past two
decades, and where obedience to laws is often half-hearted, the
implementation of such a treaty would herald important social and economic
changes. An underdeveloped country with an Hispanic-Indian culture would
have to play by the same rules of the game as the US and Canada.
The promise of such rules is intended to attract foreign investment, and
above all, put increasing pressure on Mexican businesses and labour to match
the productivity of the US and Canada. Many of the impediments to doing
business in Mexico - corruption, over-regulation, outdated labour laws, poor
infrastructure - would, hopes the government, gradually be removed. But at
the same time, many inefficient Mexican companies - perhaps whole sectors -
will go bust.
The treaty has still to be approved by the legislatures in the three
countries. The vote in the US, where President-elect Bill Clinton has
expressed conditional support, will probably be in the first half of next
year. If passed, the agreement will come into effect on January 1, 1994.
In the first year the US will free tariffs on 7,300 goods, which last year
represented 84 per cent of Mexico's US bound non-oil exports. Many of these
already entered free under the General System of Preference. Mexico will
eliminate tariffs on goods equivalent to 41 per cent of its non-oil imports.
In the fifth year the US will free tariffs on another 1,200 products, or 8
per cent of Mexico's US non-oil exports, while Mexico will eliminate tariffs
on the equivalent of 18 per cent of goods. In the tenth year the US will
liberalise another 7 per cent of Mexico's exports, and Mexico 38 per cent of
its US imports. The tariffs on a few sensitive goods, such as sugar, maize
and beans, will not be liberalised for 15 years.
The details of the treaty reveal that almost all the significant concessions
were made by Mexico, although the US failed to persuade the government to
open up the oil industry to foreign investment:
Financial sector.
Mexico has agreed to open up 8 per cent of the banking sector and 10 per
cent of securities sector immediately to foreign investment, gradually
increasing this to 15 and 20 per cent respectively by the year 2000. During
the transition Mexico will apply individual market shares of 1.5 per cent
and 4 per cent to banks and securities houses respectively. After that, full
national treatment will apply.
Agriculture.
This consists of three separate bilateral agreements. Mexico and the US will
replace all non-tariff barriers with tariff, which will gradually be phased
out, and allow roughly one-half of their agricultural trade to go through
tariff-free immediately. Mexico will protect maize and beans for 15 years;
the US sugar and orange juice for 15 years. The three countries will permit
domestic support programmes in agriculture, but work to eliminate
export-subsidies, and commit themselves not to use marketing standards to
discriminate against another country's products.
Oil.
Mexico's constitutional ban on foreign investment in the oil sector remains.
However, Mexico will gradually open up procurement of the state oil and
electricity companies to US and Canadian companies and allow US and Canadian
companies to sell gas directly to Mexican businesses. It already has reduced
the number of basic petrochemicals reserved to the state from 19 to eight.
Cars.
Mexico will immediately halve its 20 per cent tariff on cars, and cut the
remaining 10 per cent gradually; phase out over 10 years the requirement
that links imports to a car company's exports, and the rule that forces cars
in Mexico to have 36 per cent local content. The US will eliminate its much
smaller tariffs, and consider Mexico to be North American for purposes of
the Corporate Fuel Efficiency Act.
Transportation.
US truckers would be able to carry cargo into Mexico by the end of 1999.
The treaty also covers dispute settlement procedures, intellectual property
laws, rules on competition policy and monopolies, the administration of
domestic laws that affect bilateral trade, and technical standards. But the
agreement does not cover immigration (barring that of professionals), nor
provide funds for regions unable to compete.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6480</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Survey of Mexico (13): 'Greenest treaty ever'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAMIAN FRASER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WILL Mexico's environment improve with Nafta?
Nafta is nominally about trade, but the debate over the effect it will have
on Mexico's environment may help determine whether it is passed by the US
Congress, writes Damian Fraser.
The three governments like to argue that Nafta will make Mexico richer and
thus more able to afford the kind of environmental protection already in
place in the US and Canada. Faster economic growth will enable Mexico to
dedicate more resources to improving air quality in Mexico City, cleaning up
the US-Mexican border, and setting aside more land for ecological reserves.
Further, the treaty itself incorporates a number of environmental
safeguards, making it, according to Mr Bill Reilly, head of the US
Environmental Protection Agency under President Bush, the greenest free
trade agreement ever negotiated.
The green language of the treaty would give precedence to international
environmental treaties, such as the Montreal accords, over Nafta; let each
country choose the level of protection of the environment that it deems
appropriate; provides that no Nafta country should lower its health, safety
or environmental standards to attract investment; and allows disputes over
factual questions on the environment to be resolved by the Nafta trade
panels.
Mr Sergio Reyes Lujan, the president of Mexico's official Ecology Institute,
says such measures 'establish formulas to ensure that free trade is
equitable' while respecting national sovereignty. For many Americans, the
measures do not go far enough. For example, President-elect Clinton has
called for additional parallel environmental accords.
First, environmentalists worry that US firms would cross the border in
search of laxer environmental regulations. Although Nafta explicitly forbids
lowering standards to attract investment, it is not clear whether lax
enforcement that attracts investment is punishable. A number of US furniture
makers have thus moved to Mexico to escape tougher Californian state
environmental laws.
A recent report by the US General Accounting Office concluded that none of
six maquiladoras (foreign-owned plants) that they audited complied with
Mexico's required environmental impact assessment before going ahead with
operations.
Second, critics complain that the dispute resolution panels comprise trade
rather than environment specialists, and have insufficient authority to
settle many environmental complaints. As it stands, the panels can only
offer judgments on factual questions arising out of environmental disputes
that affect trade. Environmentalists want their own commission to monitor
each country's compliance with environmental laws, and would like to impose
'green taxes' on trade to finance a clean-up of the border.
Such measures would be seen by many in Mexico as intervention in its
sovereign affairs, and economically costly. But as the price of legislative
passage of the Nafta, Mexico may have no option but to accept them.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6481</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Survey of Mexico (10): Puzzling figures may be wrong -
Damian Fraser's guide to staying well-informed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAMIAN FRASER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SINCE Mexico is awash with financial newspapers, magazines, newsletters,
government bulletins and press releases, one might think that obtaining
accurate and timely information is an easy matter. However, a lot of the
material published is of little use or misleadingly presented, while much
that would be useful never appears.
First port of call should be the National Institute of Statistics, Geography
and Informatics (Inegi), responsible for national accounts and other
official statistics. Based in the state of Aguascalientes, it is managed as
if it were an autonomous organisation, though it answers to the finance
ministry.
Inegi receives praise from international agencies, such as the Organisation
for Economic Co-operation and Development, which are impressed by its s t a
t i s t i c a l techniques and professional integrity. It is responsible for
producing and/or disseminating basic economic statistics - quarterly GDP by
sector, monthly trade figures, monthly i n d u s t r i a l surveys and
monthly urban employment surveys. Every 10 years it conducts a general
census - the latest is for the period 1980-90 - and every five years a
general economic census.
While its information is usually accurate, it is not always accurately
reported, in part because press releases that accompany statistics are often
extremely misleading. On any given month, it is quite possible Mexican
newspapers will report four different trade figures.
Mexican idiosyncrasies also make some figures puzzling. Unemployment is
recorded at about 3 per cent, which no-one takes seriously. But this
reflects a tight United Nations definition of unemployment - anyone who has
worked more than a hour in a week is considered employed.
Lack of unemployment insurance in Mexico means just about everyone finds
some work for an hour. However, Inegi produces about 10 variations of
unemployment figures, to account for under-employment not captured by the UN
definition.
For these and other reasons it is best to obtain information direct from
Inegi. For recent economic figures, information can be received by fax
through a new service open to subscribers, known as Infofax (91-800-49059).
Alternatively, Inegi will send statistics by modem, or PC-disk.
Inegi's 1990 census offers a rich mine of material. All the population and
housing statistics are available on PC-diskette (and very soon on CD-ROM) at
a state, municipality, locality and even by 'block' (ie, four or so streets)
level.
Armed with the correct PC-disk you can discover the educational attainment
of residents, or the number of houses with electricity, running water,
sewerage, electricity in any specified block of streets in any Mexican town.
Such information could be used by a local p l a n n e r deciding where to
build a hospital, by businessmen interested in opening a supermarket, by
political parties wanting to target probable sympathisers and so on.
After Inegi in importance comes the Bank of Mexico. It produces figures for
inflation, foreign reserves (only three times a year), money growth, balance
of payments and financial markets.
Like Inegi, the Bank of Mexico has the infuriating habit of not saying
publicly and well in advance when its figures are to be released, nor can it
then be relied on to stick to the date. It does not even advise its
subscribers when its monthly indicators are ready. The Bank of Mexico has
the same source as Inegi for much of its material, and it is a mystery why
it is much slower in publishing its figures.
However, government departments and state companies are usually worse than
the Bank of Mexico. Perhaps the worst offender is Solidarity programme, an
anti-poverty project now under the Ministry of Social Development. While the
government is quick to reel off the number of new clinics, schools and homes
with potable water that Solidarity has delivered, academics complain there
is much less information on inputs, and thus the effectiveness of various
parts of the programme.
M e x i c o' s f i n a n c i a l newspapers and magazines provide an enough
information to overwhelm even the most enthusiastic reader. Since the M e x
i c a n press tends to attribute more significance to what important people
say than to what has actually happened, much of what is published can be
safely ignored. But senior government ministers occasionally drop
tantalising hints about the state of the economy in obscure places, so it is
usually worth reading their statements.
Perhaps the best source of financial and private sector information is
Infosel, the financial wire service owned by the Monterey newspaper El
Norte. This gives real time prices on equity, money and c o m m o d i t y
markets and market-related information on the companies and politics as it
becomes public. It also provides summaries of the Mexican and international
press.
Infosel has nearly 1,000 subscribers, and can be seen in the office of
practically every stockbroker, finance director and senior finance ministry
official. The main drawback is that with a market as volatile as Mexico's,
it becomes compulsive watching, and uses up much of the day.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6482</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Survey of Mexico (11): How the government edits the news -
The press
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAMIAN FRASER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MEXICO'S government keeps a tight grip on the media.
A few months ago La Jornada newspaper, one of Mexico's more independent
dailies, published two photographs on its front page, under the heading,
'Two political rallies in the same town'. One showed the Official government
candidate in front of a huge crowd; the other showed the candidate for the
opposition Party of Democratic Revolution addressing an empty street.
La Jornada was paid Dollars 10,000 to publish the latter photograph (for
which it later apologised) which was taken several hours before the
opposition candidate's rally began.
The only unusual thing about the affair was that it came out in the open.
Every day, Mexican newspapers print news stories or photographs for which
the government pays. They can receive up to Dollars 30,000 for a front page
item.
In the same way, journalists typically receive monthly payments from the
government departments they cover, of as much as Dollars 3,000 a month or
about three times their salaries. They also receive a rake-off from
advertisements placed by their government department of about 10-15 per
cent.
However, such practices are not universal. A growing number of Mexican
newspapers - El Financiero, a financial city daily, El Norte of Monterey, El
Diario de Yucatan, Zeta in Tijuana, the weekly Processo and Mira, generally
do not take government money, and they criticise with abandon. And as the
government retires from large parts of the economy, its ability to control
the independent press with the threat to pull advertisements is declining.
But for the vast majority, the practice of receiving government money and
self-censorship is common. Naturally, it undermines the objectivity of
journalists - if they upset their department, the cash flow drops off. Few
daily reporters in Mexico cover government corruption, or criticise the
officials with whom they are in close contact. Such work, if it is done, is
assigned to political columnists, who are often following the orders of a
political rival when they make such attacks.
President Salinas and his government have done little to change such
practices, realising how useful they are in maintaining power. Government
money continues to subsidise journalists and newspapers, and newspapers that
criticise the administration are given the cold shoulder.
The ministry of finance refuses to advertise in Mexico's main financial
newspaper, El Financiero, because it does not like its editorial line. It
does not even include it in its daily synthesis of newspaper articles. Until
September, the president would not let an El Financiero journalist on his
press aeroplane.
Televisa, Mexico's near-monopoly television company, 'is like part of the
ministry of information,' says Mr Raymundo Riva Palacio, an editor of El
Financiero, and frequent critic of the government. Televisa almost never
reports post-electoral demonstrations, rarely interviews leaders of the
opposition, or runs anything embarrassing to the government.
What changes there have been have yet to have much of an effect. The
government has ended the monopoly of the state-owned paper company, giving
newspapers the right to import their paper. But this in practice has been of
limited importance, since cutting off a newspaper's paper supply was much
too much a Draconian and public measure of censorship. And most newspapers
still buy their paper from the state-run company, one of the few to have
escaped privatisation under President Salinas.
In September the government announced that newspapers would have to pay the
expenses of covering the president's international trips - up to then all
expenses, including entertainment, were paid by the government. A
presidential spokesman said 'that in a nation of symbols this is important.'
On television, the government reckons the imminent privatisation of two
state-owned channels will put increasing pressure on Televisa to be more
independent in its coverage.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6483</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Survey of Mexico (7): Pemex is transformed - Stephen Fidler
on the restructuring of the national oil company
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEPHEN FIDLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN THE judgment of Mr Francisco Rojas, who heads Petroleos Mexicanos, one
change above all provides the key to the extraordinary transformation that
has taken place in the world's fifth largest oil company: labour relations.
When Mr Rojas was put in charge of the company by President Carlos Salinas,
the company was dominated by a union and a system that fostered economic
inefficiency and corruption. 'Without changes in Pemex's labour relations,
no other changes would have made sense. That is the fundamental change. The
rest are very important issues but they are secondary to our success in
changing labour relations,' he said this month.
The arrest in the early days of the Salinas administration of the Pemex
union boss was a first step in the rapid debilit- ation of a union which,
having once been among the strongest in Mexico, is now among the weakest.
The workforce has been cut from 168,000 in 1988 to around 120,000 now and
labour contracts have been changed to allow the company much greater
flexibility in the way it does business.
However, the lack of open- ness to competition of Pemex still makes it
relatively inefficient. The Organisation for Economic Co-operation and
Development, the Paris-based think tank of 24 industrialised countries,
points to estimates suggesting efficiency losses at Pemex could still cost
more than 1 per cent of Mexico's GDP. 'Even if the full privatis- ation of
Pemex is currently not feasible for political reasons, efforts should be
made to increase its efficiency. It might, for example, be feasible to
decentralise the giant company and privatise those parts for which this is
possible under the constitution.'
Though it has generally embraced privatisation, the Salinas administration
has been unwilling to lift the constitutional impediment on selling Pemex to
the private sector. This in part reflects the view that privatisation would
weaken the ability of the state to extract the rent due to it from the oil
being pumped. Pemex's contribution to public revenues has declined, but it
is still substantial - it averaged 26 per cent between 1988 and 1991,
compared with 39 per cent between 1982 and 1984. It still accounts for about
30 per cent of export revenues.
Nonetheless, the logic of further opening Pemex's activities to
international competition is relentless. Not only does the economy suffer
efficiency losses, but at a time of fiscal austerity, it is unlikely that
the government would be willing or able to provide Pemex with the kind of
invest- ment capital it needs for the optimal development of all its
businesses.
If that provided the logic, the explosion in April at Guadalajara - which
killed some 200 people and for which Pemex was held responsible - provided
the public support and strengthened the case for a more radical
reorganisation of the company. That reorgan- isation is now under way.
Pemex has been restructured as a corporate holding company with four subsid-
iaries: exploration and produc- tion, refining, gas and basic petrochemicals
and petro- chemicals. From the start of next year, each of the oper- ating
subsidiaries will charge the other international prices for its oil or
services, a marked change from the previously attempted system of transfer
pricing.
Furthermore, the results for each operating company will be published which
should provide greater precision about loss-making and marginally profitable
operations. The internal transactions between the company are likely to
exceed in total the company's external sales, last year, of Dollars 58.4bn.
There will be a greater willingness to accept private capital. In the coming
year, Pemex will put out to tender 22 wells in the Bay of Campeche, though
not on a risk-sharing basis. 'The market for oil industry services, for
drilling, for seismology is open and isn't prohibited by our laws. But the
change is not a legal change but a change in labour practices. Before, we
had to obtain these services through the union and today we can contract
out.'
Eight basic petrochemicals remain reserved to the state. For the rest,
'Pemex is going to pursue a series of policies where we will make alliances
and co-investments in areas that suit us. We will sell off activities where
private initiative can give greater added value. Plants that are not
profitable and that cannot be modernised technologically will be closed.'
Investment spending by Pemex next year of Dollars 3bn is also likely to be
supplemented by off-balance sheet finance for the construction of 150,000
barrels-a-day in extra refinery capacity at Salina Cruz. The company is in
the initial stage of seeking a financial adviser for this Dollars 1bn
build-lease- transfer project which, unlike the more common build-
operate-transfer projects, is allowed under the constitution.
In such projects, Pemex says it is benefiting from its joint venture with
Shell under which the capacity of the Deer Park refinery in Texas is to be
expanded. Mr Ernesto Marcos, corporate director of finance, says: 'We are
learning a lot about how to do these trans- actions from the Shell deal.'
Furthermore, the govern- ment is also expected to submit to Congress this
year a new tax regime for Pemex aimed at allowing it to operate more as the
international oil company that Mr Rojas says he wants to create. Currently,
revenue transfers to the government are negotiated yearly based on the
company's operating results. The government is unwilling to see its tax take
from Pemex drop, but wants to provide more transparency and consistency to
its tax regime.
The idea is that Pemex would pay royalties based on the oil it brings out of
the ground under a regime with similarities to that operating in the British
North Sea. It would then, like any other corpor- ation, pay corporate income
tax and profits left over would be paid as dividends to the government. On
gasoline sales, Pemex would receive Houston- based prices, with the excess
paid at the pump above that going to the government in the form of excise
taxes.
Until now, says Mr Rojas, this has been one of Pemex's structural problems.
'Pemex cannot analyse itself as a business when its tax structure gives no
direction in relation to business.'
While Pemex remains closed to competition in important areas, it is unlikely
to be able to answer criticisms of its inefficiency convincingly. But senior
management recognises that further change in Pemex is inevitable and
desirable. Pemex should make greater use of automatisation and technology,
and its inter- national operations need to be strengthened. The private
sector should play a greater role in its businesses. If efficiency demands
it, Pemex should import. Above all, the philosophy of the entrepreneur must
permeate much deeper into the company.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6484</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Survey of Mexico (8): To the victors, the spoils - Damian
Fraser on the shake-out among the country's banks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAMIAN FRASER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT HAS been a tumultuous year for Mexico's 18 banks and 26 brokerages.
Having had to deal with privatisation, restructuring and refinancing, they
have watched sharp falls in their share prices in the face of rising
interest rates and a slowing economy.
The banks' loan book grew sharply, and those non-performing more than
doubled, to reach 3.1 per cent of the total. A handful of banks lost an
estimated Dollars 500m after the rise in interest rates slashed the value of
the government paper they were holding.
To top this, the government allowed foreigners to compete in the Mexican
market. According to the proposed North American free trade agreement
(Nafta), foreigners will have up to 8 per cent of market share in 1994,
rising to 15 per cent by 2000. Then, with some safeguards, the market will
be free.
The banks' most testing experience has been their privatisation, and the
subsequent formation of integrated financial groups, comprising banks and
brokerages. The 18 banks were sold for more than Dollars 12bn, an average of
14.75 times earnings and 3.07 times book value. While this was a triumph for
the Mexican government, the high price has put acute pressure on the banks
to cut costs, raise finance and in many cases redefine their corporate
strategies.
Mexican banks have to reach new capital levels of 8 per cent (risk-adjusted)
by the start of next year, but many are finding it difficult. Government
authorities say they will show leniency to those that are moving in the
right direction.
For the banks that get it right, the rewards are high. Mexico is
under-banked and under-leveraged, with just one branch per 18,000 people,
and credit equal to 6 per cent of GDP. In the US, by contrast, there is one
branch per 4,000 people and credit is 63 per cent of GDP. Net margins remain
high - at about 6-8 per cent - and in the fast growing retail sector, should
stay that way. Few expect foreign banks to enter the retail market in the
short term given the high entry costs, with or without Nafta.
The two largest banks, Banamex and Bancomer, account for almost 60 per cent
of total assets, and by virtue of their size, management experience and
superior technology, are most analysts' favourites to benefit from the
expected growth in the financial sector. While Bancomer is Mexico's leading
retail bank, Banamex is the top corporate bank and dominates the capital
markets.
Banamex was bought by Accival, Mexico's largest and most successful
brokerage, for Dollars 3.2bn in August last year: and the two now form Grupo
Financiero Banamex-Accival, or Banacci. The new owners - Mr Roberto
Hernandez and Mr Alfredo Harp Helu - have fired or accepted the resignation
of the majority of top managers, in a shake-up intended to assert more
discipline and central control. Banamex's former managers are now found
running Comermex and other smaller banks.
'When we took over this bank, it was seven banks vertically organised. Now
it is one horizontal bank, and we have removed four layers of bureaucracy,'
says Mr Hernandez.
Banacci hopes to maintain its position as Mexico's leading corporate bank,
expanding its presence in car loans, mortgages and credit cards, while
reducing its personal loans business. Mr Hernandez says his bank has no
interest in expanding significantly in the US or Europe, arguing that
Banamex 'is going to concentrate where we have a competitive advantage.'
Banacci's ambitions suffered a blow in June when it was forced to withdraw a
Dollars 1.5bn equity offering after steep declines in the Mexican stock
market. Its plans to expand have inevitably been affected.
It then experienced a second setback when it lost around Dollars 200m on
ajustabonos, government paper whose real interest rate rose from 2.5 per
cent in April to over 7 per cent more recently. The losses reflect the
group's trading rather than commercial banking bent: it still holds
uncovered risky positions in the money and currency markets, and derives a
large slice of profits from capital markets activities.
Bancomer's strength, by contrast, is in commercial banking, from which it
makes over 90 per cent of profits. The bank was bought for Dollars 2.6bn
from investors from the Monterrey-based Grupo Visa, which owned Vamsa, the
successful financial services company. Bancomer is now Grupo Financiero
Bancomer (GFB), which comprises the bank, the brokerage Absa, and a leasing
and factoring company.
The new owners have kept most of the top management and, unlike Banacci, had
the good fortune to make their equity offering of Dollars 837m in March,
when Mexico's stock market was still hot. While the bank hopes to maintain
its leading position in the retail market, it is currently trying to bolster
its presence in the corporate segment.
Other banks are struggling to define their market niche. Banca Serfin, the
third largest bank, and bought by investors from the brokerage Operadora de
Bolsa, has been in some disarray, and in September the owners fired scores
of senior and middle managers. It is paying the price of a rapid and perhaps
ill-considered increase in loans over past years.
Comermex, the fifth largest, and bought by investors from Inverlat, is
pursuing a pan-Latin American strategy, and has bought brokerages in
Colombia, sold a 5 per cent stake to Banco Novia Scotia of Canada, and hopes
to form more alliances with financial groups in the US and Latin America.
Like other Mexican banks, Comermex is focusing on the retail and
middle-level corporate market.
As competition between these and other banks hots up, observers expect a
second round of mergers and rationalisation. Foreigners, who so far have
limited presence to the occasional small-size strategic stakes, may move in
at this point.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6485</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Survey of Mexico (9): Quiet end to year - Equity and bond
financings
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TRACY CORRIGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE STEADY flow of both equity and bond financings by Mexican companies this
year was interrupted by the collapse of the Mexican stock market in June.
Weak stock market conditions put the brakes on several planned equity
offerings for companies such as Banamex, the Mexican bank. Several companies
then switched planned equity offerings into the bond market, which soon
succumbed to a severe bout of indigestion.
Consequently, after a surge of activity in the first half of the year, the
market for Mexican debt and equity is ending the year on a quieter note.
According to bankers, it is likely to remain on hold until the new year.
After a two-year rally, the Mexican stock market fell 15.5 per cent in June,
the sharpest drop since October 1987, but has since recovered some ground.
The market rallied strongly on growing confidence that the election of Mr
Clinton in the US would not jeopardise the Nafta free trade agreement.
Meanwhile, the shift of funding to the bond market has overstretched demand,
amid rumours of Dollars 3bn equivalent of funding in the third quarter,
according to bankers.
Grupo Dina's recent Dollars 150m five-year deal and Cemex's Dollars 280m
seven-year deal are among the offerings which were shifted to the bond
market after equity market conditions proved unfavourable. Some companies
felt that stock market prices were at an unattractive level for issuance,
while other companies, whose stock prices have been performing particularly
poorly, found the market closed to them.
The effect of the surge of supply in the bond market has inevitably been a
widening in yield spreads relative to the US treasury market. Yields for
state-owned Mexican companies, such as Pemex, the oil company, and Nafinsa,
have widened substantially, and increased funding costs are expected to keep
these borrowers out of the market for the time being.
Five-year Pemex paper now trades at around 300 basis points over the
comparable US treasury yield, compared with a historically tight level of
195 basis points early this year, according to Mr Miles Protter, a director
of Swiss Bank Corporation.
The impact on yields in the corporate sector has been even greater. For
example, a deal launched last year for Apasco at a yield spread of 357 basis
points tightened to 260 basis points before widening to a current level of
380 basis points.
Weak corporate credits are now forced to pay as much as 450 basis points
over the US treasury yield curve to tap the market. 'Small companies are
paying 12 per cent for one-year or two-year money (in the Eurodollar bond
market). But they would have to pay 25 per cent in the domestic market,' one
banker explains. Consequently, smaller companies have continued to raise
funds, at relatively expensive rates, in the private placement market, often
on a one-off basis.
Bankers are expecting activity to pick up again in the new year, but in the
meantime it is likely to be concentrated in the commercial paper market. A
handful of borrowers, such as Ica, the construction company, may try to tap
the bond market before the end of the year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6486</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Survey of Mexico (6): Advantage of being near US - Stephen
Fidler on prospects for exporters
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEPHEN FIDLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Mexican government has moved a long way to improve conditions for
Mexican exporters, not least through its pursuit of a stable macroeconomic
policy. But there is wide agreement that further improvements in the
country's economic structure are needed.
The need for further action by both government and the private sector is
underlined by this year's report from the Organisation for Economic
Co-operation and Development. It comments: 'Observers judge the quality of
Mexican products as comparable with the bottom end of OECD countries and
falling short of the standards achieved by the Dynamic Asian Economies.'
Some of the problems associated with doing business in Mexico are
well-known: poor transport infrastructure, in particular the railways and
difficult telecommunications, although deregulation has allowed larger
companies to surmount some of these problems, by allowing them, for example,
to install their own satellite telecommunications systems. High labour
turnover rates - in some maquilladora industries reaching 100 per cent a
year - are also often cited as a problem.
However, it is clear that manufacturers' experience is varied. As the OECD
report observes, Mexico has in the past demonstrated its capability to
innovate. It cites the glass manufacturer, Vitro, as one with an
international reputation for product improvement and innovation.
Furthermore, the figures suggest exporters are having some success in a
difficult market. Until August, manufactured exports grew 7 1/2 per cent
year-on-year despite the weakness in the economy of the US which buys
two-thirds of Mexico's exports.
Mr Andreas Sperl, head of Mercedes-Benz Mexico, says in the past 18 months
his company has been able to reduce labour turnover from 30 per cent of the
workforce to below 10 per cent. He has also seen a big jump in productivity.
He adds of his new employees: 'I've been very surprised by how fast people
catch up. Many of them were farmworkers and often they can do the job in two
weeks.'
The company, which produces trucks for the Mexican market, is to start
manufacturing around 1,000 cars a year from next year. Mr Sperl says the
evidence suggests the quality of products is as high as anywhere.
Most businessmen emphasise the importance of training. Mr Jose de Jesus
Valdez, director of petrochemicals at Mexico's Alfa conglomerate says: 'If
there was a limiting factor, I would say that we in the petrochemicals
industry face a shortage of technical people.'
According to Mr Jeffrey Gannon, president of the board of GE de Mexico, a
subsidiary of General Electric of the US, in many of its recent investments,
which have mainly been outside metropolitan areas on greenfield sites, 'we
have found the quality and the productivity to be better than in many of our
plants in the United States and around the world.'
Mr Rodrigo Guerra, director general of IBM de Mexico, says the 150 people
who provide the intellectual force for its operation give value for money.
'They earn Dollars 40,000-50,000 a year, probably 40-50 per cent of what
they'd cost in the US, and they are 15-20 per cent more productive than in
the US.'
In gearing up Mexico's formerly closed economy to export, the North American
Free Trade Agreement is expected to play a critical role. One sector where
Mexico is expected particularly to benefit is that of textiles, where
businessmen say all three Nafta members will benefit, mainly over their
Asian competitors. But Mexico should be a particular beneficiary because
wage rates of Dollars 2.20 an hour compare with Dollars 12 in Canada and
Dollars 10 in the US.
Mexico is also seen to have a logistical advantage over south-east Asia; its
proximity to the US should allow for shorter lead times and therefore more
responsiveness to US consumer demand.
In some areas, Mexican business is expected to have a tough time. Small and
medium-sized companies may find it hard to compete, particularly with the
high current cost of credit in Mexico. Furthermore, many of the old import
substitution industries may find it impossible to compete against the US.
Mr Gannon of GE contrasts the success of one of the company's newer
products, manufactured in Mexico, with the difficulties that are likely for
more traditional plants in Mexico. This year, GE will export Dollars 200m of
gas ranges to the US from Mexico which has also added to US employment. 'In
the process of creating jobs in Mexico we also created over 2,000 jobs in
the US supplying the materials and components.
But he goes on: 'There are other businesses created 50 or 60 years ago
principally for the Mexican market; they are not as competitive and we will
have to rationalise manufacturing in these.' In areas such as light bulbs,
for example, there might be economies of scale of 100:1 to the US advantage.
As a rule of thumb, in areas where there is global excess capacity, the
Mexican industry is unlikely to survive. 'We'll have rationalisation of
manufacturing in both directions,' Mr Gannon says.
Mr Sperl of Mercedes-Benz agrees. His company's decision to begin modest car
production in Mexico was made easier by Nafta, which gave the company the
strategic option of selling into the US market from Mexico. Though no
decision had been made to exercise the option, it existed nonetheless. In
the future, there was the possibility of regional specialisationin its US
and Mexican truck operations. 'You can't think about different regions,
because now it's one.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6487</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Survey of Mexico (5): Reform plan outlined by Salinas -
Politics
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAMIAN FRASER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE PAST electoral year has been a difficult, even turbulent, one for
Mexico's Institutional Revolutionary Party. The ruling party lost the
gubernatorial election in Chihuahua and municipal elections in Baja
California. Even worse, its sitting governors in Tabasco, Jalisco and
Michoacan resigned under intense opposition pressure.
The resignations followed those last year in Guanajuato and San Luis Potosi
after the opposition cried electoral fraud. They brought the number of
non-elected interim governors appointed by President Salinas since coming to
power to 17, out of 31 states. More than half of Mexico is now ruled by
unelected governors, or the equivalent.
The routine of election and post-election protests has left almost no-one
satisfied, and brought pressure on the government to achieve consensus on
the rules of the electoral system, and for political reform. As Mr Sergio
Aguayo, a political scientist and president of the Mexican Academy of Human
Rights, says: 'Elections used to give ritual blessing to the PRI candidate,
and so were relevant. But now they are becoming irrelevant to resolving
political problems.'
From the government's perspective, the demonstrations have damaged the
credibility of Mexico's electoral process and tarnished the international
image of the Salinas presidency. The governors' resignations have divided
the rank-and-file of the PRI, and strengthened the opposition.
Four years into his administration, Mr Salinas has set out the government's
approach to political reform. He wants to make the PRI a more modern
political party, and there will be legislation to make electoral conditions
fairer for all political parties.
The president said in an interview that the reform of the PRI 'has not
finished, it has to go further', echoing the views he gave at a widely
publicised breakfast with 650 leaders of the PRI in late October. Then, he
made it clear that the old rules had to change, and the party had to abandon
past practices. Mr Salinas said the PRI had to change further its internal
structure, ideology, candidate selection and finances.
But it remains unclear whether Mr Salinas will give the PRI any power to
select candidates, including the president, or any influence on government
policy. Without such authority, it is doubtful whether the PRI will become a
modern political party.
In his November state-of-the-union address - a three-point plan for
political reform that would set a ceiling on electoral spending, make party
finances more transparent, electoral authorities more independent and give
fairer access to media - the president said the new electoral legislation
would be negotiated between the political parties. It is still uncertain
what, if any, agreement will be reached.
Government officials say the legislation will be introduced after April next
year. According to one, 'they will set the rules of the game for political
competition for the 1994 presidential elections'. The legislation will give
more public money to the parties, and make donations less dependent on their
popular vote; establish tight rules on the amounts that individuals and
organisations can contribute to campaigns; compel parties to publish party
finances; give each political party similar television time; and give
parties the right to veto officials from the Federal Electoral Institute.
If the left-wing Party of Democratic Revolution fails to endorse the
government-inspired electoral reform, the PRI is likely to settle, as in the
past, for agreement with the centre-right Party of National Action. The
leadership of the PAN is ready to negotiate with the PRI, in part because it
has been a beneficiary of the political reform. It now has three governors,
and controls over 100 municipalities.
But the PAN has to tread carefully as nine leading members - including a
former presidential candidate - have already resigned from the party because
of its pro-government stance. In an open letter the leaders wrote: 'The
party has acted not as an opposition party but as one more sector of the
system.' However, Mr Luis H. Alvarez, president of the PAN, said they
resigned in 'frustration' at not winning internal votes.
The government is likely to meet practically all the PAN demands, in part to
avoid what it fears above all - an opposition unity candidate for the 1994
elections, possibly under the leadership of Mr Jesus Silva Herzog, former
finance minister under President Miguel de la Madrid. The PAN has shown no
interest in backing such a candidacy in the past, but if negotiations with
the PRI were to break down, that could still become a possiblility.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6488</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Survey of Mexico (2): Key Facts
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Area                                                    1,972,545 sq km
Population                                 87.8 million (1991 estimate)
Head of State                       President Carlos Salinas de Gortari
Currency                                                      Peso (Ps)
Avrge Exchange Rate        1990 dollars1=Ps2,813, 1991 dollars1=Ps3,018
Exchange Rate        November 12 1992 dollars1=Ps3,116 pounds1=Ps4,739
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
ECONOMY
                                                        1990      1991
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Total GDP (dollarsbn)                                  241.4     282.5
Real GDP growth (% pa)                                   4.4       3.6
GDP per capita (dollars)                               2,802     3,216
Components of GDP (%)
Private Consumption                                     65.0
Total Investment                                        17.3
Government Consumption                                  11.0      na
Exports                                                 17.9
Imports                                                -11.2
Agriculture as % of GDP                                  8.9      na
Consumer prices (% change pa)                           26.7      22.7
Ind. wage rates (% change pa)                           30.5      29.1
Ind. production (% change pa)                            4.9       3.9
Reserves minus gold (dollarsbn, Dec)                     9.9      17.7
Narrow Money growth (% pa)                              63.1     123.9
Broad Money growth (% pa)                               75.8      49.3
FT-A index (% change over year)                        +97.1    +145.1
Total external debt (dollarsbn, Dec)                    99.7     104.1
Debt service ratio (%)                                  29.0      na
Current Account Balance (dollarsbn)                     -7.1     -13.3
Exports (dollarsbn)                                     26.8      27.1
Imports (dollarsbn)                                     31.3      38.2
Trade Balance (dollarsbn)                               -4.4     -11.1
Main Trading Partners
(1991, % by value)                                   Exports   Imports
US                                                      69.7      65.2
Japan                                                    5.8       5.3
Spain                                                    4.2       1.5
France                                                   2.2       2.5
Canada                                                   2.1       2.1
Germany                                                  2.1       6.1
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
DEVELOPMENT INDICATORS                             15-20 yrs    latest
                                                         ago  estimate
Dependency ratio*                                       49.9      41.0
Urban population (% of total)                           62.8      72.6
Population growth rate (% pa)                            3.0       1.9
Infant mort. rate (per 1,000 births)                     63.8      39.2
Adult illiteracy (% aged 15+)                           na      12.7
Life expectancy (years)                                 64.3      69.7
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
* = % of population aged under 14 or over 65
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Sources: IMF, World Bank, Datastream, Economist Intelligence Unit.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6489</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Survey of Mexico (3): Deficit sends warning signal - Stephen
Fidler says that 1993 will put the Salinas economic policies to the test
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEPHEN FIDLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE COMING year will provide a severe test for the economic policies of the
Salinas administration. With two years of the presidency of Mr Carlos
Salinas left to run, the euphoria over Mexico's profound economic reforms
has begun to abate. Economic growth has slowed and a more sober vision of
the future has settled over financial markets and business.
The warning signal has been raised by a current account deficit
significantly exceeding the government's earlier forecasts. Extraordinary
measures - including deliberately contrived customs delays at the border -
may keep the deficit this year just below Dollars 20bn, at 6 per cent of
gross domestic product, compared with Dollars 13.3bn in 1991.
The government's arguments about why this should not matter are well
rehearsed: its budget surplus means that the deficit is entirely a private
sector phenomenon; that big inflows of capital are driving the current
account deficit, not the other way round; and that much of the deficit is
due to imports of capital goods which will eventually expand the economy's
productive capacity.
While these arguments were largely accepted in 1991 as reserves expanded
because of big capital inflows, the 1992 capital influx has appeared more
uncertain.
'Last year, the government could argue that the current account was caused
by big capital inflows. That doesn't explain why the current account deficit
this year will be significantly higher than last year's, while capital
inflows have been more hesitant,' says Mr Jonathan Heath, head of Macro
Asesoria Economica, an economic forecasting group in Mexico City.
Some government officials now admit that the sustainability of the financing
is an issue. In the end, the capital account surplus will by definition
equal the current account deficit, adjusted for changes in reserves. But,
given that a s u b s t a n t i a l portion of the capital inflows are
short-term in n a t u r e, a sharp loss of confidence for whatever reason
would trigger outflows of funds and risk economic dislocation until a new b
a l a n c e of payments equilibrium is found.
'The current account deficit is of concern to us because it is of concern to
the financial markets,' says one official. The government calmed one such
bout of financial uncertainty last month by a shift in exchange rate policy.
Over time, the new policy will widen the band of possible valuations of the
peso against the US dollar. Prior to October, the maximum rate of daily
devaluation had been 20 centavos a day, an annual 2.3 per cent. The new
policy doubled the maximum possible rate of devaluation, but left the
ceiling on the peso's value unchanged at 3,056 to the dollar.
The band of possible values for the peso will thus widen to just over 9 per
cent if the same policy is in place by the end of next year, from about 3.5
per cent now.
The aim is partly to increase the uncertainty facing speculators, and to
encourage them to invest in longer-term instruments. The minimal
fluctuations of the peso encouraged speculators to borrow at low interest
rates in dollars to lend them at much higher rates in pesos.
A senior government official says that the new policy does not rule out the
eventual possibility of moving to a fixed exchange rate. 'This formula does
not prohibit the fixing of the currency. The options are all still open.'
The change should ease concerns about the effect of an overvalued currency
on Mexican competitiveness, though it will not erase them. Mr Heath reckons
it will halt the erosion of competitiveness: the maximum devaluation rate
for the currency is just about equal to the difference between expected US
inflation and his forecast for Mexico (7.6 per cent in 1993 against his
expectation of 11.9 per cent this year). Productivity growth should then
start to reduce the extent of the overvaluation.
If productivity is the key to future balance in the economy, then it is
widely accepted that further deregulation is the key to expanding
productivity.
Opinions about how far such f u r t h e r d e r e g u l a t i o n is
necessary vary. Some economists, such as Mr Rogelio Ramirez de la O, who
runs a corporate economic consultancy, believe it has to be drastic. 'I
don't think the supply side of the Mexican economy can support 4 per cent
growth over a long period with sustainable current account deficits,' he
says.
The economy is thus doomed to stop-go policies unless the government buys
time to improve the supply side by allowing the aggressive sale of domestic
assets to foreign companies. To do this, it would have to open up the still
significant areas of the economy in which foreign investment is restricted.
The government sees no such sharp dilemma, in part because of a belief that
import growth will abate as the pent-up demand that followed the
debt-depressed 1980s eases. They also believe that when the economy improves
in the US, to which 70 per cent of Mexican exports are bound, so will
Mexico's balance of payments.
The need for further deregulation is nevertheless accepted, for example, in
the country's labour laws which forbid a reduction in nominal wages unless
there is a business emergency. 'We have inflation i n e r t i a in M e x i c
o: wage settlements have been too high for inflation to fall faster,' says a
government official.
A sweeping simplification of the 1973 investment law is already planned,
according to officials, which will allow 100 per cent foreign ownership of
all but a few strategic industries. The government also plans legislation
over the coming year to make the central bank independent.
The concern about wage inflation has been partly addressed in the latest
pacto - the annual accord between the government, business and the trade
unions which has been set every year since 1987. The October accord, which
included the shift in exchange rate policy, contained a commitment that
contractual wage awards should be limited to single digits in the coming
year. Previous pactos had addressed only minimum wages.
This provided significant support for the government's single-digit
inflation target for the coming year. 'It's impossible to understand Mexican
economic policy without understanding the importance of the pacto,' says Mr
Angel Gurria, undersecretary for international financial affairs in the
Ministry of Finance.
As part of the consensus building, senior government officials meet business
and union leaders every Thursday to discuss issues ranging from the
competitive problems facing the machine tools industry to increases in the
price of health care.
Hopes in the longer term for investment - and in particular for the stable,
long-term direct investment most needed by the Mexican economy - hang on the
ratification of the North American Free Trade Agreement, negotiated last
year with the US and Canada.
Despite the change in administration in the US, the odds are still heavily
in favour of its ratification, if only because failure to do so would so
damage the Mexican economy that it would have important ramifications for
its northern neighbour. In the meantime, however, the close scrutiny of
Nafta in the US Congress could prove unsettling in Mexico.
In the longer term too, the government needs, as the Organisation for
Economic Co-operation and Development pointed out in its first report on the
country this year, to increase savings. 'Unless the national saving ratio
recovers, investment may  .. have to be scaled back,' it said.
For the year ahead, however, the government underlined in the annual budget
that there would be no dash for growth. The government plans to run a budget
surplus of 1.7 per cent of GDP next year, and expects growth to be a
sluggish 3 per cent and inflation 7 per cent. This year growth is forecast
at 2.7 per cent, and inflation at 11 per cent.
Provided that in 1994 the economy is growing faster and inflation is under
control, Mr Salinas will not mind. Such is the economic backdrop he needs
for the presidential elections which, one way or another, will provide the
ultimate verdict on his reform programme.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6490</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Survey of Mexico (4): Four men wait for a finger to point
 . - The race to succeed President Salinas
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEPHEN FIDLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE race to succeed President Carlos Salinas started a few days after he was
elected in 1988. But with just two more years left of his presidency,
competition is heating up for the dedazo - the 'pointing of the finger' that
describes figuratively the president's hand-picking of his successor, writes
Stephen Fidler.
There are few doubts that President Salinas, like his predecessors, will
have the final say in choosing the candidate for his Institutional
Revolutionary Party (PRI) and that his choice will win the 1994 election.
The dedazo is likely to be made late next year, though Mr Salinas may wish
to postpone it to early in 1994.
Most money is on four contenders: Mr Pedro Aspe, the finance minister; Mr
Manuel Camacho, the mayor of Mexico City; Mr Donaldo Colosio, the social
development minister; and Mr Ernesto Zedillo, the education minister. But
the president may promote others - such as Mr Fernando Gutierrez Barrios,
the interior minister and Mr Emilio Gamboa, the social security minister -
to increase the competition and put pressure on better-placed rivals.
Pedro Aspe
The fortunes of Mr Aspe, 42, are tied to the economy which he manages. If it
is in bad shape, that would reflect badly on him as finance minister, and
would draw attention to the political experience and sensitivities that Mr
Aspe is seen to lack.
But if the economy picks up, he stands a good chance. He is the presumed
favourite of the international finance community, businessmen, the Catholic
church, and perhaps disaffected followers of the opposition National Action
Party (PAN). In his four years as finance minister, he has barely put a foot
wrong, engineering a successful reduction in inflation, privatisations,
pension fund and fiscal reforms.
Mr Aspe has a PhD in economics from Massachusetts Institute of Technology,
and is the techocrat's technocrat. There is nothing he likes more than to
take out pencil and paper and explain why Mexico's current account deficit
is self-financing. He speaks almost perfect English, is courteous and
charming, and has successfully forged alliances with some old-style
politicians, such as the agriculture and labour minister.
But the general consensus is he would be make a better president than a
presidential candidate. He is aristocratic, slightly aloof, and no favourite
of the party faithful, who fear he is too much of an economic
fundamentalist. If elected president, he would pursue further economic and
structural reform with energy and determination.
Donaldo Colosio
The only contender to have held elected office, Mr Colosio, also 42, is seen
as the compromise choice. From the northern border state of Sinaloa, he is
pragmatic and down-to- earth. At weekends he can be seen riding around the
village of Tepoztlan on a motorcycle, a typical common touch.
As head of the PRI for three years, he would carry the party vote if
nominated. But he is also presumed to share broadly the economic vision of
President Carlos Salinas, and worked under him in the Budget ministry in the
mid-1980s. He has a master's degree in urban planning from the University of
Pennsylvania.
He scored points for managing the party's convincing victory in the 1991
elections, and is seen as a capable administrator. The head of the Social
Development ministry, he has the enviable task of managing the National
Solidarity programme, a Dollars 2bn-Dollars 3bn a year anti-poverty project.
He travels with the president on his Solidarity tours, and may receive the
implicit support of local Solidarity committees across the country.
However, very little is known about what he thinks, and he may lack the
ideological vision that has characterised the Salinas presidency. He is not
as sharp or articulate as some of his rivals, and is likely to be more
dependent on advice when deciding policy. He has also made his share of
errors, deciding for example to select a wealthy pig farmer, Mr Eduardo
Villasenor, as the PRI candidate for the recent governorship elections in
Michoacan. Mr Villasenor was later forced to stand down.
As president, Mr Colosio would probably proceed cautiously with economic and
political reform, wary of upsetting too many vested interests.
Ernesto Zedillo
A quiet, almost silent education minister, Mr Zedillo is the least favoured
of the four front-runners. Yet he is extremely intelligent, thoughtful,
dedicated and close to Mr Salinas and also to the president's powerful chief
of staff, Mr Jose Cordoba.
Mr Zedillo, 40, has an economics PhD from Yale, and was budget minister
until last year. In that post he revealed an unwavering zeal in his campaign
to cut unnecessary spending, leading some to complain he lacked compassion
and political 'savvy'. He is a strong economic reformer, but unlike Mr Aspe,
from middle-class origins. Perhaps this may make him more palatable to the
Mexican public.
But his political inexperience came to light this year in a row about new
school history textbooks. A controversy over flattering references to Mr
Salinas overshadowed the improvements in the new books. The affair also
revealed a lack of support from Mexico's political class - almost nobody
came to Mr Zedillo's rescue.
His political and administrative skills will be tested by Mexico's education
reforms, which give the states authority for secondary and primary
education. Even if does not make it to the presidency in 1994, he is likely
to be given a good cabinet position, setting him up for the year 2000.
Manuel Camacho
The mayor of Mexico City, Mr Camacho, 46, is personally close to President
Salinas and a key adviser on political and electoral matters. Mr Camacho has
argued strongly for reconciliation with the left-wing Party of Democratic
Revolution, and has had a hand in resolving most of the recent electoral
disputes.
His conciliatory style, fear of making enemies, and difficulty in making up
his mind earns him the scorn of the technocrats in government, some of whom
would resign were he to come to power. He shows little interest in
economics, and is believed to have opposed some of the president's more
important economic reforms. He came under intense criticism earlier this
year for refusing to confront protesters blocking the city centre, so the
president felt compelled to take him to lunch in a popular canteen, to which
the nation's media was invited.
But Mr Camacho has presided over important reforms in Mexico City's
finances, is striving to change the city's political structure, and has
restored the fortunes of the PRI. In 1991, the PRI won 45 per cent of the
vote, from 28 per cent in 1988. He has shown great aplomb in defusing
potentially violent clashes.
If elected, he is likely to concentrate on reducing income inequalities, and
bring the PRD back into the political fold. He favours more political
reform.
Much can happen over the next year to shape the president's thinking and how
he analyses the country's priorities to the end of the century. If he is
convinced that the No 1 issue is further structural reform in the economy,
Mr Aspe's stock would rise. If his main worry is dissension in the PRI, Mr
Colosio's chances would improve. If he believes it is time for conciliation
within the country or if he becomes concerned about its governability, Mr
Camacho might find himself in the frame.
The fact is, though, that nobody except the president knows what is in his
mind. Furthermore, favourite contenders have a habit of losing out.
Fascinating though it is, discussion of the dedazo is - as one Mexican
writer has pointed out - one of Mexico's most useless subjects.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6491</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Survey of Mexico (1): Long road to political reform -
President Salinas wants a place in history for setting Mexico on the way to
long-term growth. But the country is not yet a democracy, nor an industrial
powerhouse
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEPHEN FIDLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ACCORDING to Mexican tradition, the power of a Mexican president begins to
ebb in the fifth year of his six-year term. Often his popularity begins to
weaken. In some cases the president makes a last-ditch desperate bid for
popularity or for a place in history.
President Carlos Salinas, who underlined this month his government's
commitment to fiscal austerity for the coming year, does not come across as
someone likely to buy popularity for himself at the longer-term expense of
the country. But he wants his place in history as the man whose bold reform
programme set Mexico on the road to long-term growth. Building on the
changes set in train by his predecessor, President Miguel de la Madrid, the
Salinas economic reforms have changed Mexico from an inward-looking economy
dominated by government subsidy to an open, more market-responsive one.
The reforms are widely viewed as a model for others. Economic policy has
been been consistent, well-designed and well-executed. It has confronted
difficult issues such as the reform of agriculture. Though highly
conservative fiscally, the government says its policy has allowed it to
increase social expenditures significantly.
Yet inevitably, because such things take time, the economy is still
adjusting to the reform process, while the country's political system has
yet to accommodate its implications. The glue that held the old
corporativist system together has been irretrievably loosened, but there is
no clear vision yet of what will replace it. Mexico is not yet a democracy;
neither is it a manufacturing powerhouse. Mexico may become both of these
things, but the passage between where the country stands today and these two
desirable objectives may be less than smooth.
This possibility has been brought home to the government over the last year
on both the political and economic fronts.
Mr Salinas has long given the impression that his vision of the way forward
for Mexico's economy is clearer than his idea for the country's political
future. But protests, led by the left of centre Party of Democratic
Revolution, following elections for a handful of state governorships this
year, have pushed political reform to the front of his agenda.
The p r o t e s t s forced the resignations of governors from the ruling I n
s t i t u t i o n a l Revolutionary Party (PRI) after what is widely held to
have been presidential intervention. From the government's point of view,
the protests and resignations have had several undesirable consequences:
they have weakened the credibility of the political system, weakened the PRI
internally and increased dissatisfaction with Mr Salinas within the party,
and they have provided the PRD with a way of gaining political influence
without winning votes.
The government had already, in its earlier reforms, improved the electoral
processes. The further reform that it plans to pass into law in the second
quarter of next year will attempt to reduce the electoral bias in favour of
the PRI that arises partly out of its ability heavily to outspend its
opponents.
The opposition will agree to this, but Mr Salinas may be worried about again
alienating the PRI. He says he wants further reform of the ruling party, but
clearly he also wants to avoid so weakening it that there is a risk it might
lose the 1994 presidential election.
'The PRI is in very bad shape and the problem is not just cosmetic. The
political system is not working for anybody any more,' says Mr Rolando
Cordera, a political analyst.
According to Mr Salinas, the process of reforming the PRI 'hasn't finished
and will have to go further'. The party needed to produce political
proposals and an ideology, so that people would know what it stood for.
Internal restructuring of a 50-year-old organisation was necessary, the way
the party financed itself had to be transformed; and there needed to be
advances in the way candidates were chosen.
However, in spite of the party's internal strife, Mr Cordera believes the
PRI candidate will win the 1994 election. 'The PRI is not ready or willing
to lose the next presidential election and I think they are not going to
lose it unless they face a very profound internal crisis,' he argues. Mr
Luis Alvarez, president of the National Action Party (PAN) agrees, if for
different reasons: 'If the process were truly democratic, we'd be able to
win in 1994. But I think in 2000, it's a practical possibility.'
On the economic front, a sharp rise in the current account deficit, caused
in part by strong pent-up demand for imports after a decade of austerity,
has provided a cause for government concern. It has raised questions about
the capacity of the economy to sustain significant per capita growth without
sucking in unsustainable levels of imports. This year, to ensure a continued
flow of finance into the country, the government was forced to push up
interest rates, thereby slowing growth.
To many economists, the size of the deficit - equivalent to 6 per cent of
GDP this year - strongly emphasised the need for further structural reform
in the Mexican economy. While the government has continued to emphasise
fiscal stringency - it is predicting another government surplus next year -
this has not been sufficient by itself to make the economy competitive.
'The government has done well in public finances, and a good job, by and
large, on privatisation, but on deregulating the economy there are a
tremendous number of things still to be done,' says Mr Jonathan Heath, chief
economist at Macro Asesoria Economica, an economic consultancy.
This point is conceded by some government officials, although some of what
needs to be done will have to await another administration. Officials say
the government is working on proposals to give independence to the central
bank and is expected to introduce a significant streamlining of the 1973
foreign investment law, which will open new sectors of the economy to
foreign ownership, apart from a small number of industries deemed strategic.
Poor Mexican infrastructure - transportation and ports - severely weakens
the economy's competitiveness and will have to be addressed. Restrictive
practices in the ports - the average wage of a docker is Dollars 1,100 a
month - mean that the most important port for Mexican trade is now Houston,
Texas.
Reform of the bureaucracy is also seen as necessary, as are sweeping changes
to the legal and judicial system, where procedures are unduly lengthy and
bribery of judges common. Not only is this necessary to prevent the
widespread abuse of individual rights, but it is also an essential condition
for a functioning market economy with enforceable contracts and property
rights.
Some finance officials see the need for a reform of the labour laws, which
make it impossible to cut nominal wages except in business emergencies. 'We
have inflation inertia in Mexico. Wage settlements have been too high for
inflation to fall faster,' says one.
All this is needed to provide the backdrop to improve Mexican productivity,
itself the key to economic growth and the alleviation of the extreme poverty
which grips a fifth of the population. While Solidarity, the Salinas
anti-poverty programme, continues to increase in size and importance, growth
will have to be relied on to raise the general standard of living.
Some foreign and local businessmen report positive experiences with respect
to the productivity of their own workforces, but these indicators need to
become more common. The agricultural and educational reforms of the
administration should be steps, over the longer term, towards achieving
these objectives.
Another critical element in increasing investment and improving productivity
is the North American Free Trade Agreement with the US and Canada.
Negotiations on this critical element of the Salinas economic plan now await
ratification by legislatures in the three countries.
However, the way forward has been clouded somewhat by the defeat of
President George Bush, who has been a strong supporter of Mr Salinas, in the
US presidential election this month. President-elect Clinton has praised Mr
Salinas and said he supports Nafta in principle but he wants further
safeguards with respect to the environment and jobs. Until it is known
exactly what Mr Clinton means by this, and until the agreement is ratified
by the US Congress, nervousness among Mexican policy-makers will run high.
The coming year, then, is to be a crucial one for the Salinas
administration. Three important issues - political reform, the economy and
Nafta - will influence heavily the long-term importance of his place in
history. They will also largely determine the choice that the president is
expected to make in the next year or so about the man he wants to lead
Mexico to the next century.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6492</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / London Stock Exchange: Share prices cling on to recent gains
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY BYLAND, UK Stock Market Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE latest statistics on the domestic economy helped the UK stock market to
hold on to the FT-SE 2,700 mark yesterday, although attempts to move further
ahead were not successful. A substantially greater increase than expected in
domestic lending by the banks and building societies during October raised
some hopes that the economic recession might be lifting at last. But this
was counter-balanced by the implications of the stagnant performance in UK
gross domestic product in the third quarter, also disclosed yesterday.
Equities opened higher, benefiting from a firmer performance from other
global markets overnight, but were soon restrained by softness in the US
dollar which held back the blue chip internationals. The FT-SE Index was
also held back by a fall in ICI on the reports that a leading UK securities
house was about to issue a somewhat cool appraisal of the planned merger of
the bio-science divisions.
However, the market found support again when the Footsie 2,700 area was
challenged and share prices then crept higher, with the announcement of the
UK money supply and bank lending data helpful. Also encouraging for the
equity market was the premium over the Footsie maintained by the December
stock index future contract.
The second half of the session was uneventful, although some comfort was
drawn from favourable reports from the talks in Washington aimed at securing
a settlement of the GATT problems. Cuts in base rates by the French banks
were not regarded as immediately significant.
The final reading put the FT-SE Index at 2,706.2 for a net gain on the day
of 2.2 points. Seaq volume increased to 659.2m shares from Wednesday's 551m,
worth Pounds 1bn in retail business.
The turnover statistics bear out opinions among traders that the stock
market is 'fundamentally optimistic' and that the institutions are unwilling
to let share prices fall very far while they await further news on interest
rates and on the UK government's moves to stimulate the domestic economy.
The news on the industrial front remained negative, Blue Circle Industries,
Royal Bank of Scotland and British Rail all disclosing plans to reduce
staff. But the stock market takes the view that the depth of the recession
has been taken aboard by share prices and that only signs of a recovery in
the economy will have significantly fresh impact.
At Panmure Gordon, Mr Robin Aspinall commented that, in present
circumstances, investors were more likely to be attracted by high yielding
quality equities than by bank and similar deposits, on which returns had
fallen steadily this year and were expected to fall further.
Mr Trevor Laugharne at Kleinwort Benson Securities told clients that he
could see only weak bullish and bearish factors operating in London at
present, with 'preponderance just falling on the bearish side'; the market
is unlikely to move up in the near term unless it senses that another cut in
base rates is imminent.
The strategy team at Nikko Securities is slightly more optimistic than some
others in the marketplace in believing that the next 1 percentage point base
rate cut will come before Christmas.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 40
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6493</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / London Stock Exchange: Abbey National upgraded
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVE THOMPSON, CHRISTOPHER PRICE and PETER JOHN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE latest upsurge in Abbey National shares was ascribed to an upgrading of
profit forecasts by BZW, the UK investment bank. The recent advance in the
stock price gathered momentum throughout yesterday and drove Abbey shares up
to an all-time record of 360p before they eased off to end the session a net
8 1/2 higher at 358 1/2 p. Turnover in the stock was 3.6m shares.
BZW lifted its current year profits forecast for Abbey from Pounds 560m to
Pounds 610m and that for next year from Pounds 680m to Pounds 710m. Mr
Philip Gibbs, the sector analyst, said the increase in the current year
estimate was made because of the windfall gains to Abbey arising from the
delay in implementing reductions in most interest rates.
The rise in next year's forecast was a reflection, Mr Gibbs said, of margins
gains which derive from the widening the differential between lending and
savings rates.
Since the flotation of Abbey National at 130p each in July 1989 the shares
have risen over 175 per cent. During the same period the FTSE-100 has risen
just over 20 per cent.
Power stocks busy
The power generators, National Power and PowerGen, continued to outperform
other utility stocks, the former rising 3.3 per cent and the latter 2.9 per
cent, following renewed aggressive buying by US securities houses.
Salomon Brothers, one of the leading US investment banks, was said by
dealers to have been the main driving force behind buying interest which saw
National Power attain a record 290p before closing a net 9 1/2 higher at
289p on turnover of 4.3m. PowerGen only just failed to break its all-time
high of 293p, and settled 8 up at 287 1/2 p after 290p on turnover of 8.7m
shares.
Mr Michael Sayers, utilities specialist at Salomon, acknowledged the buying
interest: 'We've been aggressive buyers for some time and think the shares
are outstandingly cheap.'
ICI pressured
Sellers moved in on ICI and the share price fell sharply on heavy turnover
yesterday as a result of a number of negative factors. The shares were
traded down as low as 1010p and closed a net 24 lower at 1013p with 3m
dealt.
The market focused on Smith New Court research which takes a pessimistic
view of the value of the company post demerger and suggests that the
demerger will have to be deferred anyway.
There was also growing concern about Zeneca, ICI's choice of name for the
new pharmaceutical group. One disillusioned analyst said the decision to
offload the brand loyalty associated with the ICI name amounted to
'commercial suicide'. Finally there was a knock-on effect from third-quarter
figures announced by German rival BASF, which came in below the worst
expectations.
Mirror bought
Institutions decided that the administrators of Mirror Group were making a
determined attempt to get the newspaper's finances straight and bought the
stock heavily. They were responding to enthusiastic recommendations from
Kleinwort Benson and James Capel.
Mr Guy Lamming of Capel attracted investors after pointing out the
newspapers's cash generative abilities and its relative value. At Kleinwort,
Mr Derek Terrington said: 'Effectively, there is a new board of directors
and that is a move that cannot be underestimated.' The stock was 7 higher
before profit-taking brought it down to a net gain of 4 at 83p on very large
turnover of 8.3m.
Retailer Storehouse produced well-signalled figures and the shares edged up
a penny to 186p. However, having disposed of the loss-making Richards and
Habitat brands, analysts were generally upbeat about the second half. Nomura
raised its full-year forecast Pounds 11 1/2 m to Pounds 47 1/2 m, while
County NatWest added Pounds 5m to Pounds 40m. County's Ms Kimlan Cook said:
'The figures confirm our positive stance. The more you see the more
compelling the recovery story is.'
The news that the Monopolies and Mergers Commission is investigating the
perfume market hit Boots, the shares falling 6 to 484p.
Banana exporter Geest recovered from a savage downgrade by its broker
Cazenove as the company attempted to play down the current delicate
negotiations between the European Community and the Caribbean exporters. The
shares added 5 to 254p, but could not prevent a number of other downgrades,
including BZW which lopped Pounds 2m from this year's profit forecast to
Pounds 23m.
Scottish presentations were said to have lifted Iceland Frozen Foods, up 6
at 568p. Albert Fisher was said to have been recommended by SG Warburg and
the shares gained 5 to 53p in turnover of 11m.
Evode jumped 19 to 91p after diversified manufacturer Wassall made an 80p
per share bid for the specialist seals and coatings group valuing it at
Pounds 58.2m. Wassall held to a fall of only 15 to 183p despite the pressure
of the bid and the dilutive effect of a three-for-five rights at 150p a
share.
The bid encouraged marketmakers to look around for other old takeover
candidates. Lucas ended 7 1/2 up at 120 1/2 p and Norcros improved 8 to
128p. Leigh Interests was also the subject of speculative talk and rose 15
to 186p. Speculative buying pushed Yorkshire Chemicals up 18 to 340p.
Smith &amp; Nephew rose 3 1/2 to 162 1/2 p after Credit Lyonnais Laing
reinforced its buy recommendation on the stock.
Cable and Wireless (C and W) delighted the market with interim profits up
around 36 per cent at Pounds 378m and well ahead of the most optimistic
expectations which were around the Pounds 360m-level. The interim dividend
was also said to be at the top end of the market range. The shares raced up
to 657p before settling a net 10 higher at 652p on heavy turnover of 7.3m.
The proposed sale of up to 1.35bn shares continued to cast a shadow over
both classes of BT with the 'old' 3 off at 393p on turnover of 9m and the
partly-paid 4 1/2 down at 288p on 6.5m. Vodafone, helped by switching from
BT, rose 6 to 387p on 2.4m.
The discount houses extended their recent excellent performance with Union
Discount, involved in takeover talks with an unnamed party, closing a
further 25 up at 96p with the market looking for other potential bidders to
move in. Cater Allen, regarded as a possible bidder for Union, rose 4 to
385p after 400p, following the increased interim dividend. King &amp; Shaxson
which recently announced a 60 per cent increase in its interim payment,
moved up 5 to 90p.
A stock shortage and hints that one of the big US investment banks was about
to release a strong buy recommendation on the stock boosted General Accident
19 to 579p. Commercial Union, one of the market's favoured composites, edged
up 4 more to 577p. CE Heath, the insurance broker, closed 11 up at 308p with
the market relieved that the dividend cut was not even bigger.
Specialist mechanical engineer Siebe performed well as Smith New Court
upgraded its recommendation on the stock to buy from hold. The house argues
that the relative rating has come back to a more attractive level. The
shares improved 10 to 360p.
Fears that NorthWest Airlines, one of the biggest customers in the
industry's order backlog, might be considering filing for bankruptcy
unsettled British Aerospace by 4 at 126p.
British Steel rebounded 2 1/2 to 50p on expectations of EC assistance to
counter over capacity.
Speculation that Forte is actively hunting a new chief executive continued
to help the shares, which put on 4 before fading to a penny better at 175p.
First results from Euro Disney confirmed the dismal speculation and the
shares tumbled 55 to 845p.
Thorn EMI's poor spell continued, the shares - which had fallen 58p in two
weeks - dropped another 12 closing at 763p. However, an afternoon rally
suggested that it may have reached the bottom of its trading range.
MARKET REPORTERS:
Steve Thompson,
Christopher Price,
Peter John.
Other market statistics,
Page 29
NEW HIGHS AND LOWS FOR 1992
NEW HIGHS (48).
AMERICANS (2) Abbott Labs., Amer. Express, BANKS (2) Abbey Natl., Standard
Chartd., BREWERS &amp; DISTILLERS (1) Bulmer (HP), BUSINESS SERVICES (1) Penna,
CHEMICALS (3) Allied Colloids, Evode, Do 7p Pf., CONTRACTING &amp; CONSTRUCTION
(1) NSM, ELECTRICALS (1) Ericsson, ELECTRICITY (1) Scottish Power,
ELECTRONICS (1) Hoskyns, ENGINEERING GENERAL (1) Vosper Thornycroft, FOOD
RETAILING (2) Iceland Frozen, Morrison (Wm), HEALTH &amp; HOUSEHOLD (1) Astra B,
HOTELS &amp; LEISURE (2) Granada 7 1/2 pc Pf., Rank Org. 8 1/4 pc Pf., INSURANCE
COMPOSITE (2) General Accident, Sun Alliance, INSURANCE LIFE (2) Britannic,
Transatlantic, INVESTMENT TRUSTS (9) BZW Convertible, Fleming American,
Genesis Malaysia Maju, Jupiter European, Malaysia Emrg. Co's, Mezzanine
Cap., Murray Inc. B, Murray Intl. B, New Zealand, MEDIA (6) Central ITV,
Metal Bulletin, News Corp., News Intl., Sterling Publsg., TVS Entrmt. 7.4pc
Pf '08, MISCELLANEOUS (1) BAT Inds., OTHER FINANCIAL (1) Cater Allen, OTHER
INDUSTRIAL MATERIALS (1) Cookson, PACKAGING, PAPER &amp; PRINTING (1) Portals,
PROPERTY (2) Helical Bar 5 1/4 pc Pf. '12, Slough 6pc Cv. '03, STORES (2)
Fine Art Dev., Storehouse, WATER (1) Mid Kent, MINES (1) Malaysia.
NEW LOWS (33).
AMERICANS (1) IBM, CANADIANS (1) Brascan, BUSINESS SERVICES (1) REA,
CONTRACTING &amp; CONSTRUCTION (1) Prowting, ELECTRONICS (3) Kewill Systems,
Lynx, Molynx, ENGINEERING GENERAL (2) Bullough, Prospect, FOOD MANUFACTURING
(1) Sheldon Jones, HEALTH &amp; HOUSEHOLD (1) Swallowfield, INSURANCE LIFE (1)
Irish Life, INVESTMENT TRUSTS (2) Berry Starquest, London &amp; Strathclyde,
MEDIA (2) Metro Radio, Trans World Comms., MISCELLANEOUS (1) Hornby, OIL &amp;
GAS (2) Aberdeen, Crossroads, OTHER INDUSTRIAL MATERIALS (1) Baynes (C),
PACKAGING, PAPER &amp; PRINTING (1) Blagden, PROPERTY (1) Five Oaks, STORES (2)
Cantors, Dunhill, MINES (9) Anglo Am Gold, Driefontein, Durban Deep, Gencor,
Gold Fields SA, Hartebeest, Impala Platinum, Rustenburg Platinum,
Stilfontein.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 40
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6494</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAGAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / London Stock Exchange: Equity futures and options trading
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PRICE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ANTICIPATION of an impending cut in German interest rates provided the main
point of interest in an otherwise featureless and quiet day's trading in the
derivatives market, writes Christopher Price.
The December FT-SE contract opened at 2,729 and proceeded to move forward,
although buyer interest was limited causing it to drift back. December
reached its low point of the day of 2,714 around 11am.
However, talk of an imminent German rate cut, which many in the market
believe may happen in the next month, sent December forward. It was also
helped by firmer short sterling and gilts, before settling to trade in a
range of 2,720-30 into the early afternoon.
An indifferent Wall Street, a weaker pound against the D-Mark and a lack of
buyers combined to prompt December to drift slightly in later trading. It
closed at 2,726, down 4 on the previous close and at a 10-point premium to
its estimated fair value of nine.
Wall Street volume was a tawdry 6,058 contracts.
In a busier traded options market, British Steel provided the main focus
among the stocks, recording 2,933 contracts.
This included a seller of 1,000 contracts of the January 50 calls.
Rolls-Royce clocked up 1,606, followed by Marks and Spencer at 1,023 and
HSBC on 982 contracts.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 40
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6495</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAF9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / World Stock Markets (America): Good earnings reports offset
economic data
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Wall Street
DESPITE some unexpectedly bad economic news, US stock markets held their
ground yesterday, thanks partly to some good earnings reports, writes
Patrick Harverson in New York.
At the close the Dow Jones Industrial Average was up 2.16 at 3,209.53,
having spent all day a few points either side of opening values. The more
broadly based Standard &amp; Poor's 500 also ended little changed, up just 0.75
at 423.60, while the Amex composite finished 2.85 higher at 389.34 and the
Nasdaq composite 3.73 firmer at 638.59. Turnover on the NYSE was heavy at
219m shares, and rises outnumbered declines by 951 to 794.
After a series of better-than-expected economic data, market sentiment was
hit by two disappointing reports yesterday morning. The labor department
announced a 31,000 rise in weekly jobless claims to a new total of 386,000,
an increase which was much higher than forecast. Similarly, analysts were
caught out by the commerce department's report of a 1.1 per cent drop in
October housing starts.
There was one piece of good news, however. The Philadelphia Federal Reserve
reported that its measure of local manufacturing activity is up sharply this
month, an indication that the economy in the region is coming back to life.
There was also some good corporate news for the market. Campbell Soup rose
Dollars 1 5/8 to Dollars 43 1/2 in turnover of more than 500,000 shares
after the food group announced a 21 per cent increase in profits to Dollars
156.6m and a 10 per cent increase in sales to Dollars 1.7bn during the third
quarter.
Owens-Corning rose Dollars 1 1/8 to Dollars 30 1/4 after Merrill Lynch, the
Wall Street broking house, raised its fourth-quarter profits forecast from
36 cents a share to 41 cents a share.
Morgan Stanley eased Dollars  1/8 to Dollars 53 after the big securities
company reported a small drop in third-quarter profits to Dollars 110.6m.
The results were in line with market expectations.
Transamerica jumped Dollars 1 1/2 to Dollars 45 1/8 after the financial
services conglomerate announced that it was floating a majority of its
property-casualty insurance operations. The company had previously announced
that it would dispose of the units.
Shares in Sony Corp dropped Dollars 1 to Dollars 30 7/8 after the Japanese
electronics and entertainment giant reported that consolidated pre-tax
profit for the first half fell 61 per cent.
AT&amp;T firmed Dollars  1/4 to Dollars 47 1/8 on the news that the
telecommunications group plans to sell 15 per cent of its AT&amp;T Capital
leasing subsidiary in a offer to the public.
On the Nasdaq market, National Computer dropped Dollars 1 7/8 to Dollars 15
after reporting third-quarter net income of 23 cents a share, down from 25
cents a share a year earlier and below analysts' forecasts.
Canada
TORONTO stock prices strayed little from Wednesday's levels in active
trading.
The TSE 300 composite index was up 2.05 points or 0.06 per cent to end at
3233.73. Declining issues topped advances 283 to 262.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6496</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAF8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / World Stock Markets: South Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
JOHANNESBURG ended mixed with the all-share index 13 lower at 3,039.
Industrials fell 25 to 4,066 as index-linked shares posted losses despite
two-way trade in late afternoon, and the gold index finished 10 weaker at
766.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6497</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAF7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): Nikkei rises for second
day as volume improves
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TWO-WAY trade supported activity as the Nikkei average rose moderately to
post its second consecutive gain, writes Emiko Terazono in Tokyo.
The Nikkei closed 92.47 higher at 16,871.31 after a high of 17,007.82 and a
low of 16,801.81. The high was registered in the morning on buying by public
pension funds and dealers, but share prices lost momentum as profit-taking
and position-squaring eroded some of the initial gains.
Volume remained firm at 320m shares against 347m. Advances led declines by
609 to 382 with 142 unchanged, the Topix index of all first section stocks
rose 3.32 to 1,274.53 but in London the ISE/Nikkei 50 index fell 7.47 to
1,016.84.
Index-linked buying and arbitrage-related trading also drove up share
prices, while companies took profits on tokkin, or specified money trusts.
Traders said that buy orders placed at lower levels by public funds and life
assurers were providing a firm support at the 16,000 level.
Mr Yasuhiko Jinza, of the stock investment division at Nippon Life, Japan's
largest life assurer, said that the Nikkei would probably move between a
range of 16,000 to 19,000: 'We bought on Wednesday since we feel 16,000 is
the bottom of the near-term range,' he said.
Banks, higher on Wednesday on active short-covering, were mixed. Sanwa Bank,
recently reported to be the top earner among commercial banks, rose Y20 to
Y1,490. However, Industrial Bank of Japan fell Y10 to Y2,370 on
profit-taking and Fuji Bank lost Y10 to Y1,770.
Electronics issues ran into profit-taking by foreign investors. Many
Japanese institutional investors also believe that electronics issues have
room for a further fall due to poor earnings prospects. Hitachi fell Y7 to
Y726, Matsushita Electric Industrial lost Y10 to Y1,070 and Sony lost Y130
to Y3,830. Steelmakers were lower on liquidations by corporate investors.
Nippon Steel fell Y3 to Y285 and Kobe Steel lost Y4 to Y296.
Roadbuilders rose on reports that the ruling Liberal Democratic Party would
apply for Y76,000bn in a five-year road construction project. Maeda Road
Construction gained Y70 to Y2,650 and Nippon Hodo gained Y40 to Y1,940.
In Osaka, the OSE average gained 129.55 to 18,211.62 in volume of 40.2m
shares.
Roundup
THE REGION was again volatile and mixed.
BANGKOK reacted again to the SEC action against a major investor and the SET
index dropped 33.87 or 3.9 per cent to 834.17 in thin turnover of Bt6.49bn.
The index has lost 128.86 or 13.4 per cent in the past 10 trading days.
The Finance Ministry set up a Bt5bn fund on Wednesday to help shore up the
market, but brokers thought that the money had not yet come into the market.
BOMBAY extended its decline, as the BSE index dropped 101.45 or 4 per cent
to 2,423.26 on heavy selling sparked by payment defaults in Calcutta.
State-owned investment institutions failed to support the market, dealers
said.
JAKARTA focused on the failure of Bank Summa and its effects on PT Astra
International, with major owners invloved in both cases. The official index
closed 1.86 lower at 288.81.
AUSTRALIA saw results as expected from Westpac and National Australia Bank
and the upbeat tone of the previous two days continued, with some overseas
interest and local institutions beginning to buy again.
The All Ordinaries index closed 16.9 higher at 1,392.0, lifted initially by
News Corp's overnight gains in the US ahead of Friday's release by its Fox
film division of Home Alone II. Locally, the stock gained ADollars 1 to
ADollars 28.50, a record high.
HONG KONG converted a morning slide of 3.5 per cent into a slight upturn at
the close. The Hang Seng index ended 7.08 higher at 5,855.41 against an
intraday low of 5,642.71 on selling motivated by the Sino-British row over
the future of the colony.
TAIWAN extended its Wednedsay's recovery with a futher 2.1 per cent gain.
The weighted index closed 22.28 higher at 3,682.38 in turnover up from
TDollars 11.5bn to TDollars 13.6bn.
SEOUL gained 11.24 to 632.49 in a technical rebound led by buying interest
in Kepco.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6498</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAF6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / World Stock Markets (Europe): Sweden rallies on decision to
float krona
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INFLUENCES on bourses were powerful and varied yesterday, with Sweden
elevated by a sinking currency and France depressed by a big sell program,
writes Our Markets Staff.
STOCKHOLM rallied 4.1 per cent in heavy trading on speculation, confirmed
just before the close, that the krona would be floated. The government also
announced an economic crisis package which included corporate tax cuts.
Exporters and forestry shares gained the most, as the Affarsvarlden general
index rose 29.90 to 754.8 and turnover surged to SKr1.25bn from SKr686m.
Swedish shares traded in London rose further in the afternoon.
Astra, the most heavily traded share, saw its B shares rise SKr19 to SKr622
while Ericsson B shares firmed SKr10 to SKr142. Volvo B put on SKr19 to
SKr275.
OSLO's all-share index closed at the day's high of 342.13, up 4.11, on
speculation that Sweden's move might force Norway to devalue its currency.
PARIS dropped on heavy selling, the most prominent seller being James Capel.
James Capel declined to comment, other than that it had executed a very
large sell order, but there was talk that the broker had sold Pounds 60m
worth of French equities on behalf of either a UK or a US client. The CAC 40
index fell 36.84 or 2.1 per cent to 1,722.33 in heavy turnover of FFr2.4bn,
up from FFr1.76bn.
Euro Disney dropped FFr5 or 6.8 per cent to FFr68 as investors questioned
the theme park's decision to pay a dividend for the year ended September,
during which it had made a loss of FFr188m.
Elf dropped FFr13.40 to FFr331.20 on reports of a big seller in the market,
while BSN fell FFr14 to FFr953 as another broker downgraded its forecasts
for the food company.
FRANKFURT saw a recovery in Daimler after its fall earlier in the week and a
fall in BASF on poor interim results. The DAX index added 6.60 to 1,551.65
in turnover of DM5.5bn after Tuesday's DM5.1bn. The market was closed on
Wednesday.
Daimler may have avoided serious scrutiny, with interest overshadowed
yesterday by events in Sweden. After falling earlier this week on a forecast
of a 22 per cent drop in 1992 profit, it recouped DM6.30 to DM544.
BASF fell DM5.50 to DM210 after a 72 per cent drop in third-quarter
earnings. Ms Jackie Ashurst, chemicals analyst at James Capel, said the
outcome was even worse than the market's poor expectations and brought
current forecasts of a DM2 cut in the dividend to DM10 into question.
Lufthansa rewarded its fans, rising DM5.50 to DM105.50 on news that in the
third quarter of 1992 its operating result had practically broken even and
that earnings turned positive in September for the first time this year.
MILAN continued to consolidate and the speculative fizz evaporated from
targeted stocks. The Comit index fell 11.67 or 2.4 per cent to 464.72 as
turnover fell from L327bn to an estimated L250bn.
Banca di Roma lost L155 or 6.5 per cent to L2,245 and Credito Italiano fell
L55 to L2,675. Rinascente, sought after recently on speculation that Fiat
would sell its controlling stake in the retailer, dropped L830 or 9.9 per
cent to L7,550 on profit-taking.
But the brandy and spirits maker Buton added another L420 to L3,720.
MADRID retreated a little after a strong start as the general index closed
3.44 higher at 215.48 after 216.62 at the end of the morning. Volume stayed
high at an estimated Pta30bn.
However there were sharp individual fluctuations, Telefonica closing Pta5
lower at Pta1,120 after hitting Pta1,120 at one point and Iberdrola I ending
Pta4 lower at Pta673 after topping out at Pta697.
Over-sold construction stocks mostly held on to strong gains, as Dragados
rose Pta115 to Pta1,225.
ZURICH saw a recovery in banks on a decline in Swiss interest rates,
following central bank moves this week to improve liquidity and ease money
market tension. Union Bank rose SFr9 to SFr803, SBC by SFr6.50 to SFr262 and
CS Holding by SFr20 to SFr1,905.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                     FT-SE Actuaries Share Indices
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
November 19                                         THE EUROPEAN SERIES
Hourly changes             Open        10.30       11.00       12.00
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100       1055.06     1055.22     1055.17     1054.08
FT-SE Eurotrack 200       1115.65     1114.19     1114.26     1114.70
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                 Nov 18      Nov 17      Nov 16
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100             1051.36     1056.32     1058.27
FT-SE Eurotrack 200             1106.59     1109.66     1110.19
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Hourly changes             13.00       14.00       15.00       Close
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100       1052.88     1055.66     1053.91     1047.93
FT-SE Eurotrack 200       1112.79     1117.18     1115.07     1110.76
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                 Nov 13                  Nov 12
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100              1059.26                 1059.91
FT-SE Eurotrack 200              1114.93                 1120.89
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Base value  1000 (26/10/90)  High/day: 100 -  1055.89 ; 200 -  1118.99
Low/day: 100 -  1047.78  200 -  1110.01  ??Partial
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6499</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAF5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / World Stock Markets: High interest rates depress Istanbul -
After a miserable year, Turkish equities are looking cheap
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN MURRAY BROWN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Dashed hopes on inflation and high real interest rates have given Turkish
equities a miserable year, but if one thing can be said with confidence it
is that they have probably never been cheaper.
According to data provided by the IFC, part of the World Bank, Turkish
equities have been the worst performers in its emerging markets table,
falling by 58.8 per cent in dollar terms from the start of the year to the
end of October, and showing no improvement by mid-November.
As many as 35 stocks of the 145 traded are now below their nominal value,
market capitalisation has fallen to Dollars 9.5bn from Dollars 15bn in
November last year, and daily turnover has dropped to around Dollars 11m
from Dollars 80m a year ago.
The stock market has been driven lower by high interest rates, and with
little let-up in inflation, the pressure looks set to continue.
The state-owned Ziraat, the country's largest bank, is now offering 73 per
cent on yearly deposits.
This reflects a resurgence in inflation, after a slowdown over the summer.
Consumer prices jumped in September and October, pushing the annual
inflation rate to 69.2 per cent, way above the government's 1992 target of
42 per cent.
The market, which lacks large institutional investors to provide much-needed
liquidity, has been deserted by local retail investors who have provided
much of the impetus in the past. They are putting their money elsewhere,
into time deposits or into gold.
Institutional reform has been slow. The government has still to approve
legislation to provide tax breaks for mutual funds to encourage them to
invest in equities.
'There is still little concept of fund management in Turkey. You're either
in one thing or the other. There is no idea of diversifying a portfolio,'
says Ms Radhika Ajmera director of Abtrust, which manages the Turkey Trust -
one of the few country funds investing in Turkish stocks.
The government has taken some measures to encourage investment in the stock
market. For example, it has made insider trading illegal. 'We've passed 17
regulations since May,' says Mr Yaman Asikoglu, head of the Capital Markets
Board, the government watchdog authority. 'Even if nothing else is done, the
mere fact that it's now law is sufficient to bring offenders to court.'
While investors are not falling over themselves to return, there is
nonetheless a growing feeling that the market may finally be approaching the
bottom.
Some blue-chip companies are reporting good earnings growth, beating the
government's own target of 5-6 per cent for the economy in 1992. The
favoured sectors are those with strong cash flow and low debt, a major
problem in view of the country's high real interest rates, and companies
which have a well-established franchise in the domestic market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6500</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAF4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Power plant switches on 'battery hen'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BAXTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITAIN switched on to poultry power yesterday with the official opening of
what is claimed to be the world's first commercial power station fuelled by
chicken droppings, giving new meaning to the term 'battery hen'.
The Pounds 25m power plant at Eye in Suffolk generates 12.5MW of electricity
 -enough for 12,500 homes - from poultry litter: a mixture of wood shavings,
straw and poultry droppings that can be burnt at very high temperatures to
produce steam.
The plant will use 130,000 tonnes of poultry litter a year - nearly 9 per
cent of the 1.5m tons produced annually in the UK or enough to fill 25
football fields 2m deep.
According to Fibropower, the London-based company that built the plant and
developed the technology, chicken power is generating worldwide interest. Mr
Rupert Fraser, finance director, said it could be used wherever there was
sufficient density of poultry droppings.
The fuel used at Eye represents the 'output' of 70m chickens. As the birds
are harvested every few months, that is equivalent to a population of 12.5m
birds at any one time - so the plant's output is produced at the rate of one
watt per chicken.
Mr Fraser emphasised that the plant used poultry litter only from broiler
poultry farms, where the birds live on a bed of deep litter. This provides a
regular fuel source as the chicken farmers have to clear their sheds
frequently, and a consistent fuel because of supermarkets' need for uniform
quality chickens.
Although the process is no more efficient than a similar-sized coal-fired
power station, Fibropower says that replacing a coal power station with
chicken power, along with the associated handling in poultry litter, will
reduce carbon dioxide emissions by two-thirds.
The only significant byprod-uct is ash, which will be sold as an
environmentally friendly, nitrogen-free fertiliser.
The Suffolk plant was one of 75 renewable-energy projects approved in 1990
and is the largest to start operating under the non-fossil-fuel obligation
of the 1989 Electricity Act. That obliges the 12 regional electricity
companies to take fixed proportions of the electricity available from
renewable-energy projects.
Eastern Electricity has taken a minority stake in Fibropower, and has
invested Pounds 2m at Eye and a larger 13.5MW chicken power plant being
built at Glanford, south Humberside, by Fibrogen, a Fibropower sister
company.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6501</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAF3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / BA strike averted at Gatwick: Angry ground staff say company
plans to impose 25% pay cut
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CATHERINE MILTON, Labour Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH AIRWAYS last night averted strike action planned for today at
Gatwick airport by agreeing to hold further talks with unions over pay and
conditions for ground staff.
More than 1,200 staff, including booking and ticket sales staff, had voted
overwhelmingly for strike action after the unions claimed that the airline
planned to impose pay cuts averaging 25 per cent and failed to operate
negotiated consultation procedures at a local level.
BA said it had consulted unions and offered staff 'generous' compensation
worth one year's salary if they chose to take jobs in a new Gatwick-based
subsidiary, or redeployment elsewhere within the airline.
The row follows the airline's acquisition - for Pounds 1 - of Dan-Air,
formerly the UK's oldest independent airline, and the proposed introduction
of pay scales for staff in the new subsidiary known as British Airways
Gatwick Services.
Last night BA agreed to further talks after members of the TGWU general
union voted 909 to 111 in favour of a strike. Members of Apex, the
white-collar section of the GMB general union, also voted to strike by 202
to 15.
Management and unions will meet today 'to discuss and agree a solution for
cost effective short-haul operations at Gatwick', according to an agreed
statement. Talks are set to end by December 9.
The pay cuts would mean, for example, a drop of more than Pounds 3,000 for
check-in staff earning an average Pounds 13,000 a year, with compensation
payments averaging Pounds 14,000.
Virgin Atlantic and Airlines of Britain Holdings, which owns British
Midland, are expected to apply today for permission to seek a judicial
review of the government's failure to refer the takeover of Dan-Air by
British Airways to the Monopolies and Mergers Commission.
They are also accusing the director-general of fair trading of failing in
his duty to recommend the referral to Michael Heseltine, trade and industry
secretary.
The airlines say the director-general and Mr Heseltine were required to act
under EC treaty rules aimed at preventing distortion of competition or abuse
of a company's dominant position in the common market.
They complain that the BA purchase will put smaller airlines at a
disadvantage and harm their competitive position.
Northwest Airlines must escape the winter, Page 26
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6502</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAF2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / MMC inquiry into sales of perfume
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GUY DE JONQUIERES, Consumer Industries Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ALLEGATIONS that perfume manufacturers are illegally restricting supplies of
fine fragrances in order to maintain high retail prices are to be
investigated by the Monopolies and Mergers Commission at the request of the
Office of Fair Trading.
The decision marks a victory for Superdrug, the cosmetics and toiletries
chain, which sells leading fragrances at discounts of up to 30 per cent on
the normal retail price at 15 of its 670 stores.
Superdrug, part of the Kingfisher retail group, has complained to the OFT
that leading manufacturers such as Givenchy and Yves Saint Laurent have
refused to supply it directly, forcing it to obtain their products more
expensively on the 'grey' market.
The investigation will focus on whether manufacturers have denied supplies
to cut-price shops by applying unfairly standards governing the stocking,
presentation and sale of their products in retail outlets.
The MMC, which has nine months to report, will also examine complaints by
Superdrug that national magazines and newspapers have refused to accept
advertisements for its range of discount perfumes.
Superdrug says it has been unable to obtain perfumes directly even though it
has sought to meet the manufacturers' standards by investing in special
counters staffed by trained sales assistants.
The OFT has studied the case for almost a year. It was unsure until recently
whether it could act, because the European Commission has exempted from EC
competition rules some restrictions imposed by perfume manufacturers on
distribution.
Sir Bryan Carsberg, director-general of fair trading, said yesterday that he
was not seeking to negate the EC exemptions. However, some of the supply
restrictions were not covered by the exemptions and could violate Article 85
(1) of the Rome Treaty, which outlaws anti-competitive trade practices.
According to the OFT, UK sales of fine fragrances total about Pounds 180m a
year.
As well as Givenchy and Yves Saint Laurent, leading suppliers include Chanel
and Christian Dior. None of the companies would comment yesterday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6503</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAF1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / The Lex Column: Blue Circle
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Blue Circle's June rights issue and the accompanying purchase of French
boilermaker Celsius now look to have been badly timed. The shares stand at a
25 per cent discount to the ex-rights price. Yesterday's announcement of a
15 per cent reduction in the company's cement manufacturing capacity,
however, looks to be the right decision. Given the surfeit of houses and
offices washed up by the building binge of the late 1980s, the chances of
general economic recovery feeding through to construction in the next year
or so remain remote.
Blue Circle's action goes some way towards restoring the cement market's
equilibrium while leaving a little slack for an upturn when it comes; it
also improves the chance that next year's dividend will be maintained.
Investors, though, may not be ready to give the new managing director the
benefit of the doubt just yet. Yesterday's development may be better news
for Rugby.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6504</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAF0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / The Lex Column: Germany
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The alarming feature of Daimler-Benz's nine-month figures is the sheer speed
of the downturn since the summer. Even at the six month stage in June the
company was predicting an improvement over the full year. The worst of the
damage has come in cars and trucks. Mercedes sold 15 per cent fewer cars in
its home market during the third quarter - a sure sign that the
reunification bubble has burst. By promising to cut 10 per cent of its
workforce over two years, Daimler-Benz is striking a tough posture. The
worry is that German companies are behind the international competition with
their house-keeping. The 2,000 redundancies announced by BASF yesterday look
like a company getting to grips with costs, but ICI was at a similar stage
in 1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6505</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / The Lex Column: Evode
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Wassall's bid for Evode emphasises that there are plenty of reasonably sound
companies trading at rock-bottom prices. With turnover in small company
shares so low, some degree of mis-pricing might be expected. Yet although it
is hard to believe that Evode was fairly valued at 58p a share before the
market caught scent of a bid, potential bidders are thin on the ground.
Lower interest rates might normally be expected to stimulate debt-funded
takeovers. But the walking wounded from the debt binge of the late 1980s -
including Evode - are a grim reminder of the consequences of paying too much
at the wrong time.
Evode could certainly use an injection of capital. Gearing at the last
balance sheet stood close to 200 per cent if the convertible preference
shares are counted as debt. The dividend has been cut and capital
expenditure pared back. The company could hardly ask shareholders for cash
by way of a rights issue without offering a human sacrifice. Little wonder
the incumbent management has avoided such a route. Disposals have helped,
but that route leaves Evode selling assets under pressure at the bottom of
the cycle. In this context, Wassall's plan to use its stratospheric multiple
to raise capital looks good sense.
Whether Wassall's opening shot is enough is another matter. On a multiple of
operating cash flow, something closer to 100p a share might be a fairer
price. Wassall might legitimately argue that 100p would be an over-generous
premium over the pre-bid price. If it walks away with Evode for much less,
the market can hardly complain.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6506</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / The Lex Column: Euro Disney
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Perhaps Euro Disney's 'imagineers' should be called in to build a fairy tale
set on which investors feverishly purchase the company's own shares. The
reality - witness yesterday's heavy turnover in which 1 per cent of the
stock changed hands and the priced sagged a further 7 per cent - is
continuing stock market disenchantment with this Mickey Mouse venture.
One might almost feel sorry for the company if it had not been so complacent
in the first place. After all, the combination of a nominal dividend and the
deferral of Walt Disney's base management fee is a sign that management is
now desperately trying to please.
The 2.2 per cent prospective yield, though, is of little serious help in
valuing the shares. In the absence of a reliable earnings stream even the
soothing words about record attendances for a Disney start-up may not
silence the bears. Recent assurances about the high proportion of British
visitors, indeed, seem rather less convincing in the context of sterling's
depreciation. The best hope for the shares is that most of the weak holders
have now been shaken out. But a stock like Euro Disney, bought by the
professionals for short term trading, is always going to test the nerves of
small shareholders clinging on for the long term ride.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6507</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / The Lex Column: Message from Mercury
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
It is hard to quibble with Cable and Wireless's interim figures. Even
allowing for wrinkles such as the Pounds 12m made from interest rate swaps,
the company for once seems to be firing on all cylinders. Cost control and
volume gains produced useful progress in Hong Kong and a dramatic turn of
speed at Mercury. Those cynics who thought Mercury may have been polished
vigorously for sale should have their suspicions calmed by the subsidiary's
29 per cent increase in turnover.
Yet with the good news already out, the shares may find it hard to push much
higher. C and W's premium to the market is getting close to a five year low;
price competition with BT may intensify, and the business climate in Hong
Kong could scarcely be more favourable than it is at present. As the
chairman acknowledges, the telecoms market worldwide is moving towards lower
margins and the company will have to manage its way through that change.
Having sold 20 per cent of Mercury for cash, the right investment
opportunities must now be found to replace that growing profits stream. The
rapid evolution of the telecoms market will generate plenty of deals. Yet
only deregulation of the European market is likely to demand large amounts
of cash, and competition for contracts will be fierce everywhere. It is
worth remembering that C and W's past success has more often flowed from
exploiting its existing franchises than winning bidding wars.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6508</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Letter: Frustrations face those ready to 'seize' business
opportunities
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Ms M E A BLACKBURN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, I read with a mixture of interest, frustration and total amazement your
article ('Major will urge business to seize opportunities', November 16)
regarding the direct appeal made by John Major to 'British industry and
business to seize the opportunities on offer, as the government steps up its
efforts to create economic confidence',in his speech at the Lord Mayor's
banquet.
My company has recently had a planning application for change of use to A3 -
that is, restaurant - refused because of an objection by the National Rivers
Authority on the grounds that 'the development would increase unsatisfactory
discharges of sewage to the aquatic environment because of the inability of
the Heswall Sewage Treatment works and storm sewage overflows to cope
satisfactorily with existing flows of sewage to the public system.'
Our development would invest some Pounds 150,000, employ in excess of 20
full-time people and use the goods and services of local traders.
How is it possible to seize the opportunities on offer when the now
privatised Welsh Water's published investment programme for 1990-95 does not
include any improvements in this area and, as a consequence, the NRA has a
moratorium for the whole of this period on any planning applications? The
result is economic stagnation.
Anne Blackburn,
managing director,
Fable International,
Hallside,
Chelford,
Knutsford, Cheshire
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6509</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Observer: Tailpiece
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
True to the spirit of Premier Major's citizen's charters, the National
Canine Defence League has produced an equivalent spelling out the rights of
dogs.
Rail travellers reading it will see its provisions are more in line with
what actually happens than British Rail's charter for passengers. One of the
boons it bestows on the animals is the right to be neutered.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6510</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Observer: Baht that
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The real name of Sia Song, the dapper 35-year-old speculator at the centre
of this week's turmoil on the Thailand stock market, is Song Watcharasriroj.
Sia is a nickname meaning 'tycoon', as he reminded everyone by publicly
producing Bt10m (Pounds 260,000) in cash for his bail.
It was twice as much as required.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6511</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Observer: Revving up
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
'An ace in the Avvocato's new hand of poker' was how one Italian paper
described Giorgio Garuzzo after this week's management shake-up at Fiat.
The 'Avvocato' is, of course, Gianni Agnelli, the grand old man of Italian
business who steps down from the Fiat presidency in 1994.
Aside from naming his brother Umberto as his successor, the Avvocato has
kept everyone guessing as to the future shape of the management team. By
being given the new post of chief operating officer with control over all
industrial operation, the 54-year-old Garuzzo has been fingered as the man
most likely to take over as chief executive officer from Cesare Romiti.
At 69, Romiti is two years younger than his boss but is expected to leave
either with him or before him. Umberto Agnelli at 57 is of a different
generation and is personally closer to Garuzzo.
With Fiat since 1976, Garuzzo's career conforms to the classical image of a
modern industrial manager in northern Italy. In 1984 he was chosen to run
Iveco, the commercial vehicles group.
He joined the 'nomenklatura' in 1980 when he was promoted to be president of
Fiat Auto, replacing Umberto Agnelli.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6512</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Observer: Newcastle bound
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Sunderland on the River Wear, has long been engaged in rivalry with
neighbouring Tyneside. The dispute has normally centred on football but now
Wearsiders have a new reason to feel a little sore about their rivals on the
Tyne.
Nissan's announcement yesterday that it is moving the export of its
Sunderland-made Primeras and Micras from Teesside to the Port of Tyne,
rather than the port of Sunderland, is a matter of some regret for
Wearsiders, but not entirely unexpected.
Much more wounding is the realisation that this means Nissan's newest
car-carrying ship, named City of Sunderland only this month in honour of the
city where Nissan's UK car plant is based, will from 1994 be plying in and
out of the Tyne, bearing Sunderland-made cars.
Nissan, however, is aware of Wearsiders' sensibilities about the
neighbouring Geordies. 'It won't go to the Port of Tyne before it's visited
Sunderland on its maiden voyage,' promises a Nissan spokesman.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6513</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Observer: Inquest
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Now more than ever, the founders of a company can't be too careful when
choosing its name. Take for instance Penna, the title redundancy consultants
Sanders and Sidney picked last year when renaming their quoted holding
company.
Checking on what it had been up to lately, a colleague consulted the FT's
computer database. Up came lurid tales of suicides, fire deaths and drug
overdoses.
The inquest shows that a certain totally unrelated Colin Penna is a coroner
in north-east England.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6514</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Observer: Ah so
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The Japanese have a new word for the state of their economy: sokobai. But
one place where you won't hear it spoken is Nippon Syntex's immunological
research centre north of Tokyo - staff there must use the translation
'crawling along the bottom'.
The reason is that the pharmaceuticals group has banned the use of Japanese
at the centre, making English its official language instead. 'We're visited
by researchers from all over the world,' explains a spokesman, 'and we want
them to feel at home.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6515</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Observer: Out of the frying pan
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
For all the warmth Norman Lamont's Autumn Statement has won him on the Tory
backbenches, there are murmurs that he may still be on the slide. Indeed,
some say the success itself will make it easier for him to accept a
'dignified' transfer.
True, the chancellor will have none of it, telling friends he has a personal
assurance from John Major that he's safe in the Treasury. But that has not
stopped Westminster's favourite game.
One suggestion is that Lamont could be moved to Defence, still a big job in
a Tory government. Malcolm Rifkind would be shifted to the Home Office and
Kenneth Clarke would get the keys to 11 Downing Street.
But there are other challengers for the Treasury, among them John MacGregor
at Transport. Right-wing Tory MPs - unsure of Major's intentions - have
begun actively to promote the candidatures of Michael Howard at Environment,
Peter Lilley at Social Security and Michael Portillo, the youthful but
fast-rising chief secretary.
But there is general agreement that, should the prime minister decide to
shake-up his team, he has only until the second weekend in January - that's
when the chancellor hosts the traditional Chevening meeting, which signals
the start of serious planning for the budget.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6516</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Letter: Kenneth Clarke's message on Bosnian refugees must be
reversed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Ms SARAH SPENCER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, What kind of statement does Kenneth Clarke think he is making to the
rest of the world when he denies entry to Bosnian refugees stranded on the
Slovenia border ('Furore grows over Bosnian refugees', November 18); when he
requires them to obtain visas, knowing that they cannot reach the towns
where consular facilities are available? It can only be that Britain is
uncharitable and illiberal, unwilling to shoulder its international
responsibilities and share its peace and relative prosperity with those who
are manifestly less fortunate.
No wonder the foreign secretary feels that his authority on the world stage
has been undermined.
Of more lasting damage, however, may be the message Mr Clarke is sending to
the British people that Britain is for the British, that Bosnian refugees
are undesirable, an unacceptable burden, outsiders who should not be allowed
to share our way of life.
If Mr Clarke rests his closed door policy on fears of an anti-refugee
backlash from the far right then he should be aware that he is playing into
their hands. He cannot counter their arguments by singing their song. The
message he projects must be reversed: that refugees need not be a burden but
an asset. In the short term they need our help. In the long term, if they
stay, they will contribute to the economic prosperity and cultural diversity
of our nation as generations of refugees have done before. The German
Interior Ministry has belatedly launched a publicity programme of this kind.
The Swedish government has for many years provided Swedes with positive
information about people who have moved to live in that country.
The extraordinary humanitarian efforts of agencies like Alert demonstrate a
generosity of spirit from which Kenneth Clarke has much to learn. But
opening the doors would not be enough. We must tell the British people not
only that this is the right course of action for Britain to take but that
both internationally and domestically, it is in our interests to do so.
Sarah Spencer,
Institute for Policy Research,
30-32 Southampton Street,
London WC2E 7KA
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6517</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / How the French fought to save the franc: William Dawkins and
David Buchan tell the tale of how the government's financial team managed to
thwart the markets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS and DAVID BUCHAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A few yards beneath the helipad on the roof of the high-tech structure that
houses the French finance ministry is the office of Mr Thierry Aulagnon,
chief adviser to the minister.
Mr Aulagnon, one of the brightest financial brains in the French
administration, is at his computer screen, gloomily watching the value of
the franc, stuck near the bottom of its permitted rate in the European
Monetary System (EMS). The screen tells him that the franc is continuing to
wilt under the heaviest speculation on record, despite the large sums being
spent on intervention by the Bank of France.
It is late afternoon on Tuesday, September 22, two days after France's
narrow vote in favour of European monetary and political union. Mr Aulagnon
is aware that failure to turn back the speculators would be a disaster for
an already weak government.
Every 15 minutes, the Bank of France telephones to tell Mr Aulagnon that it
has bought another billion francs or so of its own currency in an attempt to
thwart the speculators. As dealing rooms across the world continue to bet on
a devaluation, the screen beeps intermittently, breaking the calm of Mr
Aulagnon's carpeted office. 'It was my worst moment,' he recalls. By the end
of the seven-day crisis on September 23, the French central bank had bought
FFr160bn (Pounds 19.6bn), its biggest-ever intervention.
That Tuesday afternoon, Mr Aulagnon could not have felt more alone. His
inexperienced young boss, Mr Michel Sapin, 40, who was promoted from junior
justice minister to finance minister only last April, was closeted in a
Washington hotel room with Mr Jacques de Larosiere, governor of the Bank of
France, and their German counterparts, Mr Theo Waigel and Mr Helmut
Schlesinger. There, they negotiated the Franco-German support for the
franc/D-Mark parity that in the end foiled the markets. Until then, Mr
Sapin's best-known contribution to his country's finances had been his
collection of antique coins.
Today, the French government is confident enough to tell the tale of how the
battle for the franc was won. Mr Sapin and his team claim they never doubted
that they would pull it off. 'People told us that the market is always
right. But we saw no reason why the franc deserved to be devalued, in terms
of economic fundamentals. It was total determination, total - from the
finance minister, to the prime minister and the president,' says Mr
Aulagnon.
But at the time, the markets did not see it that way. Traders found it hard
to believe that a currency which was effectively devalued five times in the
1980s could survive unscathed the September currency crisis. So how did the
finance ministry keep its head?
Mr Aulagnon recalls that 'a shadow fell across the franc' from the moment of
the Danish vote against the Maastricht treaty in early June, followed by
President Francois Mitterrand's decision to call a referendum. Throughout
July and August, it weakened steadily against the D-Mark.
The battle began in earnest at lunchtime on Thursday, September 17, the day
after sterling and the lira were forced to leave the exchange rate mechanism
of the EMS. Officials expected the franc to be next in the firing line, if
only because nobody knew what the result of the referendum would be on the
coming Sunday.
In afternoon dealings in Paris and morning trades in New York, the franc's
previously gentle decline suddenly accelerated, until it hit FFr3.4250 to
the D-Mark, still a fraction above its permitted floor of FFr3.4305. But
that was close enough to alarm a French government committed to intervening
voluntarily before EMS rules obliged it to do so.
By Friday evening the Bank of France had bought FFr56bn of its own currency,
borrowing heavily from the Bundesbank and commercial banks, but had failed
to shift the rate significantly. It had even begun to spend its own
reserves. 'We tried not to panic, to learn a lesson from the British and
Italian experience,' said Mr Aulagnon. Even so, Mr Sapin was worried enough
to delay by a nearly a day his departure to Washington for a meeting with
the other finance ministers of the Group of Seven leading industrialised
nations.
Finally, on Friday evening, he left for the US with Mr Jean-Claude Trichet,
director of the Treasury, and Mr de Larosiere. Mr Aulagnon was left in
charge of an emergency team in Paris. Over the Atlantic, the trio prepared
plans for defending the franc in the event of a No or a narrow Yes in the
Sunday referendum. In either case, German political support would be needed.
By Sunday afternoon Washington time, Mr Aulagnon was able to relay to Mr
Sapin that the French result was a narrow Yes and that the franc was
therefore likely to come under worse attack. Mr Sapin and Mr de Larosiere
opened negotiations with their German counterparts the next day.
Back in Paris, Mr Aulagnon was surprised as the franc, contrary to
expectations, recovered against the D-Mark to FFr3.3850 in off-market
trading on Sunday night. But by Monday morning, his worse expectations
turned out to be true and the franc slammed back down to FFr3.4250.
Chaos broke out on the markets for the next two days, while the
Franco-German teams in Washington finalised - in English, their only common
language - the complex details of co-ordinated intervention by their central
banks. Meanwhile, the Bank of France continued to hold the fort.
It was not until 2am on September 23, that an exhausted Mr Sapin made it
back to the finance ministry in Paris, bearing a Franco-German statement
that the franc/ D-Mark parity would be defended, and the secret details of a
public promise by the Bank of France and the Bundesbank to intervene
'massively'. Mr Sapin went into a two-hour meeting with Mr Aulagnon's team,
at which they discussed how to present the deal.
At 8.15am a rise in French official interest rates flashed across the Reuter
screens, followed five minutes later by the joint statement. At 8.30am Mr
Sapin announced the deal. The finance ministry held its breath as the
Bundesbank began, for the first time, to intervene. It was not until the
afternoon that Paris received its reward, as the franc started to recover,
to FFr3.40 in early New York trading. The rise prompted relief in the French
finance ministry.
'Since then, things have gone on improving,' says Mr Aulagnon. At that
moment, his screen beeps from the other side of the room. Mr Aulagnon
saunters over to check, with an air of perhaps overstudied calm. 'I always
thought we would win,' he repeats. 'But even so, I wouldn't want to go
through that again.'
Mr Aulagnon may get his wish. But the continuing turbulence on the foreign
exchange markets, which yesterday saw the franc fall 0.7 centimes to
FFr3.38, suggests more battles could lie ahead.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6518</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Letter: Growth of the independent financial adviser
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr KEVIN MCBRIEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Lex's view ('Tide against agents', November 16) that life company tied
agents have caused the biggest headaches in the wake of the last Financial
Service Act may well be true of smaller tied agents. However, these need to
be differentiated from larger tied agents, such as some of the major
building societies.
These larger tied agents have not, as far as I am aware, warranted such
criticism from the regulators.
I would also query Lex's statement that 'the trend towards direct sales
forces shows no signs of slowing'. The market share I have before me shows
direct sales and home services companies with a combined share of 48 per
cent in 1990 and a very similiar 46 per cent at mid-1992 - an undoubtedly
considerable contribution to the total market.
Independent financial advisers, however, have seen their business increase
substantially and their market share go ahead from 32 per cent to 36 per
cent at end-June 1992.
These figures exclude executive and group pensions business for which there
is little reliable data, but their inclusion would have emphasised the trend
towards independent advice rather than diminished it.
Although my company deals exclusively through independent financial
advisers, none of the above should be construed as a criticism of properly
constituted tied agents or direct sales forces. I believe that each channel,
properly controlled, has its own considerable part to play.
But I do not subscribe to the view that the trend towards direct sales
forces shows no signs of slowing. It seems on the data that the feature of
the last couple of years, if anything, is the growing significance of
independent financial advice.
Kevin McBrien,
general manager,
National Provident Institution,
National Provident House,
Tunbridge Wells,
Kent TN1 2UE
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6519</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Letter: Impulse for recovery programme
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Sir ARTHUR KNIGHT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, In a lecture in London on November 11, Rudi Dornbusch of Massachusetts
Institute of Technology suggested that in the absence of effective EC-wide
policies, Franco-German co-operation offers the best hope of getting 'actual
decisions'; that issues concerning the former Soviet Union should take
priority; and (in response to a question) that as a first step there should
be an approach to Moscow.
The object of the approach would be to offer a substantial cash sum (to be
provided by the Japanese) in exchange for the return to Japan of the Kurile
Islands; firm undertakings (endorsed by the parliament) to act effectively
to deal with fiscal and monetary problems; and to get on quickly with
privatisation.
That might seem a good way to strengthen the prospects for the 'joint
recovery programme' of which Edward Mortimer writes (Foreign Affairs,
November 18). Apart from political and security considerations, the early
consideration of such a programme is surely justified by the impulse to
growth which it could provide worldwide at a time when other prospects are
lacking?
Arthur Knight,
Charlton End,
Singleton,
Nr Chichester,
West Sussex PO18 0HX
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6520</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Money Markets: Euromark futures rise
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BLITZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHORT-DATED Euromark futures rose sharply yesterday after the Swedish
central bank decided to float the krona against the European currency unit
(Ecu.)
This focused the attention of dealers on the continuing tension in currency
markets and the possibility that the Bundesbank might introduce a cut in
official interest rates as part of as broad currency realignment, writes
James Blitz.
Sterling money markets remained calm, although short-dated futures fell back
several basis points after the latest money supply figures reflected a sharp
rise in bank lending in October, consolidating the view that the UK
authorities might not choose to ease monetary policy again this year.
On Tuesday afternoon, short-dated Euromark futures rose sharply after cuts
in Belgian and Dutch interest rates raised speculation that the Bundesbank
might have more of an opportunity to ease monetary policy without weakening
the D-Mark.
Sweden's decision to allow the embattled krona to devalue against other
currencies consolidated that trend. As soon as Sweden announced the float,
the crown plunged by about 8 per cent against the Ecu.
This caused tensions in European currency markets, and prompted dealers to
think that the Bundesbank might be forced to cut its Discount rate sooner
than it would like. The December short sterling contract rose 8 basis points
to a close of 91.35, while the March contract rose 7 basis points to a close
of 92.36.
French franc futures also rose, but the impact there was stunted by the
sharp weakening of the French franc against a generally stronger D-Mark. The
December contract rose 5 basis points to a high of 90.82, but later fell
back to a close of 90.78.
Short sterling futures fell back after total seasonally adjusted sterling
lending to Britain's private sector rose by Pounds 5.1bn in October compared
with a fall of Pounds 1.1bn the previous month. This consolidated a growing
feeling in the market that there will be no more easing in interest rates
this year.
The December short sterling contract fell 4 basis points to a low of 93.09
and later closed at 93.10. The March contract fell 5 basis points to a low
of 93.74 and later closed at 93.76.
Conditions in the cash market were easier after the Bank of England's
shortage of Pounds 850m was fully removed. Three month money closed
unchanged at 7 3/16 per cent on the offered side, while the 1 month closed
down  1/4 per cent at 7 1/8 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6521</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Foreign Exchanges: Sweden devalues the krona
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BLITZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE was strong speculation yesterday that another realignment of the
European exchange rate mechanism is imminent after Sweden's central bank
decided to float the krona against the European currency unit (Ecu), writes
James Blitz.
The Swedish authorities abandoned their policy of fixing the krona's
exchange rate against the Ecu after an earlier decision to raise interest
rates to 20 per cent failed to staunch a heavy flight of foreign capital out
of Stockholm.
By 1700 GMT, the float had effectively devalued the currency by 9.4 per cent
against the D-Mark to a level of SKr4.1200.
The effects of the devaluation were felt across the world's currency
markets, forcing the D-Mark up against the dollar, the French franc and the
lira as investors sold kronor for the German currency.
The dollar closed nearly 2 pfennigs down against the German currency at
DM1.5790. The Italian lira, which had appreciated sharply as investors grow
increasingly confident about the Italian government's emergency package,
fell to a close of L859.1 against the D-Mark from a previous L855.1. Later,
in US trading, it had slumped to L863.
Perhaps the most striking fall was the French franc's. Dealers have come to
see it as one of the strongest currencies in Europe in recent weeks. That
impression has still not been severely dented, but the franc closed at
FFr3.3800 against the D-Mark, down 0.7 centimes on the day.
The overall effects of the devaluation remained small in comparison to the
floating of the Finnish markka in the autumn, at a time when markets were
moving towards the currency crisis crescendo.
However, some dealers suggested that yesterday's move might have a domino
effect, increasing volatility in exchange rates in the next few days.
Mr Avinash Persaud, an economist at UBS Phillips &amp; Drew in London, believes
that European financial authorities could now be forced into an imminent
realignment of the ERM, in which the Spanish peseta, the Portuguese escudo
and the Irish punt are devalued.
Dealers believe these currencies are still overvalued against the D-Mark,
and that they will need to be devalued by between 5 and 10 per cent to
trigger a badly-needed spurt of economic growth.
'European financial authorities will now start to believe that the system
needs a catharsis - a cleaning - from which it will become far more stable,'
said Mr Persaud. 'The Swedish devaluation was not an isolated event. Sweden
is the first of the devaluation candidates not to be defended by capital
controls.'
Sterling, which is extremely unlikely to return to the ERM in the near term,
fell one pfennig to a close of DM2.4200. Sterling closed up more than one
cent against the US currency at Dollars 1.5325.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6522</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Government Bonds: D-Mark offers safe haven from currency
turmoil
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB and PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON, NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SWEDEN'S decision to float the krona yesterday afternoon after repeated
speculative attacks on the currency hit some of Europe's high-yielding bond
markets which remain vulnerable to currency turmoil, and encouraged further
switching into the safe haven of the D-Mark.
The Riksbank, Sweden's central bank, initially raised the key marginal
lending rate from 11.5 per cent to 20 per cent in a bid to defend the
currency.
But as the rise in interest rates appeared to have little impact, the
Riksbank decided to abandon its link to the Ecu and float the krona,
subsequently lowering the marginal lending rate to 12.5 per cent.
The outflow of currency from Sweden over the past six days reached SKr160bn
 -far more than during the September currency crisis when the key marginal
lending rate was raised to 500 per cent. Dealers estimated the Riksbank's
reserves of about SKr185bn had come close to depletion. The krona was
effectively devalued by 9.4 per cent against the D-Mark.
Swedish government bonds fell when the marginal rate rose to 20 per cent,
but as the krona was allowed to float and the marginal rate was cut, bond
yields tumbled.
The yield on the benchmark bond due 2003 moved from Wednesday's close of
11.11 per cent to peak at 11.20 per cent, before falling to 10.30 per cent.
Yields on six-month treasury bills dropped from 18 per cent to 11 per cent,
dealers said.
'It (floating the krona) was very bad news for the currency, but good news
for the bond market,' said one dealer, pointing out that without the
constraint of its Ecu tie, short-term interest rates are expected to fall
further, providing a boost to the economy.
However, any further rally in the bond market is expected to be domestically
driven as international investors remain concerned about potential exchange
rate risk.
The turmoil in the Swedish markets took its toll on some high-yielding
European bond markets, as participants wondered which of the more vulnerable
currencies would next come under attack from speculators.
Italian bond futures tumbled on news that the krona would float, on fears
the lira might be the next target for speculators.
The Italian market had opened on a positive note following Wednesday's
easing in Dutch and Belgian interest rates, as this had raised hopes of a
German interest rate cut.
But news of Sweden's financial turbulence pushed up short-term interest
rates, from 14.03 per cent to 15 per cent for one-month Libor, increasing
the funding costs for market participants.
The futures contract opened at 95.25 and dropped to 94.45 by late afternoon
before edging up slightly.
DESPITE some bad economic news that would normally have been positive for
the bond market, US Treasury prices eased across the maturity range
yesterday as some investors took the opportunity to book some profits earned
in recent days.
In late trading the benchmark 30-year government bond was down  3/8 at 101
1/32 , yielding 7.532 per cent. The short end of the market was also lower,
with the two-year note down  1/16 at 99 13/32 , to carry a yield of 4.554
per cent.
The day's economic figures should have been good for sentiment. The Labor
Department reported that jobless claims rose 31,000 in the first week of
this month, a much bigger rise than anticipated. Later, the Commerce
Department announced that housing starts fell 1.1 per cent in October, a
worse reading than forecast.
Although the data gave a mild boost to the short end of the market early on,
some investors felt that recent gains in bonds had been overdone, and
initiated a quick sell-off.
SHORT-dated German government bonds benefited from the nervousness in some
of the peripheral European bond markets, ending higher on the day.
The Liffe bund futures contract opened at 91.26 and edged up to 91.34 before
ending at around 91.32. Dealers said the bund market rose initially on
short-covering and hopes of an easing in German rates.
But as news of the Swedish decision emerged, dealers noted switching out of
high-yielding markets into short-dated German paper, which then outperformed
the long end of the market.
UK government bonds ended slightly lower, as funding worries continued to
trouble the market and gilts appeared unable to hold on to Wednesday's
gains.
The benchmark 9 per cent gilt due 2008 fell to 102 17/32 , down  3/16 from
late on Wednesday, to yield 8.79 per cent.
JAPANESE government bonds ended close to the highs of the day, as
short-covering helped to push up bond prices sharply towards the end of the
trading session.
The bond market opened on a weak note as the Tokyo stock market continued to
rebound for the second day, wiping out hopes of lower interest rates.
The Nikkei stock index rose to a high of 17,007.82 in late morning, but lost
some of the early gains and eased back to close at 16,871.31. The March
futures contract climbed to 107.70, against Wednesday's close of 107.50.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6523</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Bonds: Investor interest aroused by Y75bn
Belgian issue
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TRACY CORRIGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Kingdom of Belgium's Y75bn issue, launched yesterday by Nomura
International, sparked firm demand among European investors.
Dealers said the strength of the Japanese government bond market in the last
month has been fuelled by domestic purchases, while European investors have
tended to remain on the sidelines. However, yesterday's seven-year deal for
Belgium, priced to yield 40 basis points over the comparable JGB, succeeded
in catching their interest.
Dealers said the lack of supply, partly a result of poor arbitrage
opportunities, has helped support interest in the Euroyen market. Few
borrowers have tapped the market because of poor arbitrage opportunities,
but dealers said several sovereign borrowers are currently eyeing the
market. The Belgium offering is being used to refinance maturing yen debt.
Meanwhile, Ireland is now expected to tap the dollar sector early next week,
for up to Dollars 500m. The republic is aiming to raise five-year funds,
according to banking sources, but Finland's recent five-year deal, trading
at 82 basis points over the curve, could prove something of an obstacle.
While Ireland's debt rating is lower than Finland's, Ireland is generally
perceived as an improving credit and Finland as a declining credit. But,
while Ireland might expect to pay 60-65 basis points over the curve,
comparison with the spread offered for Finnish paper could prove
unfavourable.
Also in the dollar market, a Dollars 250m five-year deal for IBM Japan,
arranged by Nikko Europe, sold out rapidly. The deal was priced to yield 45
basis points more than the five-year US Treasury. Traders said the IBM name
is still well-liked among retail investors.
In the Euro-French franc market, the City of Paris made its debut Eurobond
offering, shifting from the domestic market in an attempt to broaden its
investor base. The FF500m seven-year issue via Credit Suisse First Boston,
was priced to yield 29 basis point over the curve. CSFB said the City's
credit is strong.
Oesterreichische Kontrollbank, Austria's triple-A rated export financing
agency, has set up a programme under which it can issue Eurobonds, notes and
private placements using the same documentation. The programme, which totals
Sch3bn, is similar to Sweden's recent Dollars 10bn programme. It was
arranged by Morgan Stanley International.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6524</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Capital Markets: UBS returns to the Japanese
bond business
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN RODGER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ZURICH
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE launch this week by Union Bank of Switzerland of SFr300m in 2 3/4 per
cent notes for Daiwa House Industry marks the return of the country's
largest bank to the Japanese section of the Swiss franc bond market after
being effectively blackballed for several months.
'UBS is proud to be mandated by a prestigious issuer like Daiwa House, and
we are looking for further business,' Mr Arthur Wulkan, senior
vice-president of UBS, said.
The row developed as a result of some peculiar customs in bond issuing for
Japanese companies in Switzerland. The main problem is that Japanese banks
and securities companies closely associated with an issuer get large
allocations even if they have no real placing power.
They then tend to sell their bonds quickly in the market. When conditions
are fair, this is an opportunity to make easy profits, but when conditions
turn sour, as they did last year, it means the lead manager has to become a
buyer of last resort.
The unhappiness of the big Swiss banks with this practice came to a head
when several Japanese financial houses sold their allocations of an issue
led by UBS for Takashimaya, the leading department store group, in a grey
market even before the issue was launched.
An angry UBS abruptly cancelled their allocations, leaving them unable to
fulfil their grey market sales contracts. The bank then followed up by
setting new rules for its syndicates to prevent the grey market action.
Some of these rules, notably insisting on an alphabetical listing of
syndicate members, offended Japanese sensitivities, and the entire Japanese
financial community retaliated by effectively blackballing UBS. The bank,
which ranked a strong third among book runners last year with SFr1.76bn in
issues, had not led a single one this year until the Daiwa House issue.
UBS eased its tough stance in April, saying it would respect Japanese
customs and 'show appropriate flexibility'.
A leading Japanese securities company official in Zurich said yesterday he
thought the big Japanese banks would continue to try to convince their
clients not to use UBS as a lead manager. However, Japanese securities
companies tended to sympathise with UBS.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6525</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Capital Markets: Plea for single European
credit rating agency
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A MERGER of existing credit rating companies in Europe would be the best way
of creating an agency which spanned the continent, the man heading the
German credit rating initiative suggested yesterday.
Mr Oliver Everling, managing director of Projektgesellschaft Rating, which
has carried out preparatory work for an agency, said a merger of British and
French organisations last month was the first step towards such an body.
At a congress in Amsterdam, Mr Everling said Europe has about 40 separate
rating agencies. The merger of the London-based IBCA and French Euronotation
paved the way for other European agencies to join a pan-European body.
Surveys in the Netherlands and Germany show that European companies wanted a
new institute based on the continent, he said. 'The investor needs full
market coverage to make comparisons between ratings. There is a big
discrepancy between market potential and market coverage.'
Mr Everling said a major factor in setting up the European agency was that
no other valued opinion was available to Standard &amp; Poor's and Moody's,
'even when they are wrong'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6526</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Ticket to delays and disruption: Underground staff are
poised to stage a strike which has echoes of the 1970s
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CATHERINE MILTON and RICHARD TOMKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
First, public demonstrations against pit closures; then, warnings of strife
over the government's public-sector pay squeeze; and now a strike call for
most of the workers on London's Tube network.
The language and the issues seem like a throw-back to the 1970s as politics
takes to the streets, and the government 'goes for growth' and talks about
imposing a 'pay policy'. Mr John Monks, the deputy general-secretary of the
Trades Union Congress, claims: 'There is a mood similar to 1979, the feeling
that a particular approach to running the economy has failed and that we
need a change.'
But with unemployment nudging 3m, common-sense suggests the balance of power
is unlikely to shift back to unions. It is only weeks since the publication
of figures showing strikes at a 100-year low, and the unions themselves are
playing down the prospect of action over pay in the public sector. The Tube
workers' threat to start an indefinite strike next Tuesday over pay and
conditions, like yesterday's strike ballot by British Airways ground crew at
Gatwick, seems to be a special case.
The 21,000-strong Underground workforce is highly unionised and tends to
mistrust management. Many are inclined to listen to the few activists whose
arguments are bolstered by past victories over less ambitious plans to alter
their pay and conditions. The last such attempt was in 1989 when there were
17 separate day-long Tube strikes.
The current dispute, if it comes, could be bitter and perhaps violent.
London Underground has made it clear that it will run a service if the RMT
railworkers' union calls its members out, and claims enough people will
cross picket lines to enable it to do so. Passengers will be carried free if
there are insufficient employees to staff the booking offices and ticket
barriers.
The origins of the dispute lie in a 119-page document called the Company
Plan, launched with a fanfare almost exactly a year ago. This set the scene
for a three-year programme of change aimed at turning the Underground into
what it always should have been: a clean, efficient, punctual, reliable,
safe and customer-friendly railway.
Passengers were told of the plan through a bold - some might say bizarre -
advertising campaign in which London Underground accepted that the railway
was performing unsatisfactorily, blamed itself, and promised better things.
What appeared baffling was how the Underground's management could accept
responsibility for allowing services to become unsatisfactory while
simultaneously expecting passengers to have any confidence in its ability to
put things right. And in any event, if the problems with the railway were
capable of resolution, why had they not been solved before?
The answer, explained Mr Denis Tunnicliffe, London Underground's managing
director, lay in the railway's recent history. Throughout the 1970s and
early 1980s, passenger numbers declined as employment in the capital fell,
and there was little incentive either to invest in the Underground or manage
it any better. Then, just as passenger numbers started to climb again during
the boom in London's financial services industry in the mid-1980s, the
King's Cross disaster struck in 1987.
Some 31 people died in the horrific fire that swept through the north London
Underground station. From that point onwards, safety became the overriding
priority. Manpower, which until then had been falling, rose again by 3,000
over two years as employees were taken on to implement safety measures and
act as human fire detectors pending the installation of electronic
surveillance systems. Meanwhile, stations deteriorated as work was started
to rip out potentially inflammable materials, and services were constantly
disrupted by the need to halt trains and call out the fire brigade on even
the tiniest suspicion of fire.
Only in 1990 did London Underground reach the stage where it felt safety
could be reasonably assured. Then, in response to the deafening din of
complaints about the quality and reliability of the service, it turned its
attention to efficiency. It assembled 200 managers into 'value analysis'
teams and sent them out across the railway to investigate how it could do
better.
What the management had expected to find was a series of areas of
underperformance that could be picked off one by one and targeted for
improvement. Instead, it found such large swathes of poor performance right
across the railway that it decided to tackle everything at once. Hence, the
Company Plan.
One aspect of the plan is simply a case of doing obvious things to make the
railway run better - for example, making more effort to get train intervals
right. As London Underground points out, it may not sound particularly
serious if trains due to run at two-minute intervals run at intervals of one
and three minutes instead. But the result is that 75 per cent of passengers
experience 50 per cent higher passenger loadings than they should do.
The solution, according to London Underground, lies in discipline and
training. Much of it is simply a matter of making sure the train begins its
journey at the right time instead of having to wait on the convenience of a
driver finishing his tea-break. After that, it is down to the line
controllers and station staff to prevent bunching.
But more important in the context of the current dispute is the other prong
of the Company Plan: the onslaught on labour costs. It provides for the
workforce to be cut by 5,000 to 16,000, partly by contracting out ancillary
activities and partly through an attack on restrictive working practices.
One example of the cuts is the contracting-out of station cleaning, where
this has not already been done, at a cost of more than 400 jobs. The move
will be accompanied by the contracting out of train cleaning, with the loss
of another 400 jobs.
More jobs will go through the ending of restrictive working practices. For
example, existing agreements lay down that a driver's shift lasts 8 hours 1
minute. In practice, it is almost impossible to create rosters which fully
employ drivers and still get them back to their depots before their shift
ends. The introduction of flexible rostering - accepted years ago by British
Rail drivers - will enable London Underground to make more efficient use of
drivers' time, with a consequent reduction of 600 jobs.
Once redundancy costs have been met, efficiency savings are expected to
lower the Underground's operating costs by Pounds 150m a year by 1995. In
theory, passengers are supposed to feel the benefit through a freeing of
resources for higher levels of investment in the railway. Unfortunately,
that sentiment is looking a little hollow after the chancellor's decision
last week to axe London Underground's investment budget by more than Pounds
200m a year below the previous plan to about Pounds 500m.
And yet, says London Underground, the rationale for the plan has in no way
been undermined by the chancellor's decision. Nor will workers who keep
their jobs necessarily be worse off. All employees will switch to salaried
status, and most will have more interesting and satisfying jobs; 70 per cent
of workers will enjoy pay rises averaging 6 per cent as a result of the
changes, and the 30 per cent who stand to take a cut will have their present
level of earnings protected until 1995; and redundancies will be voluntary
and spread over three years.
So why strike? One idea the unions find difficult to accept is that gains to
the winners should overshadow losses to the losers. The average driver may
see his salary increase from Pounds 20,250 to Pounds 23,000 a year, but less
skilled workers such as senior booking clerks will see their pay fall from
Pounds 18,568 to Pounds 16,700 a year.
The unions argue that London Underground's divide-and-rule strategy will not
work. It has, they say, neglected certain small groups, such as some 300
signals technicians, who are mostly members of the largest rail union, the
left-leaning RMT, which has called the strike. The salary of an assistant
signals technician, for example, will drop 15 per cent to Pounds 13,440. The
RMT says 60 per cent of all signals technicians will lose money under the
company's plan. This group, the union says, fears its work will in future be
contracted out.
But the dispute, from the union perspective, is not just about pay. The
unions believe they are defending a workplace tradition of consultation
which management wants to abandon. Even workers who stand to gain
financially are exercised by the new conditions. The drivers are concerned
about new redeployment rules under which they claim earnings could drop by
as much as Pounds 8,000 a year after three years.
Many workers are upset about other planned changes, such as the move to
multi-skilling. For instance, booking clerks who may have been dealing with
passengers from behind screens for 30 years could find themselves rostered
for platform duties.
There is also concern over ending the link between promotion and seniority
and the move to make some workers re-apply for their jobs under new training
schemes. The management counters by saying it has responsibility for
promotion and deployment.
Privately, some union officials admit they have been surprised by the
strength of members' feelings. However, they have considerable doubts about
striking in a recession, and while they point to public support for the
miners, they suspect that people are unlikely to demonstrate in support of
Tube workers whose jobs were not immediately in jeopardy.
Despite their misgivings, union officials are committed to public backing
for the strike. They remember the wild-cat action at the time of the 1989
dispute and are determined not to witness a repeat of it. But the RMT's
unilateral call for a strike has already irritated both Aslef, the train
drivers' union, and the TSSA white-collar rail union, whose members are
still balloting.
As for the passengers - what they want to know is whether they are going to
get to work on Tuesday. The answer may well be yes. Although three out of
four RMT members voted for the strike, only 55 per cent turned out for the
vote; and many of them may have been seeking to strengthen their
negotiators' hand rather than express a desire to strike, especially in the
run-up to Christmas.
Disruption, on the other hand, seems inevitable, with all that implies in
delays, cancellations, overcrowding, lack of information and short tempers.
The joke among London commuters is whether anybody will notice the
difference.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6527</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / The pendulum swings: The privatisation of strategic UK
industries and utilities may have its limits
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TONY JACKSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Italy is selling its banks, France its chemical companies, Spain its tobacco
monopoly, eastern Europe practically everything. Privatisation, from its
tentative beginnings in the UK a decade ago, seems unstoppable.
Except, that is, in the UK itself. The mooted privatisation of British Rail
is under fire from all points of the political compass. The idea of
privatising Scottish water is supported by just 4 per cent of the Scottish
population. The shambles of the pit closures has left the public asking
whether the privatisation of gas and electricity has made it impossible for
the UK to have a coherent energy policy.
The obvious question is whether the UK, having taken the lead in embracing
privatisation, is doing the same in turning against it; or indeed, whether
the UK is demonstrating to the rest of the world that privatisation has its
natural limits.
In looking for an answer, it helps to recall what kind of enterprises are
state-owned in the first place. In the UK, at any rate, the list falls into
two main categories: so-called strategic industries, and utilities. The
first has provided UK privatisation with its greatest successes. The second
is its biggest headache.
The concept of the strategic industry has changed and weakened in the years
since the second world war. Fighting a conventional war requires ships,
aircraft, land transport and raw materials such as steel and oil. Even in
peacetime, governments have tended historically to regard those industries
as centrally important to the economy. In continental Europe, many still do.
Thus, if those industries required huge capital projects such as steel
mills, North Sea rigs or petrochemical crackers, governments paid for them.
If individual companies fell on hard times, the government took them over.
In the UK, the result was an extraordinary proliferation of state-owned
enterprises: British Steel, British Leyland, British Aerospace, British
Airways, British Shipbuilders, Britoil, Rolls-Royce and Royal Ordnance. In
the end, one of the most compelling reasons for returning all these to the
private sector was that, in peacetime, their products could be obtained
perfectly easily on the world market.
The utilities are another matter. In the 1980s, the concept of rolling back
the frontiers of the state meant that the idea of centrally planning and
financing the national infrastructure became deeply unfashionable. In
ideological terms, the chief attraction of privatising gas, electricity,
water and telecommunications was that it took the provision of basic
services out of the hands of bureaucrats and subjected it to disciplines of
the market.
With hindsight, this begins to look like the outward swing of the pendulum:
an exaggerated denial of the role of central planning in response to decades
of blind faith. The question is not which approach works best in practice.
Rather it is whether the population at large feels that the provision of
certain fundamental services is a collective responsibility.
The furore over the pit closures suggests it may. When the government
privatised electricity, it must have quietly congratulated itself on the
neat way it was washing its hands of British Coal's future. When the coal
contracts came to be renewed, the generating companies were bound to cut
their consumption. But the government could argue, with perfect logic, that
it was powerless to intervene.
The trouble was that the public would not wear it. There was general
astonishment and anger at the idea that the deployment of Britain's finite
energy resources could not be discussed at governmental level. Since this
had been one of the main ideological points of the exercise, the government
was left dangling on a hook of its own devising.
The question now is whether this kind of debate will surface elsewhere.
There are one or two signs that it may. In the US, even the outgoing Bush
administration has devoted much time lately to discussing the
infrastructure. In the UK, much of the hostility to privatising British Rail
rests on the idea that it is government's job to think through the
relationship between rail and road. At this rate, even such matters as the
modernisation of the UK's telephone network could become issues of public
policy.
If so, there is trouble ahead. In particular, the industry regulators -
Oftel, Ofgas and the rest - are already looming large in the public
consciousness. Their powers are only tolerable because they are specifically
limited to questions of competition and efficiency. If responsibility for
public policy were added on top, the already vexed question of who regulates
the regulators would become clamorous.
Finding a solution would be equally difficult. From the regulatory framework
downwards, the whole structure of the privatised utilities expresses the
political dogma of a decade ago. It now seems the dogma may be changing. The
structure is not built to change with it, nor was it meant to be.
Privatisation enthusiasts everywhere, take note.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6528</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Leading Article: Cars, congestion and pollution
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE AUTUMN Statement's removal of car tax may help sell a few more cars, but
it also emphasises the contradictions between the UK's transport and
environmental policies. More cars mean both more congestion and more
pollution. The question is whether the two birds can be killed with one
policy stone or whether distinct instruments are required.
Official forecasts of UK emissions of carbon dioxide, one of the gases
thought to cause global warming, range from an 18 to a 78 per cent increase
over 1990 levels by 2020, at least in the absence of new environmental
curbs. If present trends are extrapolated, the volume of traffic on the
roads will also rise by two and a half times in the next 30 years. These
developments are related, since emissions from transport are the fastest
growing category in all forecasts.
Traffic was already mainly responsible for the 30 per cent rise in carbon
monoxide emissions during the 1980s. Traffic also doubled the emissions of
black smoke over the same period. The introduction of catalytic converters
on new cars from next year will begin to curb the emission of those
unpleasant gases. But converters work properly only on hot engines, while
most car journeys are shorter than five miles. Converters will also fail to
reduce emissions of carbon dioxide. Failure to change the transport trend
therefore threatens the UK's ability to meet internationally agreed
environmental targets, which require 'greenhouse gases' to be back to 1990
levels by 2000.
Marginal cost
Growth in the private use of motor vehicles is so high partly because of the
underlying increase in demand, partly because of unwillingness to provide
alternatives and partly because of the failure to charge properly for road
use. Once a motorist has paid for a car, taxed and insured it, the marginal
cost of driving is little more than the price of the fuel and the parking.
In consequence people drive too much.
The UK government's most publicised proposal for meeting the global warming
targets is a tax on energy and on its carbon content. But the European
Commission has calculated that its proposed tax of Dollars 10 a barrel of
oil or oil equivalent would add only 6 per cent to the price of a gallon of
petrol and 9.6 per cent to diesel, not enough to make any difference to
demand.
A far higher increase in the marginal cost would be needed if traffic
volumes were to be restrained. The simplest tool would be a higher tax on
fuel. It would be an unpopular measure, but introduced in stages - with the
proceeds returned, perhaps through lower value added tax - it might be
politically achievable. It would work by discouraging driving and also by
making the vehicle fleet more fuel efficient.
Blunt instrument
Higher taxes on fuel would tend to lower congestion. But they are a blunt
instrument for that purpose. Higher fuel taxes would also fail to provide
any incentive to the private sector to build the new private toll roads that
the government desires. Thus road pricing, suggested this week by Mr John
MacGregor, the transport secretary, has an important role to play.
Road pricing and higher fuel prices are logically distinct instruments
addressed at different targets. But they should be mutually supporting.
Moreover, in practice, comprehensive road pricing is not something for
tomorrow or even for the day after, while a move towards higher fuel prices
can be. Tolls on trunk roads can also be introduced relatively soon, along
with trial road pricing in cities, before the introduction of more
comprehensive road pricing schemes, perhaps early in the next century. In
the meantime there is always the possibility of higher taxes on inner-city
parking.
Any attempt to tackle the problems caused by motor vehicles will be
politically unpopular. This is certainly true of higher fuel prices and road
pricing, both of which are likely to be part of the solution. But a survey
of attitudes in the European Community, published yesterday, suggests
recognition by the average Briton of the environmental threat posed by
traffic. The government needs to educate the public on the painful measures
required if its vague concerns are to be dealt with effectively.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6529</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Leading Article: Co-ordination within Europe
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
ECONOMIC GROWTH, or more precisely the lack of it, has replaced inflation as
the pressing concern of most European governments. The UK government has
already shifted to a pro-growth strategy by partly turning its back on
European co-operation. Is this the only alternative for governments that are
worried about slow growth and rising unemployment? Or would a change in
policies, either co-ordinated between governments or conducted at the
European level, be a better way to revive their stagnating economies?
European countries have shared economic problems, which are getting worse.
The OECD, in September, forecast European growth of 1 per cent this year and
1.5 per cent next, not low enough to be a recession but too little to
prevent the unemployment rate from rising above 10 per cent. The resulting
protectionism and anti-immigrant right-wing populism could not have come at
a worse time.
Understandably, the Commission wants a co-ordinated response. Yet the EC
already has a shared macroeconomic policy which is largely to blame for its
current economic difficulties. The European exchange rate mechansim, once a
force for disinflationary good, has become an engine of deflation. It has
imposed a tight monetary policy which, however appropriate for Germany, has
proved increasingly inappropriate for the rest of the ERM, as the Bank of
England pointed out in yesterday's Bulletin. Both the UK and Italy,
countries with serious internal problems, found the pressure too great and
were forced to depart from the ERM. Yesterday, Sweden was forced to retreat
from its ERM link.
Monetary response
A co-ordinated loosening of monetary policy is the obvious remedy for this
co-ordinated deflation. Yet the persistence of inflationary pressures in
Germany, and the unwillingness of France to contemplate a general
realignment, look likely to prevent German and thus ERM interest rates from
falling more than modestly for months rather than weeks.
Does fiscal policy offer an alternative? Loose fiscal policy is, in fact,
the route that most slow growing countries have already been forced to take.
The Commission estimates that the EC budget deficit has risen from 2.8 per
cent of EC output in 1989 to 5 per cent this year, larger than the fabled US
deficit. If the Maastricht fiscal rules were suspended, then there would be
room for more fiscal pump-priming. The large European economies, including
the UK, are still sufficiently closed that unilateral expansion would have
some positive effect. A co-ordinated expansion could, in theory, have
beneficial spill-over effects across the community and beyond.
Multilateral solution
Yet it is doubtful whether fiscal policy can do the trick and may well be
counter-productive in the face of a persisently tight monetary policy. The
spill-over effects of Germany's sizeable fiscal expansion following
unification were short-lived and, for most countries, more than outweighed
by high interest rates. In any case, Italy, Germany, the UK and Spain are
already in serious fiscal difficulties. The markets might expect a further
boost in these countries to be permanent and force long-term interest rates
higher.
Nor are Mr Delors' proposals for more spending at an EC level anything more
than a frustrated gesture. He may be right to push for more infrastucture
spending in poorer countries for 'cohesion' purposes, and if this is his
intention he should say so. But an Ecu 5bn increase in spending, just 0.09
per cent of EC GDP, is too small and would arrive far too late to have any
effect on overall economic growth.
The EC's situation looks increasingly perverse. Calls for a co-ordinated
fiscal policy, which would in effect mean little more than a rise in the
French budget deficit, have arisen because the EC already has too much of
the wrong kind of co-ordination. The stranglehold of high German interest
rates must be loosened.
Without a deal that allows European interest rates to fall soon, the markets
may yet impose further British or Swedish-style unilateral solutions. But a
fiscal boost in France might work if it were combined with an offsetting
tightening of German fiscal policy, to allow the Bundesbank to cut German
interest rates. This would be co-ordination worth having.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6530</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAFAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Arts: Garbarek and Scofield - Jazz
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GARRY BOOTH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Unmistakeable for its frosted beauty, the usually melancholic music of the
Jan Garbarek Group took on full blizzard dimensions for the Festival of
Scandinavian Arts. Flaxen haired Eberhard Weber's eddying electro-bass and
Rainer Bruninghaus' gothic keyboards wrapped around Garbarek's saxophones
remain at the core. But the addition of Danish born Marilyn Mazur on
percussion and Norwegian singers Mari Boine and Agnes Buen Garnas expanded
and energised the outfit to exhilarating effect at the Barbican on Sunday.
Garbarek's lonesome and reedy bent soprano or his dissonant tenor can
insinuate eastern exoticism when taken with a tabla accompaniment (Ragas and
Sagas is his most recent offering on the ECM label). To hear his great
swirling anthemic arrangements of nordic joiks (sic) as in last year's I
Took Up The Runes is to hear the 45 year old Norwegian in his natural
setting, however.
The numbers, unannounced and improvised on at length, are based on simple
and even hooky folk tunes. Where some have empty spaces occasionally crossed
by Bruninghaus' cranky notes, carried by Weber's sonorously and
electronically interwoven bass lines, others swing densely with Mazur's
dynamic percussion as if for a snow bound calypso.
The re-introduction of singers - Garbarek has worked with both before - is
especially welcome, alongside the appointment of Mazur's dancing percussion.
Mari Boine was first on with a ringing and probably salutary tale set
cleanly against a flat synth background, Garbarek also piercing the gloom
occasionally on soprano.
Later Agnes Buen Garnas, stern but striking, belted out an ululating harmony
with Garbarek's shrill tenor, closing with an uplifting chant that suggested
a nordic muezzin.
In stark contrast to the wide open landscape of sound created by Garbarek's
group, American guitarist John Scofield's group sent his nervous neo-bop
tunes ricocheting around the Festival Hall on Monday. Teamed up with his
favourite saxophonist, burly Joe Lovano, bassist Dennis Irwin who crouches
over the upright and young drummer Bill Stewart, Scofield's absorbing and
sometimes Monk-ish technique is to tie up his melodies in knots.
In a selection of tunes taken from recent and forthcoming Blue Note
recordings, Lovano and Scofield exchanged solos jerkily, Irwin and Stewart
taking turns by rote. A new ballad, 'Easy For You', (the new album is Jazz
Camp) followed a bluesy theme, 'Since You Ask', Scofield beautifully teasing
out a romantic melody. 'Grace Under Pressure', the title track of the
current recording, closed with more knotty soloing from Sco', followed by
shading, as a bouncing Lovano picked up the lead.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6531</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAE9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Arts: Therese Raquin - Ballet
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CLEMENT CRISP
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
One of the appalling effects of Stalinism upon the Soviet Union was the
doctrine of Socialist Realism, whereby art had to reflect the ideals of
socialism on the most blatant populist terms. The creative subterfuges that
sought to find ways out of this prison were fascinating, but experiment and
adventure were reduced to the very margins of the arts. The shadow of these
prison bars fell across ballet well into the 1970s and the catalogue of
choreographers whose work was rejected, or dismissed to the depths of the
Union includes the venerable Kasyan Goleizovsky, and such interesting
figures as Leonid Jacobson and Igor Chernichov.
That an art thus thrown in upon itself, and upon its most traditional
procedures, flourished at all is a marvel. The work of Yury Grigorovich at
the Bolshoy has brilliantly exemplified the vigour that an imaginative
choreographer could bring to the well-defined conventions of state ballet.
Not only was Soviet ballet a creative prisoner, it was not allowed many
visiting ideas from abroad. Thus the 'modern' ballet that has evolved is
blinkered, obsessed with what are supposedly 'modern themes': a franker
sexuality than that allowed by the diktats of Mme Furtseva, and a need to
expose the tensions of a state undergoing monumental change. Of true
modernism - the evolution of post-Balanchinian classic language (or even a
Balanchinian language); experiment that examined means rather than message -
I have seen no trace. Hence such awful things as Vinogradov's Revizor and
his up-dated Petrushka. Hence the banalities of many other works which
propose modernity and look as if they were conceived (as they were) by
Inexperience out of Deep Feelings  - that most dangerous artistic parentage.
And hence, too, Boris Eifman and his St. Petersburg Ballet Theatre which is
at Sadler's Wells this week. Mr Eifman started to make his dance pieces in
the late 1970s as a gesture of defiance against the Leningrad establishment.
Of his sincerity there can be no doubt - it is only latterly that he has
been granted any formal recognition - but about his creative procedures I
have every doubt in the world. He offers two works. Therese Raquin begins on
a high note of hysteria and contrives by some dire alchemy to increase the
nervous pressure and diminish the drama. It is reportedly a tragedy. I found
it rather more of a laugh than Figaro's Intrigues that completes this
desperate programme, a leaden romp on which I reported some three years ago
when it was staged by the Ballets de Monte Carlo.
Therese Raquin caricatures Zola's novel, reducing it to awkward grapplings
between Therese and her lover which are played against a frieze of posturing
corps de ballet members who don black cloaks, a variety of confusing
outfits, and at one moment burst on stage like a team of gymnasts on a day's
outing. They do a lot of unison emoting, which is no help at all. Therese's
mother-in-law has a hell of a time in and out of a wheel-chair. The piece
goes on for an eternity, and maltreats gems from Bach for its first part,
then sinks its teeth into Schnittke's gritty piano concerto. Of
choreographic interest I could discern no trace.
Figaro's Intrigues (the chief of which is against Beaumarchais) is set to
Rossini in less than appealing arrangements, and is Very Vivacious Indeed.
It is also inconsequential as drama and hugely predictable as dance -
Massine on a bad day. The casts of both works give of their all in
peculiarly exhausting fashion. The evening is not recommended.
St. Petersburg Ballet Theatre is at Sadler's Wells until November 21. The
season is supported by LBC News Talk.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6532</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAE8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Arts: Grieg's 'Peer Gynt' - Concert
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID MURRAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Most music-lovers know that Grieg's famous Peer Gynt Suites were drawn from
the theatre-score he composed for the first production of Ibsen's epic, at
the playwright's express request. From time to time we hear more of the
music, when some orchestra takes the trouble to collect suitable singers,
and an actor or two to narrate and to speak some lines when a musical
fragment needs them.
But such performances have always relied upon a posthumous edition published
in 1908, when some parts of the score had already gone missing. Only in 1986
was everything found and reinstated in the right order, thanks to the
doctoral labours of Rune J. Andersen. Though Neeme Jarvi and the Gothenburg
Symphony recorded the complete score the next year, it seems that their
Barbican performance of it on Wednesday was the first before a live audience
since the original staging in Christiania (now Oslo).
It was done in style. Peer Gynt has just one serenade, evidently written not
to over-stretch a leading actor who does not sing much, and his Solveig two
pretty songs, but the excellent Hakan Hagegard and Barbara Bonney were
imported to sing them. Laurence Howes had devised an ingenious English text,
often in rhyme like Ibsen's, and ample enough to establish some characters
and the gist of the story.
Gerard Murphy and Simon Callow enjoyed themselves hugely as Narrator (plus
Boyg and Button-Moulder) and the speaking Peer - despite Callow's erratic
grip on his words: at one point he addressed his desert princess not as
'Lily of the sand', but 'of the Strand'] - with ripe support from Susan
Engel and Joanne Pearce. Probably this version stretched out longer than
originally foreseen, for the announced Bartok Concerto was quietly scrapped;
but this Peer filled up the time very pleasurably.
The Gothenburg orchestra is clearly first-class and Jarvi's spontaneous
dramatic instincts were exactly what was needed to keep the score sharp. The
lesser among its 26 numbers are, after all, fairly routine swatches of
theatre-music. On the other hand, to hear all the bits is to be struck by
Grieg's personal way with harmony, consistently genteel but also piquant,
and his fine ear for instrumental colour without tricks.
It was particularly rewarding to hear the choral passages restored. Though
Grieg was careful not to demand too much of the voices, the arrival of their
human timbre is always planned to telling effect. The Tallis Chamber Choir
did more than justice to all their music, whether as trolls, houris or
decent churchgoers. The three herd-girls who lure Peer to a night of passion
turned out to make a lusty Valkyrie-ish trio, and Der-Shin Hwang sang a
sultry desert princess.
Sponsored by Skandinaviska Enskilda Banken London
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6533</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAE7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Arts: Todays Television
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER DUNKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Send a cheque this morning to your favourite charity then, with a clear
conscience, you can ignore the hype and smugness which makes BBC1's annual
Children In Need appeal such an embarrassing occasion.
C4's Short Stories (8.30) shows short films from new directors. Today we
have a picture of 'The Comper Queen', Rita Smallburn, one of those women who
dedicate their entire lives to entering competitions. Do we really need five
programmes about Howard Carter's discovery of Tutankhamun's tomb 70 years
ago? The people at BBC2 seem to think so. The Face Of Tutankhamun begins at
9.00.
It is followed by the first in a series of 10-minute programmes, Sister
Wendy's Odyssey, in which Wendy Beckett, who has spent 20 years as a
solitary nun in a caravan, gives her views on some of the greatest works of
art in various British cities. She has become a renowned art expert, we are
assured, 'by using books and postcards' (9.50). BBC2 screens Jean-Luc
Godard's 1960 film, his first and best, A Bout de Souffle (11.20) and C4
shows Karel Reisz's 1966 offering Morgan - A Suitable Case For Treatment.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6534</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAE6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Arts: Classic drama in Germany gets a revolutionary look -
Jackie Wullschlager finds that the boldest, most inspiring shows come out of
east Berlin
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JACKIE WULLSCHLAGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
It is exactly three years since the Berlin Wall fell, and in the theatre the
offstage drama is revolutionary. This month, a newly privatised Berliner
Ensemble, once Brecht's Marxist bastion, is launched. The Rosa Luxembourg
Volksbuhne (People's Stage) reopens with a savage satire against the
Bolsheviks. And the jewel in east Berlin's dramatic crown, Max Reinhardt's
Deutsches Theater, is finding 80 per cent of its audience from the west.
What is left of the theatrical traditions of East Germany's proudest
cultural achievement? Theatres in the DDR used to be cheap, full, and
politically alert. The structure and the audiences may have changed, but the
surprise is that the style survives. Drive blindfold in and out of the
Brandenburg Gate, pick any Berlin stage, and from gesture, accent, overall
mix of dramatic ingredients, you will still tell an east German production
at once. Some of the boldest, most inspiring shows across the country now
come out of east Berlin.
At the Deutsches Theater, Thomas Langhoff's version of Hofmannsthal's The
Tower is a model of a classic given a new lease of life. The Tower, written
by an ageing author lamenting the collapse of Vienna, has an unhappy stage
history - it opened in 1928, simultaneously in Munich and Hamburg but with
opposite endings, because Hofmannsthal could not make up his mind - and on
the page it seems incredible that this lumbering relic of palmy Habsburg
days was a contemporary of Brecht's Threepenny Opera, which opened in Berlin
the same year.
Yet Langhoff, via a dash of Brecht, has turned the play into a comic
commentary on our times. The story, adapted from Calderon, is a parable of
changing regimes. It tells of Prince Sigismund, who is imprisoned in a tower
because an oracle foresaw he would cause his father's downfall and, taken to
court for a day, turns out as murderous as predicted. But he is in fact
anti-Machiavellian, a spiritual leader used by plotters, then sacrificed for
a people's king, Corporal Oliver.
Langhoff works it as cartoon strip of coup and counter-coup where palace
putsch, revolt against the ancien regime, new totalitarian ruler all strike
chords with Germany's current upheavals. Jorg Gudzuhn plays the King as
Clown, a fusspot in furs and feathers who rolls his 'r's like Chaplain doing
Hitler, haggles over his pension, throws tantrums. Gudzuhn, with his elastic
face, shaking limbs and forlornly grand gestures, streaks slapstick with
tragedy: from mad Habsburg to Honecker, he is every ruler on the way out. In
a climactic fight with his son, he gets a bloody red nose - a literal clown
who has lost power and love.
Langhoff underlines Oedipal battles with a comic vision of the Doctor
(Reimar Baur) as an identikit Freud, bearded, spectacled and anxious, sent
to analyse the wild beast that the caged Prince has become. For his visit,
the huge black tower-prison commanding the stage reverses into a tall white
lab with fluorescent lights and doors and furniture distorted into high,
long, unnerving shapes.
It is one of many brilliant clashes of mood with which Langhoff paints
conflict. Another has grey advisors giggling against the chime of church
bells as the king goes mad in a monastic rose garden: spiritual ecstasy
versus worldly disaster. Sigismund, metamorphosed from wild child to
courtier to martyr in breathless, blood-and-sweat star turns from Daniel
Morgenroth, is sacrificed like the tower in a chess game. In a last metaphor
of changing values and the downfall of ideologies, Oliver (Frank Leinert),
the commissar in boots and steel-rimmed glasses, pushes his double forward
onto a balcony and the power puppet is acclaimed by the masses.
Langhoff uses Brechtian devices - kinghood must be ridiculous, for example -
but each character is so finely delineated that individual emotions are
rarely subsumed in big ideas.
But at the Rosa Luxembourg Volksbuhne Frank Castorf directs a King Lear
which is just the reverse. At first its craziness compels. Castorf has the
obligatory absurd king (Wilfried Ortmann), a bumbling pensioner so
down-and-out that even his shoelaces are rotten. His three daughters are
charladies, cleaning the stage with silver buckets. The abandoned Cordelia
(Annett Kruschke) does not cry but pisses into hers; her husband marries her
with her trousers still down and drinks the contents of the bucket.
This proletarian Lear turns the disintegrating state into an everyday farce:
its reality, perhaps, for the man in the street who finds the shops empty
and the tram too expensive. It is set on shifting planks of wood whence
courtiers fall off the edge into ditches of water. No one knows where he is
going: a country adrift without policy. Lear is not even sure which tragedy
he is in; once he calls Cordelia 'Ophelia'. A fat cabbage, hacked up with a
hammer, points the blame: the German for cabbage is 'Kohl'.
If you enjoy political satire, this is a show to catch. But it is not
Shakespeare, it is absolutely lacking in emotion, in the sense of characters
as individuals, and in the subtlety and generosity of spirit which makes
contemporary reworkings of Shakespeare truly come alive.
The Tower and Lear are both about individuals caught up in revolutionary
times, and this is the dominant theme across east Berlin stages. The
Berliner Ensemble continues to show vintage Brecht productions on the
subject, Galileo and The Good Woman of Setzuan, until the premieres of its
new directors in January. The highlight of the recent Brandenburg Theatre
Festival in Berlin was a Potsdam production, The Small Pogram at the Station
Buffet, about uprisings against a small town Jewish couple. It was sparked
by Jewish mourners in Brandenburg overhearing the disapproving mutter 'It
wouldn't have happened under Honecker'.
Another Volksbuhne premiere, City of Justice, is a first-ever production of
a Russian satire on the revolution by Lew Lunz written in 1923. Director
Andreas Kriegenburg catches some of the mood of its propaganda opposite,
Eisenstein's Battleship Potemkin, with a mass of desperate Soviet soldiers
hanging on to a ramp which goes straight through the auditorium and a cast
of citizens who find themselves in a city not of justice but of nightmarish
machinery ordering every aspect of their lives.
This is a loud, dark, violent show, the jokes about soldiers wanting to 'get
to Russia' - a cause of special mirth here - as insistent as the drumbeat
from the foyer which carries even to the nearest U-bahn station. It is a
claustrophobic, heady experience, but like the other shows here, unlike
drama anywhere else in Germany.
The Tower is in repertory at the Deutsches Theater; King Lear and City of
Justice in repertory at the Volksbuhne am Rosa Luxembourg Platz.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6535</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAE5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / The Property Market: The allure of warehouses - The sector's
attractive yields have caught the eye of investors and developers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VANESSA HOULDER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The humble warehouse has long been regarded as one of the least glamorous
sectors of the property market. That dowdy image, however, is in part
responsible for its laudable record as one of the industry's most successful
sectors.
In the 1980s, speculators' neglect of this seemingly unpromising market
helped protect it from the oversupply that plagued the rest of the industry.
That, in turn, helped warehouse properties generate returns of 22 per cent
over the past five years - more than double the market as a whole.
However, the sector's reputation is changing. High yields, low management
costs and the availability of new leases with good covenants have attracted
new investors in the past couple of years. At the same time, a flurry of
interest from developers has raised the possibility of oversupply.
Recent concern about oversupply is well founded, according to a new report*
by Chesterton, the property consultancy. 'Caution is required to prevent the
bandwagon effect which led to oversupply in the B1 (light industrial and
other business uses) market,' it warns.
The shift in attitude stems in part from far-reaching changes within the
distribution industry itself. Modern warehouses are larger, more carefully
positioned and more sophisticated than ever before - a trend that is most
visible in the big distribution parks that have emerged along the M1 and M6
motorways throughout central England.
The impetus for change in the distribution industry has come from the need
for improved response times and more frequent, faster deliveries. This has
stemmed from the heavy costs of holding stock, the relative fall in
transport costs and the increasing dominance of the large retailers.
'The conventional warehouse of the early 1980s is now becoming increasingly
outdated,' says Chesterton. 'As the level of sophistication continues to
increase, so the life of the building shortens and the rate of obsolescence
grows.'
Large retailers, particularly grocers, have been the driving force behind
such changes. From the mid-1970s onwards, they began to switch from local
distribution systems controlled by suppliers to their own regional or
national distribution networks. Other types of retailers have gradually
followed suit, although many are still grappling with the need to centralise
their distribution networks. Most manufacturers are even further behind,
having concentrated on rationalising their production facilities in the
1970s and 1980s.
The momentum of these changes has been checked by the slowdown in the
economy. 'It has been slowed down by recession but it is still happening,'
comments Ms Christina Howick, a partner of PMA, a London-based property
consultancy.
Even without the recession, the distribution industry is faced with some
important challenges and uncertainties, including:
The road versus rail debate, which has important implications for the
location of distribution centres. The case for distribution by rail is
enhanced by the costs of congestion, pollution and other environmental
concerns. However, many manufacturers and retailers are sceptical of the
rail industry's ability to provide the right level of service and
reliability.
The single European market, which is prompting manufacturers to review their
manufacturing and distribution operations on a pan-European basis. Companies
wanting to service the northern European market from one location are likely
to favour northern France, Belgium, Germany and Holland over the UK. The
future supply of land for warehouses. Chesterton reports that investors are
concerned about the high allocation by local authorities of land for
distribution uses. This could depress the rate of rental growth, investors
fear.
At present, the distribution of land with planning permission for warehouses
is very uneven. The south-east and east Midlands have more land with
detailed planning permission for such use than other regions.
This concern contrasts with the complaints of developers about what they
consider to be restrictive planning policies. 'There is a dearth of
constructive planning policies on the subject which is hampering British
industry,' complains Gazeley Properties, a leading warehouse developers.
Pressures for shorter leases, particularly for second-hand space.
'Short-term distribution contracts are typically three to five years and
there may be resistance to an institutional lease of 25 years,' says
Chesterton.
As well as these uncertainties, warehouse property has the disadvantage of
large average lot prices - often costing more than Pounds 10m. This,
combined with the specialist nature of these investments, heightens the risk
involved in replacing a defaulting tenant.
These risk factors justify a higher yield than other kind of property.
Indeed Chesterton believes that some yields have been driven down to
unrealistic levels. The growing availability of research and awareness of
this class of property are likely to stimulate continued interest among
investors. But the downward trend in yields suggests that the re-rating of
the sector over the last few years may have run its course.
* Shedding Light on Warehousing and Distribution, Chesterton Research
Department, 54 Brook Street, London W1A 2BU, Pounds 55.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6536</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAE4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Technology: Japanese blades at the cutting edge
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DELLA BRADSHAW
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Razor maker Wilkinson Sword has turned to Japanese steel technology to give
Europe's shavers a safer shave. The dual blade on its Protector shaving
system uses non-corrosive steel which is especially hard to ensure that the
blade retains its cutting edge. To make sure the blades do not nick the
skin, 10 filaments of wire straddle the blades. Wilkinson Sword: Germany,
212 405 230; UK, 0670 713421.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6537</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAE3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Technology: Business travellers enter US quicker
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EVELYN BRODIE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
If you stagger from a transatlantic flight to face a long immigration queue
behind hundreds of tourists entering the US, then relief may be at hand,
writes Evelyn Brodie.
Next month the US Immigration and Naturalisation Service will issue
biometric cards to frequent business travellers from the US or elsewhere.
The cards contain nine pieces of information about the passenger's hand,
such as the length of the fingers. People with cards will go down a separate
aisle at immigration, insert the card into a machine and their hand into a
window. If they match, the traveller is admitted.
The cards will be used initially at two airports - Newark and JFK. INS: US,
202 514 2648.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6538</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAE2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Technology: Health, safety and the environment
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DELLA BRADSHAW
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Next week is the UK's National Health, Safety and Environment week, and with
that in mind many companies might be considering how to improve their safety
record. One aid could be a software package developed by Datas, of Enfield,
north London, to help companies analyse where accidents occur and so help to
minimise them.
The Accidata accident management system helps employers comply with the law
by providing the forms on screen that employers need for reporting
accidents. By analysing the data, companies can work out how to prevent
accidents in the future. Datas: 081 366 5557.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6539</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAE1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Technology: Taking a shine to synthetic diamonds
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DELLA BRADSHAW
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A diamond chunk the shape of an eagle is the promise of a technique
developed at Pennsylvania State University for producing cheaper industrial
diamonds. The process borrows techniques from the two existing methods of
synthetic diamond production, but adds an ingredient of its own - a fine
powder of silicon or metal dust.
As with the original General Electric process, the technique starts with
solids - graphite, carbon or wood. This is mixed with the silicon or metal
powder and then heated in an atmosphere rich in atomic hydrogen - in a
similar way to the chemical vapour deposition process.
The shape of the final diamond product can be determined at the beginning of
the process - a wire, sheet or cube. The method can produce solid diamonds
in layers of up to about 50 microns, but the larger diamond shapes are
porous. Pennsylvania State University: US, 814 865 3421.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6540</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAE0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Technology: Pen and keyboard get together at last - Worth
Watching
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DELLA BRADSHAW
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Pen-based computers have proven their worth in gathering information outside
the office - in particular for filling in forms. But back at the office the
data has to be downloaded into the office computer system.
To make life easier, pen computer specialist Grid, part of the Tandy group,
has developed a computer which combines the best of both worlds. The screen
can be written on with the attached stylus. It then swivels back to reveal a
keyboard which can be used to incorporate the data into, for instance, a
report.
The Grid Convertible costs Pounds 2,700 and comes with MS-Dos and
Microsoft's Windows software designed for pen computing. Tandy Grid: US, 817
390 3100; UK, 081 897 6565.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6541</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAEZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Technology: Edging ahead by a neck - Della Bradshaw explains
how electronic memory cards are helping weavers react swiftly to changes in
fashion
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DELLA BRADSHAW
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Your best silk tie may boast an international name such as Gucci, Polo or
Aquascutum on the label. But there is a fair chance that it was woven in a
small market town in Suffolk.
Vanners Silk Weavers make some 30,000 silk ties every week, 80 per cent of
which are sold overseas. Keith Parker, technical director of Vanners,
ascribes the company's success in the fast-moving fashion industry to its
application of the latest technology. 'It's the only way we can stay ahead,'
he says.
For Britain's mills, once called dark and satanic, the job has not been
easy. Until a few years ago, Vanners had to store details of all its tie
designs on miles of punched cards - the likes of which have been in use
since the jacquard loom was invented in 1803.
Now the Sudbury-based company is converting to memory cards, which have
recently proven popular in the portable computer and electronic diary
markets. In opting for memory cards, Vanners has skipped whole generations
of computer storage technology.
The basic problem for weavers was the noise and vibration of the giant
jacquard looms - Vanners has 64 of them - together with other environmental
hazards such as dye works. These meant that the more fragile floppy or hard
discs could be easily corrupted or destroyed.
The steel-encased memory cards, on the other hand, are much more reliable.
'You can drop them from six feet on to a concrete floor and they will still
retain their data,' points out Sherry Garber, product co-ordinator at US
market forecasters Instat.
For Vanners, the move from punched card to memory card will save both space
and money. Today, three bays at the Sudbury mill are completely taken over
by the punched cards: a wadge of cards nearly a foot thick can represent a
single pattern. In contrast, one memory card - a mini printed circuit board
packed with memory chips and a battery - can store eight designs.
More important, the technology will help Vanners react more quickly to
changes in tie fashion. The company needs to produce four collections a year
for spring, summer, autumn and winter wear.
There are also national variations, explains Parker. Although every country
may want brighter designs for spring and summer, customers in Italy favour
different variations from those in Japan.
Once the sales staff has shown the latest fashion designs to customers,
changes may be needed in the pattern or the colour - Vanners has 480
different coloured silk threads to choose from. If that happened it could
take up to two hours to produce the cards needed for a complicated design -
a peacock paisley, say - using the punched card system.
There are up to 50 new designs produced every week. And the problem is
compounded on a long production run, where the paper card can become dirty
and damaged and so a second one has to be made.
With the memory cards, it takes only three seconds to feed the data from the
design room through a computer network to the individual loom, or weaving
machine. There it is stored on an S-Ram memory card. These incorporate
static random access memory chips, on which data can be stored and then
erased so that the card can be used again. (Master copies of the design are
held on optical or floppy discs.)
The process is so quick, reports one of Vanners designers, that just
one-and-a-half hours after a group of customers entered the mill with their
design they were able to see the tie, albeit a simple pattern, roll off the
loom.
The toughness of computer memory cards has found them a ready home
elsewhere, such as in point-of-sale applications in shops or pubs, where
they are used to log purchases for stock control purposes. Another example
of memory cards being used in data collection is at Bristow Helicopters.
The basic problem for the helicopter company, says David McKay, software
manager, was how to monitor and record the performance of various components
when the craft was in flight, in order to prevent component failure.
The memory card is inserted into the dashboard of the helicopter for the
flight and then taken by the pilot, on landing, to a personal computer at
the landing station. There the data is analysed.
But it is in the mobile computer marketplace, in machines such as the Sharp
or Hewlett-Packard palm-tops or the Amstrad notepad, that memory cards have
shown most potential. Unlike a floppy disc, the steel-encased cards can be
slipped into a jacket pocket without fear of damage.
The impetus behind the take-off of memory cards in the PC industry has been
the ratification of standards, so that cards from one manufacturer can be
interchanged with those from another.
It was with this in mind that the Personal Computer Memory Card
International Association (PCMCIA) was set up in 1989. It issued its first
standard in September 1990 and a new format for the standard will be
released on December 1 this year. Members of the PCMCIA include
Japanese-parented companies such as Mitsubishi Electric, Toshiba and Fujitsu
as well as US chip and PC companies like Apple, Intel and Texas Instruments.
Although the cards based on S-Rams are popular now, they look set to be
eclipsed by cards incorporating flash memory chips. Unlike S-Ram cards,
these retain information when the power is switched off without the need for
a battery. Flash memory chips are erased by a flash of electricity that
takes less than a second.
Flash memories also have a higher storage capacity. Today's
commonly-available S-Ram cards have up to 2Mbytes of memory - enough to
store 2m alpha-numeric characters - although cards with twice this capacity
will be widely available next year, says Colin Mason, engineering manager in
the semiconductor division of Mitsubishi Electric in the UK.
For weaving applications, a group of S-Ram cards suffices in most cases,
says Jay Hale, sales and marketing director for Bonas Machine Company, which
makes Vanners' electronic machine.
But for more widespread applications - where a computer user would transfer
a memory card from the desk-top machine to a portable to an electronic diary
 -more memory will be needed for storing programs and data. Today's flash
memory cards can store up to 20Mbytes but the technology has drawbacks.
Flash memory cards are power hungry and data can only be erased in chunks.
With S-Ram cards, individual bits of data can be erased - as with a floppy
or hard disc.
Both these drawbacks are already being addressed by chip makers. As a
result, Walt Lahti, vice president on Instat, says that the worldwide market
for flash memory cards, worth just Dollars 7m (Pounds 4.6m) worldwide in
1991, could be worth Dollars 33m this year and Dollars 903m by 1997.
Lahti predicts the big growth market will be in what he calls the 'sneaker
net' market, where users will take a disc out of one PC and then run around
with it, using it in several other machines.
Mobile phones could be another potentially enormous market, as could home
photography, where the photographer would use the memory card in a camera
instead of film and then transfer the pictures on to an optical disc or
other long-term storage device so that they could be viewed on the
television screen. Both Eastman Kodak and Polaroid are members of the
PCMCIA.
As PCs work their way into the factory environment, replacing today's
minicomputers and servers, flash memory cards will also find more widespread
industrial applications, predicts Mason.
Meanwhile, back in the weaving industry S-Ram technology has still a
potentially huge market waiting for it, explains Hale. 'Ninety per cent of
the world's jacquard machines still use punch cards.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6542</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAEYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / People: UK gathers AT&amp;T's regional experience
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
James Mellon has been appointed managing director of AT&amp;T's international
operations division in the UK.
He will have two main responsibilities: managing the US telecommunications
giant's correspondent relationships with British Telecommunications and
Mercury Communications, which govern more than Dollars 1bn of international
traffic between the two countries; and developing the services AT&amp;T offers
its customers.
Mellon says he is the first AT&amp;T manager to work in all the world's three
big regions. In his last job, he looked after AT&amp;T's correspondent
relationships in South America and Africa, working out of Florida. Before
that, he spent nearly four years in Hong Kong managing relationships with
China, Hong Kong, Taiwan and Macao.
His new post is a 'rounding job', he says, which would give him an
understanding of the world's post, telephone and telegraph companies (PTTs).
Aged 45, he has been with the AT&amp;T group for 19 years, starting his career
at New England Telephone, which is now split off from AT&amp;T.
Although Mellon says his main goal would be to build on the existing
relationships 'which are very profitable to both sides', he would not rule
out satisfying customers' needs by competing with BT if that proved
necessary.
In recent years, AT&amp;T has examined the possibility of acquiring stakes in
GPT, the UK telecommunications manufacturer, and Mercury, but in both cases
negotiations broke down. There has also been speculation that it was
interested in buying the Vodafone Group, the mobile communications concern.
However, Mellon says it would be 'speculative' to comment on the possibility
of making any moves of a similar nature, but he confirms that such
acquisitions would come within his responsibility.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6543</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAEXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / People: New chairman for Forum UK
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Baroness Denton, who founded Forum UK, one of Britain's top women's
networks, is stepping up to become president; she is to be replaced as
chairman by Pam Garside (right), who takes over for a two year period.
Forum UK, which has 175 members and is part of the International Women's
Forum, was founded in 1989. Its members meet two or three times a month,
including a regular breakfast at the Ritz. Employment secretary Gillian
Shephard is a member, as is Barbara Mills, director of public prosecutions.
Garside says the most contentious issue she faces in taking over an outfit
that has been 'nurtured from nothing into a flourishing organisation', is
whether or not to hold numbers at the present exclusive level. She is also
keen to forge links with the Continent, pointing out that the international
forum is very much American-dominated, and that there is, for instance, no
off-shoot in Germany as yet.
Garside, who was brought into Forum UK at the beginning, spent 10 years,
until 1989, studying and working in America. She took a masters in hospital
and health care administration from the University of Minnesota, and spent
six years at Health One Corporation, Minneapolis. She now runs her own
consultancy 'New Health'; is director of organisational development at North
West Thames Regional Health Authority; and is a visiting fellow of the
school of management at Imperial College.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6544</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAEWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / People: Insurance moves
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Colin Honey, 50, has been appointed deputy managing director of Domestic &amp;
General, the fast-growing insurance company which specialises in insuring
domestic appliances.
Honey is being groomed to take over as managing director next summer from
Howard James who is planning to take life easier following a serious
operation. James will remain on the board as a non-exec-utive director.
James' planned retirement ends a 17-year partnership with Martin Copley,
Domestic &amp; General's 52-year-old chairman. Domestic &amp; General was floated on
the unlisted securities market in 1988 at 165p. Since then its shares have
risen nearly six-fold. By concentrating on a specialist niche - it has more
than 2m policyholders - it has managed to escape the downturn in the rest of
the insurance industry.
*****
Commercial Union, the most successful of the UK composite insurers, is
continuing to make extensive use of the coterie of former city analysts who
have joined the company in recent years.
Peter Rice, who joined CU from County NatWest in 1988, is appointed a UK
divisional director. Chris Pountain, who made his name at Morgan Stanley and
other securities houses before joining CU earlier this year, succeeds Rice
as group corporate finance and planning manager.
Pountain, 39, and Rice, 42, are both qualified actuaries.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6545</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAEVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / People: Cicurel moves to ICD
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
David Cicurel, currently the French chairman of International Media
Communications, the USM-quoted video products and soft drinks company, is to
be appointed the new chairman of International Communication &amp; Data,
following the enforced retirement through ill-health of the incumbent, Nigel
Balcombe.
Daniel Unger, interim chairman of ICD, says IMC had agreed to provide
Cicurel's services to ICD in return for an option to subscribe for 6.95m
ordinary ICD shares (12.2 per cent of its equity) exercisable within three
years at 7p apiece.
USM-quoted ICD supplies names, addresses and information to the direct
mail/direct marketing industry.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6546</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAEUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / People: Constructive careers
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Michael Richardson (above left), formerly a director of Eleco Holdings and
Fairclough Building, has been appointed md of Nico Construction (Europe).
Ian Ruperti, a director of Nico's parent TEAM SERVICES, has also joined the
board.
*****
Colin Dearlove (above right) has been promoted to group finance director of
BARRATT DEVELOPMENTS succeeding Robert James who has taken early retirement.
*****
Chris Marsden, a director of BALFOUR BEATTY BUILDING, has been appointed
director of its northern region.
*****
Doug Chalmers, project director of Broadgate Development, has been appointed
BOVIS CONSTRUCTION director at Bristol.
*****
Keith Charlton has been appointed md of BELLWAY HOMES' north west division;
he moves from Connolly Homes and succeeds Gerry Hamilton who becomes
strategic land director of Bellway estates division.
*****
Gordon Dibble, formerly executive vice-president and chief operations
officer of John Brown's US business units, is promoted to md of JOHN BROWN
Engineers &amp; Constructors Ltd, London; he succeeds David Moorhouse who
becomes chief executive of the John Brown engineering &amp; construction sector.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6547</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAETFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / The Property Market: Hillier Parker research says shopping
centre vacancy rates are higher in small schemes
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
VACANCY RATES in shopping centres are markedly higher in small schemes,
according to new research by Hillier Parker, the chartered surveying firm.
Many smaller schemes do not have sufficient critical mass or sales potential
to attract large chain retailers and strong independents, according to
Hillier.
The average unit shop vacancy rate in schemes opened between 1965 and 1985
is just 5.7 per cent - well under average high street levels - compared with
20 per cent for schemes opened between 1986 and 1991.
In many cases, high vacancy rates in schemes that opened after 1989 cannot
be blamed on the sharp decline in vacancy rates. 'In a significant number of
cases, letting problems result more from scheme deficiencies,' it says.
Flaws included poor scheme design, inadequate anchoring, insufficient
critical mass and an inappropriate scheme size.
Vacancy rates are highest in southern England, reflecting a build-up of
supply and the subsequent decline in demand since the late 1980s.
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
                          TOTAL RETURN (%)
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
                       Retail   Office    Industrial          All
                                                       Properties
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
Year to Sep 92            6.2     -6.0           3.1          0.9
Quarter to Sep 92         0.2     -2.1          -0.7         -0.8
Month of Sep 92          -0.4     -1.0          -0.6         -0.7
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
Investment Property Databank
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6548</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAESFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Wool output forecast to fall
further in 1992-93
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BLACKWELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WORLD WOOL production, which fell by 10 per cent last season, is expected to
decline further in 1992-93 to the level of the early 1980s as adverse
weather conditions and low prices continue to take their toll, according to
a report from the International Wool Textile Organisation.
Total world availability of wool (production plus carry-over stocks) is
expected to fall to 2.26m tonnes from 2.45m tonnes in 1991-92 and a record
2.46m tonnes in 1990-91. This follows a decade in which availability rose by
43 per cent and marks the 'most significant contraction in supplies since
the early 1970s'.
The report estimates production for the coming season at 1.67m tonnes, down
from 1.74m tonnes in 1991-92 and 14 per cent down on the 1989-90 record of
1.97m tonnes. Carry-over stocks are forecast to decline to 592,000 tonnes
from 719,000 tonnes in 1991-92.
'Leading exporters Australia, New Zealand and Argentina are expected to
account for well over 60 per cent of the current season's contraction and
the former Soviet Union for most of the balance,' the report says.
Australia, the world's biggest producer, is expected to produce 549,000
tonnes, down 4 per cent on the previous year and 21 per cent on 1990-91.
Sheep numbers were down 10 per cent to 151m in the year to the end of March.
By September 25 this year the Australians had reduced their stockpile from
the January 1991 peak of 553,398 tonnes to 472,306 tonnes.
Overall demand for wool is expected to continue to improve as a result of
strong growth in China, Korea and Taiwan and the prospect of recovery in
Western industrialised countries. This will bring supply and demand into
much better balance, the report says.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6549</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAERFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Go-ahead for heavy minerals
project
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP GAWITH
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ANGLO AMERICAN Corporation, South Africa's largest mining house, has
announced that it is proceeding with the R1bn Namakwa Sands heavy minerals
project in the North-Western Cape.
Speaking in Johannesburg yesterday, Mr Julian Ogilvie Thompson, chairman,
said the project showed that 'although South Africa is a small player in
global terms, we are as competent, innovative and competitive as the rest'.
Production is scheduled to start in 1994 at an initial mining rate of 4m
tonnes a year, rising to full capacity of 16m tonnes as the market improves.
Reserves are in excess of 500m tonnes. At full production the plant should
generate revenue of R360m (Pounds 48m) a year, in 1992 money, almost all of
which will come from exports.
The capital cost is R946m in current money. The R576m equity portion will be
funded 80 per cent by Anglo and 20 per cent by its associate De Beers. The
Industrial Development Corporation will be lending the balance of R370m.
The main product at Namakwa Sands will be Ilmenite, which will be smelted to
produce titanium slag and pig iron. The slag is ultimately used as a
colourant in paper and paints, while pig iron is a speciality iron with
ductile qualities. By-products will be zircon, used in the ceramics and
foundry industries, and rutile, which is used in the manufacture of pigment
for the paint, paper and plastics industries. At full production the project
will produce annuallly 195,000 tonnes of slag, 120,000 tonnes of pig iron,
140,000 of zircon and 38,000 tonnes of rutile.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6550</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAEQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / World Commodities Prices: Fruit and Vegetables
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Apples continue to dominate the fruit basket with British Columbia Red
Delicious at 50-55p a lb (50-60p), Washington Red Delicious at 50-55p a lb
(50-60p) and English Cox at 29-40p a lb (35-45p), reports FFVIB. Oranges
continue to be a best buy at 12-25p each (12-25p). Cabbage varieties are
plentiful with Primo and Celtic at 20-25p a lb (20-25p), Spring greens at
25-35p a lb (25-35p) and Savoy at 30-35p a lb (20-35p). Iceberg lettuce at
50-60p a head (60-80p), Round lettuce at 25-35p (30-35p) a head, and Spring
onions at 40-45p a bunch (45-50p) are all good salad buys.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6551</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAEPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Banks pull out of commodities
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BLACKWELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE NUMBER of banks involved in financing international commodity
transactions in London has fallen to just a dozen from about 30 over the
past 2 1/2 years, a London conference was told this week.
'This rapid fall-out of banks has caused some of the commodity trading
companies in the industry considerable pain and has even meant ultimate
demise on occasions,' Mr Guy Saunders, senior manager, commodity and trade
finance at ANZ Bank, told the conference, organised by Moores Rowland, the
accountancy firm, in association with World Commodity Report.
The cut in the number of successful commodity traders companies and banks
committed to the industry meant 'the past few years have been extremely
turbulent and unstable from a financial perspective.' But he thought that
the remaining banks would continue to support the industry.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6552</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAEOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Rubber producers call for pact
review
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SINGAPORE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
NATURAL RUBBER producers want consumers to review measures to stabilise
prices, Mr Sucharit Promdej, secretary of the Association of Natural Rubber
Producing Countries, said yesterday, reports Reuter from Singapore.
'The current agreement is working well to the advantage of consumers as
prices have remained low,' said Mr Sucharit, who was attending the
International Natural Rubber Study Group's forum. He said rubber producers
wanted to review the discretionary powers of the buffer stock manager.
Council members of the International Natural Rubber Organisation, a
consumer-producer organisation, are scheduled to meet from November 23 to
December 2 in Malaysia.
At its May meeting, the Inro council failed to end a stalemate on whether
the current price-stabilising International Natural Rubber Agreement should
be reviewed.
Producers want the pact, which expires at the end of 1993, replaced, saying
it favours consumers. But consumers want the status quo maintained. 'Inro's
intervention has not made much impact,' Mr Sucharit said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6553</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAENFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / World Commodities Prices: Market Report
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
London's robusta COFFEE futures finished with gains of up to Dollars 15 as
the market seemed to have resumed its upward trend after a recent downside
technical correction. Dealers said a 50 per cent retracement had been
completed in New York's March arabica contract, which earlier this week rose
to a high of 74.10 cents a lb from 64.30 cents last week and then slipped
back to a low on Wednesday of 69.20 cents. In the short term, however, the
market looks unlikely to move sharply in either direction ahead of next
week's ICO talks. London COCOA prices closed mostly higher. News that the
Ivorian prime minister's office had estimated the 1992-93 cocoa crop at
780,000 tonnes was above trade expectations and seen as mildly bearish. BASE
METAL prices closed mixed on the LME, concluding a generally lacklustre
session of few features. Dealers said early price rises ran out of steam,
with fundamental factors unable to provide a follow-through to technical
advances.
Compiled from Reuters
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6554</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAEMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Ukraine plugs expensive oil
leak - Chrystia Freeland and Neil Buckley report on an alleged Dollars 20m
scam
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRYSTIA FREELAND and NEIL BUCKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
VLADIMIR HORIUNOV, until this week the top oil man in Ukraine, had achieved
a lifestyle few of his countrymen can even imagine. When Mr Vitold Fokin
became Ukrainian prime minister, he plucked his friend and associate Mr
Horiunov from the Lysychansk refinery in the dismal rust belt of eastern
Ukraine and appointed him president of Ukrnaftokhim, the state oil monopoly.
But Mr Horiunov was often absent from Ukrnaftokhim's Kiev headquarters,
travelling frequently to the UK, Europe and North America.
This week those halcyon days ended as Mr Leonid Kuchma, the prime minister
who replaced Mr Fokin less than a month ago, disbanded Ukrnaftokhim and
fired its senior directors, alleging they were engaged in illegal resale of
oil on a massive scale. The body has been replaced by a state committee on
oil and gas.
Mr Kuchma - who has launched a major clean-up campaign since coming into
office - alleges that 8m tonnes of oil have been re-exported from Ukraine
this year alone. He says he has passed information on to the Ukrainian state
prosecutor and will press for charges to be brought.
The case illustrates the dangers of corruption as the former-Soviet
republics begin their transition to market economies, and follows widespread
rumours and suspicions of oil industry corruption in several other
republics.
The allegations that Ukrainian officials are profiting from the resale of
oil come at a time when crucial services are being cut because of Ukraine's
worsening oil crisis, created by Russia's gradual shift to world prices.
Ukraine, which traditionally consumed 50m to 60m tonnes of crude oil a year
has received less than 30m tonnes over the past ten months.
Ambulance services in the southern city of Mykolaiv have been severely
affected, domestic flights from the capital city, Kiev, were grounded for
several days last week and the price of a canister of fuel on the black
market is close to the average monthly salary. Ukrainian oil refineries are
working at less than half their normal capacity.
The Financial Times has obtained the details of some of the deals in which
Mr Horiunov and his Ukrainian and foreign associates were involved.
Ukrainian oil industry officials allege that more than Dollars 20m worth of
fuel was re-exported; the FT has evidence of re-exports worth several
million dollars.
Contracts and internal correspondence show that one of the ways Mr
Horiunov's refinery in Lysychansk re-exported petroleum products was through
Triplet, a private business in Kiev that was set up specifically for this
purpose.
With the help of various co-operative government agencies, Triplet obtained
export licences for the fuel. Western purchasers were then directed to send
payment for the fuel to a UK-based company called Eltrip, which includes Mr
Sergei Tsyhankov, director of Triplet, on its board of directors. Mr
Horiunov also became a director in October 1991.
One specific deal, in summer 1991, worked like this: 50,000 tonnes of heavy
fuel oil refined at Lysychansk, the Ukraine's biggest oil refinery, were
exported to an unknown Western purchaser through the Lithuanian port of
Klaipeda. Triplet made the arrangements with the assistance of Istok, a
Russian company that has been accused by the Moscow daily, Izvestia, of
involvement in illegal oil re-export.
Triplet and the Lysychansk refinery then requested that payment for the fuel
 -which amounted to Dollars 1,898,844.47 after transport and other costs had
been subtracted - be transferred to the British bank account of Eltrip. Mr
Tsyhankov, director of both Triplet and Eltrip, admitted yesterday this deal
had taken place but said full payment had not been made by Istok.
The FT has details of other contracts in 1991 relating to the export of
700,000 tonnes of diesel fuel, 200,000 tonnes of gasoline, and at least
980,000 tonnes of heavy fuel oil, and 300,000 tonnes of other fuel, but it
is not clear whether all these deals took place.
Mr Kuchma told reporters earlier this week that while many of the deals had
been licensed, licences had sometimes been obtained fraudulently. Moreover,
the resale of oil products was illegal because it violated Ukrainian law and
agreements with Russia, and the proceeds had ended up in private hands.
Repeated efforts by the FT to contact Mr Horiunov over the past four months
have been unsuccessful.
Mr Tsyhankov, however, said the legality of the licenses was not the
responsibility of Triplet, but of Ukrvneshtekhpromobmen, the body which
issues licences.
He added that Eltrip had only been used to buy equipment for the Ukrainian
oil industry, and claimed that Mr Fokin had given permission for some
re-exports to take place this year to fund new equipment purchases for the
Lysychansk refinery.
'In this bordello which we have, it is impossible to do everything according
to the letter of the law,' he observed. 'We are just beginning to become
businessmen. Sometimes it takes wild forms.'
The process by which Triplet acquired its UK arm, Eltrip, illustrates the
unusual ways in which business connections are sometimes forged with the
former Soviet republics.
Triplet bought Eltrip with the help of a Leeds-based shop-owner, Mr Keith
Gornall. Mr Gornall had been befriended by a Soviet student who wandered
into his city-centre hi-fi and electronics shop in the summer of 1990.
Before leaving the UK, the student promised to put Mr Gornall in touch with
business associates from the Ukraine.
A group of Ukrainians visited Leeds in December 1990 and bought a company
'off the shelf', changing its name to Eltrip. Mr Sergei Tsyhankov became a
director, along with Mr Gornall and several Ukrainians. Mr Gornall, who was
unaware of the sources of Eltrip's funds, continued to work at the company
for several months before he was replaced as director by Mr Vladimir
Horiunov in October 1991.
Eltrip investigated the possibility of exporting everything from condoms to
medical equipment to Ukraine. Early in 1991 it acquired a local company
dealing in televisions, W. Tree Trade TVs, for more than Pounds 200,000,
with the intention of exporting TVs and video recorders to Ukraine.
Mr William Tree, however, who still works part-time at the company, said
only one shipment of televisions ever went to the Ukraine, and despite now
being owned by Eltrip the company continued its UK trade as before. He added
that Mr Horiunov had joined Eltrip as a 'shadow' director in a consultancy
role, when the company was attempting to acquire equipment from the US. He
had since resigned as a director.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6555</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAELFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Venezuela invites operators to
tender for 'marginal' fields
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOSEPH MANN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   CARACAS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE VENEZUELAN government announced that it is seeking international tenders
covering the operation of 73 so-called 'marginal' oil fields with total
proven reserves of 1.2bn barrels.
This is the second time the government of President Carlos Andres Perez has
asked private companies to bid for the rights to produce crude oil. Until
earlier this year, this sector had been closed to private investment ever
since the Venezuelan petroleum industry was nationalised in 1976.
The minister of energy and mines, Mr Alirio Parra, said that the fields,
grouped into 13 production units according to location, contain light and
medium gravity crude. Once the marginal fields are fully operational they
should be able to produce a total of about 260,000 barrels a day, or about
10 per cent of Venezuela's current crude oil production.
Mr Parra added that the new operating contracts would be more flexible than
agreements signed earlier this year, and would allow contractors to explore
for additional deposits of oil and gas within their assigned areas.
The fields, some of which are at present being operated by the national oil
company, PDVSA, have not received any significant investments for about 15
years. They are considered marginal fields as they do not form part of
PDVSA's mainstream plans for developing new oil production capacity.
The winning bidders will finance any production investments out of their own
pockets and will be paid fees by PDVSA according to the volume of oil they
produce. The operating companies will not own the oil they produce, and will
be obliged to sell all oil and gas output to PDVSA. Mr Parra said he
expected that companies interested in bidding on the fields would obtain all
necessary technical data by March 31, 1993, and that tenders should be
received by June 30 next year.
Earlier this year four investor groups made up of Venezuelan and
international partners won contracts to operate a series of inactive and
marginal oil fields. Two groups, Japan's Teikoku Oil Company and a
consortium made up of Benton Oil (US) and Vinccler (Venezuela) agreed to
invest a total of USDollars 280m over the next decade to develop and operate
specific oil fields.
However, the other two winners - Shell and Lingoteras de Venezuela (a
Venezuelan group) - did not sign operating contracts. According to the
ministry, Shell wanted any legal disputes to be settled in New York state, a
position the Venezuelan government did not accept.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6556</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAEKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: RTZ's investment boosts
credibility of diamond site
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KENNETH GOODING, Mining Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
RTZ CORPORATION, the world's biggest mining group, has already spent
USDollars 6m to join the hectic hunt for diamonds in the Lac de Gras area of
Canada where the biggest land rush in North American history is taking
place. If the UK group takes up all its land options it would cost Dollars
30m, said Mr Bob Wilson, chief executive, yesterday.
Diamonds were discovered in this area of the North West Territories in
November last year by a small Canadian mining company, Dia Met Minerals,
which now has the financial backing of Broken Hill Proprietary (BHP),
Australia's biggest company. BHP's presence and that of RTZ, which says it
is interested only in high-quality, low-cost mineral deposits, lends extra
credibility to claims that Lac de Gras could become one of the world's major
diamond mining areas.
However, Mr Wilson was cautious yesterday when talking to the Association of
Mining Analysts in London. He suggested it was unlikely that RTZ would take
up all its options. These entitle it to interests in about 4m acres -
interests of 40 or 60 per cent, depending on the deal reached with the
original claim holders.
Also, while six out of seven holes drilled on land in which RTZ was
interested were bearing kimberlitic material, history showed that only 2 per
cent of kimberlite pipes actually contained diamonds and only 30 per cent of
those that contained diamonds had eventually proved worth mining.
Base metals and gold prices were unlikely to go much lower but would remain
'soggy' until well into 1993, suggested Mr Phillip Crowson, RTZ's chief
economist. He said more aluminium, nickel, lead and zinc production cuts
were needed before prices could rise substantially. However, the copper
price would have to slip to 75 to 80 cents a lb before output cuts were
necessary. Mr Crowson did not expect copper, which yesterday closed at a 98
cents a lb, to fall to this level.
He pointed out that output cuts were being delayed because many producers
had sold forward when prices 'spiked' and warned that 'special factors'
might drive up London Metal Exchange prices in spite of the fundamentally
poor outlook - factors such as heavy Chinese buying, investment funds
returning to the metal markets if the US economy showed a
stronger-than-expected recovery, or simple price manipulation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6557</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAEIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: Yasuda in Paine Webber share
sale
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
YASUDA Mutual Life Insurance of Japan has halved its investment in a capital
tie-up with Paine Webber to Dollars 150m and sold Paine Webber 1.7m shares
at the request of the US brokerage, Reuter reports from Tokyo.
Profits from the sale totalled Dollars 83m and follow a similar sale in
February.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6558</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAEHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: Cheaper funding lifts Orix
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHARLES LEADBEATER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ORIX, the leading Japanese leasing company, reported a 6.4 per cent increase
in net income to Y10.02bn (Dollars 80.5m), largely a reflection of tighter
credit screening of clients to reduce risks of bad debts and cheaper funding
as a result of cuts in Japan's official discount rate, writes Charles
Leadbeater.
The Orix group is one of Japan's top non-banks, which are less tightly
regulated than the banking sector.
The non-banks have been hit by a rising tide of non-performing loans as a
result of the sharp fall in the real estate market over the past two years.
The group's revenues were about 15 per cent down at Y193bn for the six
months to end-September.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6559</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAEGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: A besieged industry draws up
plans for survival - Japanese houses have stopped hoping for a rapid return
to the free-spending of the late 1980s
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT THOMSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Daiwa Securities announced a net profit of zero for the first six months of
1992, cut its graduate intake by 40 per cent and launched a campaign for
staff to 'Do My Best' in encouraging investors to use the broker's services.
The reforms at Daiwa, one of the big four Japanese securities houses which
has just closed three sales offices, reflects the upheaval in a securities
industry which has begun to give up hopes for a rapid return to the
free-spending days of the late 1980s.
Instead, the pressure for branch closures and mergers of brokers intensifies
with each bad trading day.
Daily turnover of stocks on the Tokyo exchange this month is an average
180m, far below the 450m that marks whether most brokers make a profit or
loss.
The listless trading has added to woes of a first half in which not one of
the largest 14 brokers reported a net profit. Dramatic revival aside, the
figures for the full year will be far worse, as brokers will be forced to
write-off mounting losses on their stock portfolios.
In common with Daiwa, most companies are trimming workforces and pruning
executive salaries, but these cuts do not go deep enough, and over the next
two years, the crowded ranks of Japanese brokers will almost certainly be
thinned by mergers and closures.
Japanese houses are already lowering their international profile. Nomura,
the largest broker, has recently cut 35 staff from its London operations and
closed three European offices. The list of branch closures lengthens each
day: Okasan Securities has just shut its Frankfurt office; Sanyo Securities
has closed a Los Angeles operation; and Dai-Ichi Securities is leaving
Milan.
With so many brokers unable to lift themselves out of the red, the industry
wants a slowing of financial deregulation. Debate continues on an end to
fixed commissions and banks' entry into the investment trust market, both of
which would increase competition and put added pressure on weaker brokers.
'Slimming is our aim at the moment,' explained Mr Satoshi Matsumoto, head of
corporate planning at Kankaku Securities, which lost Y18.6bn (Dollars
149.6m) in the first half, following a Y18bn loss last year. 'We have to
accept that the market is not the same and try to make money at the new,
lower levels.'
In explaining the industry's plight, brokers agree they badly miscalculated
in the late 1980s, when daily stock turnover was an average 1.02bn. The
financial bubble was pumped ever larger, and brokers concluded that the
biggest problem was expanding rapidly enough to keep pace with the
irrepressible demand.
In the four years until the market peaked in December 1989, personnel at
Japanese brokers rose by 41.6 per cent. Desperate to open new branches, but
restricted by the Ministry of Finance, the brokers turned to now
unprofitable sub-branches or 'boutiques' in shopping malls, train stations
and department stores - these were limited in products offered but still
required heavy outlays in computer systems and rent.
Applications for full branches rose as rapidly as the Nikkei index - Kankaku
had nine approved by the ministry that will not open - and were still being
filed when the market began a 'temporary readjustment'. Three years later,
the brokers' most important sources of income are still evaporating and
their resources are nearing exhaustion.
A telling sign of the brokers' income shortage is the turnaround in public
share offerings. In 1989, there were 261 public offerings which raised a
total of Y6,257bn - so far this year, two companies have raised Y1.25bn, and
no public offerings were made during the fiscal first half from April to
September.
Stock and bond commissions, down 30 per cent in the first half, account for
about 60 per cent of income at the big four brokers, Nomura, Daiwa, Nikko
and Yamaichi. At the 10 second-tier companies, which reported first-half
losses ranging from Y3.8bn to Y18.9bn, commissions account for around 80 per
cent of revenue and as much as 95 per cent.
Brokers had hoped that a revival of the corporate bond market would increase
earnings. New issues rose from 33 in the second half last year to 40 in the
first half, but the market is still heavily regulated. There are strict
limits on the types of companies able to issue bonds and on the trading of
those bonds, and the only real relief for leading brokers has been increased
income from trading stocks on their own accounts.
Behind the falls in price and turnover on the Tokyo Stock Exchange is the
simple fact that few Japanese institutions or individuals have an incentive
to buy stocks. Life insurance companies and banks have their own financial
problems and are not keen to pump more money into low-yielding stocks,
particularly as many companies are cutting their dividends this year.
Individual investors are also shunning the market because scandals last year
raised doubts about the integrity of leading brokers, which admitted to
compensating corporate investors for stock losses. The TSE insists that the
industry has reformed, but brokers announced two weeks ago that they
compensated clients even after the spate of confessions, apologies and
resignations last summer.
In an attempt to stir interest in stocks, the TSE and finance ministry have
urged industrial companies to increase their dividend payments, and
discussed tax breaks for dividends and capital gains. The ministry this week
announced a relaxation of limits on employee share ownership programmes, but
the Nikkei market average was unmoved.
Mr Yukio Aida, chairman of Nomura Securities, said: 'These are very
difficult times,' and companies are restructuring for 'survival'. He said
'even Nomura' may not have the resources to bail out stricken smaller
brokers, which were heavily reliant on business from individual investors
and were particularly aggressive in expanding.
Comparisons are being drawn between the industry's reform and the
restructuring of Japanese banks, which are establishing a land and loan
purchase company to ease the heavy burden of non-performing assets. Banks
also have an understanding from the government that public funds may be used
if the crisis worsens, but the securities industry can expect no such public
assistance.
Just as the finance ministry is encouraging mergers to streamline the
banking system, ministry officials believe that the 264 brokers registered
with the Japan Securities Dealers' Association are far more than the country
can support. The difficulty is finding brokers wanting to expand their
networks through mergers and acquisitions of the more vulnerable houses.
For some brokers, traditional bank patrons are offering assistance. Dai-Ichi
Kangyo Bank, Japan's largest, is helping to overhaul Kankaku Securities,
while Sakura Bank has renegotiated loans at Yamatane Securities, which is
planning to cut management staff by 40 per cent.
If deregulation stays on track, the banks could use these connections to
expand their role in the securities industry, but little money will be made
in the near future. Kankaku 'hopes' to make a profit by March 1994, but says
much depends on the timing and strength of an economic recovery.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6560</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAEEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: Malaysian carrier ahead 5.5%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KIERAN COOKE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KUALA LUMPUR
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MALAYSIA Airlines (MAS), the country's national carrier, has announced a 5.5
per cent rise in pre-tax profits for the first half to September 30.
Taxable profits rose to MDollars 153.46m (USDollars 61.2m) from MDollars
145.68m a year earlier. Turnover increased to MDollars 1.94bn from MDollars
1.78bn.
In the year to March 1991, MAS registered pre-tax profits of MDollars 206m
and MDollars 120m in 1991-92. But these figures included funds raised from
aircraft sales. The group did not reveal what percentage of interim profits
came from these sales.
Earlier this year, MAS forecast taxable profits for the current year of
MDollars 372m. Airline analysts say MAS has benefitted from a 20 per cent
rise in domestic air fares approved by the government in June. But they say
that, despite the six-month rise in profits, the full-year profit projection
is unlikely to be met.
Last month, a fire at Kuala Lumpur's main airport caused traffic disruption
for more than two weeks. The fire came during the holiday season, and
analysts say that it cut MAS revenues.
MAS is in the middle of what is one of the global aviation industry's
biggest expansion programmes. In the course of its present five-year plan -
1991-92 to 1996-97 - MAS has orders for 72 aircraft costing a total of
MDollars 10.6bn.
Earlier this month MAS launched Malaysia's biggest rights issue yet to raise
MDollars 1.75bn in a one-for-one offering, which MAS said was oversubscribed
by 3.9 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6561</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAEDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: Westpac tumbles to record loss
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
WESTPAC Banking Corpor-ation yesterday announced net losses of ADollars
1.56bn (USDollars 1.07bn) after abnormal items for the year to the end of
September, a record for Australia's four national trading banks.
The result contrasted sharply with a ADollars 675m net profit announced by
the more conservatively managed National Australia Bank. Earlier this week,
Australia and New Zealand Banking Corporation revealed a net loss of
ADollars 579m.
Westpac reported net profits of ADollars 104m for the second half, but the
return to profitability was swamped by the bank's first-half loss of
ADollars 1.66bn, which followed a ADollars 2.65bn write-off against bad
loans.
The bank said second-half net profits were ADollars 268m before abnormal
losses of ADollars 106m relating to US tax, a ADollars 51m pension fund
writedown, and a ADollars 7m writedown of its 6.2 per cent shareholding in
the ANZ bank.
The directors cut the final dividend from 12 cents to 6 cents, making a
total of 18 cents a share, compared with 24 cents. The board maintained full
franking, but said future increases in dividends would depend on
performance.
The result ends a year during which five directors resigned and the bank was
given six months to improve performance by the AMP Society, its biggest
shareholder.
Westpac strengthened its balance sheet after the first half through a
ADollars 1.2bn fully underwritten rights issue, but was embarrassed when
shareholder scepticism left the issue 72 per cent undersubscribed.
Mr Frank Conroy, managing director, acknowledged that the bank would be
vulnerable to a takeover if the federal government relaxed its ban on
mergers between Australia's big six financial institutions.
Mr Conroy said shareholders were likely to be 'not very happy' with the
result. However, he said there was 'some evidence' that the bank's
profitability was starting to improve.
Profitability before tax, bad debts and abnormal items had been stable for
18 months at an annualised level of about ADollars 1.3bn. The capital ratio,
which reflects balance sheet strength, had improved from 8.4 per cent to 9.7
per cent following the rights issue. And problem assets had fallen to
ADollars 7.6bn from ADollars 8.2bn before specific provisions.
'Taken together . . . we have the foundation from which to recover our
financial performance over time, and reposition the bank to its rightful
place in the market,' Mr Conroy said.
Westpac said it intended to reinforce the recovery in profitability by
cutting costs and increasing revenue by ADollars 300m by next September;
cutting its expense to income ratio from 70 per cent to 58 per cent over
three years; and reducing its corporate lending assets by ADollars 10bn by
1995.
Westpac shares closed 3 cents higher on the Australian Stock Exchange at
ADollars 2.65, still 35 cents below the offer price for the recent rights
issue.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6562</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAECFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: Japanese trading companies to
cut top salaries
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHARLES LEADBEATER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
EXECUTIVES at some of Japan's leading trading companies are facing salary
cuts of between 5 per cent and 10 per cent after their companies yesterday
reported sharp falls in profits for the first half of the financial year.
The downturn in the domestic economy was the main reason for the falls in
pre-tax profits which ranged from 25.6 per cent at Mitsubishi and 33.7 per
cent at Sumitomo.
All the trading houses suffered large falls in the value of their securities
investments held by special trusts. The houses' finances are a broad
reflection of the state of the Japanese economy as well as its trade flows.
Mitsubishi's pre-tax profits fell by more than a quarter to Y31bn (Dollars
249m) for the six months to the end of September on a 3.3 per cent fall in
sales to Y7,502bn.
The deterioration in Mitsubishi's profits was mainly due to a continued rise
in operating costs, which were up by 7 per cent. That was the main factor
behind a 32 per cent fall operating profits to Y35bn. Earnings per share
were Y8.11, down from Y14.14 a year earlier.
The Mitsubishi board yesterday decided to cut top executive salaries by an
average of 10 per cent from the end of this month.
The decline in Mitsubishi's sales was most pronounced in Japan where the
economic downturn prompted a 6.9 per cent fall in sales which account for
about 46 per cent of the group's total sales. Fuel sales rose by 8.9 per
cent but chemicals fell by 10.7 per cent and machinery by 8.3 per cent.
Sumitomo reported a 33 per cent fall in pre-tax profits to Y23bn on sales of
Y8,596bn, down 9.1 per cent from the first half of last year.
The group's operating profits were almost halved to Y13bn because, despite
the fall in sales, its general and administrative expenses rose by 7 per
cent mainly due to higher labour costs.
Machinery sales were 3.3 per cent up, but sales of metal and steel fell 22
per cent, while chemicals and fuel were 9.5 per cent down and textiles 9.2
per cent lower.
Sumitomo sharply increased its provisions for doubtful receivables from
Y189m to Y655m, while its valuation loss on securities holdings rose from
Y769m last year to Y1.2bn, reflecting the slump in the Tokyo stock market.
Income from the sales of securities fell by Y1.6bn to Y3.9bn, while cash on
deposit was cut by Y410m to Y934m.
Mitsui's pre-tax profits fell by 21.4 per cent to Y25bn on a 7.5 per cent
fall in sales to Y7,712bn. Operating profits were 24 per cent down at Y24bn.
Marubeni blamed the appreciation of the yen against the US dollar for an
erosion of its profit margins on its foreign trade related businesses. Its
pre-tax profits fell by 32.6 per cent to Y15bn on a 4.5 per cent fall in
sales to Y8,283bn.
Itochu, formerly C. Itoh, is cutting executive salaries by between 5 per
cent and 10 per cent from next month despite reporting an 11.5 per cent
increase in first half pre-tax profits to Y22bn on a 9.1 per cent decline in
sales to Y9,201bn.
The profit increase was mainly due to increased dividends from foreign
subsidiaries and non-operating financial income.
Sales in the metals division fell by 23 per cent as the company cut back on
gold trading. Itochu said it had made an appraisal loss of about Y90bn on
its securities investments, worth about 30 per cent of its outstanding
securities investments.
Nissho Iwai's pre-tax profits fell by 15.7 per cent to Y8bn on a 5.5 per
cent drop in sales to Y5,198bn. Nissho Iwai said it made an appraisal loss
of about Y20bn on its securities holdings which are worth about Y220bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6563</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAEBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: Abnormal items behind 6.3%
profits fall at NAB
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NATIONAL Australia Bank (NAB), Australia's biggest and most profitable bank,
yesterday reported a fall of 6.3 per cent in net profits to ADollars 675m
(USDollars 454m) after abnormal items for the year to the end of September.
However, the bank said net profit before abnormals increased by 11 per cent
to ADollars 802m. The abnormal loss of ADollars 127m was caused entirely by
a write-down in the carrying value of the NAB's 4.9 per cent stake in the
Australia and New Zealand Banking Group (ANZ).
Mr Don Argus, managing director, said the result was 'the story of a black
ink bank'. He said the result was 'satisfactory' in the light of 'difficult'
trading conditions in Australia and the UK.
The result was achieved in spite of a 33.5 per cent fall to ADollars 189m in
the contribution from NAB's UK and Irish division, which includes the
Clydesdale, Northern, Yorkshire and National Irish banks. The sharpest
reverse was incurred by Yorkshire Bank, which suffered a 33 per cent fall in
profits to ADollars 11m, caused mainly by an increased charge for bad and
doubtful debts.
The Australian operations increased their contribution to group profits by
9.7 per cent to ADollars 588m. New Zealand operations, excluding the
recently acquired Bank of New Zealand, contributed ADollars 9m, compared
with a loss of ADollars 9m in the previous year.
Mr Argus said the main factors behind the improvement were a 5 per cent fall
in provisions against bad and doubtful debts to ADollars 908m, and a 1 per
cent increase in net interest income to ADollars 3.6bn. Almost half the bad
debt charge related to the UK and Ireland.
He said there were signs of modest recovery in Australia, but the outlook
for growth remained moderate, and uncertainties still surrounded the
property market and the level of business confidence.
This would sustain strong pressure on margins in the housing and retail
deposit market, the backbone of NAB's profitable performance.
Mr Argus said UK economic activity was expected to be weak in 1993, but
lower operating costs and charges for bad debts would provide a base for
improved profits.
See UK Companies
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6564</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: Sony down 61% on poor domestic
sales
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SONY, the leading Japanese consumer electronics group, yesterday confirmed
the sharp downturn in domestic consumer demand with a 61 per cent fall in
interim taxable profits.
And Pioneer Electronic, the audio equipment maker, announced poor interim
earnings, posting a 44 per cent drop in pre-tax profits.
Sony's consolidated taxable profits for the first half to September plunged
to Y38bn (Dollars 309m) from the previous year's Y97.5bn. The announcements
follow other leading Japanese electronics companies, which have also
reported sharp profit falls due to sluggish trading. Matsushita, the largest
group in the industry, reported a 65.6 per cent fall in pre-tax profits
earlier this week.
Sony's sales were boosted by a rise in entertainment revenue, and advanced
4.8 per cent to Y1,900.1bn. Operating profits however fell 39.6 per cent to
Y64bn due to foreign exchange losses, and net profits fell 60.2 per cent to
Y17.9bn.
Entertainment revenue rose 17.9 per cent to Y383.6bn, thanks to the group's
box office hits. Revenues from films and videos rose 40.4 per cent, due to
its film Hook, which brought in Dollars 250m, while A League of Their Own,
starring Madonna, netted Dollars 104m.
Electronics equipment sales increased 2 per cent to Y1,516.5bn. Video
equipment sales were hurt by market saturation, falling 3.8 per cent to
Y437.3bn, while audio equipment was flat at Y452.4bn.
Domestic sales fell 2.9 per cent to Y461bn, while overseas sales rose 7.6
per cent to Y1,439bn, supported by to a 12.5 per cent rise in the US.
European sales advanced 4.8 per cent, because of the strong D-Mark.
Inventories, of which 85 per cent is electronics equipment, fell 2 per cent
to Y851.6bn. Sony said it wanted to reduce the level to Y800bn by the end of
the fiscal year to March through a cut in production.
First-half capital spending was curbed by 41 per cent to Y137.6bn, while
research and development spending rose 2 per cent to Y117.8bn.
On a non-consolidated basis, Sony saw a 0.8 per cent fall in pre-tax profits
to Y36.6bn on a 3.7 per cent decline in sales to Y959.2bn. The company,
which fell into the red on the operating level last fiscal year, managed to
post a profit of Y11.7bn due to aggressive cost cutting.
Uncertainty over a recovery in the domestic market forced Sony to revise
down previous forecasts for the 12 months to March. Consolidated sales are
expected to rise 3 per cent to Y3,950bn, while operating profits are
projected to fall 20 per cent to Y133bn. The group's net income is forecast
to fall 71 per cent to Y35bn.
Meanwhile, Pioneer said pre-tax profits fell to Y10.8bn due to poor sales of
audio-visual equipment and karaoke systems. Sales fell 2.7 per cent to
Y205.5bn, with domestic sales declining 12.8 per cent. After-tax profits
tumbled 37.9 per cent to Y6.6bn. Pioneer expects annual pre-tax profits to
fall 34.1 per cent to Y21.8bn on a 2.5 per cent drop in sales to Y405.5bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6565</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: Depositors leave Bank Summa
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM KEELING
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JAKARTA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BANK Summa, the troubled Indonesian bank which was suspended from clearing
operations last week with bad debts of over Rp1,000bn (Dollars 487m),
re-opened yesterday for small-scale depositors to make withdrawals.
Under a rescue plan supported by a consortium of about 17 private banks,
customers with deposits of up to Rp10m were allowed to withdraw their
savings. From dawn, queues were reported at many of its more than 200
branches as thousands decided to clear their accounts.
Bank Summa has about 150,000 depositors, of which up to 90 per cent may
qualify for the rescue package.
Executives of the consortium's banks, which have raised over Rp150bn to
support the operation, have privately said they are participating only under
pressure from Bank Indonesia, the central bank.
Dr Adrianus Mooy, central bank governor, said on Monday that no central bank
funds would be made available to rescue Bank Summa. He noted that, while the
rescue package would assist small-scale depositors, the withdrawal of their
funds would make a restructuring of Bank Summa more difficult.
Bank Summa is owned by the Soeryadjaya family, who are also majority
shareholders in Astra International, Indonesia's second largest company.
Last week, the Soeryadjayas sold 40m Astra shares for Dollars 197m. Bankers
say they may have to relinquish much of their remaining stake, valued at
over Dollars 500m, to cover the bank's debts, over half of which are owed by
companies in which the Soeryadjayas hold an interest.
Astra's share price closed yesterday at Rp8,500, down 16 per cent for the
week and 40 per cent since mid-year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6566</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: Downturn at Morgan Stanley
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MORGAN Stanley, the Wall Street securities house, yesterday reported a
slight fall in third-quarter net income to Dollars 110.6m from Dollars
121.8m.
The company blamed the drop in earnings on a contraction in new equity
offerings, and lower revenues from its principal trading business.
The figures would have been more disappointing but for the Dollars 42.6m
gain Morgan Stanley earned from the sale of its stake in MS/Essex Holdings,
and an increase in the carrying value of its investment in Kohl's
Corporation.
Although the company enjoyed strong results from foreign exchange, swaps and
government bond trading (some of the gains were undoubtedly linked to the
turmoil in European bond and currency markets during September), they were
more than offset by poor results in equity and commodities trading.
Overall, Morgan Stanley's earnings from trading for its own account dropped
15.6 per cent in the quarter to Dollars 300.8m.
Investment banking revenues fell 6 per cent to Dollars 182.3m, a reflection
of the fall-off in equity securities offerings and merger activity. The
volume of debt issuance rose during the period, thanks to continued healthy
demand from US and foreign corporations for bond underwriting services.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6567</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAD7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: Dutch bank withdraws plans to
bid for BBL
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RONALD VAN DE KROL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   AMSTERDAM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
INTERNATIONALE Nederlanden Groep (ING), the Dutch banking and insurance
group, has withdrawn plans to make a BFr63.6bn (Dollars 2.0bn) public bid
for Belgium's second largest bank, Banque Bruxelles Lambert (BBL), following
a disagreement between the two sides about the price per share to be
offered.
BBL said that ING had refused to confirm its earlier stated maximum price of
BFr3,600 per share. For this reason, BBL said it would not be recommending
the bid to shareholders, which it described as being a condition that both
sides had agreed must be fulfilled if the bid were to go ahead.
ING, which recently completed an examination of the Belgian bank's books,
confirmed that it would not be proceeding with the bid, blaming the
development on disagreements about the value of certain BBL assets.
The Dutch group said that it would have been difficult to win the bid at any
price lower than the maximum BFr3,600, because BBL shareholders had said
that they would not tender their shares at the original maximum price.
However, the Dutch company, which owns approximately 11 per cent of BBL,
that it would remain an important minority shareholder.
BBL said last night that a report which it recently commissioned from Credit
Suisse First Boston showed that the shares were worth substantially more
than BFr3,600.
BBL's shares were suspended yesterday on the Brussels stock exchange after
they fell BFr160 to BFr3,300 on speculation that the long-awaited bid would
not be launched after all.
ING had hoped to use BBL to create a second home market and to export its
'bancassurance' concept of combining banking and insurance to Belgium.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6568</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAD6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: Campbell Soup shows 21% gain
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CAMPBELL SOUP, the US food company embroiled in a takeover bid for Arnotts,
the Australian cookie and cracker group, yesterday reported a 21 per cent
increase in first-quarter after-tax profits to Dollars 156.6m.
The improvement was scored on sales up 10 per cent to Dollars 1.7bn, and
translated into earnings per share of 62 cents, compared with 51 cents a
year earlier.
Mr David Johnson, Campbell's chief executive, claimed the advance reflected
a push for markets and increased market shares, with advertising expenditure
up 24 per cent.
In its core North and South America markets, Campbell saw a 9 per cent sales
increase, with a 15 per cent earnings gain. In the much smaller Europe/Asia
division, the gains were 16 per cent and 28 per cent respectively.
However, although sales in the biscuit and bakery arm advanced by 8 per
cent, profits fell by 11 per cent.
Campbell said sales of its Pepperidge Farm premium cookies remained soft,
because of the recession, and that the earnings dip reflected higher
marketing spending on new Pepperidge Farm and Delacre products.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6569</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAD5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: Dell Computer surges 120%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LOUISE KEHOE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAN FRANCISCO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DELL Computer's shares rose Dollars 2 3/4 to Dollars 39 at mid-day
yesterday, when the US personal computer company reported what one Wall
Street analyst called truly amazing third-quarter results.
Sales by the Texas-based PC company, which sells computers by mail order and
over the phone, shot up 149 per cent to Dollars 570m from Dollars 229.3m in
the same period last year. Net earnings were Dollars 28.6m, or 72 cents a
share, up 120 per cent from Dollars 13m, or 35 cents.
This marks the third consecutive quarter in which Dell's revenues have
increased by over 100 per cent. 'We are continuing to gain market share from
both larger and smaller competitors,' said Mr Michael Dell, chairman and
chief executive.
Recently, Mr Dell predicted an end to the price war that has slashed profit
margins throughout the PC industry. 'We are overwhelmed with demand, so if
we lowered prices it would be like a self-inflicted wound,' he said.
Dell's domestic sales increased 138 per cent to Dollars 377m. International
sales surged 172 per cent to Dollars 193m.
For the first nine months, sales increased 131 per cent to Dollars 1.4bn,
against Dollars 604m last time. Net income was Dollars 70m, or Dollars 1.81
a share, 98 per cent higher.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6570</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAD4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: Carrier must escape the winter -
Nikki Tait and Ronald van de Krol on Northwest Airlines' troubles
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT and RONALD VAN DE KROL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Just how bad is the financial situation at Northwest Airlines, the fourth
largest US carrier? That is the question bouncing around Wall Street's junk
bond desks, as analysts try to figure out whether yet another US carrier is
headed for the bankruptcy courts. 'My guess is that it's very critical,'
says Ms Chris Daley at Bear Stearns.
As ever with distressed US carriers, the pressing issue is liquidity, rather
than long-term capital structure, although the latter is scarcely
encouraging.
Northwest - whose 370 aircraft, Dollars 7bn-plus in annual revenues, and
46,000 employees make it roughly similar in size to British Airways  - was
taken private via a Dollars 3.65bn leveraged buy-out in 1989, bringing in
KLM as a minority equity partner. Today, the US carrier still has Dollars
4bn in long-term debt and, against a dire industry backdrop, has notched up
Dollars 880m in after-tax losses since the beginning of 1990.
But the focus of concern is whether it can survive the low-travel winter
without fresh financial assistance. Northwest drew down the last tranche of
a Dollars 600m revolving credit, its main source of flexibility, last month.
In the wake of this move, analysts are left guessing at the precise level of
cash balances: 'I wouldn't think there's a near-term liquidity crisis,' says
Mr Phillip Baggally, with New York credit rating agency, Standard &amp; Poor's.
'But if they want to get through the winter period, they will probably need
some financial help.'
Support for this comes from several sources. First, even in the high-travel
summer period, NWA Inc clocked up a Dollars 19.7m loss after interest
charges and tax.
Now that the duller winter season has set in, some analysts reckon that
daily operat ing losses may be about Dollars 1m-Dollars 2m - a good rate at
which to eat up cash balances.
Second, Bankers Trust (BT), the US investment bank which acquired a minority
equity interest in the air line at the time of the buy-out, is trying to put
together a Dollars 300m one-year term loan for Northwest, with a deadline of
November 27.
Sources involved suggest the bank is prepared to contribute Dollars 50m, and
that the begging bowl is being passed widely to other existing banking
backers, other equity investors and even to suppliers.
Yesterday, KLM helpfully assisted the effort by offering to contribute
Dollars 50m, if others come in, and said it believed a Dollars 250m-plus
loan would enable Northwest to meet its near- term financial commitments.
But the question which everyone - including, presumably, the targeted
contributors to the BT loan - is asking, is whether an emergency facility
would really fix anything longer-term.
Again, the bullish view is that, having escaped the win ter, Northwest could
then look again at attracting new equity funds, partnership deals, a
renegotiation of the repayment terms on existing banking facilities, and/or
alterations to its new aircraft delivery schedules.
The bears, by contrast, point to the volatility of US airline business; the
very slow improvement in the economy; and the propensity for fare wars to
break out.
One potential plus for the airline could be concessions from its unions.
Northwest pilots have already offered to inject Dollars 100m a year, for a
three-year period, either through lower wages or other means. (If a deal was
struck solely through wage concessions, this would equate to a 15 per cent
pay cut.)
However, like KLM, the pilots insist other constituents at the airline must
play their part, for the offer to hold - a condition which was partially
fulfilled yesterday when four other labour unions tentatively proferred
another Dollars 200m in annual financial concessions over a similar term.
The pilots also want a share in Northwest's equity, or some equivalent deal,
and job security.
If the BT loan is not forthcoming, what are the airline's alternatives? One
possibility is asset sales; the disposal of slots at Chicago's O'Hare
airport, for example, has been mentioned. However, as one analyst points
out, such deals can seldom be arranged in a hurry.
Another is a Chapter 11 bankruptcy filing. The Cassandras have noted that
the 'drop dead date' for the BT loan is two days after Thanksgiving, which
could allow the airline to cash in on the heavy holiday traffic, and then
file in the subdued period which follows.
There are even unconfirmed suggestions that some of NWA's management would
welcome this option, since it would allow the airline to abrogate certain
contracts and, if pursued quickly, enter bankruptcy with a good cash balance
and a fair chance of emerging as a much stronger carrier.
In all of this, KLM's interests are plain to see. On the one hand, its stake
in Northwest is part of a grand design to become a global airline straddling
Europe, North America and, partly through Northwest, Asia Pacific.
On the other hand, Northwest's continued losses are putting pressure on its
own results, which are forecast to go into the red in the year 1992-93. For
this reason, KLM emphasised its Dollars 50m contribution to the Northwest
loan would not involve taking a higher stake and, by implication, a larger
share of the losses.
In 1989, KLM's involvement in Northwest was heralded as a strategic coup of
global proportions. The carrier must now fear its investment could land it
in the middle of a grimmer US phenomenon - a Chapter 11 filing.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6571</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAD3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: AMD to build chip plant in Texas
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LOUISE KEHOE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ADVANCED Micro Devices, the US semiconductor manufacturer, is to build a
Dollars 700m manufacturing facility in Austin, Texas.
The plant will employ up to 1,000 people and produce AMD's next generations
of microprocessors and highly integrated logic chips for applications, such
as computer networking and multi-media computing.
Scheduled for completion in 1994, it will initially be capable of producing
integrated circuits on eight-inch diameter silicon wafers using the latest
manufacturing technology to produce devices with half-micron features
(approximately 1/200th of the diameter of a strand of human hair) and
smaller.
Chips and Technologies, another Silicon Valley chip maker, said it was
restructuring to reduce expenses and increase its focus on key strategic
products. Chips has reduced its workforce by 20 per cent since June. The
company now expects a further reduction of about 20 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6572</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAD2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: Morgan Stanley slips to Dollars
110.6m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MORGAN Stanley, the Wall Street securities house, yesterday reported a
slight fall in third-quarter net income to Dollars 110.6m, compared with the
Dollars 121.8m earned in the same period last year.
The results were in line with market forecasts, so Morgan Stanley shares
were virtually unchanged at Dollars 53 on the New York Stock Exchange.
The company blamed the drop in earnings on a contraction in new equity
offerings, and lower revenues from its principal trading business.
The figures would have been more disappointing but for the Dollars 42.6m
gain Morgan Stanley earned from the sale of its stake in MS/Essex Holdings,
and an increase in the carrying value of its investment in Kohl's
Corporation.
Although the company enjoyed strong results from foreign exchange, swaps and
government bond trading (some of the gains were undoubtedly linked to the
turmoil in European bond and currency markets during September), they were
more than offset by poor results in equity and commodities trading.
Overall, Morgan Stanley's earnings from trading for its own account dropped
15.6 per cent in the quarter to Dollars 300.8m.
Investment banking revenues declined 6 per cent to Dollars 182.3m, a
reflection of the fall-off in equity securities offerings and merger
activity.
The volume of debt issuance rose during the period, thanks to continued
healthy demand from US and foreign corporations for bond underwriting
services.
Commission revenues were down 3 per cent to Dollars 968.6m, but earnings
from asset management (a fast-growing area for most Wall Street firms) and
administration services jumped more than 40 per cent to Dollars 57m.
Expenses excluding interest rose 8 per cent to Dollars 575.8m, due primarily
to higher compensation payouts, occupancy and equipment costs and brokerage,
clearing and exchange fees.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6573</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: AT&amp;T to float 15% of its leasing
and finance unit
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AT&amp;T, the US telecomm-unications company, announced yesterday that it was
planning to float 15 per cent of AT&amp;T Capital, its equipment leasing and
finance subsidiary, as part of a broader strategy to give the unit greater
financial independence from the parent group.
A new subsidiary, which will keep the name AT&amp;T Capital, will be established
to take over most of the unit's Dollars 7bn in assets, although it's
leverage lease and project finance assets will remain with AT&amp;T for tax
reasons. A public stock offering of about 15 per cent of the new unit is
planned for next year, depending on market conditions.
AT&amp;T said the changes, which have been under discussion for several months,
were designed to let AT&amp;T concentrate more on its core businesses of
communications and computing, yet still retain a substantial interest in
AT&amp;T Capital. The unit reported revenues of Dollars 1bn last year (out of
the total Dollars 63bn reported by AT&amp;T), and has 600,000 customer accounts
and 2,400 employees, making it one of the largest leasing and finance
companies in the US.
AT&amp;T said that the partial spin-off of the subsidiary would also give the
telecommunications company greater financing flexibility because future debt
issued by the new unit would not be supported by AT&amp;T. However, it would
continue to guarantee the unit's current outstanding debt, which included
Dollars 2.71bn of medium-term notes.
Mr Thomas Wajnert, AT&amp;T Capital's president and chief executive, said
yesterday: 'We will have greater control of our destiny, financing and the
markets we pursue. At the same time, we still maintain the AT&amp;T relationship
and brand name.'
AT&amp;T Capital was formed in 1985 to help market AT&amp;T's business systems. In
its present form the company is made up of 10 separate units that finance
both AT&amp;T and non-AT&amp;T equipment, including computer systems and cars and
telecommunications, office manufacturing and general business equipment.
News of the changes at AT&amp;T Capital helped lift AT&amp;T shares Dollars 1/4 to
Dollars 47 1/8 in early trading on the New York Stock Exchange.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6574</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNAD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: Transamerica sets IPO date
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TRANSAMERICA, the San Francisco-based financial services group, is to float
a majority interest in its property and casualty insurance operations on the
US stock market. The newly-independent company will be headed by Mr Jon
Rotenstreich, a former president of Torchmark Corporation, the insurance
group.
Transamerica first revealed it planned to get out of the property-casualty
business in July. However, at that stage, it was mulling whether to sell the
business, demerge it through a distribution of shares to Transamerica
shareholders, or go for an initial public offering (the US term for a
flotation).
Yesterday's announcement suggested the IPO would go ahead next spring, and
involve the sale of new shares, plus part of the existing Transamerica
holding.
Proceeds from the sale of the new stock would go towards strengthening the
property-casualty company's surplus, while Transamerica would use funds
raised from the sale of its own shares to pay down debt, repurchase capital
stock or invest in continuing operations. The west coast company, which
holds a 25 per cent interest in Sedgwick Group, the UK insurer, added that
it planned to sell its remaining shares in subsequent offerings.
The property-casualty operations represent the 27th largest P-C insurance
business in the US, with assets of Dollars 4.8bn. Transamerica said it
intended to purchase Sedgwick shares held by the insurance division, and
would retain Transamerica Insurance Group's 51 per cent interest in River
Thames Insurance, a London-based reinsurer.
The parent company said it would not be able to gauge whether it makes a
profit or loss on the disposal until the IPO price is set, but any loss
would not exceed Dollars 75m after-tax. Yesterday, the shares rose Dollars 1
1/2 to Dollars 45 1/8 in early trading.
Mr Rotenstreich, meanwhile, is perhaps best-known as the president of
Torchmark who, in 1990, waged an ultimately unsuccessful bid campaign by the
Birmingham, Alabama insurer against American General, a much-bigger
insurance company.
Prior to this, he was vice-president, treasurer and chief financial officer
at IBM, and before that, a managing director and general partner at Salomon
Brothers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6575</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: Daimler-Benz rules out share
stake in Daf
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Gerhard Liener, finance director of Daimler-Benz yesterday ruled out any
move by the German group to take an equity stake in Daf, the struggling
Dutch truck maker.
Mercedes-Benz, the automotive subsidiary of the German engineering and
aerospace group, has been in negotiations with Daf for more than three
months, but Mr Liener appeared yesterday to squash Daf's hopes of gaining
financial support from the German truck maker.
'We do not have any intention of becoming a shareholder,' he said. 'They
would be very happy, if we would buy ourselves into the equity, but we are
not going to do that.'
The tough stance by Daimler-Benz is a considerable setback for Daf, which
announced in August it had been forced to enter discussions on a strategic
alliance.
The Dutch truck maker, in which British Aerospace holds an 11 per cent stake
and which is now in its third year of heavy losses, said it was seeking an
alliance, where the new partner would provide fresh equity, as well as
collaboration to allow it to share products, new product development costs
and plant capacities.
Mr Liener insisted that Mercedes-Benz was only discussing a collaboration in
which the two companies could exchange some components.
Mr Liener said that it would have to be a two-way exchange. Daf has launched
a new medium-heavy truck range, the Daf 75/85, this year, and Mr Liener said
that the German group was considering taking cabs from Daf in a possible
collaboration deal.
Mr Liener insisted that Mercedes-Benz was 'already big enough in trucks in
Europe', where its share in the European Community had jumped to 32 per cent
from only 25 per cent in 1990.
'The more market share grows the more we are exposed to risks. We don't want
more than 32 per cent, that is a peak. We don't want to defend that. That
would be too costly.'
Mr Liener forecast that, as the German market contracts, Mercedes-Benz's
share of the west European truck market (over six tonnes gross vehicle
weight) would fall to 27 per cent to 28 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6576</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: Campbell Soup improves 21%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CAMPBELL SOUP, the US food company which is embroiled in a takeover bid for
Arnotts, the Australian cookie and cracker group, yesterday reported a 21
per cent increase in first-quarter profits, at Dollars 156.6m after tax.
The improvement was scored on sales up by 10 per cent overall, at Dollars
1.7bn, and translated into earnings per share of 62 cents, compared with 51
cents in the same period of last year.
Mr David Johnson, Campbell's chief executive, claimed the advance reflected
a push for markets and increased market shares, with advertising expenditure
increasing by 24 per cent.
In its core North and South America markets, Campbell saw a 9 per cent sales
increase, with a 15 per cent improvement in earnings, and in the much
smaller Europe/Asia division, the gains were 16 per cent and 28 per cent
respectively.
However, although sales in the biscuit and bakery arm advanced by 8 per
cent, profits fell by 11 per cent.
Campbell said sales of its Pepperidge Farm premium cookies remained soft,
because of the recession, and that the earnings dip reflected higher
marketing spending on new Pepperidge Farm and Delacre products.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6577</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: Mercedes-Benz considers assembly
in US
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE, Motor Industry Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MERCEDES-BENZ, the automotive subsidiary of Daimler-Benz, is considering
setting up a passenger vehicle assembly plant in the US, Mr Gerhard Liener,
Daimler-Benz finance director said yesterday.
Such a plant would probably be built as part of its Freightliner heavy truck
operation in the US, he said.
It is believed Mercedes-Benz is examining the long-term potential for
assembling people carriers in the US.
These high-roof estate cars that carry seven to eight people have been
pioneered by the Renault Espace in Europe and the Chrysler Voyager in the
US.
'We might build a plant for another type of vehicle, not for classic
passenger cars,' said Mr Liener.
'There are many new vehicle configurations in the US - electric cars,
four-wheel drive leisure utility vehicles and minivans.
BMW, the German rival of Mercedes-Benz, announced plans earlier this year to
build a car assembly plant in the US in Spartanburg, South Carolina, its
first large facility outside Germany.
Mercedes-Benz will begin small volume car assembly in Mexico in the first
quarter of next year with the long-term target of supplying some cars from
Mexico to North America, said Mr Liener.
Mercedes-Benz was aiming to increase local content in Mexico to a sufficient
level by the second half of the 1990s to allow it to export cars duty free
from Mexico to the US and Canada under the terms of this year's North
America Free Trade Agreement, he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6578</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: BASF tumbles 45% with warning of
worse to come
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PARKES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PRE-TAX profits at BASF, the German chemicals giant, tumbled 45 per cent to
just over DM1bn (Dollars 626m) in the first nine months, and the situation
is worsening, according to Mr Jurgen Strube, group chairman.
'Trends in important markets suggest that growth will become even slower,
and that this pattern will continue into next year,' he told a press
conference yesterday.
Confirming further job cuts of at least 2,000 next year, Mr Strube said that
in October the group's average selling prices were 8 per cent lower than a
year earlier. Volume sales were also starting to fall, and order books last
month were 15 per cent down on October 1991.
The effects of the international recession and the more recent downturn in
Germany showed up in a 2.5 per cent fall in group sales to DM34.2bn for the
period under review.
Pre-tax profits, down 25 per cent in the first quarter and 37 per cent at
the half-year, have now hit a 10-year low as a proportion of sales.
Problems facing the group in 1993 included the slowdown in the automotive
industry, highlighted yesterday in Daimler-Benz's fading profits.
Currency fluctuations, notably the appreciation of the D-Mark against the
dollar, were having a marked effect, and worldwide surplus capacity was
depressing prices, Mr Strube added. Government-imposed health spending cuts,
expected next year, are also likely to hit the group's drugs business which
is one of the few still showing satisfactory sales and earnings.
The company also faces the prospect of massively increased costs to meet the
requirements of environmental legislation either implemented or planned.
Mr Strube, a regular and vigorous critic of Germany's environmental
policies, claimed these would cost the group DM700m in capital spending and
add DM400m a year to operating costs at its main base in Ludwigshafen alone.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6579</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: Downturn of 8% at Daimler-Benz
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PARKES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE SUDDEN reversal of fortunes at Daimler-Benz, Germany's biggest company,
showed up yesterday in an 8 per cent fall in net profits to DM1.27bn
(Dollars 795m) for the first nine months of this year.
The downturn followed increases of 14 per cent in the first quarter and 16
per cent at the halfway mark and was attributed by the company to
'unexpected difficulties' in the key vehicles divisions during the third
quarter.
Although profits fell by half in the three months to the end of September,
markets had been prepared for the bad news after an informal announcement
last weekend that net earnings for the full year were likely to fall by
almost a quarter to DM1.5bn.
Sales in the nine months rose less than 2 per cent to DM70.18bn, with the US
showing a relatively strong 11 per cent increase. The company reacted
cautiously, saying further developments in the US would depend largely on
economic recovery and currency factors.
Mercedes-Benz, the vehicles business which produces more than two-thirds of
group earnings, also reported a 9 per cent increase in US car sales even
though the market was stagnant. However, home market deliveries tumbled 15
per cent, and in the rest of western Europe, only Britain, Spain and
Portugal showed improvements.
The German market for commercial vehicles also nose-dived in the three
months to the end of September.
Domestic sales of trucks, vans and buses, which had improved by 8 per cent
after the first six months, were down 4 per cent at the end of the period
under review.
AEG, the electrical and electronics division, was helped by a 60 per cent
boost in rail systems business to an overall 8 per cent sales gain. Deutsche
Aerospace (Dasa) reported a slight fall in sales to DM11bn during the review
period, but expects the full-year figure to reach DM18bn.
Even so, 'the prospect of a substantial deterioration' is emerging because
of falling orders for aircraft and defence systems, the group said.
Mercedes US plans, Page 26
Lex, Page 20
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6580</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: Renault earnings top FFr7.5bn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
RENAULT, the French state-owned car group, yesterday reported more than
doubled pre-tax profits for the first three quarters of the year, in sharp
contrast to the situation at its Swedish partner, Volvo.
Renault made FFr7.51bn (Dollars 1.39bn) before tax in the nine months to
September, against FFr2.90bn in the same period of 1991, on turnover up by
10.7 per cent over the same period from FFr122.22bn to FFr135.26bn. The
profit comes after a FFr478m charge for Renault's share of Volvo's losses.
The French group attributed its improvement to gains in market share by the
car division, a steep fall in finance charges and reduced losses at Mack,
the US truck unit of Renault Vehicules Industriels (RVI). Cars represent
83.7 per cent of turnover and trucks 13.6 per cent.
However, Renault warned that the outlook was clouded by a fall in
registrations in some of its main export markets and a continuing decline in
demand for heavy trucks. RVI's operating loss in the third quarter was of
the same order as its FFr301m loss for the whole of the first half and the
truck division's outlook for the rest of the year was 'unfavourable', said
Renault. On top of this, the group will be taking the cost of the September
currency crisis in the current quarter.
Group profits in the second half would be well down on the first, though
full-year sales and net profits would still show a significant increase over
1991, said the group. Last year, Renault reported a FFr3.08bn net profit on
sales of FFr166bn.
Renault's turnover in the third quarter of this year reached FFr40.42bn, a
3.7 per cent rise on the FFr39.98bn of the same period in 1991. Pre-tax
profits in the three months to September reached FFr2.06bn, as against
FFr1.94bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6581</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: Audi plans to shed 10% of
workforce
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WALLER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AUDI, the quality car division of Volkswagen, yesterday became the latest in
a line of large German companies to announce large-scale lay-offs in
response to rapidly deteriorating business conditions.
Audi said that it was planning to reduce its workforce by 3,000-4,000 people
next year. This is about 10 per cent of the 37,500 people currently employed
by the group.
The move follows similar drastic measures from other car manufacturers,
including Daimler-Benz which this week announced plans to cut 40,000 jobs by
the end of 1994, mainly in its Mercedes-Benz car subsidiary. Porsche, the
sports car company, is cutting its workforce by almost a quarter.
Audi blamed the move on the the outlook for the economy, which would be much
worse next year. The group said it was necessary to take these structural
measures in order to remain competitive in international markets and to
increase productivity further.
It said discussions over the way in which the jobs would be cut were under
way. Factories in Ingolstadt and Neckarsulm would bear the brunt of the job
losses.
Audi is expecting a significant increase in deliveries this year. However,
in October it cut back production plans from 490,000 to 470,000 vehicles.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6582</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: Deficit of SKr707m at Volvo
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER BROWN-HUMES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
VOLVO, the Swedish motor vehicle group, reported a SKr707m (Dollars 116m)
loss after financial items for the first nine months, with declining demand
for cars and trucks in key markets more than offsetting the benefits of its
rationalisation programme.
The result compares with a SKr1.27bn profit for the same 1991 period.
Sales climbed to SKr58.8bn from SKr55.5bn, although, excluding acquisitions
and divestments, they were down by 1 per cent. The operating loss climbed to
SKr1.52bn from SKr1.25bn.
In the third quarter, the group made a loss after financial items of
SKr604m, compared with a SKr119m profit a year ago. The operating loss was
marginally down at SKr683m from SKr697m, thanks to reduced losses from the
company's car operations.
Earlier this month Volvo announced plans to close two of its three Swedish
car plants and shed 4,500 jobs as part of a continuing rationalisation
programme. The group says it has already cut annual costs by SKr4.3bn since
1990.
Car sales revenue rose 3 per cent to SKr31.6bn in the first nine months,
although only 228,900 vehicles were sold during the period, compared with
238,200 a year ago. Difficult market conditions persisted in the company's
three main markets, Sweden, UK and the US, and the operating result remained
negative.
The truck division also reported a loss for the period, although it was
profitable in the first nine months of 1991. Truck sales were down to 35,500
from 38,400, continuing the trend of the last five quarters. The company
warned that increased demand in North America this year would not offset the
overall downturn, mainly in Europe.
The group said Sweden's decision to float the krona yesterday would have a
negative short-term impact on its result.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6583</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / International Company News: Third-quarter profit at
Lufthansa
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WALLER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
LUFTHANSA, the struggling German airline, yesterday reported a profit for
the third quarter but warned that it would revert to losses in the final
three months of 1992.
The company said that in September it made its first monthly profit this
year, and that total pre-tax losses for the first nine months were DM262m
(Dollars 164m), down from a first-half loss of DM542m, meaning that it made
a profit of DM280m in the third quarter.
The improvement was less due to business fundamentals than to the effects of
an accounting change, the company said. In September the airline announced
that it would switch to a less conservative depreciation policy for its
aircraft and it said yesterday that this was the main reason for the better
result.
The airline said that it achieved a significant increase in passengers
carried and a further reduction in the rate of cost increases during the
third quarter. Sales for the nine months rose 4.7 per cent to around DM11bn
while the number of passengers climbed sharply, by 14 per cent to 20.8m.
However, it warned that conditions in the industry continued to be bad, with
prices under pressure because of intense competition. Another negative
factor was the appreciation of the D-Mark which hit profits by DM254m in the
nine months and by DM142m in the third quarter alone.
Lufthansa said that the figures gave no reason to relax the current campaign
to cut costs in all areas of the business and that it was too early to say
that the company had turned the profits corner. For seasonal reasons, the
fourth quarter usually brought a loss, the company warned.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6584</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNADOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Redundancy costs cut Clydesdale
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BUXTON, Scottish Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CLYDESDALE BANK, the Glasgow-based subsidiary of National Australia Bank,
saw its pre-tax profits fall by Pounds 5m to Pounds 59m for the year to
September 30.
Operating profit was 13 per cent higher at Pounds 67.4m (Pounds 64m),
despite a jump from Pounds 28.9m to Pounds 37.4m in provisions for bad and
doubtful debts.
The pre-tax figure was after exceptional charges of Pounds 8.4m to cover
redundancy costs.
A year ago the bank, which was bought in 1987 from Midland Bank, began to
shed 700 jobs at its Glasgow head office as new technology came into use.
Staff numbers have fallen by a total of 530 to a little less than 7,000,
half through redundancies and the rest by natural wastage.
Sir David Nickson, who last December succeeded Sir Eric Yarrow as chairman,
described the results as 'not unsatisfactory' in the 'worst worldwide
economic recession since the 1930s'.
But Mr Charles Love, who recently took over as chief executive from Mr
Richard Cole-Hamilton, said he did not expect recovery in the Scottish
economy until 1994. 'There are no green shoots in Scotland.'
Mr Cole-Hamilton, who leaves the bank at the end of the year, said that bad
debt provisions accounting for 0.88 per cent of total lending compared well
with other banks. Clydesdale, which operates mainly in Scotland, had steered
clear of problems in the City of London, but 'the recession has gone on too
long for a lot of our customers in Scotland'.
Staff costs rose by 1 per cent, while other costs went up by 4 per cent. The
cost/income ratio was static at 67 per cent including the exceptional item,
but fell to 64.5 per cent without it. Total assets grew 12 per cent to
Pounds 5.7bn.
Mr Love, formerly chief executive of TSB Bank Scotland, said that he saw
opportunities for the Clydesdale to 'leverage in' lessons from the parent
company.
He wanted to fill holes in the bank's coverage of the Scottish market by
developing a greater presence in the east of the country. Its strengths at
the moment are in the Glasgow area and around Aberdeen.
NAB results - Page 27
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6585</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Yorkshire Bank down 40% in 'tough year' -
Bad debts hit National Australia's subsidiaries
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MATTHEW CURTIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
YORKSHIRE BANK, a sub-sidiary of National Australia Bank, yesterday reported
a 40 per cent drop, from Pounds 107m to Pounds 64.6m, in pre-tax profit in
the 12 months to September 30 following a steep rise in the provision for
bad debt.
Mr David Knight, chief executive, said the bank had pulled through a tough
year, but confidence last November that loan loss provisions would not rise
significantly had proved misplaced.
The charge for bad debts jumped from Pounds 76.1m to Pounds 133.9m.
Mr Knight said: 'There was a degree of optimism at the start of the year,
but not only was there no recovery, conditions deteriorated. In addition, we
felt the impact of the recession moving north.'
However, he said the bank's retail business performed well, increasing its
share of core markets and tightening its control of costs.
Total assets were Pounds 4.24bn (Pounds 4.41bn).
The cost/income ratio was 46.7 per cent, compared with 47.5 per cent, which
Mr Knight said confirmed Yorkshire's position as a low cost operator.
The balance sheet remained strong with tier 1 and tier 2 capital at 6.8 per
cent and 2.8 per cent of total assets respectively.
The bank's branch network continued to expand, with five new branches opened
in King's Lynn, Cheltenham, Gloucester, Telford and Stevenage.
Belfast-based Northern Bank, another subsidiary of National Australia, also
suffered an increase in bad debt provisions.
They amounted to Pounds 7.61m (Pounds 4.69m) but were described by Sir
Desmond Lorimer, chairman, as 'well below the norm for clearing banks in the
British Isles'.
There was an exceptional charge of Pounds 7.85m (Pounds 1.5m), to leave
pre-tax profit down 26 per cent at Pounds 43.1m (Pounds 58.6m).
The exceptional charge covered a judgment in the Irish High Court in respect
of a claim brought by a Norwegian bank, relating to a foreign trade
transaction originating in 1986 in the Republic.
An appeal has been lodged.
'We are weathering the recession well' Sir Desmond added. 'We have a
dominant position in the market-place, an asset book of sound quality and a
strong capital position.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6586</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNADMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Penna up 18p as recovery continues
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BOLGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES IN Penna, the holding company for the Sanders &amp; Sidney outplacement
consultancy, yesterday rose 18p to 224p as the company continued its
recovery from last year's losses, writes Andrew Bolger
Pre-tax profits were Pounds 1.03m in the six months to September 30,
compared with a loss of Pounds 251,000 last time. Turnover rose from Pounds
3.25m to Pounds 5.42m.
The shares, one of the best-performers on the USM last year fell from a peak
of 328p to 80p after a profits warning in October. In December the company
produced even worse figures than predicted.
Mr John Beard, chief executive, said the group had achieved its objective of
building on the improved performance in the second half of last year.
Sanders &amp; Sidney, the executive employment counselling specialist, said
there was a strong advance in all its offices and all sectors.
Mr Beard said: 'The outlook for Sanders &amp; Sidney in the second half is
encouraging.
Earnings per share were 13.9p (losses 3.9p). The interim dividend is 3p
(1p).
See Observer
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6587</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNADLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / UK Company News: Sullivan trying again for the Post
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR DAVID Sullivan, the controversial publisher of the Sunday Sport, is
planning to try again to get a controlling interest in the Bristol Evening
Post group.
An approach was blocked two years ago by Mr Nicholas Ridley, the trade and
industry secretary, after a Monopolies and Mergers Commission investigation
on the grounds that it would not be in the public interest.
As the Bristol Post yesterday revealed a 44 per cent increase in pre-tax
profits to Pounds 2.83m in the six months to September, Mr Sullivan said he
planned to return to the MMC.
'Last time I had no track record in running newspapers apart from the Daily
Sport; now I have the Sunday News and Echo,' Mr Sullivan said. The News and
Echo is an orthodox newspaper circulating in the north of England with a
claimed circulation of about 70,000.
Mr Sullivan, an unwelcome 10 per cent shareholder in the Bristol Post,
described the results as competent rather than brilliant.
'They are gradually doing things I said they should do such as closing down
newsagents that weren't making money,' he added.
Bristol Post's pre-tax profit increase, from Pounds 1.96m last year, was
achieved despite static turnover of Pounds 17m in the main newspaper
publishing business and a depressed advertising environment.
Mr Michael Gay, chief executive, said the group was benefiting from
rationalisation and improvements to operating methods. In the main newspaper
division staff numbers had been reduced by 14 per cent, or 127. Further cost
savings are likely at the group, which also runs confectionery and newsagent
shops and has distribution and property interests.
Mr Gay said changes were not related to the presence of Mr Sullivan, who had
been seeking, unsuccessfully, a seat on the board to give 'a younger, more
dynamic input to the company.'
Technological developments and lower advertising volumes will enable the
group to make a further reduction of more than 50 staff this year.
The Pounds 830,000 trading profit in the newspaper division was greater than
that in the 52 weeks to the end of March. All sections increased their
profits; group sales rose nearly 3 per cent to Pounds 30.9m.
Earnings per share rose to 7.95p (6.04p) and the interim dividend is lifted
to 4p (3.75p).
Mr Mark Beilby, media analyst at stockbrokers SG Warburg, described the
result as a solid set of figures. 'It shows that newspaper groups can do
pretty well despite the recession.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT924-6588</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CKTBNADJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>921120
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 NOV 92 / UK Company News: M&amp;G Recovery and M&amp;G Income
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Two new M&amp;G funds have announced results and dividends.
At September 30 1992, M&amp;G Recovery Investment Trust had a net asset value of
32.13p for capital shares and 47.32p for zero dividend preference shares.
The trust was launched in March. It paid an interim dividend of 0.85p in
September and has now declared a further 0.85p towards meeting its forecast
of a 3.75p total for the year ending March 31 1993.
Net revenue for the period to September 30 was Pounds 3.31m for earnings of
2.55p per share.
M&amp;G Income Investment Trust, launched in October 1991, saw gross revenue
reach Pounds 18.9m for the period ended October 31 1992.
Earnings per share were 5.3p and a fourth interim dividend of 1.3875p is
declared to make 4.9125p.
Net asset value on October 31 for the capital shares was 50.06p and for the
zero dividend preference shares 38.17p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
